



But, there was no way these people would loosen their hand just from seeing that,



"I think it's better using Goshujin-sama's transmutation though."



While whispering that kind of thing, Tio was hovering in the sky while flapping her wings, both her hands were joined into a shape like a jaw and black magic power was focused there. And then, she released that in one go. Dragon's breath that was compressed in this way became a piercing attack.



The attack that was fired advanced in spiraling motion like a thin lance, it impacted the place Shia pulverized accurately and pierced the head of the divine beast.



The black spear went through the head and entered inside the mouth, without stopping it pierced to outside from inside the throat and the attack continued to pierce the sea.



A fatal wound. Everyone who saw that would surely think so, but it seemed that was still insufficient to kill a divine beast that was superior even compared to the ancient monster.



GUAAAAN!!



The divine beast didn't die instantly, it raised a sound that was a little high-pitched and sea water crawled up its body. And then, when the place that was destroyed was covered by water, the water was swallowed into the wound. Right after that, the wound bulged and recovered like a rewound video.



"Uhee, by any chance, it can recover as long as it has sea water, something like that?"



"In that case, it will take time to kill it completely. It will be best if we art able to destroy its magic stone but…Goshujin-sama, how doth it goes regarding that?"



Tio landed beside Hajime while asking.



Hajime was looking at the divine beast with a strange glint in his eyes while shaking his head.



"No, I cannot find its magic stone. There is a chance I overlook it with how large its body is but…magic stone will grow large in the proportion of the monster's size, with how much I'm looking but still cannot find it I guess it doesn't have it from the start. Its whole body is dyed reddish black just like the Evil Eater."



"Muu, how troublesome. I don't feel we art going to lose at all, but I want to avoid wasting time…"



"What to do, Hajime-san?"



Ancient monster seemed to be the ancestor of monsters. Shia and Tio frowned from hearing that this monster was the same type with that ancient monster that they once fought.



But, in contrast Hajime only shrugged lightly.



"Facing a giant sea monster like this, the theory is to enter its body and attack from the inside right?"



"Ah, the thing just now…"



Shia raised her voice as though she was noticing something.



Right at that moment, the divine beast whose head was in the middle of recovering raised a scream as though to drown Shia's voice.



aAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!



It was unmistakably a shriek. Its whole body was writhing as though being in an intense agony.



Looking at that state, Tio also nodded in understanding while asking Hajime.



"By the way o Goshujin-sama. What art the meal course?"



"Broiled eel roasted by tar from the inside. The garnish dishes are explosive and deadly poison."



"Oou…hearing that, I feel a little sympathy for it."



Hajime's quick answer made Tio sent a pitying gaze to the divine beast as though she was looking at a poor thing.



As for the divine beast in question, it was shrieking while writhing around fiercely without stopping.



That couldn't be helped. After all, the crossbit that was sent inside its body opened a gate and poured down a large amount of tar and explosive inside, in addition it also scattered around the strongest poison that was the product of the abyss, where in the end, all of those were lit on fire all at once. Like that even its hard scales were irrelevant.



The divine beast began to drink sea water. Surely it was trying to fill its body with sea water in the attempt to heal. But, that was a bad move.



As though to proof that, right after the divine beast drunk sea water, a part of its torso burst up along with a grand explosion sound. Flame blast also jetted out from its mouth. A scream filled with bewilderment rose from the divine beast.



"Giving a lot of water to flame above three thousand Celsius…obviously a vapor explosion is going to happen. Ah, a beast won't know anything like that huh."



"That is, someone who had ever set flame inside the body of something like that must be only Hajime-san. This is absolutely its first experience with that desu."



"How unpleasant, this first experience is. …No, rather is it not a lovely first experience instead?"



"Don't get deeper and deeper into your fetish. It's scary when I wonder if you are going to demand something that is incorrigible even for me in the future."



Hajime's expression became unpleasant from hearing Tio's nonsense. And then, ignoring Tio who was going 'ehe ehe' shyly for some reason, his gaze returned at the divine beast.



The divine beast who somehow felt like it was giving off an air of despair from experiencing how the damage in his body got increased instead when it tried to recover. Even so, perhaps because of its dignity as a powerful monster, even while spouting out a lot of blood it was glaring at Hajime with eye glint boiling with killing intent.



Hajime who received that gaze…licked his lips for some reason.



The divine beast twitched.



Hajime murmured to himself while floating a fierce smile to that divine beast.



"I want to eat…"



" "Eh?" "



Even though it was a small whisper, regardless of the stormy wind and the raging sea, for some reason those words resounded clearly, it caused Shia and Tio to whip their head quickly at Hajime.



The divine beast too, even though it was supposed to writhe in agony, its movement stopped still and its gaze was fixed at Hajime.



Hajime was directing his eyes that were strangely sparkling since some time ago at the divine beast, while whispering further.



"Its flesh is nicely filled to the brim with strength. If it's this beast, than it surely can become even my nourishment."



And then, he licked his lips one more time.



With that finally even the divine beast noticed.



The enemy before its eyes, the fiercely glaring gaze this enemy directed at itself wasn't something easy to understand like hostility or killing intent…it was an appetite for food.



With a shudder, a chill that the beast had never felt since it was born ran through its whole body. Unaware, the divine beast was 'drawing away' unbecomingly. The gaze that was by no means had never been directed to it who was an existence that stood at the top of food chain――that gaze from the predator caused an indescribable terror to invade its body.



This person wouldn't be able to do it――the monster didn't think of anything like that. At present, the one who was cornered like this was itself. The divine beast was convinced. If it kept fighting on, itself would be definitely…eaten.



The moment it understood that, the divine beast turned aside adroitly with an agility that surprised even itself. The heat inside its body that was burning it up, or the pain of the invading poison, or the impact of the explosion when sea water touched the burning in its body, it ignored all of those and poured all its strength just to escape earnestly.



The divine beast that attempted to escape with a resoluteness that should be nonexistent for the strongest level of monster made even Hajime to get taken aback for a moment. That was just how splendid the escape was. As though *pyu~* such sound effect was accompanying its escape.



"-, bastaard. Wait, meaat! How can you run away despite being a divine beast huh!"



PIGYAAA―――!!



When Hajime used the crossbit inside the divine beast in panic to try to stop it in its track, the divine beast raised a roar that sounded a little pathetic, that long body deflated just for a moment, and then it vomited a large amount of sea water that made one wanted to ask just from where it took all of that from.



Naturally, explosions occurred grandly, parts of here and there of its body were blown up, yet it somehow managed to vomit out the crossbit. And then, it manipulated the sea water to make several tornados on the sea, it directed them to Hajime while diving into the bottom of the sea at full speed.



"Let, me, eat, the, meat, of you, bastaaard~"



While blowing away the tornados that were approaching from all directions using impact conversion of magic power, Hajime demanded for the divine beast's meat with a voice that resembled a deeply held grudge.



The divine beast that looked back just for an instant from under the sea surface met the bloodshot gaze of the tiny being demanding its meat, while harboring a tremendous terror to that, it averted its gaze in panic as though to say "I've seen what must not be seen".



And then,



PIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII~~~~!!



While a crying voice that had surpassed being pathetic and instead invited pity was resounding in the air, its figure vanished into the darkness of the deep sea. It felt like they could hear something that somehow sounded like "I won't come out from home anymoreee~", but surely it was just their feeling though.



"Son of a bitch! It should be impossible for a monster of that level to immediately decide to escape! Even though it's a chance to power up at this last minute!"



Perhaps because the divine beast had disappeared, the dark cloud was dispersing and the stormy sea was recovering its calm once more, amidst all that Hajime stamped his feet in frustration.



There, Shia and Tio were approaching with an exasperated gaze.



"For Goshujin-sama, even a divine beast is already nothing but predation target."



"Until now surely it had never been looked at with that kind of gaze, that's why it has no endurance isn't it. Its last cry, it sounded a little pitiful. Perhaps this will even become a trauma for it that turns it into a shut-in after this."



"Chih, that snake got no guts."



There was no doubt that surely not even in a dream that a divine beast of all things could have its bravery to be questioned.



Hajime stored the returning crossbit in a bad mood and took out his compass once more to decide the route.



Then, right at that timing, ahead of Hajime and others' gaze, the space a few kilometers separated from them began to shake like jelly. And then, after a few moments the space melted and disappeared and a large island appeared from the space gap.



"…It seemed, there is an entrance to the next space at the center of that island."



"Does it appear because the divine beast withdrew?"



"That possibility art high. No one would even imagine that it would withdraw in that way though."



Shia and Tio sent a gaze of pity at the spot where the traumatized divine beast vanished, and then they followed Hajime's lead and departed from that spot.



It appeared that the island had quite the size. The island was covered with really tall trees that could reach a few dozen meters in the whole, other than the shoreline they couldn't see the ground at all. The entrance to the next space seemed to be at the center of that forest.



And then, Shia's rabbit ears sensed that powerful monsters were running rampant in large number there, especially at the center part.



The monsters weren't at the level of the divine beast, but every single one of them was a powerful monster. They wouldn't lose against the monsters, but the monsters' number was a lot so it felt like it would take quiet the time to fight the monsters just like against the divine beast.



Shia asked Hajime "What to do?" with her gaze.



Hajime took out 'Shuragen AA' from 'Treasure Warehouse II' once again and took a kneeling posture on his skyboard and entered a sniping stance. Using heat detection, the scope penetrated the trees and projected only the image of living things.



"Aa, don't tell me Hajime-san is…"



"Wait a bit. I'll take care of this right away. This is a lightning speed accurate bombardment from outside their detection. Surely they won't be able to react. I'll blow away the head of things that looks troublesome."



Shia took the confirmation from Hajime with a cramped face, and then crimson flash rushed through the sky instantly.



That streak of flash wasn't noticed at all by a giant gorilla that looked like a giant kong walking heavily deep inside the forest, its head got blown away instantly, and its brain matter was scattered everywhere. Next the bullet impacted the ground and a large crater was created with the trees on the area got blown away.



Furthermore, thunderous sounds reverberated in succession. From a far distance of more than ten kilometers, the lights of death that flew at a speed that was impossible to detect dispersed one after another the heads of the giant monsters loitering around the area that seemed to be the space entrance. The thick forest was instantly turned into a battlefield site that was littered with holes.



"Surely, after defeating the divine beast, next powerful monsters would go ROAR! in a great swarm and the intruder would go Kyaa, what a disaster! Originally this must be for something like that isn't it."



"Well, this art not a labyrinth so this art not even a trial…though there art no doubt that this art intended to be obstacles perchance."



While half laughing Shia and Tio remembered the time until now, where Hajime easily removed the obstacles using methods other than frontal attack, that was why the two of them hadn't made any significant contributions yet.



Both of them exchanged gazes filled to the brim with sympathy to each other from how their expectation of rampaging with their all in order to take back Yue was betrayed.



But, that ardor would be demonstrated just before they reached Yue's location.



After massacring the island's monsters one-sidedly, Hajime and others transferred to the next space from the stone statue at the center of the forest and leaped out into a world of sky where several gigantic islands were floating.



There were islands with a diameter of only a few dozen meters, but there were also islands with a scale of a few kilometers. River water was continuing to flow down from the edge of the floating islands without end with some kind of mysterious logic. Because of the height, the water became mist after some distance of falling as waterfall, the scenery of white mist drifting at the surrounding was very fantastical.



Above all the floating islands were overflowing with greenery, there were plains and also forests. There was not a single floating island that was merely a floating rock.



Sea of clouds was spreading below. The clouds lingered at the height of their gaze, drifting on the sky like cotton candy. Even now it felt like the clouds were giving off a sweet aroma.



Even though there was no sun, but brilliant light was pouring down, light pillar weaved through the gaps of the clouds――several of what was commonly called as 'ladder of angel' could be seen.



There were white clouds overflowing with great numbers of floating islands, and then there were also beams of light pouring down.



It was truly a solemnly mystical scenery. If someone who didn't know anything was told that this place was heaven then they would unconditionally believe it.



After their gazes were stolen just for a little while by that scene, Hajime and others shook their head and advanced forward. Their objective was the floating island that looked conspicuously large even among all the many floating islands. The compass was pointing at there.



They flew their skyboard and closed the distance in the blink of eye. At the same time, they caught strong presence at that floating island.



Before Hajime and others who narrowed their eyes in vigilance, that guy appeared.



"As expected you came. Nagumo Hajime. The fool who defy god."



With silver wings and hair that looked like an apostle rustling from the wind, the monster user devil race――Freed Bagua was there.





Chapter 169




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. He also did the edits.



____________________________________________________



White Divine Dragon and the Platinum Apostle



On the gigantic island with diameter around ten-odd kilometer.



There were grass plain and forest, with branching small rivers in between, where the upper stream was linked toward the mountain with bountiful greenery.



A chalk white obelisk was enshrined at the grass plain area of that floating island. The huge tower that was around fifty meters tall looked out of place in the middle of the magnificent nature. Coupled with that artificial whiteness, it looked strangely conspicuous.



But, something even more standing out existed further above that obelisk, it was a silver colored man sitting cross-legged on a shining magic circle. His silver hair and wings fluttered in the wind. His skin was so white that it looked transparent, even the color of his eye pupils looked shining radiantly silver.



His clothing looked like a pure white priest outfit. Coupled with his calm and self-possessed state, his appearance gave a divine impression. If anyone who didn't know anything saw him, they would surely think that a messenger from heaven had descended.



The first voice that man, Freed Bagua let out made Hajime who was facing him to snort while he started talking frivolously.



"Is that new fashion? If that's the case then there is nothing I can say except you have got no fashion sense at all. It's because you are still accepting the clothes that your parent(god) prepared for you without protesting that you looked incredulous like that. Your red hair and darkish skin before this looked manlier you know?"



Hearing Hajime's speech, Tio and Shia burst into a snort "bufuh" beside him. Perhaps the two of them also had such experience, that the clothing that parents prepared for their children was usually embarrassing. Just what kind of clothing that Karm and Adol presented to their daughter, and then, the complicated expression that Shia and Tio surely made at that time…it was something that made Hajime felt relatively curious.



Although, Freed who was obviously got made fun of only reacted slightly with a twitch of his eyebrow from that speech, his calm behavior still didn't break. And then, as though to say that he got no intention to follow along with Hajime's frivolous talk, he talked with a cold voice.



"…Indeed, you really are still alive. When Aruvheit-sama didn't come back, and my lord informed me that you are going to come, I thought what kind of a joke is that yet…truly what an obstinate man you are. It would be better if you just graciously die."



"Hee, so that shitty bastard Ehito predicted this. Well, I guess he at least has that much brain. He understands just how great my feeling toward Yue is after all. So? What about you? Were you told to defeat us here? Getting ordered to come to your suicide here, what a cruel order that is. So that's why your hair got totally white like that then, because of the stress huh."



Once more, snorting sounds "buhoh" could be heard from Hajime's both sides.



Freed ignored the sympathetic gaze that said "Freed-kun, you really got it hard" which was directed at him and continued on talking.



"No matter the time you are still screwing around. Really, you don't seem like a man whose woman is taken away at all."



"Yue is the best woman there is after all. It can't be helped that she is popular. I only need to straighten up all the guys who laid her hand on her. Even the master you are proud of, I'll carve a lot of agonies and regret into him before killing him."



"That haughtiness, it will be immediately broken apart. My lord has already grasped that body perfectly. There is not even a one in million chance for you to take back your woman."



As though to beat despair into Hajime, as though to show that it was the truth, Freed informed Hajime using a matter-of-fact tone without getting worked-up at all.



However, in regard to that Hajime's face contained not even a single trace of agitation. Rather, he was giving back a fearless smile.



"The one who is calling me irregular is your side you know? Something like a worthless scenario that you guys prepared, I'm going to messed them up into pieces."



"…"



Hajime and Freed exchanged gazes wordlessly for a while. The Wind of killing intent began to blow suddenly. That atmosphere which licked at the skin like coiling snake was truly apt to be described as an explosive situation.



Hajime's finger touched Donner, at that moment, Freed opened his mouth as though to beat Hajime to the punch.



"Your previous question."



"Aa?"



"Your question of 'were you told to defeat us'――half is correct."



"Half?"



With his hand still touching Donner, Hajime narrowed his eyes questioningly in a state where he could draw his gun and shoot anytime.



Freed suddenly stood up from his cross-legged sitting posture and flapped his silver wings to float in the air, then he opened his mouth.



"My lord――Ehitorujue-sama granted me the command to let you pass without any obstruction when you arrived at this place. There is nothing more mortifying then the lost of my chance to strangle you to death with this hand, but it's still inevitable for your life to meet its end."



"Hou. Then? During that time you are going to face Shio and Thia, that's what you mean?"



"Exactly. While you are receiving divine punishment from my lord, I'll thoroughly torture to death the women who love you dearly."



Right after Freed said that, the obelisk shined radiantly.



Hajime drew out Donner with the end of the talk. The fired bullet became a red flash and approached Freed's forehead.



However,



*GIIN!*



A hard sound reverberated, that attack was completely blocked. When Hajime looked, it was as though the bullet crashed into an invisible wall in front of Freed, the bullet flattened and stopped midair.



"If you think that my space magic is the same like before than that's a great mistake."



It appeared Freed had laid out a protective wall of space isolator around himself beforehand. From how Hajime's magic eye stone was unable to detect the wall, then it was just like Freed said, his level in space magic had increased.



At that moment where Hajime's first attack was blocked and a bit of time was bought, the obelisk that was emitting strong radiance shined explosively.



The white light completely dyed their field of vision. But, Hajime's magic eye stone that wasn't affected by the amount of light accurately caught what kind of phenomenon this was.



Before long, the light settled down, and what flew into their cleared up field of vision was the scenery of a great swarm of monsters clamoring together to the degree that no empty space could be seen. Their number was definitely in four digits. Roughly there might be around two thousand monsters.



From each and every single monster, they could feel the strength at the level of the monster at the lowest level of the abyss at the very least. There were also monsters that they had encountered before, but based on their appearance every single one had been evolved.



A black wolf with four reddish black eyes had its head increased by two like a watchdog of hell. A black panther with tentacles seemed to be combined with a chimera, it had draconic claws and snake tail while the air at its surrounding was flickering. A monster with horse head Ahatd had further two arms added, and it was also further enveloped in reddish black magic power that seemed to be 'Vajra'.



Especially the dragon flock that covered the sky, every single one appeared to possess strength at the same level with the white dragon that they faced at Guryuen Grand Volcano.



And then, the leader of that dragon flock, the white dragon that was also the partner of Freed, it was emitting an absurd pressure that easily surpassed all the monsters. Its physique was already nearly twenty meters big Its pure white scales were giving off the radiance of steel. The wings on its back increased to two pairs of four wings, each time it breathed pure white spark was surging from its mouth.



The scar on its chest was exposed with ferocious dignity. Its magnificent body was shining brilliantly and emitted divinity. A white dragon that came out in legend――or perhaps it should be called as a white colored holy dragon, a white divine dragon. In any case, it appeared to have a strength that easily surpassed the divine beast leviathan that they encountered just now.



Hajime and others were surrounded by a few hundred, a few thousand monsters of abnormal level, the fierce killing intent was showered on them from all direction, amidst that Freed was floating calmly right at the side of the white divine dragon with his silver wings flapping.



"Now, Nagumo Hajime. You can leave behind the women who love you dearly in this despair and progress ahead."



Hajime directed a scorning smile toward Freed who elaborated this disgusting plan where Hajime had to leave behind Shia and Tio among this swarm in order to meet her beloved woman.



"Are you idiot? Just why do I have to listen to what you are saying? I can just instant-killed all of you before going forward brazenly."



There was no need to purposefully divide their battle strength in front of the enemy. Hajime who talked that doing this with all three of them was faster was given a cold gaze by Freed.



And then, he proclaimed.



"No, you are going to go ahead. To head toward despair, alone by yourself."



"Hah, saying whatever you like――!?"



Instantly a golden light poured down toward Hajime. The 'angel's ladder' that suddenly appeared from the gap of the clouds really resembled the torrent of light that once captured Yue.



"Hajime-san!"



"Goshujin-sama-"



Shia and Tio, perhaps remembering that time they reached out their hand toward Hajime with a slightly uneasy voice. As expected, their hand was repelled away.



Hajime was going to take out his pile bunker to show that the same trick wouldn't work the second time. However, Freed opened his mouth faster than that.



"That light was a light of teleportation. It will lead toward the location of your 'beloved'."



Hearing that stopped Hajime's hand for an instant. Indeed, the light that was pouring down right now didn't have a harming effect at him for even a bit, it felt like it was connected with a space somewhere.



But, Hajime immediately rethought his thinking and he was going to destroy the light torrent. He could just exterminate Freed and the monsters together with Shia and Tio, then go to Yue altogether. As expected, he was unwilling to leave behind just the two of them in this space.



But, the one who stopped such Hajime was no other than Shia and Tio.



"Hajime-san, please go ahead."



"Truly. It's an invitation that art hard to come by. Just the two of us art enough to take care of this side."



Hajime's eyes widened slightly. But the two added more words without being concerned of that.



"Leave this place to us and go ahead! I wanted to try saying that sentence at least once desu."



"Doon't worry, we art going to follow immediately after finishing here. Fufufu."



Hajime's face turned exasperated toward the rabbit and the no good dragon who sent him a wink while raising their death flag daringly. And then, he also sensed how they were seriously telling him to go ahead even while joking around.



That was a scolding toward him not to let go of the chance to arrive at Yue's location even if it was at a stage that the opponent prepared, it was also a resolve to not let any other to become hindrance at his battle against Ehito, it was also their faith that if it was Hajime then he would surely rescue Yue without fail, and it was also the expression of their confidence that if it was the two of them then they would make it somehow against a situation of just this level.



Hajime's figure was fading. He was being transferred to another different place. Although Hajime was slightly hesitant, he directed a gaze that was filled with his utmost trust at the resolved Shia and Tio and strongly nodded.



In actuality, it was outside of their expectation for the inside of [Holy Precincts] to have this many varied spaces contained inside it. They had the compass, so they didn't get lost in searching Yue's whereabouts. But, if for example, Ehito rearranged the spaces' configuration like a block game or if he could teleport without limitation, then there was the risk that this would become an endless chase.



In that aspect, it was honestly painful when the degraded version crystal key broke when they entered the [Holy Precincts]. In the worst case, there would be a need for Hajime to recycle the very small amount of god crystal he used for his other artifact to create a new degraded crystal key, so if the other side was giving him the invitation then it was an unexpected windfall for him.



Shia and Tio also understood about that, for that reason they proposed this dispersion of battle strength that could be said as a bad move.



"Got it. Shia, Tio…"



"Yes desu."



"Yes."



Just before Hajime was teleported, he made a fierce smile and left behind his words to the two in exchange for leaving from here.



"No need to hold back. Kill them all…in a way fitting as my women."



"Yes, siiir desuu!"



"Fufu, leave it to us!"



Shia and Tio were also returning a smile that looked like a wild beast at Hajime.



At that moment, the light dispersed and along with it, Hajime's figure vanished.



The two who were left behind――Shia was tapping her war hammer Vire Doryukken on her shoulder while glaring over the monsters around them, while Tio was cracking her neck audibly with a somehow bewitching smile on her face.



"Now then, it seemed that you said something about torturing us to death or something but…"



"Instead, the one who wouldst be made sport to death art thou, just like all those time before, and from here on too. Thou art truly a man without any learning capability."



While being surrounded by several hundred, several thousand monsters of absurd level, far from having their calm expression crumbling, Shia and Tio were instead giving Freed a gaze as though they were looking at an idiot. Freed narrowed his eyes to that.



"Don't think that I am the same like the me before this. This power that I was bestowed by my lord――putting aside that monster, there is no doubt that I have surpassed the likes of you two. Prepare yourself. The bitterness of being looked down, I'll return it completely, no, I'll return it by several folds to the two of you. The two of you can meet your end while yelling that man's name with your death cry."



"Enough with the tedious talk desu. Crushed, beaten up, punched, exploded, splattered, they are all similar, but I'll let you chose the method that you preferred to be massacred with."



"So this is what art called as big talk. Let me taught thou this thing called as the difference in status."



Both sides sent each other caustic words.



A beat.



Killing intent burst out from the whole body of each of them.



And then,



"Kill them-!"



"I'll kill you to death desu-!"



"Be annihilated-!"



The spark of battle was lit up.



Rain of aurora rained down from the sky, immense blazes were spat out from three-headed wolves, violent shockwave surged from the six-armed horse-heads, silver flash and a large amount of feathers rushed from the front.



Lethal attacks from all directions. The field of vision of Shia and Tio were completely covered with death.



But,



"Tio-san, two steps to the right, drop a little then go three steps ahead desu."



"Right, that helped."



Tio moved almost reflexively following Shia's murmur. Aurora poured down at the spot where she was at just a moment before, furthermore when Tio lowered his altitude shockwave passed through above, and when she stepped forward she evaded silver feathers in return.



At the same time, Shia was also similarly taking steps as though she was dancing in midair. She slipped through the gaps of the attacks as though it was actually the attacks that were avoiding Shia.



The place where Shia moved at, and then, the place where Tio moved at following Shia's instruction, those places were places with the thinnest concentration of attack.



The derivation of characteristic magic 'Future Sight', the 'Revelation Sight'――an ability that could automatically take a peek at the future a few seconds ahead. Shia predicted the trajectory of attack with this ability and calculated the safe spot swiftly.



Nevertheless, it was not an exaggeration to say that the density of the attacks sent to them was like a wall. Even if they moved to the place where it was relatively harder to be hit, that didn't mean that they were unharmed.



Therefore,



"URYAAAAAAAA-!!"



"Just this much-!"



Shia took out from the empty air a kendama made from adamantium and coated with sealing stone, and then she launched it instantly overhead. Vire Doryukken struck the metal ball and a thunderous sound roared, at the same time the kendama was rising to the sky with a violent momentum like a rocket flying to space.



The surface that was coated with sealing stone displayed its trait fully and reduced the intensity of the rain of aurora. Next, the aurora rain was snapped away to far beyond due to the kendama's pure destructive force.



And then, for a brief time, the gray dragon that was defenseless due to firing the aurora could only get startled funnily by the approaching metallic mass from below. At the next moment, *mekyo!* such graphic sound resounded and while the kendama was sinking into its stomach, the dragon was further blown away to the sky.



The gray dragon got the bones in its whole body got pulverized and disappeared at beyond the sky. An instant later Shia then appeared at the place where that dragon was at as though in replacement, without stopping she used the chain to swing around the kendama, giving rise to a whirlwind that beaten to death the surrounding gray dragons.



Freed slightly narrowed his eyes toward such Shia, but when he directed his gaze at Tio who was left behind, there he could see the figure of Tio who was crossing her arms while getting swallowed by the impact of light and blaze.



Although in that spot the attack was relatively fewer, but she was still getting hit by attacks at the amount that might be enough to inflict lethal wound considering the level of the power of the attacks.



However,



"That appearance…"



"Hmph, compared to Goshujin-sama's reward, this level of pain art too lukewarm."



Tio was floating unmoving with a fearless smile while saying such sentence. Her appearance was completely changed compared to her appearance just a moment before.



First of all, the color of her skin was different. Her beautiful skin that was like porcelain was now covered with jet black color, only her golden eyes were piercingly shining in there. Looking carefully, Freed noticed that the source of the jet black color was from dragon scales on her skin.



It was the derivative skill 'Partial Dragonification' from characteristic magic 'Dragonification'. The dragon scale that originally could only came out in Tio's black dragon form was now being put on like a chainmail so that it wouldn't obstruct the movement of her small human form. Furthermore, using 'Dragon Scale Hardening' that increased the hardness of the scale in respond to the magic power consumption, Tio completely endured all the attacks solidly.



Of course, if Tio was actually hit by all the attacks then the damage would pass through, but with Shia's help the number of attacks that she got hit with decreased remarkably, she would have no trouble at all if she only got hit by one or two of each variation of attack.



By the way, the reason Tio didn't turn into dragon completely was purely because her human form was more maneuverable and it was also harder to hit her because she was a smaller target like this. Although her physical strength dropped compared with the state of complete dragonification, she had already mastered the 'Partial Dragonification' to the degree that there was not that much difference in defensive capability aspect, so this state was convenient for her in this case.



If this technique was to be given a name then this would be composite dragonification and metamorphosis magic――the 'Dragon Scale Armor'.



"A return gift!"



The instant a pause appeared between the attacks, Tio turned into a counterattack. She stretched both her hands horizontally and instantly focused tremendous magic power, at the next instant she fired breath attack from the tips of both her hands like a laser that had been compressed to the limit.



The right and left breath attacks that were fired straight like black string easily pierced the monsters at their line of fire. Even the horse head that looked excellent in defensive power was also no exception. This attack of Tio had been refined until its might heightened by that much.



In addition, that was not the end of it. Tio spread wide her hands horizontally and then she twirled on the spot.



Naturally, the super thin breaths that pierced and bisected everything were matching Tio's movement and trampled the battlefield, mowing down the monsters.



Her clothing that looked like Japanese clothes gently fluttered along with her long beautiful hair, exhibiting elegance like in a dance in this battlefield. The blood spray scattered everywhere by the bisected monsters that were falling to the ground colored Tio's surrounding like a blizzard of falling sakura petals.



"Impudent…Uranos. The disgrace that you once received, clear it up right here!"



Freed who frowned from looking at Tio's figure gave instruction at the white divine dragon(Uranos) beside him. Uranos's reddish black eyes shined in joy.



GOGAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!



Uranos raised an extremely loud roar.



It didn't fire aurora as breath attack, it was merely roaring, but just with that space itself trembled, a shockwave of sound was generated. Normal people would have their body pulverized just from that, and even if they endured it a primitive terror would well up and they might be driven mad, a violent howl.



Truly a roar of a divine dragon.



Due to that, even the monsters who should be its ally couldn't help but get paralyzed, the attacks that were raining down like storm also got completely dispersed.



Although, it was by no meant that Tio was helped just because of that.



"Nuoo!?"



While her whole body got strongly struck by the shockwave, combined with the lightness of her small human body caused Tio to get blown away. She fell toward the ground like a meteor. Looking carefully, there were few small shining fragments scattered at the trajectory her body passed through. Although it was only a few, but Tio's prided dragon scales were smashed, just from a single roar.



Tio impacted the ground like that without being able to kill her momentum. *BAM* Tremor hit the ground and a small crater was created on the floating island, Tio's figure got concealed by the rolling up dust.



There, a merciless pursuit attack was fired.



GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!



The world was dyed by white radiance, by the breath of the Uranos――by aurora.



Even the word tremendous couldn't represent a fragment of that attack's might. The absurd torrent of light caused the space itself to creak, just its after-wave gouged out the ground of the floating island.



And then, at the place that got hit directly…the aurora pierced until far below――it broke through the bottom of the floating island and pierced until the far beyond.



Yes, the aurora pierced through the ground of the floating island that had the diameter of ten-odd kilometers until it came out on the other side. The sea of clouds spreading under the island had a hole opened there like the eye of a typhoon that dispersed in a radial shape.



A terrifying might. It was just like the light of divine punishment. Everything that stood on its way would be completely destroyed without any discrimination by that breath of devastation.



Before long, the flash that dyed the world was disappearing as though melting into air.



"Tio-san-!"



Tio was swallowed by the aurora, no, any possibility other than Tio got destroyed altogether with the ground leaving not even dust behind was unthinkable from witnessing this spectacle, seeing that caused Shia to spontaneously called Tio's name with shrieking voice.



While beating to death several gray dragons with her kendama, Shia focused her eyes at the spot where Tio got blown away at, but she could only see a hole in the ground that was completely empty of any living thing and she couldn't discover Tio's figure.



"Hmph, perhaps that's overdoing it. Despite my intention to torture her to death, but to be annihilated with one attack…the situation just cannot go as I hoped for."



"There is no way such thing is――!?"



Freed glared at below looking not amused.



Shia raged to deny those words.



And then, Shia changed the Vire Doryukken into bombing mode and aimed at Freed…at that moment, the figure of herself getting slashed into pieces by countless large swords was reflected in her brain. It was a death prediction from her characteristic magic 'Future Sight'.



A chill rushed through her whole body instantly, her voice got caught in her throat while she twisted her body half-forcefully. From the superb timing of the attack's instant, it brought to Shia's intention that this was an attack that leaped through space――an attack that couldn't be dodged perfectly based on Shia's experience.



In an instant, the space around Shia was undulating, from there large swords were thrusting out in a flash.



"――"



While raising a wordless scream, Shia's legs and arms cartwheeled midair in order to at least avoid a fatal wound, and then four large swords grazed her and blood sprayed up.



Another large sword approached her head, she avoided that by turning her head and the blade grazed her cheek, two large swords approached her neck from left and right, she blocked one with her Vire Doryukken, and used the chain connected to the kendama to block the other one.



She pulled the trigger of Vire Doryukken next and used the fierce recoil to rotate like a spinning wheel, three blades rushed at her as though blocking her escape path, but she barely evaded them even while her shoulders got gouged.



And then, even while bearing injury, Shia somehow succeeded to get away from her future of death and put her feet on air using 'Air Force'. At the same time, the apostles with platinum hair flew out from the undulating space with their wings flapping, their twin swords launching severe slashes at Shia.



"KuUUUU-"



Vertical bisecting attack using two large swords at the same time. Shia blocked that attack using the handle of Vire Doryukken, but she was pushed toward the ground by immense pressure and impact where the weapons of both sides were locked with each other.



Amidst the sparks scattered by the large swords and the war hammer, Shia fell with fierce momentum toward the ground, the platinum apostle who wielded that bizarre strength from really close range then opened her mouth at Shia.



"The first apostle Erst. Judgment to god's enemy."



Immediately after, the large swords shined in platinum light. Right after that power swelled up explosively into a torrent. The apostle that introduced herself as Erst swung out her twin swords in one breath then.



"Gua!?"



Shia's body was struck fiercely due to the impact, she fell on the ground like that. *BAM* Fierce shockwave radiated loudly and a crater was created, dust rolled up. It was like a reproduction of Tio's fall before this.



Sure enough, five platinum flashes aimed for Shia at the bottom of the crater, all of them were fired simultaneously.



"The second apostle Zweit. Judgment to god's enemy."



"The third apostle Dritte. Judgment to god's enemy."



"The fourth apostle Vierte. Judgment to god's enemy."



"The fifth apostle Funfte. Judgment to god's enemy."



The four apostles that appeared unnoticed were conducting their introduction proclamation while launching their bombing. Even if the color of their magic power light was different, but it only stood to reason that the light that an apostle launched must have disintegration ability.



Thinking of the apostle's explosive power that struck Shia into the ground, the spec of the platinum apostles were obviously above even the normal apostle, from that it could be easily imagined that their bombing would be something absurd too.



Shia immediately pulled her kendama close to use it as shield replacement, but in the end would it make it in time or not… Similar with Tio, it seemed that Shia was also going to vanish inside the light.



But, at that time,



Gigantic black flash that was fired from somewhere approached the apostles, furthermore *hyun* a sound of cutting wind resounded and something like a rope rushed inside the dust cloud and entangled around Shia's body, it then extracted Shia from that spot in one go.



The platinum apostles flapped their platinum wings and evaded the black flash. At the same time, the ground where Shia was just at before she got pulled was pierced by the platinum bombardment. The ground after the dust got swept away had been gouged really deeply, even though the attack didn't pierce until the bottom of the island but the bottom of the hole couldn't be seen from above. As expected, the might of these apostles had wide difference compared to the normal apostle.



"Shia, art thou safe?"



"Tio-san!"



Shia who was entangled in black rope――or more accurately in black whip was pulled up and received into an embrace of Tio, who although she was in a sooty state here and there with various sizes of wound all over her body, her expression still looked comparatively fine.



Shia spontaneously sighed in relieve, to that Tio grinned widely while the corner of her mouth was holding a test tube container.



And then, Tio moved her lips and tilted the test tube container, she drained up the content in one go before *puih* she spat away the container also with a wild gesture, she then released Shia from her black whip.



"…So you escaped. What a toughness that is as expected from that man's woman. How annoying."



The expression of Freed's eyes warped while he spouted out abusive language.



"Well, I thought I was going to die for a bit there though. For the large shield created by Goshujin-sama to be pulverized, although it couldn't use 'Vajra' or 'Transmutation'…thou have really evolved this dragon of thy."



It appeared in that instant when the aurora poured down, Tio summoned a large shield artifact from her 'Treasure Warehouse II' and she barely escaped at the slight time it took until the shield got pulverized. In other words, the protection of Tio's Dragon Scale Armor got overtaken only by the after wave and she bore this much damage from that. As expected, the aurora of the Uranos was something absurd.



"Hmph, is it really okay for you to act composed? The aurora of Uranos who has reached the territory of a divine dragon is increased not only in its might. Its additional ability to obstruct healing is also evolved. It obstructed even the regeneration magic. On top of that, it is making the wound to worsen further with the passage of time. Although you got hit only by the after wave, if you bore that much wound, it won't take that long for the effect to gnaw at your body until you die you know?"



"Is that so? All these monsters, and then these platinum apostles, these art quite troublesome. …Well, normally that's how it would be."



"What?"



Ahead of the gaze of Freed who was feeling dubious at Tio's way of talking, Tio was wrapped in the light of magic power. That was the sign that regeneration magic was being used. As though to show that, the wounds that Tio bore were being healed one after another.



Freed was gazing in astonishment while raising his voice from being unable to endure his question.



"Ridiculous…the invasion of the aurora is being nullified? Impossible-"



"The ridiculous one art thou. Just how many times do you think Goshujin-sama hath been showered by that light. Obviously something like one or two countermeasure would be created for that."



"…Don't tell me, is it the liquid just now?"



Tio shrugged at Freed's question. It seemed that was the correct answer.



Anti-aurora magic medicine 'Fix It J'――the ability to obstruct healing that was included in the magic power of the aurora, Hajime who understood that it came from the magic factor with opposing nature against the magic power contained in the aurora made this magic medicine. Hajime enchanted magic that would negate the effect of the aurora into powder of metal that didn't have bad effect to the human body to make this medicine.



It had been proven by the 'God Water' that it was possible to forcefully heal the affected wound using something with healing power that surpassed the obstructing effect. And so, if the obstructing effect was weakened by this 'Fix It J', even if the effect had been evolved but the wound could be healed enough using regeneration magic.



Freed showed an irritated expression that the additional effect of the aurora didn't show result. Even the Uranos at his side was making growling sound from its throat in dissatisfaction.



But, at that time,



"-, Tio-san-"



"Yes-"



Suddenly, Shia raised a voice of warning, both of them immediately leaped away from their spot.



After that, platinum flash rushed through.



"Freed-sama. These people are that irregular's comrade. Please don't let your guard down."



"Acknowledged."



Erst was giving a warning to Freed using polite language. It seemed that before they knew it the status between the Freed and the apostles had been reversed. Most likely it was because the transformation that happened with Freed, but right now there wasn't any free time to know the detail.



The platinum apostles flew out simultaneously focusing at Shia.



"We will hand down the judgment at that rabbit person first. Is that fine?"



"Yeah. I'll leave that one to you. I too want to judge that dragon woman, the one who made fool of me once."



Erst nodded briskly at Freed's words, she then flapped her platinum wings in order to deal with Shia herself and flew away.



When Shia guessed that all the apostles were designating her as their target, she raised a ferocious war cry while forcefully blowing away the large sword that was swung down at her by the second apostle Zweit along with the holder.



"Bring it on desu-! Just try it if you think that you can desuu!"



Immediately after, faint blue magic power burst out from Shia. Using the derivative skill of magic power operation, 'Body Strengthening', and then also the further derivation skill 'Impact Conversion Increase III', Shia's body capability was explosively raised up.



And then, she rotated the kendama in high speed using only snapping motion of the wrist of the hand holding the chain, swinging around the super heavy kendama like a flail.



The gigantic metal mass was rotating in circle with abnormal speed and became like a streak of light.



There, the third apostle Dritte came attacking right from the front. Shia pulled the trigger of Vire Doryukken and fired out bursting slug bullet to check Dritte in place.



Dritte evaded that like it was only natural and kept advancing. But, Shia read ahead the path that she took and launched the kendama that looked like it would snap away anytime with superb timing. The liberated red kendama that looked like a wild beast made Dritte unable to take evasive action…was how it looked like, but the moment she was almost hit, Dritte's figure vanished.



And then, at the next moment, she materialized right at Shia's side. Furthermore, unnoticed the fourth apostle Vierte from behind and the fifth apostle Funfte from below were approaching, they slashed their twin large swords as though to block Shia's place to escape.



"ts, youu-"



Shia entrusted Vire Doryukken to her physical strength and swept it horizontally, she repelled away the large swords of the two apostles while dodging the last sword with a somersault.



But, it seemed that this time it was the apostles who read ahead of her movement, Zweit who was sent flying before this was already slashing her large sword in a timing that couldn't be dodged.



Inside the flow of time that felt strangely slow, the eyes of the inhuman apostle and Shia's eyes crossed with each other. No emotion or anything could be seen there, but vaguely Shia could feel something like triumph "Even if you can see the future, you cannot avoid this right?", surely it wasn't just in her imagination.



Shia wasn't even agitated or impatient, she returned back a straight clear gaze. Shia didn't blink even once while capturing the rapidly approaching blade that left behind trail of platinum light in her field of vision.



A predicament of this level was nothing to speak of. Don't think that the one who obtains new power is just you! Shia proclaimed that implicitly. And then, just when she was about to use that new power…a black whip stretched out smoothly and entangled the wrist of the apostle before her eyes.



(Oh my, I don't even need to use it. As expected from Tio-san. That's a superb follow-up desu!)



Shia who whispered that in her heart changed her plan. While a smile formed at the corner of her lips, Vire Doryukken leaped up from below.



The slowing world returned to its original speed.



Right after that, the arm of Zweit was tugged away and the trajectory of her large sword slipped away from Shia's body. At the same time, the war hammer repelled away the second sword from below at the opposite side while rising up with powerful speed.



*GOGYA!*



Such graphic sound resounded, Vire Doryukken that hit the jaw of Zweit blown her away to the sky above as though rocket propulsion was carrying her away.



"Disappear."



Toward Shia who was just lifting up Vire Doryukken, a cold voice――Erst's proclamation came at the same time with a platinum flash that attacked Shia.



Shia was unable to evade due to an instant of her body stiffening after launching her attack.



But, as expected the color of anxiety was nonexistence in her expression.



Right after that, Zweit who was blown away just now was returning. That wasn't because Shia's blow wasn't effective and she came to attack once more. The black whip that Tio controlled was still connected to her hand, therefore she was now being pulled back forcefully, toward the line of fire of the platinum light.



"――!"



Erst and the pulled back Zweit reflexively gazed in astonishment, at the next moment, Erst's bombing was defended by Zweit's own platinum wings.



And then, Zweit shook off the black whip entangling her wrist and got out of the line of fire in hurry.



This was happening in less than a second.



But, that was enough.



"SEYAAA!!"



A yell exploded.



Shia's Vire Doryukken caught the platinum flash in a full swing. A tremendous shockwave was generated, at the same time, the surface that was coated with sealing stone dispersed the disintegration ability along with the flash.



And then, the apostles who attempted to attack Shia without any interval were held back by Tio's breath attack, while Tio's body slipped in to become shield using her dragon scale against the opponent that couldn't be held back. Although the black dragon scale of the dragon race that boasted supreme hardness was disintegrated, coupled with its unparalleled endurance it somehow pulled through with only faint wound created by the platinum magic power.



"Those arts quiet the cooperation, but it's troubling for thou to then look down on our cooperation!"



Tio opened her mouth. At the tip of her mouth, magic power was focusing with fierce momentum. Dritte who was looking at that across the arm covered with dragon scale that blocked her large sword immediately leaped away. The compressed breath pierced that vacated spot.



Naturally, Shia and Tio became standing back to back.



"Tio-san, thank you very much. It's truly amazing that you can breakthrough to here."



"Well, if I charged with the resolve to be damaged, then as long as it's not against that white dragon I am unstoppable."



Yes, Tio saw Shia who was receiving a concentrated attack from the apostles, and then she resolved to receive damage from Freed and the monsters' attack while cutting across the storm of attacks to come at Shia's side.



"But, Tio-san, your wound…"



"Shia. It will be okay with this. Just so thou know, there is this."



"…Aa, I see desu."



Shia and Tio talked back to back with a small voice that could reach other.



During that time, with Erst at the front as the starting point, the apostles were surrounding the two. Beside Erst, Freed finally arrived accompanied with his Uranos.



"Sorry. It seems that dragon woman is not really bothered by damage. I misread the way she fights a little."



"No, we too were unable to finish off Shia Hauria. It appears that she has further increased her fighting strength in these few days. …What an unbelievable thing."



It seemed that the two of them were revising their analysis of Shia and Tio.



"Then, we will pull away Shia Hauria away and exterminate her."



"Aa. Even the dragon race won't be able to maintain that kind of reckless fighting for long but, I too will use my full strength here."



Shia and Tio, and then Freed and Erst, each side exchanged words with each other. The wind of tension blew once more.



And then…



"Exterminating god's enemy."



"Receive your judgment, foolish people."



Erst swung her twin large swords, while Freed distorted the space at the tip of his stretched out hand.



At the same time,



"I'm going-, ――'Level IV-'!!"



"Come, mine retainer, ――'Dragon Army Summoning'!!"



Shia's body reinforcement rose by a level, the light magic power enveloping her further increased in radiance. Along with Tio's proclamation, a hundred armed black dragons materialized from the 'magic orbs' that were scattered in the battlefield unnoticed by anyone.



Right now, the gong of the second round was sounded.





Chapter 170




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Tingle translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



Author's comments: Time for Shia's culmination



____________________________________



The Young Girl With Rabbit Ears is Excelling



"UryaA!!"



With a cute and brave voice, Shia jumped out.



Body strengthening Level IV ― More precisely, this skill was one level above the magically operated derivation Conversion Efficiency Up III. This skill which could turn magical power into physical strength with a ratio of 1:3 had been evolved into Conversion Efficiency Up IV with sublimation magic, raising the ratio to 1:4.



At the same time,



"Fire!"



Tio issued her command.



GoAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!



Surrounding Shia and Tio were the swarm of monsters. Surrounding the swarm of monsters were the armed black dragons summoned by Tio's artifact, which simultaneously fired breath.



It was a perfect surprise attack for the monsters who were struck from the rear by a series of breaths.



The poor monsters resembling prisoners locked in iron maidens were mercilessly penetrated and killed by black flashes resembling Tio's breath attack.



The power was more than enough. It was around the same level as the aurora of the white dragon back in their first encounter. In other words, it was above the power of the reinforced ash dragons.



In fact, the breaths fired from the black dragons who numbered roughly one hundred instantly pulverized over two hundred monsters. That is to say, each breath was able to break through at least two monsters which boasted an unusually high level of defense.



Just where did these ridiculously powerful dragons come from? Freed grumbled as he directed the silver bombardment towards Tio. Even though he personally improved the level of the ash dragons to the level of the former white dragon, even though if received the assistance of god… Just how much effort and training would be required to go against that?



Even if Tio had a high aptitude with metamorphosis magic, if you were to compare her current skill with her skill back in the devil king castle, it was indeed an impossible development. No matter how you put it, her current level could not be reached in only a few days.



(In that case, as expected, the cause for this is the equipment attached to the black dragons. Such a thing as equipping monsters with artifacts… how absurd. That must once again be that guy's doing. How annoying!)



Freed came to that conclusion and cursed at the white-haired boy who wasn't here. Seeing his bombardment was repelled by Tio, he issued instructions to the monsters while preparing his next attack. That is, to eliminate the surrounding black dragons.



Following the main order, the large number of faithful subordinate monsters turned around and their new targets shifted from Tio to the black dragons.



Just as Tio planned. It was already bad enough that they had to face the platinum apostles, freed, and the divine white dragon, but if they also had to watch out for the attacks of the crowd of the monsters while fighting the other opponents, it would become unbearable.



'Numbers against numbers'. She was glad she had anticipated such a situation and had been preparing for it.



These armed dragons were from a species of dragon that inhabited a hidden village, Tio's hometown ― located on an island that could be reached by heading north on the continent until reaching a mountainous area, making one's way through the mountains until the seaside, and then navigating through the sea for several hundred kilometers. Originally, their power level was not less than that of monsters on the upper level of the abyss.



With the strengthening obtained using metamorphosis magic, their power became on par with the middle-level monsters. Add to that the artifacts bestowed upon them by Hajime's sublimation magic, however dirty that was, and their power rivaled that of lower level monsters. Finally, taking cheatmate into account (TN: The food Hajime made for them before the fight), their power could even be said to rival that of monsters in the lowest parts of the abyss.



Incidentally, even though the dragons used to be a different color, the fact that there were only black dragons was because Tio had used metamorphosis magic. The reason being something as stupid as: [The wife of the devil king (TN: refers to Hajime here) should be accompanied by evil dragons. Who says evil means black, right?]. The person herself showed a self-satisfied look.



Freed's monsters simultaneously attacked the armed black dragons. Their number was still more than ten times more. Specs-wise they were roughly equal. Therefore, it should be expected that the black dragons would be overwhelmed by the enemy's numbers.



However, that expectation would soon be betrayed in the truest sense.



First, as if to say the skies belong to them, the ash dragons simultaneously unleashed a series of breaths expressing their anger. Countless traces of light shone through the air. Totaling more than three times the numbers of black dragons, the series of breaths looked like a wall to them.



However, against the multitude of attacks which were expected to become direct hits, the black dragons performed evasive maneuvers that looked like barrel-rolls and successfully dodged the series of attacks, a little like someone finding gaps and weaving his way through a crowd.



These moves seemed like the movements of Shia, who knew the safety zones, made just before.



The origin was the helmet the black dragons were wearing.



This helmet covered the entirety of the head, until the tip of the nose, and had a Foresight ability. Unlike Shia's foresight, this ability could not show a distinct picture of the danger beforehand, but once an attack had been fired, it did have the ability to sense the trajectory of the attack. They took precise evasive action according to this ability.



The black dragons counterattacked with breaths and mowed down the alarmed monsters. A monster with the head of horse which managed to slip through the black light dove towards a black dragon's chest and swung its strong arm. The fist that was thrown into the part of the armor that covered the black dragon from its lower parts up until its stomach made contact and a dark red wave spread as the monster's magical power was turned into a shockwave.



However, at that moment, a similar wave was caused by the armor, and the one getting blown away was the monster with the horse head. That was obviously the effect of Impact Conversion. The moment the armor the black dragon wore perceived a shock, it returned it. It was a reactive armor, so to speak.



In addition, a three-headed wolf and a black panther chimera launched an attack on the black dragon, only to be counter-attacked by its claws and tail. The two monsters scrutinized the counter-attack, as if they were mocking its dullness, and quickly dodged it. Or so they thought, but in the next moment, they fell on the ground with their blood splashing out.



Even though they should have certainly dodged it, their bodies had been split into two. The cause for this was the activation of Wind Nail which had been installed on the dragon's claws and at the edge of its tail.



Though equal specs-wise, comparing the strength only based on numbers was presumptuous. The artifacts equipped could overturn the difference in fighting strength of both sides!



"Fufu, this is the result of my group work with goshujin-sama. Not bad, don't you think?"



"Uranus! Mow them down!"



Ignoring Tio's prideful moment, Freed twitched his eyebrows and gave the order to the divine dragon. An enormous torrent of aurora was fired in the direction of Tio.



'How many times do I have to deal with that?' Tio thought as she quickly went out the way of the incarnation of death which mowed down everything in its path. At the same time, she made a telepathic communication with the black dragons that stood in the path of the attack to urge them to evade.



The black dragons made a tailspin and performed an emergency escape, but as expected, it was impossible to perfectly evade the maxed-out death beam which made Tio feel her scales were being shredded just from the aftershock, and several black dragons sustained wounds.



Then, without a moment's delay,



"― Boon of the Dragon King."



Tio sang to herself.



Then, a black wave spread through Tio. The black dragons having lost their wings and limbs who were tumbling to the ground recovered in the blink of an eye, allowing them to keep flying.



Spirit magic and regeneration magic combined, Boon Of The Dragon King. This magic is a combination of regeneration magic and spirit magic, used to select only the black dragons as the scope of effect.



Just as the name of the magic suggests, the black dragons received healing from their own king. They raised a cry of great joy as they resumed the fight. The dragon king had protected them. No matter how wounded they had been, they showed no fear. Even if they were in a situation where they should instinctively prioritize evasion, they moved forward and swung their claws and bore their fangs at the enemy. As a result, this made the black dragons in superior position again.



And, Tio swung the black whip she was holding in her hand. Even though its length appeared to be five or six meters at most, once it was swung, it expanded to an impossible degree and took an irregular trajectory as it soared through the air. The speed of the tip of the whip was slightly above the speed of sound.



It was a horizontal slash aimed at Freed.



"Tch!"



Freed clicked his tongue, and tried to used the silver wings as a defense. However, the trajectory of the black whip suddenly changed and its tip struck the white divine dragon's eyeball.



GuluaAAAAAAAAAA



Normally, even if the divine dragon's eyeball were to receive a direct hit, its aberrantly huge stamina would not allow there to be even a single trace of a wound. But, the moment the tip of the black whip made contact, it followed the surface of the eyeball, creating a gap in space, easily tearing through the eyeball.



That black whip was naturally an artifact made by Hajime, and its name was Black Whip of Slavery. On one part of its design was attached a small Treasure Warehouse. Stored inside was the biggest black whip in existence, three kilometers in length. By pouring magical power, one could freely take more length out or in, effectively changing the size of the whip. At a glance, it was a whip that could stretch infinitely.



Furthermore, countless small pieces of metal were attached along the whip, so if one were to concentrate one's eyes on the whip, one would see something similar to a cat's tongue, or possibly the skin of a shark, that would shave off its target.



And, a space magic, Decapitation Silk, was embedded in those metal pieces. By the will of the user, it could cut off the surrounding space.



Although the divine dragon narrowly avoided another strike coming for its other eye, its pride had been damaged. It showed fury at the fact that it had received a wound. In its anger, it started mowing down the battlefield with its aurora.



Countless of its own allies were swallowed in the attack, but it didn't hit Tio, which only made the divine dragon angrier.



"Overcometh by emotions on the battlefield? How inexperienced."



Even if it had changed and its power increased, it had a long way to go as far as combat experience is concerned. It seemed the white divine dragon had lost its composure.



In a sense, against the white divine dragon leaving lots of openings in its attacks, Tio, showing the dignity of a senior, swung her black whip of slavery.



However, this time it was aimed at the three-headed wolf that was still staggering from the after effects of the previous aurora.



"GuGaaa!?"



The three-headed wolf let out a surprised voice at the sudden black whip of slavery that twined around its neck and tightened.



"Cometh to life, together with the first cry of birth, ―― Authority of the Dragon King!!"



The voice which carried Tio's dignity resounded.



At the same time, the three-headed wolf screamed.



"GiiiaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA"



It was a strange scream you would totally never expect from this three-headed wolf.



The cause would be obvious for anyone.



"Wh, what, what are you doing!?"



Freed said in an unintentionally shaken voice.



That couldn't be helped. After all, the three-headed wolf whose neck had been entangled by the black whip of slavery, underwent a sudden transformation while it was screaming.



In terms of seconds, it took approximately three seconds.



In this short timespan, the three-headed wolf turned into a monster that was covered in black scales. It grew thick, strong limbs and a tail, as well as sharp claws, and hard wings showing radiance ―― It had turned into a dragon.



Authority of the Dragon King, a combined magic made of spirit magic and metamorphosis magic. A spirit magic that took the information of dragon transformation from her own dragon race soul and copied it, Dragon Soul Reproduction, and a metamorphosis magic, Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation. This combined magic forced the monster to undergo a transformation into a black dragon.



Normally, no matter how high Tio's aptitudes were in metamorphosis magic, it should be impossible to turn a monster, controlled by someone else at that, into her own underling in mere seconds.



What made such a thing possible was Black Whip of the Slavery. Its real worth didn't lie in controlling its elasticity at will, nor in its ability to cut through the surrounding space, but in its ability to act as a device that assisted a compulsory change into a dragon. Using this black whip of slavery as an intermediary, Tio was able to force the usual monsters to turn into black dragons.



She could make the monsters she whipped obey her.



Maybe it could be said It wasn't something fitting for an extremely masochist pervert, or maybe it could be said it was something too fitting for a pervert's wildest ends. It couldn't be helped that Shia and the others looked at Hajime in disbelief in lots of ways when he handed the black whip to Tio.



While Freed was shocked at the fact that one of his underlings had been snatched away, two more of his monsters were again changed into black dragons.



"As if I'm going to let you do anymore than that."



A magical attack like surging wave was fired by Freed. The magic that contained all attributes rushed towards Tio to engulf her. At the same time, silver feathers were fired to cover the remaining gaps. And, to seal any means of escape, the white divine dragon unleashed its aurora.



Tio, without a moment's hesitation, jumped inside the storm of the attack unleashed by Freed without fearing damage.



If she wouldn't be able to avoid it, she might as well leap into Freed's attack, was the conclusion she reached. This evasion action, which could be said to be reckless, was actually a success taking into account the power of the aurora and its after effects.



However, although most of Freed's attack was repelled by her black scales, his magic, and most of all the decomposition ability, were pouring constantly and she sustained by no means only light damage.



As the pulverized black dragon scales reflected light, blood began slowly falling to the ground, and before long, it turned into a spray of blood.



"How unsightly. Now that you can't rely on restoration from the stubbornness of your dragons and your magic, you're showing such a disgraceful way of fighting."



"I wouldn't put it like that. Those are also legitimate tactics."



"Foolishness. You just don't understand the concept of abilities. I was surprised at your ability to snatch away my monsters, but it seems the person herself is going to meet her end soon after all."



Freed made fun of Tio's fighting style, who was ignoring the damage she received. And, once more, she was faced with a barrage of magic and decomposition magic, while the divine white dragon breathed its aurora breath.



Tio once more weighed the aurora breath and Freed's attack, chose the latter, and exposed herself to the storm of the attack.



At that time, she expanded the length of her black whip of slavery to turn more monsters into black dragons. Seeing such behavior, Freed thought she was acting like a desperate chicken trying to invert the tide of the battle by increasing her war potential because her own power must be reaching its limits. His mocking face grew even more mocking as he saw this.



'If you like being bombed so much, I'll let you have as much as you want' thought Freed as he turned a sadistic look to Tio. The density of the barrage of attacks increased yet again.



On the other side, Shia jumped out. A fierce battle was going on with the platinum apostles on this side too. Though, by no means could it be said to be a fair battle.



Just barely, yes, really just barely, did Shia manage to endure.



If she didn't have body strengthening Level IV and her native magic Divine Revelation Sight, she would have probably been instant-killed by the platinum apostles. With a quick estimation, the specs of the platinum apostles could be said to be several times that of Shia. She had expected these apostles to be stronger than the average apostle, however she hadn't expected them to be this strong.



"How about giving up? Shia Hauria."



Erst, who held a large sword and was engaged in a sword lock with Shia, stared at her and said so from point-blank range.



There, for a moment, an improbable thought like 'Maybe it's better to do that… ' popped in her head. When she realized she had been taken aback by the earlier suggestion, a long sword came sweeping sideways from the back.



At once, using her weapon which was engaged in a sword lock as support, Shia used Air Force to perform a handstand and kick into the air. The trajectory of the sword missed her by a hair's breadth.



"Don't underestimate me desu!"



While performing her handstand with her twisted body, she also pulled the trigger of Vire Doryuken, firing a slug bullet from point blank range. It was a special bullet that had been improved and whose power had been increased, and it caused a violent shock. Shia aimed for the moment the two apostles were recovering from the shock, and made use of it to jump back.



Immediately after, a silver flash passed through the place Shia was standing before. Without taking a moment to be relieved, Shia used Air Force once more and jumped. As expected, another silver flash came from another angle and grazed Shia's feet.



Rolling over in the sky, she hardened herself in midair and immediately descended towards the ground. That's right, at the very least, if she was on the ground, she wouldn't have to face attacks coming from below in addition to all other directions.



Then, once she had successfully taken distance from the enemy, she made a sour expression and started a monolog, while staying alert and keeping Vire Doryuken ready.



"To feel uneasiness caused by Charm this late in the game…that's such a failure on my part."



"Or rather, did I just feel surprised when I broke out of the spell? Even though I have strengthening against charm type effects."



The apostles who had also descended onto the ground surrounded Shia from all five sides.



Facing the perseverant Shia, Esrt sent her a somehow amazed look. Even so, the fact that Erst was not showing any sign of impatience was not only due to her being inhuman, but mostly to the fact that she was convinced they would overwhelm Shia.



Erst and the other apostles knew that the reason Shia was able to keep up was because of her native ability. And also that it would consume a non-negligible amount of magic power each time. Even if she was in possession of an artifact supplying magic power, it was bound to run dry after some time.



"Originally, you shouldn’t have lasted even a few moments. Good grief, even I am amazed at your degree of strengthening … This is Yue-san's magic, right?"



Shia narrowed her eyes dangerously.



The original color of the light of the apostles' magic, silver ― There was now orange mixed in it, making it a platinum. And, Shia had come to see and feel that gold magic countless times during their travel, so she couldn't be mistaken. It was a precious part of the elder sister she had befriended … It was Yue's magic.



Of course, she knew that it was the doing of Ehito Rujue, who occupied Yue's body.



But, to think that the power of her special person was being used arbitrarily, and pointed at them as a weapon … the anger rising up from her chest was not average.



Feeling she might lose herself to her anger boiling like magma, Shia frantically held her anger back.



Then, intending to turn all the heat she had generated from her anger into power and leave her thoughts for later, she tried to do as Yue, her battle master, taught her, that is, to remain calm like the cold of ice.



In return, Esrt replied with a voice seemingly devoid of emotion.



"More precisely, it should be called the magic of our master, Ehito Rujue-sama. That body, as well as its magic. Everything already belongs to master."



" … … "



Shia's anger skyrocketed as Esrt calmly gave an answer she seemingly considered really natural.



Shia took out a vial from Treasure Warehouse II. She put it directly before her open mouth and drank the contents in one gulp, just like instant foods. To make her even more unreasonable. To break through her limits.



Then, she exhaled like Tio did, and rashly threw the container away. She swung Vire Doryuken once.



Then she spoke in an extremely cold tone and used words she would absolutely never let her family, or Hajime and her friends, hear.



"Fuck you! I've heard enough. Yue-san's body and magic, and her everything else, it's obvious who owns all that. That's right, everything is Hajime-san's. The one you guys call irregular. I, the one with the title of Divination Expert who can glance into the future, certify that. To the likes of you, as well as your master, I can make the following prediction ― 'There is no future'."



" … Nonsense. What do you think a diminutive existence whose hands or feet can't reach master do? Accept reality, Shia Hauria. Tio Claus doesn’t even compare with Freed-sama. And because you are being once more overwhelmed by us, the best you can do is try to endure. Can't you understand? Or is it that you're trying to escape from reality? The ones who don't have a future are you people."



Esrt had suddenly been overcome by a strange chill, and her voice had faltered. She objectively analyzed the situation, and precisely refuted Shia.



Certainly, although Tio was aiming to turn the tide by increasing the number of black dragons, the wounds she had sustained weren't minor, and she was probably planning to use up all her strength to thwart their plan before it succeeded. And, on this side, Shia had also been overwhelmed to this extent.



There was nothing that could prove Erst wrong.



Up until now …



Shia who had daringly refuted her started laughing with an atrocious face resembling that of a beast.



"'That's the limit of my power'. When did you hear me say such a thing?"



"? What are you ―"



Puzzled, Erst tried to make sense of that with a questioning voice ―



However, her mouth suddenly stopped ―



Shia's power swelled up. Along with an angry war cry.



"―― Level V ! ! "



The atmosphere shook with a thud. Light blue magic sprang out depicting a screw-like trajectory and rose up.



Originally, with sublimation magic, she could enhance her magic one level above. Which is why, using sublimation magic, the limit of Shia's body strengthening should have been Level IV. However, what allowed her to surpass that limit was Hajime's special magic potion Cheatmate Dr.



What Shia drank some time ago was not restorative medicine, but a drinkable Cheatmate. A specialized version containing an excess of ingredients with the use of sublimation magic at that. If it weren't Shia who was specialized in body strengthening, it wouldn't be strange for the user's body to be disintegrated within seconds. It was the kind of body strengthening this was about.



Shia, who had broken through her limit, immediately jumped out, breaking the ground beneath her.



"Huh, again, more power … However, even with this, you're still no match for us!"



Erst stopped Vire Doryuken which was swung at her from the front using her large sword. With a thunderous roar, the surrounding ground cracked, but the large sword didn't make a sound.



Then, using mere physical strength, Erst repelled Shia, as if proving her earlier words.



In truth, if one were to compare the status of Shia and the status of the platinum apostles, the difference would be clear.



How much of a gap there was between the two.



For argument's sake, if the platinum apostles had a status plate, the stats indicated on it would be something like this:



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：22.000 ⇒ [Strengthened 66000]



Stamina：22.000 ⇒ [Strengthened: 66000]



Resistance：22.000 ⇒ [Strengthened: 66000]



Agility：22.000 ⇒ [Strengthened: 66000]



Magical power：22.000 ⇒ [Strengthened: 66000]



Magical resistance：22.000 ⇒ [Strengthened: 66000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



For normal apostles, their stats would all be at 12.000, and at 36.000 after being strengthened. Meaning those white-platinum apostles almost had twice their stats.



And, Shia's body strengthening Level V was (TN: CM stands for Cheatmate, SM for sublimation magic, BS for body strengthening):



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS Ⅴ 38400]



Stamina： 120 ⇒[CM 240] ⇒[SM 480] ⇒[BS V 38480]



Resistance： 100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS V 38400]



Agility： 130 ⇒[CM 260] ⇒[SM 520] ⇒[BS V 38520]



Magical power： 3800 ⇒[CM 7600]



Magical resistance： 4000 ⇒[CM 8000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



This is how it was. Those were specs that would enable her to surpass normal apostles, but they fell far short of the platinum apostles she was up against.



Shia, who had been blown away by Erst, flew horizontally along the ground. However, there was not a single sign of her losing her composure, and the ferocious daring smile was still there.



Beams of light of the white-platinum apostles were approaching her from left and right. Using Vire Doryuken, she propelled her body and evaded. Then, she turned towards Zweit who was awaiting her from behind, rolled around, and used her propelling force to make a full swing of Vire Doryuken.



The white-platinum apostle unintentionally gazed at her in wonderment after her next words, which were accompanied by a war cry.



"―― Level VI ! ! "



"!?"



The following impact. If one depicted this scene with a painting, the physical impact would be the same as the facial impact between Erst's face moments before and now.



However, just before the blow with the strength of Shia's propelling, she operated Vire Doryuken's gravity magic and its weight increased. The white-platinum apostle couldn't turn a blind eye to the destructive power that was created.



With a terrific roar, a shockwave was created from between the two who clashed. Dust shot up, and inside, a pair of large swords had caught Vire Doryuken's blow and were crossing against it.



The blow couldn't be stopped with only one hand anymore. Zweit's feet which had been slightly pushed back testified of that.



Shia's body strengthening Level VI. Its values were:



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS ⅤI 46000]



Stamina： 120 ⇒[CM 240] ⇒[SM 480] ⇒[BS VI 46080]



Resistance： 100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS VI 46000]



Agility： 130 ⇒[CM 260] ⇒[SM 520] ⇒[BS VI 46120]



Magical power： 3800 ⇒[CM 7600]



Magical resistance： 4000 ⇒[CM 8000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



But, she was still far from being a match for them.



However, the artifact made by Hajime and her age of gods magic made up for that gap.



Shia poured magic into Vire Doryuken which was engaged in a sword lock with the twin large swords in the center, thus activating a gimmick.



KASHUN! One part of the center of the damaged surface on the ground slipped, and inside, the jet black stake that had been charged started emitting light blue sparks, and immediately rotated at high speed.



"Pierce through!"



Following Shia's pattern, her finger pulled the trigger.



GoOOON



A thunderous roar reverberated.



"Na!?"



Came Zweit's surprised voice.



Vire Doryuken's IAP pile banker mercilessly pulverized the pair of large swords into thousand pieces and drew near Zweit's head.



Zweit, surprised, barely managed to move her head out of the way, but the jet black stake which grazed her cheek inflicted a significant wound on the face of the beauty that resembled a piece of art, and tore through most of her beautiful platinum hair.



From the sky, Dritte shot silver feathers. So did Vierte and Funfte from the left and right.



Furthermore, Zweit who was at point-blank range moved to avoid the silver flash, and Erst swung her silver twin swords.



There was no way out.



They had reassessed the increase of specs in Shia's body strengthening, and maybe they were aiming to bring her down quickly. Maybe she was actually strong enough to take down Zweit if they weren't careful.



Any means of escape was virtually nonexistent for Shia.



All of a sudden Shia closed her eyes.



"Have you given up!"



Came Erst's voice.



She couldn't think of any other reason why Shia would close her eyes under these circumstances. Anyone else would naturally think along the same lines as Erst.



But, there was no way the monster rabbit would stand there and accept defeat.



And in the next moment, all attacks missed their target.



"!?" X5



Their inhuman expressions lost their perfectness.



Instead, their faces were painted with confusion and surprise.



That couldn't be helped. Because, after all, Shia was still there. She was there, and even so, all the attacks slipped through.



It was not that the person herself had been cut into two so skillfully that she hadn't realized anything, neither that she had been obliterated by the feathers and flash.



The cause was the strange sight displayed before their eyes. That strange sight was a Shia that had become semi-transparent.



The space magic Half Transition ―― a magic that shifted one's body halfway to a different space. All interference from the origin space wouldn't reach the body. In other words, it was a magic of absolute defense.



This was, so to speak, a failed transition magic that connected two spaces. If someone other than Shia were to do it, it wouldn't be unlikely that their body would get scattered in pieces, so it was an emergency defective magic that was quite dangerous. Because in no way were her magic aptitudes poor in spite of being specialized in body strengthening, and because she was in a state where she had broken through her limits thanks to the Cheatmate she used, Shia could immediately use space magic as a physical ability.



Of course, it was a magic even Shia could not use at her own convenience. It consumed a huge amount of magical power. And on top of Shia not being able to interfere with the origin space either when half-transitioning, she couldn't even move. Therefore, it was a trump card she could only use once in a battle.



Which is why, Shia wouldn't miss this chance.



As soon as the attack passed through, she undid the half-transitioning and returned to the origin space, and dove forward while firing explosive slug bullets around her.



She closed in upon Zweit's bust, who had lost her pair of large swords and had only been firing silver bombardment. Then, she moved past Zweit's drawn out icefish-like hands in a move resembling a snake, and Shia's hands grabbed Zweit's head.



Placing her palm so it covered Zweit's eyes, Shia used her nails on Zweit's forehead to lock her grip.



Then,



" ―― Level VII ! ! "



Additional body strengthening.



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS ⅤII 53600]



Stamina： 120 ⇒[CM 240] ⇒[SM 480] ⇒[BS VII 53680]



Resistance： 100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS VII 53600]



Agility： 130 ⇒[CM 260] ⇒[SM 520] ⇒[BS VII 53720]



Magical power： 3800 ⇒[CM 7600]



Magical resistance： 4000 ⇒[CM 8000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Possessing stats far exceeding that of strengthened normal apostles, she rushed forward while still holding Zweit's head, escaping the siege she had been in.



In moments, she exceeded the speed of sound, broke through the wall of the atmosphere, and slammed the back of Zweit's head with this insane force against a boulder protruding from the ground.



Taking into account the stamina of the white-platinum apostles, there was no way their heads could be crushed like a tomato. On the other hand, the boulder would be pulverized. However, Shia didn't stop there and kept pressing Zweit's head farther into the ground, before firing off an explosive slug bullet from point-blank range.



Furthermore, while jumping from that spot, she kept pulling the trigger over and over again. Against the explosive slug bullet creating brutal shockwaves, even if Zweit wouldn't sustain major wounds, there was no sign of her being able to move, and she was being crucified deep into the ground like a doll being toyed with.



Sensing that Erst and the other had come in pursuit, Shia unmindfully took out a big lump of metal from Treasure Warehouse II. It was a rectangle shape, 20 meters in length, 10 meters in width.



On one face was a small hole. Shia changed the design of Vire Doryuken and thrust it into the hole.



Then it would become obvious. The huge rectangle object was an external equipment attached to Vire Doryuken to deal damage.



Even if one was using gravity magic, there was a limit to the reduction of weight. A human wouldn't be able to hold 100 tons even with gravity magic.



Yes, this hammer really weighed 100 tons.



"Let the earth be scarred desu!"



Shia let out a loud yell.



Using her physical strength which had been strengthened beyond the realm of humans at full throttle, she swung down the hammer, preparing to cause an impact nothing short of comparable to that of an asteroid on a star.



When Zwei was finally able to raise his body from the storm of the explosive slug bullets, her whole vision was already covered with a wall cold metal.



"―― !"



At once, she entered defense mode using her white-silver feathers to cover her body in a knit. But, on the surface of the strike, there was obviously a sealing stone, and the moment of impact, it unknitted the feather, which then completely vanished under the weight that defied common sense.



Then, a severe earthquake occurred.



The artificial island that had caused the unnatural earthquake rumbled. The ground collapsed where the head of the hammer had crashed like a grave-marker. And, as if to make doubly sure of the deed, the hammer started rotating.



At that time, on the surface of the hammer that was touching Zweit, countless sharp edges grew out, and grinding sounds resounded as holes were being made into her. As a matter of fact, a drill gimmick was attached to the head of this hammer. In order to pulverize into million pieces the enemy that had been crushed by it.



Moreover, sealing stones had also been put on the sharp edges to deny enemy resistance. Even if Zweit used her white-silver feathers to protect her body, it would be useless. Truly, men were fond of drills.



Glancing at the 100t hammer that kept digging into the ground little by little, Erst and the other apostles, with a disciplined attitude that seemed indifferent to their fellow apostle's situation, rushed towards Shia.



Shia had just brought down the true 100 tons. She began the process to detach Vire Doryuken from the head of the hammer by shrinking it. She would definitely not make it in time, and she couldn't use [Half Transition] once more. If she did, the consumption of magical power supply from demon crystal stone would become unbalanced, and her body strengthening would be undone.



If that happened, if she was hit only once, there would be no second time.



There, Shia would have to use another of her trump cards.



"It's over!"



Erst's sentence penetrated her ears.



At the same time,



Gakin!



A hard sound resounded.



From Shia who had received and stopped the pair of large swords.



It was not that she used an equipment relying on an artifact to block the swords, nor that she used the pommel of Vire Doryuken.



It was just that she only had her body at her disposal, and she stopped the blow from the pair of large swords.



"Steel Clothes ―― It"s going to take more than normal attacks to bring me down you know?"



Shia's fearless voice echoed.



It was literally as if she wore steel clothes: it was a metamorphosis magic that strengthened her body.



Her neck, shoulders, arms, feet. The sword that obviously aimed to chop off Shia into several pieces, although it managed to bite into Shia a little because of the disintegration ability, was stopped from inflicting a major wound.



The apostles stiffened unintentionally. They started searching their data at high speed for an explanation, but no matter how much they searched, there was obviously no data recording of Shia having an advanced defense system skill as Hajime did. The fact that she immediately became impenetrable using metamorphosis magic indicated that her way of using it had to be very unique.



Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation was unique in its use of the demon stone, which was similar to Ryutaro's. It immediately made one's own body undergo a metamorphosis. It wasn't much different Tio's Dragon Transformation. It was Steel Transformation, so to speak. Though its consumption of magical power was not at the level of Half Transition, it was still significant, so its use had to be carefully thought about.



The apostles started trembling slightly. But this mere action would leave a fatal gap in this battle that was anything but usual.



Gashun! Vire Doryuken's shrinking process completed. Shia's face showed a faint smile at the return of her partner in her hands.



Then she let out that war cry once more.



"―― Level VIII ! ! "



"Na !?"



A light blue magical power surged. Shia's specs went up once again!



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS ⅤIII 61200]



Stamina： 120 ⇒[CM 240] ⇒[SM 480] ⇒[BS VIII 61280]



Resistance： 100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS VIII 61200]



Agility： 130 ⇒[CM 260] ⇒[SM 520] ⇒[BS VIII 61320]



Magical power： 3800 ⇒[CM 7600]



Magical resistance： 4000 ⇒[CM 8000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Her physical ability was nearing that of the platinum apostles.



Erst's face twitched.



Immediately following, the pair of silver swords that were trying cut Shia's Steel Clothes were repelled. Then, with both of Erst's arms raised due to the repelling, her stomach was left exposed, and a rotating Vire Doryuken was thrust into her at full power.



"Gaha!?"



Esrt's body was bent back and forth. A short exhalation, along with bloody vomit, came out from her mouth, and one of her swords involuntarily fell from her arm that became loose after the shock. And, she was sent flying with terrific force, like the ball in a pinball game.



Dritte, who had been stunned by the absurd defense before her eyes, suddenly came back to herself and swung her twin swords. Shia evaded by simply letting herself free-fall towards the ground. Vierte and Funfte gave pursuit using their platinum bombardment and feathers.



Using Divine Revelation Sight and Air Force, Shia barely evaded. She landed near the empty large hole made by the floating island of the extra-large drill. Glancing inside, she confirmed her feeling that Zweit had been subjugated. Also, she confirmed the stern faces of the apostles after Erst, the first apostle, had obviously received some serious damage when she was blown away.



Even though they had the conviction that they were overwhelming the enemy, when they noticed there were only three of them left.



Closing in on Shia, suddenly her previous declaration passed through their minds.



――To the likes of you, and also your shitty master, I can make the following prediction 'There is no future'.



Dritte who was in the lead gritted her teeth.



She was thinking about something insignificant, that was all nonsense.



Then, she shook off the ominous feeling that was sticking to her and swung down her pair of large swords with all her strength.



That sword swing, to which was added the power of her drop, could only be described with one word: powerful.



In response, Shia readied Vire Doryuken's lower part and took a stance of interception.



'What a fool', Dritte thought. Her body strengthening surprisingly deserved credit. Certainly, it was an outstanding boost that allowed her to approach them, the white-platinum apostles.



But, even with this, she couldn't reach them. This attack, which also used the speed of her fall, was simply something that exceeded the power of Shia's stats. Therefore, there was no way she would be able to defend against it. Let alone intercept it!



However …



( … … Why is your mouth moving!? What the hell are you intending to say!?)



Actually, she knew. In this slow motion scene, the movement on Shia's lips was something familiar, something she had come to see many times in this battle. Each time those powerful words were unleashed into this world, little by little, she was growing closer to it. To their height, that is. It was like an evil spirit lurking in the abyss, whose hands was growing longer in order to drag them in.



Dritte's muscles froze.



Therefore, without even realizing herself, she made a wish.



(Please stop!)



But, naturally, there was no way this wish would come true ――



"Level IX ! ! "



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS IX 68800]



Stamina： 120 ⇒[CM 240] ⇒[SM 480] ⇒[BS IX 68880]



Resistance： 100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS IX 68800]



Agility： 130 ⇒[CM 260] ⇒[SM 520] ⇒[BS IX 68920]



Magical power： 3800 ⇒[CM 7600]



Magical resistance： 4000 ⇒[CM 8000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Shia Hauria was now exceeding the white-platinum apostles. The pair of large swords Dritte had swung down and Vire Doryuken, which Shia had swung up, collided.



The explosion-like shock spread in the surroundings, and the ground around Shia was blown off, leaving a crater.



Even with the speed of the fall added to it, the two competing powers were equal.



Sparks were splendidly scattering around the pair of large swords and Vire Doryuken that were locked against one another.



"To stand against the apostles of god, what arrogance! Go down! Shia Hauria!"



The apostles had no such things as emotions. That was a lie all right.



Dritte, who had gotten aggressive and betrayed the usual calm of the apostles, fluttered the wings on her back in an attempt to smash up Shia.



After all, as she stated, it was unforgivable to stand against a being like herself who deserved the title of apostle of god. But, what was even more unforgivable was the fact that she would harbor the feeling of 'fear' caused by Shia, someone who had entered their own territory.



In order to deny this, she desperately poured more power into her pair of large swords.



Shia caught sight of Vierte and Funfte sneaking up from behind to attempt a pincer attack from left and right, spoke.



"Ha, I had no idea! So much for your rules."



Shia wrapped it around Dritte's neck.



Her hair that is.



"This is ――"



"You're in the way!"



Her hair, like it was a living being, tightened around Dritte's neck, and threw her with terrific force at Vierte who was approaching from the left. Neither Dritte, nor Vierte, could ever have expected Shia's hair to move like a living being. They were completely taken by surprise, and were thrown onto the ground.



And then, the expression on the face of Funfte who was approaching from the right … froze.



Yes, at the sight of that face.



"Impossible, that can't be! Such a thing as surpassing us!"



"Now then, this is the last one, ―― Level X ! ! ! "



Funfte screamed in denial as Shia, whose sky blue magic was reflected on the walls, stepped forward.



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



Physical strength：100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS X 76400]



Stamina： 120 ⇒[CM 240] ⇒[SM 480] ⇒[BS X 76480]



Resistance： 100 ⇒[CM 200] ⇒[SM 400] ⇒[BS X 76400]



Agility： 130 ⇒[CM 260] ⇒[SM 520] ⇒[BS X 76520]



Magical power： 3800 ⇒[CM 7600]



Magical resistance： 4000 ⇒[CM 8000]



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝



It was an overwhelming physical ability that surpassed the stats of the white-platinum apostles by more than 10000.



From Funfte's point of view, all she could see was Shia suddenly vanishing from her field of vision. Shia's movement speed had finally exceeded the perception ability of the apostles.



Funfte opened her eyes wide in terror at the impossible situation where she, an apostle of god, had lost sight of the enemy she was fighting, when she felt a figure from behind.



Barely having the time to direct her line of sight over her shoulders, all that was reflected in her eyes was a war hammer spreading over her entire field of vision.



"Ku, such a thing … "



Came the extremely shaky voice of Dritte as she retook her stance after having been previously thrown onto the ground along with Vierte. At the end of her sight was the surreal scene of Funfte's head pulverized, with only a stain left on the ground.



"Dritte … At this rate … "



On Dritte's side, Vierte, who readied her pair of large swords, addressed her fellow apostles as she kept her trembling eyes on Shia. However, there were no follow-up words. It was obvious she frankly didn't want to say what came next.



Dritte couldn't respond. Nevertheless, at that time, she caught sight of an unusual phenomenon surrounding Shia. No, more precisely, it was an unusual phenomenon surrounding what deserved the title of Shia's partner, the war hammer.



"This is … "



If they focused their eyes, they could see countless cracks on Vire Doryuken.



That was not a coincidence.



After all, it stopped countless attacks from the front, each of which had decomposition ability and unusually high impact, and what's more, it now has to cope with Shia's insane physical strength which surpassed reason. Rather, what was more of a wonder was how it had withstood all that so far.



"Vierte, target the weapon."



" … I see."



She understood the intention behind these words.



Immediately after, Shia's shape disappeared.



The moment Dritte realized this, Shia had already appeared behind her. A truly overwhelming speed. If it was only physical ability, she would be surpassing even a Hajime who was on Supreme Break.



However, the apostles would now be aiming to avoid physical contact at all costs, even if barely, after seeing what happened to Funfte.



The moment she saw Shia disappear, she immediately covered her body with her wings and pointed her of large swords overhead.



Her feathers were pulverized in an instant, but they managed to reduce the strength of Shia's blow to some extent, allowing the pair of large swords to stop the blow completely next.



"GuUUUUUUUUU!?"



Even so, Dritte unintentionally leaked an anguished cry at the tremendous shock that resulted. Both of her arms made an unpleasant sound which seemed to reveal they had reached their limit. Then, Vierte used her decomposition ability at its maximum.



The target was not Shia, but the cracks spreading on Vire Doryuken. She estimated that if Shia were to lose her weapon, they would only be up against living flesh, and thus have a chance of winning.



However,



"I predicted that you know?"



The derivation of her native magic Future Sight, Hypothesis Sight. Shia had become suspicious of Dritte and Vierte's discussion. What if I attack Dritte? She glanced into the future at this eventuality with her ability.



Therefore, she was aware of where Vierte would probably be aiming to strike.



Shia's beautiful legs disappeared. Her fine, toned, long legs precisely fixed on Vierte's neck.



Gokin!



Resounded the lively sound of smashing.



Vierte's neck was bent towards the direction of the day after tomorrow. Immediately following, fluently fired in a flash, came the explosion of an elegant, tremendously powerful roundhouse kick, that sent Vierte's body flying with terrific force.



"Ku, that damn monster"



"Please don't go around suddenly praising me."



Dritte fired white-silver bombardment. In terms of distance, it was from point-blank range.



However, as if naturally, it didn't land on Shia. Her shape disappeared instantly, and the next moment, she had snuck upon Dritte's bosom.



Without even having time to take a breath, Dritte received an elbow strike in the pit of the stomach. Gohaa! To this Dritte who was reduced in a sorry state where she was spewing out bloody vomit, a kick that seemed to pierce the sky was raised up. Before the beautiful form that bent 180 degrees top and bottom, Dritte, whose jaws had been pulverized, was sent floating into the air in a hopeless state.



"Explode desu!"



A scream, then an explosion.



While returning her feet, bent overhead, to their original position, Vire Doryuken had already picked up a speed too fast to be visible.



In that moment, it broke the speed of sound, causing an explosion in the air, and the next moment its full swing appeared.



And, Dritte, who received that full swing …



Her shape was no longer anywhere to be seen.



All that were left were red stains on the ground.



There, a war cry resounded.



"HaaaAAA ! ! "



It was Vierte. It seemed she didn't die even with her neck bone pulverized. She created a tidal wave of flames around a magic square using her white-silver wings, went inside, and started approaching Shia.



"Such a thing won't work against the current me!"



Swinging her rabbit ears, she sensed the presence of Vierte inside the large fire, and swung Vire Doryuken with a splendid timing at the place where Vierte was covering herself with fire.



There came jumping in … two shadows.



" ! "



Shia was surprised. She opened her eyes wide at the fact that she, who was excellent at the perception of presences, had been deceived.



By Vierte's presence, the large fire, as well as their whole resulting strategy.



"Be destroyed!"



The large sword that was swung against Vire Doryuken, the moment it hit Vierte, was Erst's.



As if trading Vierte's life for more power, Vierte's limbs were pulverized simultaneously with Vire Doryuken. Inside the flames starting to disperse because of the death of their caster, Erst ran past Shia to face her back. Then, she immediately turned around, and swung her large sword to pierce Shia who had just lost her partner.



Performing a rotation that seemed like a dance, she had taken a striking stance and her large sword was approaching Shia to take her life.



On the opposing side, Shia, who had her back turned to Erst, turned around like a mirror.



Then, for a moment, their gazes met. In this slow-motion space, both of their feelings were conveyed to one another.



(The apostles cannot lose!)



(I will be the one to win!)



The brightness of the large swords swelled up. It was a radiance that showed that even against Steel Clothes, it would be ready to chop off Shia's neck. That was the radiance of a will strong enough to question its emanating from a puppet.



Or maybe it was that at this moment she was betting her pride as an apostle, that she didn't want to lose, and she would carry out the mission of god and them apostles.



But, 'I don't want to lose' and 'I want to win'. There was a gap of strength between those two wills. When they clashed, the one with more pressure was undoubtedly … the latter.



As if to prove this fact, inside the slow-motion space, something started to form in the hand of Shia which should have been empty. Red liquid, as if it were alive, started to converge.



Erst opened her eyes wide in surprise.



That was because … Shia was holding a war hammer made of blood that had gathered from the cut she inflicted on her own arm.



Crimson War Hammer ―― it was a magic that used metamorphosis magic on one's own body, just like Steel Clothes. Something allowing her to freely manipulate her blood.



Leaving the slow-motion space and returning to the original world, the next moment, they both clashed ――



Once more, their backs were turned on each other.



The blood war hammer was falling and scattering blood like cherry blossom.



Pushu! Blood gushed out from the neck of the alert Shia.



Then a voice spoke.



" … I wonder what this thing rising up within me is. This tightening thing that makes me want to scream. Shia Hauria. Do you know what it is?"



" … Isn't it frustration?"



Hearing Shia's answer, Erst nodded 'I see'.



Immediately after, something came falling from the sky and stuck to the ground separating the two of them.



It was the large sword that had been broken halfway.



On closer look at Erst's stance, it wasn't that only Erst's sword had been broken. On her chest, there was a big hole. It was obvious whatever was inside had been pulverized.



Erst finally relaxed her alertness and threw away her broken sword. Then, she looked over her shoulders at Shia who had likewise relaxed, and muttered her last words with an expressionless face.



"I hate you."



Just as Shia said, that was the result of the considerable level of frustration she had been holding in …



Erst only said this, then fell down like a puppet whose strings had been cut.



At this sound, Shia fluttered her rabbit ears and hair, and turned around. Then, she muttered something in turn. Really as if to say that this was the cause of her victory. With a broad grin and fearless smile.



"I hate you 'very' much."



Then, she collapsed.



"Ahh, as expected, Level X takes a heavy tollll. And because I also used Crimson War Hammer, I am getting anemiaa"



While taking out a restorative medicine from Treasure Warehouse II, Shia muttered a monolog and held onto her consciousness that seemed ready to fade at any moment in some way or another.



"Now then, I've dealt with the apostles but … what is happening on Tio-san's side ―― "



Shia redirected her consciousness towards Tio whom she had been separated from while she fought with the platinum apostles. Searching her memory, when they got separated, the armed black dragons were surrounded by countless more monsters, and seemed to be rampaging without losing.



The black and white flashes flying about in the sky were worthy of a space battle between two fleets in a sci-fi movie.



Because the black dragons didn't seem to be losing ground, and that their master, Tio, seemed to be fine, Shia breathed a sigh of relief.



But, the next moment,



OoOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO ! ! ! !



Came the violent yells of countless numbers, that gave the sense that the sky was going to fall. And, simultaneously, a large army of monsters made its appearance, making completely light of the previous ratio.



Shia thought this was bad, and that she had to try and stand up, but the adverse effect of Level X was overwhelming, and it didn't look as if she would be able to stand up immediately.



Meanwhile, something else occurred. She wondered if it was the terrific flashes in the sky,



ZuDooOOOON ! !



An earth tremor spread, and something came crashing with terrific force right next to Shia, who was lying on the ground. She was swung back and forth by the oscillations.



Wondering what it was, Shia turned her sight ahead as she revitalized her upper body. There, there was …



"Eh, Tio, san?"



Lying down on the completely smashed-up ground, having wounds all over her body, was the figure of Tio.





Chapter 171




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



Dragon God Manifestation



(TN: The kanji used for dragon here is for the Chinese dragon, not the western dragon.)



Going back in time for a little.



During the time Shia was embroiled in a mortal combat with the platinum apostles, Tio was also in the middle of a fierce fighting.



Tio unified the armed black dragons with the new black dragons which were transformed using the black whip of slavery, with them Tio challenged the abnormally powerful monsters that filled the surrounding to the brim while enduring the aurora breath of the white divine dragon and Freed's variegated chantless-limitless storm of magic, bearing damage that wasn't few in the process.



The number of monsters that were turned into black dragons using the black whip of slavery was already nearly a hundred. The number of the dragons' fighting force had become doubled. In addition, with Tio's regeneration magic 'Boon of the Dragon King', they became an astounding battle force that should be called as the undying black dragon army.



But, even so, the one who was cornered in this fight was Tio.



(…Hm. The 'Fix It J' at mine hand wouldst be used up soon. When it becomes difficult to evade the aurora completely, it will cause mine damage control to be harsh.)



Tio took out a new magic medicine 'Fix It J' to reduce the additional effect of the aurora and then she gulped it down in one go while making a bitter face.



The aurora breath of the Uranus was excessively powerful. It was exactly like the main cannon of a battleship. Even just its aftershock granted the additional effect of obstructing healing magic and worsened the already existing wound to the target, so completely avoiding that attack was next to impossible.



Not only that, the Uranus didn't only have aurora breath as its attack, it was also creating countless aurora bullets that floated in the area where they would then flew around like a strafing Gatling gun.



Furthermore, Freed's all elements magic in full burst and silver feathers, his silver bombardment, and space magic was pressing on Tio like a surging wave, then the gray dragons above that couldn't be handled by the black dragons would also launch a heavy rain of aurora one after another.



Tio who was continuously enduring through that in paper-thin difference could be said as astonishing. But, if the magic medicine 'Fix It J' that Tio only had several bottles remaining was used up, then that situation would also crumble down, she was placed in a brittle equilibrium right now. The moment Tio became unable to nullify the effect of the aurora showering down on her and she couldn't evade, Tio would surely become cornered in one go at that time.



How much her dragon scales were already broken, how much her blood had flowed out…



Even if she used regeneration magic, there was a limit to the amount of her magic power. Not only for regeneration, her magic power was also being consumed in great amount for her breath attack and metamorphosis magic. To put it bluntly, her situation was gradually getting worse.



Freed also understood that, even now when a hundred of his monsters had been stolen by the black whip of slavery, his composed expression didn't crumble.



Tio was aiming to overturn the situation by turning the monsters into black dragon before she became unable to endure anymore, that was what Freed was thinking, so now that he was looking at Tio's situation where it became difficult for her to heal, on top of that the difference in battle strength where his monsters were still five times the number of the black dragon, he became convinced of his victory.



Looking from his slightly distorted lips, perhaps he was already planning to make sport of Tio until she died. Perhaps in his heart, he was already laughing, looking at the fool who was meaninglessly resisting in desperation for a result that was already obvious to see.



While vaguely guessing that thinking in Freed's heart, Tio was flipping over at midair even now to evade the aurora breath, she swung her whip in a world where up and down was reversed to hold back Freed, at the same time she counterattacked at the Uranus with super thin breath attack from the tip of her gun finger that made a gun shape.



While confirming that her attacks were easily repelled by a barrier of space magic and the white divine dragon's claw, Tio grumbled in her heart.



(Muu, I compressed that attack considerably already. That damned white dragon. To flick away mine breath attack entirely like that. Is that the revenge for previously? The subordinate monster is just like the master. It is making a disgusting grin.)



A fierce barrage of attack approached Tio. Light bullets and silver feathers, plus great number of magic.



Tio activated the space ripping magic enchanted in her whip and tore apart several of those attacks with the meandering movement of the whip that looked like a snake, she weaved through the gap that was created in the barrage and passed through. But, as expected she was unable to perfectly evade, the attack that impacted the edge of her body shaved off her dragon scales.



And then, an aurora breath attacked Tio at that timing. *GOU-!* It blew away the atmosphere while approaching Tio, annihilating a part of Tio's right shoulder and one of the dragon wings growing on her back.



"Kuuuuu-, that's effectiveee"



While leaking out voice unconsciously from the pain that she already didn't remember how many times it had been, Tio used a certain power and immediately used regeneration magic to regenerate her dragon wing before she rebuilt her posture from her midair tailspin.



However, what was regenerated was only her dragon wing while her shoulder blade was still bleeding mostly unhealed. Wondering whether Tio's regeneration magic had finally become unusable, Freed's faint grin became even deeper.



In contrast, Tio was sighing while pondering in her mind.



(Good grief, if Goshujin-sama is the one who did this to me then I would hath reached one or two climaxes already. Even without the side effect from the ability's activation, that kind of attack only granted me pain, and above all, it feels disgusting.)



Surely even Freed who was planning to torment Tio until death would be troubled without end if that only made Tio happy instead. No, before that he would undoubtedly draw away in revulsion.



(The black dragons art increasing favorably. At this rate it wouldst be possible to overturn the difference in battle force. …However, in the end, will it progress that well…. Above all, to head to Goshujin-sama's location with mine own strength and then face against the god…as expected, I hath to prepare that ahead then. In that case, I will need some time…)



Tio who squeezed out a conclusion from wracking her brain repeated attacking and evading the attacks while lamenting the inconvenience of her own trump card. Then she suddenly talked to Freed also with the intention of buying time.



"Which reminds me, thou. What happened with thy brethrens? They should have crossed into the Holy Precincts along with thou shouldn't they?"



Tio who suddenly chatted lightly at him despite her cornered situation made Freed retracted his grin and he narrowed his eyes suspiciously.



Tio made a wry smile at such Freed.



"What's wrong, as thou can see, I can possibly increase my battle force for more than this. At this rate, it seems I can somehow manage this somehow don't thou think? So I am just making a little probe here."



Freed nodded once while grumbling "Fumu" toward Tio who was transparently conveying her true motive.



And then, looking at Tio who was harboring hope that she could possibly overturn the difference in battle force at this rate if the devil race didn't participate in the fight, Freed was making a pitying expression while opening his mouth.



"Let me say that it is a needless worry if you are feeling apprehension about the possibility of participation of my brethrens. All members of the devil race are sleeping at another domain. After all they need to have the strength that is worthy as the vanguard of the god residing in their body before we arrived in the new world."



"I see now. However, this made me wondering though. Why art thou following someone like that Ehitorujue? That guy incited war from the human race side. Because of that there were a lot of devil race people who died isn't that correct? Dost thou not have any ill feeling for that?"



While getting hit by a light bullet once more that caused her dragon scales and blood to be scattered, even so Tio repeated her question calmly.



Freed kept the intensity of his attack without any slackening and returned a sentence.



"Everything is according to god's will."



As though it was only obvious, as if that was the truth, Freed said that without any hesitation or sadness on his expression.



Tornado was generated from the four pair of wings of the Uranus which crumbled the balance of Tio. The aurora breath that was fired at her at that timing burned half of Tio's body. The damage surpassed the reduction effect of 'Fix It J' toward the secondary ability of the aurora. Because of that Tio grimaced due to the additional effect that was invading her body while she drained up a new 'Fix It J' and used her regeneration magic.



However, she was unable to heal herself completely, her constricted waist and burned skin that were exposed from her torn clothes stayed unhealed. Her sleeve was also stayed torn up from her shoulder blade and her white graceful arm swelled bright red.



Cold sweat was perspiring from her skin as though to express her pain, even so Tio repeated her question.



"Even so won't thy comrade become unable to rest in peace? If Ehitorujue didn't summon people of another world here, the Goshujin-sama also wouldn't arrive here. In that case thou wouldn't lose several thousand of thy brethrens like in that day. If the people who hath departed, see thou right now…what art they going to think I wonder?"



Hearing those words that sounded like provocation, or even possibly scorn, Freed suddenly stopped his attack. Not only Freed, the attacks from other monsters including Uranus also stopped coming.



Inside the silence that suddenly visited, a severe earthquake thundered from far away. It was surely the sound of Shia rampaging. But, Freed and also Tio didn't move their gaze there.



Did some kind of change of heart happen in him? Was rage welling up in his heart, or else he wanted to defeat Tio's impudent argument? Tio didn't understand what was going on in actuality, but for the time being this situation was something that she would greatly celebrate for. After all for the time being Tio had the need to receive nonlethal pain from the enemy for a while.



"The likes of you, don't you dare to talk impertinently about our matter."



"Even if I'm not being impertinent, but I could not find even a single factor in Ehitorujue's way of doing thing that I can possibly give my approval forth."



"But, your premise is mistaken. There is no right and wrong in what the god is doing. The intention of the lord is exactly the true path. Therefore, all of my brethrens whose life were scattered, they are all martyr. There is no way they would regret it or anything, surely they will also take pride in what I'm doing."



Tio sent an exasperated gaze at Freed hearing those words.



"The true path, is it. In the end, thou art merely stop thinking for thyself. That's a blind faith. To put it in another way thou hath been brainwashed. Since the first place thou were already a religious fanatic, but even so I could see thy pride as a devil race and thy affection toward thy brethrens. But right now thy art completely a controlled puppet."



"That's what I called as an impertinence."



Freed cut off their talk for once, then he sent a pitying gaze at Tio before started talking once more.



"The many wars, the many hardships, all of those were the trials that god handed down to us. That great person was searching, for existence that is worthy to walk together with him. And then, the one who overcame those trials and got recognized by that great person is only our race, that's all there is to it. The me who was unable to grasp that divine will and instead insulted that great person as a pagan god, that foolishness makes me want to vomit right now. However, that great person forgive this foolish me, and not only he welcomed me in, he even granted me the qualification to be the retainer of god. This depth of god's mercy…why, are you unable to understand it?"



Freed who began to get into a trance while talking caused Tio to groan "oou" in repulsion inside her heart. Freed talking like this was also because of her provocation, but he was even more unsightly to see than she expected.



And then, the content of his talk also felt in perfect form in a certain meaning. There were truly a lot of places that were fully loaded with double standards she could throw retort at. After listening this far, perhaps it could even be said that it felt refreshing instead.



"Just like thou said, in the first place it has become like this because I am someone impertinent. Leaving that aside, 'qualification to become retainer' thou said? Doest that referred to that transformation to an apostle?"



"Correct. First my lord had elevated me to an apostle's rank. And then, eventually I will climb to the rank as retainer god, similar like Aruvheit-sama. It's truly something awe-inspiring, but now that Aruvheit-sama has died, I am serving as my lord's immediate follower. In that case, my race will become the follower of me who is the follower of god. That is to say they will become the people chosen by the true god――a divine race."



Perhaps feeling the extraordinarily great honor that he received, or else, perhaps he was imagining how his own race would rule over the people at the new land as the race of god, whatever the reason Freed's expression was turning into something that might be prohibited to be broadcasted to public while he kept talking even to the topic that he wasn't asked for.



But, at that time, space undulated as though to obstruct the talk of Freed. No, it was a generation of immense power to the degree that it made them thought that space was undulating.



When they spontaneously directed their gaze at the direction of the power, there a faint blue magic power was pulsing like heartbeat while winding up. And then, several of the platinum apostles leaped forward yet they then got blown away instead, they could see such spectacle at the far away.



"Impossible…the apostles are being pushed back? Absurd-. The first until the fifth apostles had been strengthened by my lord's power to a great degree already-!"



Freed's expression changed from a look of ecstasy into a look of shock as though he had been showered with ice water.



That was just how hard it was to believe seeing the scene of someone who regardless of battling five platinum apostles at the same time, far from matching the apostles, this person was even gradually beginning to overpower them.



But, for Tio who believed in Shia from the start, she replied back with an extremely composed tone.



"What art thou feeling surprised for. Among all of us, with the exception of Goshujin-sama, the one who is the most monstrous is Shia just so thou know. That person is without any foundation like being a vampire, dragon race, or apostle's body, even if we look back at her ancestor, she is only a demi-human which mean she also doesn't hath talent in magic. To say further, something like a rabbit race is a race that is the most cowardly in the world. That maiden overturns all that with just her feeling. The likes of the soldiers of the self-proclaimed god who hath no ability other than soaking in joy from belittling other people at best, there art no way they would be able to rival her with just some strengthening don't thou think?"



Tio talked as though it was the truth of this world.



Freed could only leak out a murmur of "…impossible" to Tio's words.



And then, he shook his head as though to shake off something, and then he glared at Tio with a gaze that contained coldness.



"I have to go to support the apostles. Tormenting you to death end right now. You can quickly meet your end."



"Don't say that. The main event will be from here on just so thou know."



"Nonsense. Your scheme won't result in anything. The difference in battle force is impossible to overturn. You are already wounded all over. Further, just I and Uranus are enough to be your opponent."



Freed quietly raised his hand. It was as though he was saying that if that hand got swung down then the scythe of the god of death would be swung down on Tio's neck. Answering its master's will, the white divine dragon roared and its eyes glinted with killing intent.



The fact was that there was five times difference in their battle force. There were still a thousand of Freed's monsters remaining against the two hundred black dragons.



But,



"I don't remember saying these art all of my black dragons though?"



Tio smiled fearlessly.



And then, she resounded the command to revolt simultaneously.



"Awaken! Reborn! O children of dragon king――'Dragon King's Corpse Life Army'!"



Immediately the land squirmed.



No, more accurately the monsters who fell on the ground from the mortal combat unfolding at the sky――that great number of husks were moving like sludge.



At the ground right below where nearly a thousand monsters were lying down, their husks were dyed reddish black and the scenery became a painting from hell. There the first cry of newly born life rose, the husks' shape was gradually firming up, and then the long necks there that were rising up looked like the lid of hell that was sliding open.



One body, and then one more body, those things that were born from the heaps of bodies and streams of blood unfolded open their wings vigorously and flapped, those large bodies were floating up in order to hasten to join at their king's location.



"What, is that…"



Freed's movement spontaneously stopped, his eyes narrowed while looking down at below while he whispered. Tio then answered that whisper.



"What is necessary for black dragon transformation is not only this black whip of slavery. How much dragon scale and blood doth thou think I hath scattered in this battlefield?"



"What? Don't tell me, you used a part of yourself as the medium?"



"Fufufu, now, this is the celebration of thy birth! Raise the grand roar fitting for a dragon!"



"――"



It was Tio's――the dragon king's command.



The black dragons who were just born, and the black dragons who were dancing in the sky simultaneously answered that command. Breath attacks in black color of Tio's magic power light were fired in countless number.



Skewering flashes pierced the sky from the ground. Flashes were rushing horizontally from back and front, left and right. The black flashes that were fired almost at the same time formed a cage of heat ray that put the monsters of Freed at the center with no place to escape.



The shriek of death agony rained down from the sky.



Soul and metamorphosis composite magic 'Dragon King's Corpse Life Army'――this magic was using Tio's own blood and scale as the medium, where the soul magic Dragon Soul Reproduction and metamorphosis magic Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation were applied on the monsters' corpse to create black dragons.



By offering flesh and blood, making use of corpse, it created a new army――in addition, the created dragons were all black dragon with an evil and atrocious appearance that could be mistaken as an evil dragon. It could be said as a worthy deed for a woman who looked up at a man who was titled as demon king that she called as goshujin-sama…perhaps.



Normally someone who listened to detail of this magic would feel one or two repugnances, but Hajime who listened to the report about this magic instead said "To be able to make use of the killed opponent, that's really ecological. What a convenient magic huh" and looked a little envious. As expected from the man who was called as demon king or demon god. And then, Tio who blushed and fidgeted around shyly but happily after getting praised like that could also be said as having enough quality to be a female general of the demon king.



"How's that? Thy monsters hath been reduced considerably with this don't thou see?"



The corpse life army that was created was roughly consisting of four hundred dragons. Combined with the armed black dragons and monsters that were turned into black dragons using the black whip of slavery, then the total number of the army could reach six hundred dragons.



And then, with the simultaneous breath attacks just now, the monsters of Freed that got slain were roughly three hundred monsters. If added with the numbers of monsters who got heavily injured and became unable to fight satisfactorily then the number of the victim would jump to five hundred. The remaining monsters in good health and all their limbs intact were more or less five hundred.



In other words, the condition had been overturned.



Although Tio's appearance was wounded all over, but her figure who was standing imposingly in midair with black dragons obeying her in the background was truly worthy to be called a dragon king.



As for Freed, he took a slow glare at the battlefield, and then he suddenly lifted the corner of his lips.



It was as though he was looking at the struggle of a bug that had all of its wings already plucked out, as if he was laughing mockingly at a person who ran desperately at non-existence hope, that smile was awfully warped, expressing his ugly emotion.



Freed's mouth opened. His eyes were muddy like dark sludge in his expectation to trample the other party's hope. And then with a voice that was filled to the brim with scorn and ecstasy,



"I don't remember saying these are all of my monsters though?"



Right after that, a pillar of light rose up from the obelisk.



Furthermore, it didn't seem to come only from the obelisk in front of Tio's eyes, the same white light was also rising to the sky one after another from the islands other than the floating islands where Tio and Freed were at. That implied that there were the same obelisks at the surrounding floating islands, this scene was enough to stir up unpleasant premonition in Tio's heart.



"…Hmmm. As expected, it won't go well that easily. If I hath to say in Goshujin-sama's style, then this must be a 'template'." (TN: I guess what she mean by template here is something like cliché or trope I guess.)



Tio was reflexively making a bitter look while whispering that, while at her field of vision the worst situation was coming into view.



OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!



It was a fierce war cry that made the whole space rumbled.



Above and below, back and front, left and right, like a wriggling wall, everywhere she looked at there were monsters, monsters, monsters, a swarm of monsters.



Not only at the floating island where she was at right now, all the islands floating at the surrounding were also wholly covered with swarms of monsters.



Just how many their number could possibly be? Several thousand, several tens of thousands, the monsters' number wasn't at that level anymore. Even hundreds of thousands weren’t enough at all to express their total number. Most likely the monsters here were in the millions.



"Although they are a level inferior compared to the previous monsters, I think their number has compensated for that for more than enough, don't you think so? Now then, Tio Claus, the sport is now over. Prepare to be trampled down."



Right after that, Freed swung down his arm.



That was the signal for the trampling.



The monsters in a great amount of numbers simultaneously rushed at the black dragons.



(-, no matter what this number art just too many. As for Shia…looked like she is victorious, but as expected she cannot immediately move. If she is attacked right now she wouldn't last even for a bit. Thinking about the future, I wish the time could pass a little bit more yet…it can't be helped! A woman is all about guts!)



Although the armed dragons were somehow fighting hard, yet the black dragons other than them were in the middle of raising scream of death agony right now. Tio made her decision.



Until this point of time, she was thinking about after this battle, she was taking safety margin as much as possible while continuing to save her power so she would be able to support Hajime later with the greatest strength possible that she could muster but…now she flung off that thinking to the wind.



This method was a dangerous method where she could possibly die instantly is she mistook even a step.



However, she could only do that in order to activate it instantly! For the sake of her friend, and then, for the sake of her beloved master, she didn't hesitate!



"Cooome on, o white dragon! That indomitable that still hath not hit me properly, now I'll receive it head on without evading, so put thy spirit and fire it at me!"



While saying that provocative sentence, Tio swung around her whip like a tornado around her and cut apart the swarming monsters while her other hand was firing her compressed breath attack.



The black compressed breath that was specialized for piercing became a streak of light and pierced the monsters on its line of fire and arrived at its target the white divine dragon.



Uranus seemed to hear Tio's provocation, it dispersed the approaching breath merely with its roar while its eyes were sparkling with killing intent as though to say "Then take this if you can", it then fired an extra-large aurora.



*DOU!* A bombardment that looked like the main cannon of a space battleship firing that came out in science fiction movie approached in a straight line at Tio while turning the allied monsters into dust just from its aftershock.



Tio drained up in one breath the 'Cheatmate Dr' that she wasted no time to take out, she then threw away the container while performing partial dragonification.



Both her arms swelled up and turned into dragon arms covered in dragon scale and sharp claws elongating out. Furthermore, her whole body became covered with jet black dragon scales leaving no spot exposed, she crossed her arms and took a defensive posture to protect her vital spots.



Freed saw her doing that and guessed that Tio was seriously not going to evade to receive the attack. He made a sneer thinking that she had resigned herself already. That was only natural he guessed. There was no way she could come out safely after getting hit by the aurora. He could see no merit in doing that, that was why it was only natural for him to think that she was now accepting her death graciously.



But, just before the aurora hit, he saw the powerful and resolute gaze of Tio that was visible from the gap between her crossed arms, and he got caught in a violently bad premonition.



He was about to call at Uranus to stop the dragon's attack unconsciously, but the aurora had already got fired by then. It was impossible for him to make it in time, and right then,



*ZUDOOOOOOOO-!!*



Tio's figure was swallowed into the aurora along with a thunderous sound and she vanished from sight.



A track of light divided the sky horizontally.



Inside that light of devastation,



"――—!!!"



Tio desperately endured while raising a wordless scream.



The prided dragon scales that dragon race boasted as the hardest were annihilated in succession. While feeling aware of the unpleasant sensation running through both her blocking arms, an abnormal storm of agony that assaulted her whole body made her gritted her teeth with a force that might break her teeth.



It was an intense pain that might make her mad.



Tio understood that her body was being annihilated from the edge. She hallucinated the shadow of death slithering up on her body. This wasn't like the sweet pain that Hajime granted her, not even for a bit. She was undoubtedly able to listen to the scream that was raised by her dying body.



The damage that had already far surpassed the scope that could be described made her consciousness almost got blown away to the beyond. While she was barely taking hold of her consciousness, Tio endured it through to the end with her spirit, and then…



(…I can do this-)



Conviction.



At the same time, she took out the variable large shield Aedeon from 'Treasure Warehouse II' in front of her eyes, it blocked the aurora just for an instant. The white breath of devastation was easily annihilating the shield that was just a pile of metallic mass without any 'Vajra' or 'Transmutation' or even magic power for regeneration poured into it, but even so the quality shield of Hajime's made definitely protected Tio's body from ruin during a few seconds.



Just that much was more than enough. With a flap, Tio leaped out from the torrent of aurora. And then, she was falling to the ground while white smoke was rising from her body and she impacted on the ground with a thunderous sound.



The ground was gouged from the impact and dust cloud rose up grandly.



"Eh, Tio, san?"



Shia's words felt caught up was surely not only because of her exhausted body.



Shia was obviously looking shocked from seeing the disastrous appearance of Tio.



Tio replied with a bright voice in order to reassure Shia.



"Yes. This is, every, one's, belo, ved, pervert, Tio, san he…gafuh…gehah"



"No no no, this is not the time for saying humor with a body that almost died like that! There is no person or anything that like Tio-san when you are in your pervert mode! All the mankind would only draw away in revulsion against such pervert desu! Wait not that, healing, quickly healing!"



"No, person, likes me…the whole mankind, will draw away…how, cruel. Gofuuu, haa haa."



While taking out magical medicine of healing from her own 'Treasure Warehouse II' all flustered, Shia was making a sharply piercing retort with a voice that was oozing with unease. Even while enduring a tremendous pain, Tio's tone was changing from feeling a bit of pleasure and she was going 'haa haa' in a different meaning. As expected, the pain given to her from her comrade felt sweet.



Shia was crawling toward Tio who was lying down spread-eagled in a tattered state, magical medicine in hand. But, before Shia could reach Tio, a silver feather flew in high speed and disintegrated the medicine container at Shia's hand.



Shia came to her sense and when she looked at the direction from where the feather was flying, there was Freed riding above Uranus there glaring at Shia without hiding the scorn in his expression.



When Shia looked above, there was a swarm of monsters there in which the expression of like the number of stars matched it perfectly. Her surrounding was also completely buried in monsters, she couldn't see the edge of the island at all. It was as though the ground was covered by undulating dark clouds.



Shia and Tio were surrounded completely in a hemisphere shape.



Because Shia had acted recklessly in her battle with the apostles, she was in a state where she couldn't immediately fight, as for Tio it should be rather left unsaid. She was heavily wounded to the degree that it was mysterious that she was still alive.



In other words, this is a situation of checkmate from all point of view.



"A power that could drive away the strengthened apostles of god is something to be feared…but it appeared you have completely used up your strength. It's already over for Tio Claus too. This is the end of the path of the fools who went against god. Obediently receive this judgment."



Shia directed a chilly gaze at Freed who haughtily proclaimed such. And then, when her mouth opened to talk back,



'Fuh, fuha, fuhahahahahah, gehah, kafu-, hahaha-"



Shia swallowed her words hearing Tio's laugh.



"…Have you lost even your mind? That's understandable. After all you should be tormented by unimaginable tremendous pain even now."



"No, no. Nothing, wrong, with mine sanity. What art funny, is, thy humor. Fufu."



Tio ghastly distorted her blood soaked face while directing a sharp gaze that was unthinkable coming from that wound-riddled body. Pierced by those golden eyes with slitted pupils that were increasing in radiance, Freed unconsciously took a step back.



The bad promotion that he felt before Tio got directly hit by the aurora swelled up further, a chill was circling in his whole body as though something unknown was crawling around.



But, he ignored the chill using his fury toward himself who was pressured by these two who were already at the death's door no matter he saw it, and he kept up with his haughty attitude.



"Hmph. What can you do this late with that kind of state? Do you think you can manage something somehow with the likes of the black dragons? Or else, don't tell me, are you thinking that your master would return here so conveniently?"



"Perish, the thought. Just that, the one, ending this, is me."



Tio's body was shining with black colored magic power light. Even though she was supposedly unable to move, her body was making creaking sound while she scolded her trembling legs to stand up. Without paying any mind to the blood that was dripping down, only her lips were showing a deepening fierce smile.



Freed put himself on guard.



He tried to deal the finishing blow judging that there was no need for any question. In concert with that, Uranus also opened its mouth wide. Light of annihilation was converging inside it.



And then, in that moment just before the last flash was going to be fired,



*DOKUN—!!*



Pulsing sound resounded in the space.



Not only that, a tremendous pressure that was even accompanied by physical impact rushed through the dome-shaped space, causing Freed and Uranus to slightly staggered. There were even monsters in the surrounding who fainted.



The center of that pressure was without doubt Tio.



Despite being just a step away from death, she was emitting an impossible pressure.



*DOKUN—!!*



Pulsing was spreading at the whole space once more.



The abnormal pressure was heightening second by second. It even caused a hallucination as though their heart was being grabbed tightly.



*DOKUN—!!*



The pulsation spread for the third time.



Whether one wanted it or not, they were made to understand this instinctually. That it was an existence that one must not lay their hands on.



What they felt was fear.



What was hard to believe, what he didn't want to believe, was that this swelling pulsation of power easily surpassed the white divine dragon that could be said as the culmination of Freed's effort.



(I, impossible. Just what in the world, something, something is happening-. Is she not actually dying? Is she bluffing? Something…something like this, it's as if, as if this is the same with that monster-)



With his body stiffening unable to be aware of his trembling arms and legs, Freed spouted out such words that were filled with confusion and agitation in his heart. But then he came back to his senses all of sudden when he noticed Tio who had stood up completely, she had pulled Shia close to her and gazed at Freed with narrowed eyes.



If he had the free time to be paralyzed, if he had the time to lament how unbelievable this was, then he should attack them with no question asked instead. Even with the situation turning bizarre like this, it didn't change that Tio and Shia were in exhaustion, it would be enough if he attacked simultaneously along with the surrounding monsters. Freed was feeling anger at his own stupidity after this late like that.



With that fury, Freed who was scolding himself raised up his arm.



"Tsk, attack-! Don't let them do anything-! Kill them right now-!!!"



A command that sounded like a shriek.



All the terrified monsters couldn't immediately react. Be that as it may, the monsters that were in the number that was far more than enough to destroy just two people obeyed that command, including the Uranus they let out their killing intent.



There, a voice resounded.



The voice that possessed a solemn echo sounded like it was descending from the sky despite how the speaker was right there in front of them.



"Observe closely. This is the zenith that I, the dragon race Tio Claus had arrived at."



Right after that, a storm of killing intent was released.



At the center of that was naturally the aurora breath of Uranus.



But, all those attacks couldn't hope to wound Shia and Tio.



If the reason was asked, it was because just before the attacks were launched, an extremely large flash surged and pierced the sky with Tio as the center.



Black――or rather the dark light that was like the abyss was rising straight to the sky, the monsters standing on its way were all blown away.



Although attacks were rushing at that flash's bottom, the place where Tio and Shia were at, the dark light pillar rising to the sky while rumbling the space didn't shake even a bit.



Far from that, it increased in radiance even further while still piercing the sky, in addition black ripple was spreading in the sky.



"What is, what is happening-!"



Freed yelled with even his confusion exposed.



Even while he was doing that, the dark ripple was spreading through the sky――



At the next moment, a flame blast licked all over the sky.



The radiant great fire was spreading crawlingly and in the blink of eye the sky was dyed red. What was manifested wasn't sea of clouds but a sea of flame. The red sea that was blazing roaringly couldn't be thought as the scenery of this world by any means.



Further in that flame sea of the sky, lightning surged.



Divine rumbling sound roared, not losing to the sound of the air bursting. The raining down thunders were randomly, carelessly, mercilessly, shooting out the monsters and exterminated them like scattering flies.



At that time, in the sea of flame and lightning, something undulated.



A black and shining twisting large body. The whole of that body couldn't be seen yet, it was unclear just how big it was, a part of its body was jutting out from the sea of flame and thunder before sinking in again. It was just like how the divine beast leviathan was lurking in the sea, however, the aberrant pressure pouring down on the ground was far mightier.



"What, wha-what, is that…"



Freed was staring at the sky in a daze while whispering. All the monsters including the white divine dragon were also at the same state. All the monsters were similarly kept staring at the red sky in a daze.



There was no way that whisper would be answered. But, just when they were thinking like that, in that timing the thing swimming in the sea of lightning and flame displayed the whole of its true form.



Along with a tremendous roar.



GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!



The sky fell.



The enormously tremendous roar that made the listener hallucinate that rained down from the sky in super wide range.



Due to that, the monsters who had difficulty in their defensive power were easily pulverized, while a lot of other monsters had their consciousness reaped and they fell on the ground.



Amidst that, what showed its figure was a gigantic dragon covered in dragon scale that shined black with its body clad in flame and lightning. It wasn't a western dragon that imitated a lizard. It was an eastern dragon with a long meandering body like a snake. The whole length of its body might be more than a hundred meter.



Black dragon――no, if the white dragon was called as a white divine dragon, then the true form of this dragon that should be called as a black divine dragon, went without saying, it was the form of that person Tio Claus.



Soul and metamorphosis composite magic 'Dragon God Manifestation'――using soul magic 'Magic Clad Alignment' that aligned the soul with magic so that the body could wear the magic itself with the highest class flame magic 'World Destroyer Flame Wave' and the highest class wind magic 'Sky Miracle', and then adding to those the metamorphosis magic 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation', secret medicine to strengthen the body, sublimation magic, and then, the 'Pain Conversion II' that was the derivative skill of characteristic magic 'Dragonification', only after using all of those at the same time this ultimate skill of Tio could be activated.



Tio was reducing the side effect of the aurora that was too strong while doing damage control. Even while doing that she was piling up the necessary strength for dragon god transformation using 'Pain Conversion II' by continuously bearing wounds.



She had received that much damage while healing herself to the degree that she wouldn't die, even so, if at the very end she didn't bear that heavy wound that brought her to the verge of death, she wouldn't be able to pile up the strength for the dragon god transformation. In addition, she was unable to stock up energy by hurting herself, on top of that the damage couldn't be changed into pleasure in the middle of the conversion, and then there was even the side effect of her sense of pain getting magnified. If someone with average mental strength attempted this, they would be driven mad assuredly before they could activate the dragon god transformation.



Originally Tio planned to take care of Freed with only her black dragons, and then she would rush toward Hajime's position with a strength that was still heightened to maximum before unveiling this technique in the battle against Ehito but…



In the present situation where she forced herself to activate this technique, she might only have a minute to maintain this form. And then, after her dragon god transformation was released, she would surely become the same like Shia where she would be in a state where she couldn't fight.



Therefore



(I'll finish everything in this one minute!)



The golden eyes of Tio who accomplished dragon god transformation glared fiercely at the monsters below.



The monsters immediately drew back in fear. Only one, the white divine dragon who wasn't drawing back, but in its eyes there was a fear and awe that couldn't be hidden.



Tio's roar thundered.



Right after that, many gigantic lightning surged from the sea of flame and lightning and mercilessly cooked the monsters swarm. If this scale was measured using the earth measurement then the scale could far surpass a level F5 storm. The monsters who tried to escape were all rolled up and embraced into blazing arms, they were annihilated there leaving not even dust behind.



"Impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-! This, something like this is impossible-,! There is no way this is possible-!"



The thunders raining down from the sky was like a divine punishment. The tornado connecting the land and sky and swallowed everything into ruin was like the fire of hell.



Seeing that scene that should be called as the manifestation of heaven's might, Freed felt like the divinity of the god that he held faith to was denied along with his faith, he was repeating words that denied reality in half-madness.



And then, he gave an order to the divine white dragon that was his best masterpiece.



"Deny that, Uranus! That, that existence, DENYYYYYY IIIIIIIIITTT!!"



GuUU, RUAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA—!!



Uranus answered its master's command.



It opened its jaw and fired the strongest aurora it could as though to blow away his fear altogether, as though to grant its master's wish.



However, that attack which was fired with its whole body and soul――



GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA—!!



The flash of darkness clad in sparks that was fired from the jaw of the divine black dragon Tio collided against the aurora midair. A beat later, the aurora was easily pushed back and the flash of darkness swallowed Uranus without stopping.



There wasn't even a shriek of death agony.



The flash of black that erased even sound merely tore up the sky, gouged the ground, and without slowing down it annihilated a part of the floating island before vanishing at the space below.



No, the white divine dragon wasn't completely annihilated.



Its lower body was blown away, its body that consisted mostly only of chest and head fell on the ground with a bam. Its dignity as a divine dragon had already gone without even a fragment remaining. Light was quietly falling off from its eyes, reducing the flesh into a mere husk.



"U, ra…nus?"



Freed stared at the white divine dragon with powerless voice.



That figure that didn't respond even when he called made an indescribable emotion to well up in his heart.



The processing of information in his brain couldn't catch up with what was happening.



Even though he was floating in midair, it felt like his feet was swaying unstably.



When Freed noticed, he was screaming.



"AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!"



Giving only a glance at the millions of monsters who were exterminated with preposterous momentum, Freed glared straight at Tio and flapped his silver wings. In those eyes things like monsters or anything else weren't reflected anymore, there was only flame of fury and hatred blazing there.



He fired silver flash with all his strength. He fired shockwave of space magic and tore apart the space.



But, all of those were easily dispersed just with Tio's roar.



He couldn't reach.



He couldn't reach toward Tio who had climbed to far away height.



That was why,



"Gahah!?"



The shockwave of the roar that Tio raised――Freed was driven away just from the after wave from that.



Freed whose whole body was struck hard and stiffened as though he was paralyzed was then assaulted by falling thunder. *KA-!* The sky flashed and then at the next instant, a tremendous impact pierced his body, Freed was falling to the ground while white smoke was raising from his body.



His body struck the ground, and then after he bounced several times on the surface, he finally stopped and laid down spread-eagled.



In the eyes of Freed that were looking above at the sky, the scene where the monsters in the number that covered the whole space to the brim had been reduced to a degree where they could be counted by a glance was reflected. Whether he wanted it or not, he was made to understand that this was the end.



His violent emotions already disappeared, right now for some reason only emptiness was smoldering in him.



What is someone like me who was welcomed by god doing, giving up like this. I should resolve myself instead to walk the path of martyrdom to take the enemy together with me into death until the very end.



Even when he tried to persuade himself like that, as expected, his body didn't even twitch. His body was unable to move because of the damage…not. The will power to move his body, just wasn't welling up in his heart.



"I…"



At that time when Freed was about to whisper something, a black light fell from the sky toward him.



His awfully calm mind judged that it was a finishing blow for him. With this, it was the end for him.



But, at that moment, a shadow passed over the firing line of the black light.



KURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAA–!!



"Wha-!?"



Something roared and cut into the firing line, and with its body that something became Freed's shield, it was…



"Uranus-!!"



Yes, it was the white divine dragon that should have already expired.



With its body that now consisted only of its upper body, Uranus somehow moved and leaped in front of the dark flash.



The white divine dragon whose body was in tatters from the edge slightly turned at Freed who was opening his eyes in shock while narrowing its eyes quietly.



He couldn't hear any words even if he used metamorphosis magic.



Nevertheless, at that time, Freed was able to clearly understand what the white divine dragon was conveying to him.



Namely,



"Run away, huh…"



While making aurora to gush out from its remaining broken body, unbelievably Uranus was holding back Tio's flash――that will, it was the will to not let its master Freed to die.



At that moment, a torrent of memory rushed Freed.



He recalled. At the time when he was nothing more but a mere devil race, why at that time he was attempting to challenge a great labyrinth.



(…I was merely, wishing to make a safe country, where nothing could threaten my brethrens. I pursued power for the sake of that. My brethrens were more important than anything. I thought that if it was for their sake then I could do anything. Yet despite so…'It can't be helped because it's the will of god', huh…)



The white divine dragon was pressuring on him.



It was directing a criticizing gaze toward its master that wasn't trying to run.



But, toward that white divine dragon, Freed only shook his head quietly and made a troubled smile.



He challenged a great labyrinth with mad desperation, actually he even almost died many times before obtaining the metamorphosis magic. And then with that magic this dragon monster was the first monster that he subdued. Since then this dragon had been his partner for all this time.



Even though it should have been dead for sure, yet it crossed over logic and rushed to him when he was in danger. He felt a definite bond in that act. Even though he himself had already forgotten even such an important thing before he knew it, his partner didn't forget that even now when it was already dead.



Freed's body was worn-out, he was already unable to move satisfactorily.



Then,



"…Sorry. Go together with me, partner."



――Kurya



That voice sounded as though it was saying "Can't be helped huh".



At the next moment, the dark flash swallowed everything like a divine punishment――



After that, there was nothing left behind.



(If thou two weren't charmed by that god…thou would be a good pair of master and servant, no, a good partners with certainty. But, thou were unable to resist or persist, art because of thy weakness in the end. Thou could make no excuse. Well, at the very least, this Tio Claus will remember the conclusion of the two of thou.)



Tio turned a solemn gaze fitting for a dragon god to the spot where Freed and Uranus were at.



That way of ending that Freed and Uranus showed at the very end, where they smiled wryly at each other holding a saturation of various emotions, for Tio it was something that for some reason she didn't want to cast away as something trivial.



But, at that time, Shia's voice resounded.



{Ti, Tio-saaaan. Won't the time come any time nowww?}



Shia's voice that reached Tio through telepathy came from inside the body of Tio that transformed into dragon god. So that she wouldn't get dragged in, Tio sheltered Shia inside her body where it was the safest place. It was essentially the same like when she stored away her equipment when she turned into a dragon. Her body was longer than a hundred meters anyway so there was no problem for her to shelter Shia inside there.



{Yes. It's frustrating but, mine limit will come soon. Let's annihilate them all in one go!}



The time limit of the dragon god transformation.



Along with a terrific roar, a flash that dyed the world black rushed through the space. Thunders were becoming fiercer and fiercer and gigantic tornados of flame trampled the monsters to ashes.



And then,



{Kuu, thi, this is the limit.}



At the same time with Tio's pained voice, the sea of flame and thunder covering the sky dispersed and the tornado became undone gently. There was almost no monster that could be seen. Even if there were monsters that survived they would be wounded all over or ran away at full speed already fearing Tio's majestic appearance.



Right after that, the body of the black divine dragon went *KAT!* as though light exploded, then that large body vanished like a lie and Shia and Tio appeared at the midair.



As only natural, they lost against gravity and fell.



"Wait, Tio-saaan! This is midair desuu!"



"Ah, oops. I hath no spare energy. Shia, give me help."



"Are you stupid-. Even I don't have any spare energy anymore!"



They looked like they still had the composure to complain at each other, but in actuality they couldn't even use 'Air Force' or body strengthening, far from that they didn't even have magic power remaining to activate 'Treasure Warehouse II', so this wasn't quite a laughing matter for them.



"Hiiiii! Even though we have won with great pain, yet we are going to die like this in the end, I don't wanna desuu!"



"I, it's fine! Black dragooonnn, heeelp uuussss"



Tio called the black dragons. Shia felt relieved noticing that they still had this method.



However, the voice of the black dragons that responded to Tio's call sounded extremely far.



"Aa, that's right. Because it was dangerous I made them to evacuate quite far. Perhaps they won't make it in time…"



"Noooooooooo!! Hajime-saaaaan!!"



Shia started crying. While Tio was plainly flustered.



But, at that time, a white shadow rushed toward the two in super speed like a streak of flash.



And then, the arms of the two were firmly caught by rabbit ears, the catcher then kicked on the air and reduced its speed.



That was,



"Inaba!?"



"Is it Inaba!?"



"Kyuu!"



Yes, it was the kick rabbit Inaba-san.



Inaba was kicking on the air while gradually lowering their altitude, he then safely lowered Shia and Tio on the ground.



"Thou saved us. My gratitude to thou, Inaba."



"Inaba, thank you very much. But, why are you here…"



"Kyukyuu! Kyuu?"



Inaba brushed off his rabbit ear with a swish as though to say don't mind it. And then in exchange for answering Shia's question, Inaba stiffened his ear at a certain direction.



When they looked there, there were the figures of Shizuku and others at far away waving their hands energetically at them while coming to their spot riding their skyboard.



Shizuku and others who closed the distance in the blink of eye landed down beside Shia and Tio.



"I'm glad that the two of you are safe. Looks like it was dangerous just now isn't it."



"I wondered what was going on when Inaba-san leaped forward, but really it's great that the two of you are safe."



"Ou, looks like you two got really messed up huh."



"Haha…it was like looking at a myth happening just now. …Really, I'm glad that Shizuku and others stopped me…"



Shizuku and Suzu approached Shia and TIo who was lying down dead tired and made them drank magic medicine and put healing magic on them. Ryutaro was looking around at some of the floating islands that looked like they were going to crumble anytime with an astonished expression. Kouki was cursing "Are you idiot huh!?" and punching with his all the him in the past who acted hostilely at Shia and others while offering thought of gratitude at Shizuku and others once more.



"Shizuku-san and others too, you are all safe. Besides, it appeared that the idiot-san also seems to be reflecting. That's great desu."



Shia's words made Kouki groaned "uu".



"But, as for the other one…no, I doth not say anything. Everyone, thou all has worked hard."



Tio was looking at Suzu with a bit of consideration, but as for the aforementioned Suzu, she was smiling with a clear gaze like a different person compared to before they parted, so Tio didn't convey any word of consolation and merely gifted them words of praise. Toward that, Suzu's smile turned even stronger.



"Nevertheless this is shocking. When we discovered the entrance that connected the spaces and tried to jump into it…"



"Sea of fire, tornado of flame, countless monsters, and then there was even a jumbo dragon exactly like in a myth. I already resigned myself for a bit there. The scenery made me wanted to make a U-turn because we mistook the room."



Shizuku and Suzu turned their gaze at Tio.



It appeared Shizuku and others arrived at this space just when Tio was doing her dragon god transformation. The first scene that they saw right after crossing the space was an Armageddon…there was no doubt that their eyes at that time were flying out of their eye socket in shock just like in manga picture.



"Well, because that was mine trump card after all. Originally I wished to rush at Goshujin-sama's side in the state of dragon god transformation but…that was a wish that was too high to achieve. Rather than that, all of thee hath caught up to us really quickly isn't it? Even though thou hath no compass like us."



"We weren't really lost you know? After the clock tower got smashed, it took us a bit of time to search the other city but, when we discovered another entrance and used it, we arrived directly to here."



"Hmm. As for us, from that ruined city there were several spaces that interposed between us until this space but…perhaps with the destruction of the clock tower, the arrangement of the connected space changed then. After all the compass should have displayed to us the shortest route."



Possibly this might be the harassment from Ehitorujue. Tio thought about Hajime who went ahead and she sent a bit worried gaze at empty air.



The expression of Shizuku who guessed that Hajime wasn't here as expected from Tio's expression turned similarly worried and then she inquired about what happened.



Like that they listened to the rough gist of what happened from Shia and Tio, and then all of them nodded at each other in agreement to chase after Hajime in this case, it was at that time,



GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO —-



The space began to rumble.



Shia and others put up their guard at the surrounding wondering what was going on.



Ahead of the gazes of them, *bari-*, *biki-*, the space itself was cracking. It was as though the space was going to crumble.



Right after that, the floating island where Shia and others were at that was already greatly damaged became unable to endure the vibration that attacked the space and large fissures ran through the ground, a beat later, the island crumbled grandly.



In panic, they boarded their skyboard and evacuate to sky.



"Tha, that is…is that by any chance, the surface?"



Suzu was pointing at below while raising her voice.



The floating island was breaking. The space beneath it was wavering, from there they could see a ground at far below. The scenery there where there was a fortress and grass plain was also one that they were familiar with, and then a great number of people were clamoring there in that image.



Perhaps because the space was unstable, that scenery immediately disappeared and returned back to usual. But, the eerie rumbling was still not stopping, the spots of space where there was wavering faintly displayed places that they had visited before and also places they didn't know before vanishing once more.



"…Surely this is because of Hajime-san desu. Hajime-san is fighting Ehito desu!"



"That's right. This place art Holy Precincts. Then this place should be the place that is most affected by the god Ehito. For the space to become unstable might mean that this is just how much Ehito art being cornered."



It was merely a hypothesis.



But, it was a hypothesis that they could believe because if it was Hajime then it was possible.



"Then, we too have to hurry then."



"Yoosh, let's get out from this place that might collapse anytime and link up with Nagumo-kun immediately."



Everyone nodded to Shizuku and Suzu's words.



And then, they headed toward the obelisk at the center floating island that was still barely floating.



Shia who was still staggering with her shoulder was supported by Shizuku with her shoulder while she touched her hand at the obelisk without hesitation.



"?"



However, nothing happened. When Hajime used his compass, there was no doubt that it was pointing at this obelisk, so there was no mistake that this was the entrance.



Shia touched the obelisk one more time, but as expected nothing happened.



"Why!?"



Shia who became desperate touched again, but no matter how many times she repeated the obelisk wasn't reacting.



"Perhaps this art related with this unstable space. If I remember correctly, there art also obelisk at the other floating islands correct? Let's try using those."



Following Tio's consideration, they headed toward the other obelisk.



…However, that obelisk was also not reacting.



And, at that time, the space shook once more.



And then, this time the space began to crumble from the edge.



Shizuku who got a bad premonition went toward the boundary where the place was beginning to crumble and threw a rock as a test. Her premonition was spot on. The thrown rock crumbled as though it was disintegrated and vanished without even leaving dust behind.



"A bad, situation is it…"



Tio's grim voice rang awfully clearly.



"Even if we get swallowed by the crumbling we are going to be safe…something like that would be just too convenient isn't it."



"What about the obelisk that we used to enter into this space I wonder?"



Following Suzu's proposal, they headed toward that place in a hurry. The crumbling was advancing rapidly. They understood that the space was shrinking down as though a cage was getting smaller little by little. Right now, even in this moment the floating islands that were caught by the crumbling were vanishing into dust starting from their edge.



"No way…we cannot even go back."



Kouki murmured with a sorrowful face.



The obelisk that Kouki and others came out from into this place also didn't react.



The crumbling was approaching.



They returned to the center floating island in hurry, but the crumbling was accelerating with increasing momentum. It seemed that even another space that they could see from the swaying space also didn't escape from the crumbling. Even the world of the ruined city was vanishing from its edges.



"Is this…as far as we can go?"



Kouki murmured.



Shizuku and others gritted their teeth hearing those words.



"Hajime-san, Yue-san…"



With a strong gaze, Shia was staring at an empty space as though she was looking far away while calling the name of the two of her beloved.



Finally the crumbling was also starting to erode the center floating island.



They desperately wracked their brain. They wouldn't stop struggling until the end.



Like that, rather than waiting for death





Chapter 172




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



Mankind's Struggle (First Part)



Turning back the time a bit.



The surface of the world was completely changed by the erosion of dark red color that looked like the eyes of a monster. And then, a crack of space that exposed the abyss appeared at the sky of such bizarre world.



After Hajime and others safely jumped into that crack of space which scattered muddy black miasma――the gate that connected toward Holy Precincts, the apostles of god that swarmed that place turned on their heel still with an expressionless face.



What was reflected in the inhuman eyes looking down from the great height, was the crowd of people who displayed their insolence by trying to oppose god's will.



" " " " "Judgment of god." " " " "



Those words were murmured in one voice.



If the people at the ground heard those words, surely they would object "There is not even a speck of reason for us to be judged!" with a loud voice.



But, the puppets of god that wouldn't even lend any ear to that objection swung their twin large swords once, then they flapped their wings and began to descend all at once. They only revised their orbit using their silver wings. Next, the large number of apostles rapidly approached toward the allied force mostly by freefalling while leaving a silver trail behind like a swarm of meteors.



Thinking of the apostles' spec, in this battlefield where bug character like Hajime and others were gone, there was no existence that could possibly stop these women. Even if there were a lot of people in possession of item like the artifacts that could launch flash(Anti-Material Rifle) which covered the penetration of Hajime and others into Holy Precincts, but there was no reason that mere 'human' could hope to match them.



Therefore, for the apostles what would be starting from here on wouldn't a battle, it would be a curbstomp without any doubt, just a light work like mowing down grass.



…was what they thought how it was supposed to be.



That thought only continued until their whole field of vision was buried in barrages of bullets.



"Attackkk!! No need for even a drop of mercy or reservation-! Pound away with the intention of using up all your ammooo!!"



An amplified command resounded among the allied force, at the same time bullets barrage were fired without pause from the whole allied force soldiers.



Every single soldier aimed rifle gun toward the sky and pulled the trigger, each time the trigger was pulled the internal mineral that had been enchanted with 'Lightning Clad' electromagnetically accelerated the pseudo-full metal jacket bullet and fired it.



The all out firing from all the rifle guns that had been distributed to all the soldiers of allied force became several millions of flashes just for the first wave attack that pierced the sky.



Furthermore, the large gatling railguns that were fixed at the fortress and trenches completely blanketed the sky with flashes simultaneously. The number of the gatling railguns in total was a thousand. A thousand of the monstrous railguns with twelve thousand shots per minute roared simultaneously.



That wasn't all.



In addition, a thousand stationary large Orkan released a few hundred missiles loaded inside them almost at the same time. The spectacle of orange fire trail rushing to the sky all at once could be described as a masterpiece.



Regarding the weapons, the people with fast understanding were given priority to be a shooter, they had practiced handling the weapon until the last minute, so the weapons that were the hybrid of top of the line modern weapon and alternate world fantasy could muster their fury without taking too much time. The characteristic advantage of modern weapon where 'it wasn't influenced by the skill of the individual' was exhibited in ample here.



In an instant, the sky was completely covered by swarms of flashes and missiles, they easily swallowed the apostles who kept descending down.



The swarms of railguns that already should be called as a wall mercilessly gouged out the apostles, opening wind holes in their body one after another, the swarms of missiles grandly scattered flame blast and shockwave everywhere and bloomed crimson lotus in the sky. The apostles that got dragged into that blooming were toyed around inside the storm of explosions and their body burst and scattered.



However, even though the first wave of the apostles got easily killed because they let their guard down, the enemy over there was the apostle of god. They immediately put their guard up, weaved through the barrage, slashed away the flashes, or used their silver wings for defense and forcefully broke through to approach their enemy.



"Naïve."



The one who was lifting the corner of his lips in fearless smirk was the sniper of Hauria race who played a very active role when Hajime and others stormed the Holy Precincts. It was 'Bardfeld of Certain Death', ten years old.



Across the scope that was enchanted with 'Foresight' which displayed the future position of the enemy as a phantom image, he stared at an apostle that slipped through a flame blast and naturally pulled the trigger with quiet breathing.



Immediately, a cannon shot that was specialized for penetration similar with Schlagen became a flash, with a superb timing it attacked the apostle who was going to move to attack right now, the flash then cleanly blown up her head.



Scenes similar with that were also accomplished here and there by the grand flashes that were fired from everywhere in the fortress and trenches. This feat was achieved by the sniper team that was fully equipped with the improved version of Schlagen.



Perhaps judging that such snipers were a danger, the apostles followed the line of fire and directed their gazes toward the snipers that included 'Bardfeld of Certain Death' and they flew out all at once at them…



This time, it was the golem soldiers who were standing by at the back of the snipers, with gatling cannons in both hands and missile pods equipped on their shoulders, they began simultaneous strafing fire to protect the snipers.



"――"



The apostles gulped and attempted to evade.



But it was too slow. At this point of time, the snipers were already catching the prey across the scope. Faster than even their mind, their finger leaned on the trigger and quietly pulled. It was as though their body had known the best timing.



The result was just a matter of course. The sky was decorated with blooming crimson flowers once more.



Even though this was supposed to be an easy work that was equal with a mere slaughter, even though the monsters were supposed to be already gone from this place, for some reason it was only the apostles who got killed one-sidedly. Weren't they the apostle of god? Weren't they standing at far away height that human couldn't possibly arrive at, created by the supreme existence as the greatest fighting strength?



The apostles naturally narrowed their gaze.



"Know how futile your resistance is."



One of the apostles whispered.



Right after that, they stopped descending and rained down silver bombardments all at once from long range toward the ground.



It was a silver colored squall.



It was a really beautiful and fantastical spectacle, but the tragic result this local heavy rain would bring about was the very definition of atrocity itself.



Some part of this was offset by the barrages of bullet, but the bombardment that came from apostles whose body was clad with silver magic power in strengthened state slipped through the barrages mostly intact and approached the ground.



…And then,



"Great Barrier start up!"



It was held back above the allied force.



The improved great barrier that was activated following the command of the commander Liliana, blocked the meteor shower of death.



Against the silver flash that possessed disintegration ability, even if it was the great barrier that was an age of god artifact that had protected the capital of the kingdom for many years, originally the best it could do would be to hold on for a few moments. But, right now the great barrier that had been applied with Hajime's improvement was spreading in rainbow ripple and firmly protected the allied force.



The great barrier that originally was deployed in three layers with the strength of each layer depending on proportion with the range was now focused into a single layer which increased its toughness. Naturally, it was also strengthened using sublimation magic. By no means it could perfectly oppose the disintegration ability, but it was capable enough to make the apostles to spend some time breaking through.



And then, the time that was bought from that was for the sake of showing the next hand to recover from the hopeless situation.



The blow from the first barrage was merely a surprise attack against the arrogant apostles. With these women who literally had specs that were in a different league compared to human as the opponent, they would surely adapt after the first attack. Therefore, the humans had to carry out the plan so they could fight the apostles.



That plan was,



"To the choir squad. Please give the fall toward the puppets who proclaimed themselves as angel!"



The order of Liliana that was amplified in sound resounded in the battlefield.



The target of that command was the people who looked like clergyman that gathered at the rooftop of the fortress, there were even women and children included among them.



With a solemn atmosphere that didn't suit the battlefield, everyone put their hands together in front of their chest with uniform movement, taking a praying pose. All of them were the clergymen of the church who spread the teaching of the holy church in the remote region, that was to say they were the remains of the holy church. They were people who had separated from the central church, or possibly they had too much of pure faith that they were driven away from central as troublesome people.



Those people who were in a sense were the true clergymen followed the direction of an aging man clad in priest clothing standing in front of them, then they opened their mouths slowly.



" " " " " " " " " "――――♪" " " " " " " " " "



A melody resounded.



It was a holy song. A song that blessed the people and condemned the people that trampled on peace and love. A solemn melody of sacred protection and judgment.



A magic circle was floating beneath the choir. Through the crystals that were put here and there on it, the power of the holy song itself was amplified to terrific level.



That song which pushed through the explosive and thunderous sounds of the weapons and resounded throughout the battlefield naturally reached the ears of the apostles who were launching all-out bombardment to break the great barrier.



Immediately,



"――, this is, my strength-"



One of the apostles leaked out a surprised voice.



That was surely something that couldn't be helped for her. After all, the proof of strengthening that was the silver light which enveloped her body had dispersed, in exchange there was crimson light coiling around her before she felt her strength leaving her body like water that flowed out from a container with opened cork.



Once the pope Ishtar invoked this magic――'Holy Song of Supreme Degeneration' toward Hajime who was facing the apostle Nointo at the sky above the God Mountain. It was a brutal magic that combined the effects of obstructing the target's movement and weakened their strength as long as the song was resounding.



Now this song had its effect amplified using sublimation magic, in addition, it was also enchanted with the words of power that stopped the body function of Kaori and did her in before, Hajime reproduced the effect using soul magic and enchanted it through the medium of crystal pillars.



As expected, driving the apostles until they went out of service or completely weakening them were impossible, but the song was still able to obstruct the strengthened state of the apostles, in addition, it also could drop the specs of the apostles until nearly sixty percent of their original specs.



"Tsk, eliminating."



The gazes of the apostles were directed at the choir which was the source of their abnormality. They planned to prioritize eliminating the choir.



Several of the apostles formed a group and they began to lift their large swords simultaneously. Right after that, their magic power was focused and formed a swelling silver sun.



Although only a bit of time had passed, but the great barrier was already screaming from receiving disintegration ability from countless apostles. If it got hit by the focused silver bombardment, it would surely become unable to endure this time and got smashed.



"But, that too is within expectation. Please prioritize the apostles whose movements are stopping!"



Liliana's command resounded for the third time. That command was conveyed to all leaders of each squad, then they further gave that instruction to the subordinates under them to prioritize targeting the apostles who were concentrating in the focused bombardment.



The swarm of fire lines reached out from the ground toward the sky, the thickness of this wave was by no means diluted. It wasn't diluting at all. The people with high shooting ability obeyed the command and sniped at the unmoving apostles simultaneously.



The apostles who weren't involved with the focused bombardment defended against this attack. Using their twin large swords, their silver wings, feathers, they intercepted the attack. However, with their specs that had been forcefully lowered down and the crimson light that was coiling around their body and hindered their movement, so they were unable to deal with surging waves of the excessively mighty attacks which weren't depending on the user's specs.



One apostle, and then one more apostle, the apostle who were supposed to be absolute strong person were slaughtered with wind holes opened all over their body.



"Irregular-, even when you are not here you are still making a nuisance against us-"



The crimson light was coiling around the apostles mockingly. That was the radiance of the monster who had driven them away many times over. Seeing that light, the voice of the apostles who proclaimed that they were without emotion or anything turned a bit rough. They vaguely visualized in their mind a white-haired and eye-patched young man giving them a middle finger with a fearless grin.



However, it didn't mean that the allied force was able to shoot down all the apostles, finally the focusing finished and the light of devastation was emitted from the silver sun.



*GOU!* The atmosphere shook, the silver bombardment that was the result of the focus of fifty apostles hit the great barrier.



The rainbow ripple undulated fiercely, *biki biki* with cracking sounds cracks entered the great barrier.



"You guuys, put your spirit in iit!"



Such angry yell resounded at a corner of the fortress where the artifact of the great barrier was positioned. That was the angry voice of Wolpen who was the chief transmutation master of the kingdom. The artifact whose cracking was spreading due to the severe burden was repaired in real time using transmutation by the craftsmen led by Wolpen. Their hands were equipped with fingerless gloves that raised their transmutation ability. It was a romance glove that was a quality product of Hajime.



"Chief-, it's impossible already-! It cannot hold out!"



"Chih, can't be helped then. Abandon the great barrier! After activating the small scale barrier, we are going to concentrate at multiple barriers for the choir!"



" " " " "ROGER-" " " " "



After the great barrier was smashed, Wolpen and others activated the small scale barrier that defended temporarily against the bombardment that might pierce through, like that they ran around busily. They abandoned the barrier that protected the allied force and poured all their strength to the barrier artifact that focused on protecting the choir.



The moment they abandoned the transmutation for repairing in real-time, the cracks on the cylinder artifact spread all at once, and then a beat later the sound of pulverizing was echoing while small pieces flew everywhere.



That sound of pulverizing also resounded from the rainbow great barrier outside the fortress.



Similar like what was once seen at the kingdom capital, sparkling fragments were scattering and vanishing.



The apostles flapped their silver wings and flew in all at once. Their target was apparent at a glance. It was the choir that shaved off their specs until sixty percent.



Right now the rooftop where the choir was located at was enveloped by a multi-layered rainbow barrier that looked like the great barrier. By compressing the barrier into small scale and making it multi-layered, on the whole it had a hardness that surpassed the great barrier. But, if it was aimed by concentrated attacks then it would be surely got smashed through in less than a few minutes.



"Uu, aAAAAAAAA-!!"



One of the holy knights that was placed outside the barrier as protection for the choir raised a war cry and brandished his sword. He shook off his body that was naturally paralyzed from the majestic appearance of the approaching apostles by screaming.



"A nuisance."



The knight's torso was easily cut by the large sword that was slashed horizontally and he got blown away.



Yes, the knight wasn't bisected, he was blown away. In addition, there was a strange numbness in the arm that the apostle swung.



That fact made the apostles unconsciously stopped moving. With the attack of the large sword that was enchanted with disintegration ability, then even though they could only use forty percent of their strength it should be easy to bisect a single human into two. Despite so, she was unable to do that.



"HAAAAAAAAA-!!"



"-"



From the back of the apostle whose movement stopped because of the mysterious phenomenon, a new knight launched a vertical splitting attack from above along with a loud scream that had not even a speck of hesitation. The apostle didn't even use her large sword and blocked the attack with her wing, but not only the attack opposed her disintegration ability, it even made unpleasant sound *giiiiiiiiii* resounding before the knight sword sunk in. The apostle gazed to that in astonishment.



There, a scolding flew from that knight.



"Don't falter! We are a knight. Protecting is exactly our duty! Protect this place!"



"Captain David…guh, forgive me. Let me assist-"



The knight that was previously blown away stood up even while coughing away, a scratch in a straight line was left on his armor. He then slashed at the apostle with fierce momentum.



It was as though that became the signal, the knights――the former holy church's sacred knights that were led by the Aiko protection squad captain, David, the 'Goddess's Knights (self-proclaimed)' faced the flying apostles one after another.



And then, using their bastard swords that raised high-pitched sound while looking misty, the gauntlets that brought about the effect of 'Strong Arm' just by putting them on, and the leg armors that similarly granted the effect of 'Strong Leg', they assaulted the apostles while barely enduring the attacks of the apostles. Even if they were damaged by the attack that they couldn't endure, their armor somehow protected them from great harm.



"…Don't tell me, all of this strength come from artifacts?"



One of the apostles murmured.



David and everybody else, the knights, they were all equipped similarly with a bastard sword, gauntlets, and also black armor and simple helmet.



Black armor――this artifact was enchanted with 'Vajra' that was continuously active and 'Impact Conversion' that activated the moment attack touched the armor. Even the knight that got hit by an apostle's attack managed to pull through somehow with this.



And then the bastard sword was the so-called 'High-Speed Vibration Sword', just the sword itself possessed a considerable sharpness, on top of that it could release high-speed vibration using magic power, causing it to be able to disperse the disintegration ability even if only to a certain degree. And then, the helmet was enchanted with 'Light Speed', it was a degraded version but it was attached with the function to expand the user's perception.



All those equipment were basically a set and they were distributed to all the soldiers. In addition, before the battle began cheatmates were distributed so the specs of all the soldiers were also raised.



The plan was to weaken the apostles while at the same time making every single one of the allied force soldiers into a superhuman. As the result, the knights were able to oppose the apostles barely.



Even so, that was as far as it went, in the end they needed a group just to attack a single apostle before they could finally match the apostle.



At present even now the apostle that David slashed at was blowing away the other knights and repelled the vibration sword of David.



"Kuh――"



The apostle swung down her large sword toward David who was clenching his teeth due to his unrecoverable posture.



At that moment,



"First one."



"Eh?"



It was unclear whether that amazed voice was leaked by David or by the head of the apostle that was rotating in the air…



Like a joke, the head of the apostle flew casually and left behind its body. A beat later, *busha―!* amidst the blood spray that spurted grandly, that guy was there before anyone noticed.



It was a man with his body wrapped in black clothing that covered everything until his lips, a one lens type sunglass on his eyes, thin and sharp short sword――a kodachi held in reverse grip in his hand. On his head, fluffy rabbit ears were fluttering.



"The color of your blood is filthy, just like this dark red world…"



The man swung his kodachi sharply to swipe away the blood clotting it while pushing his sunglasses using his middle finger, then his lips suddenly distorted in nihility (it was unseen because of the mask though). However, that man then introduced his name without being unable to hide his atmosphere of "The me right now, is totally sparkling!"



"This head of apostle, has been definitely received by this dark hunter demon of the wriggling darkness, Karmvantis Elfalight Rowderia Hauria."



Correct, it was Karm. It was only the clan head of rabbit race Karm Hauria.



At the surrounding, the apostles who were held back desperately by the knights were approached stealthily from behind, then their head flew away with a splat by the many people of Hauria clan.



The rabbit ears of the man caressed the kodachi lovingly while he directed a pitying gaze at the collapsing headless apostles.



"My bad. But tonight Julia is feeling quite hungry."



A rabbit-eared woman was covering one of her eyes with her hand while whispering.



"Don't you know that you are the bad one? After all, you are making my other self to awaken…"



A rabbit-eared girl in the first half of her teens was staring to empty air with a philosophical gaze.



"…This is, the will of the world. Then, I can only obey that…"



A rabbit-eared youth about the same age was holding his left arm while groaning.



"Kuh, raging as you please again-! Calm down, my left arm-!"



A beat.



The rabbit-eared people wearing sunglasses and black clothing looked at each other face and then they nodded at each other with really satisfied expression.



And then, the apostles returned to their senses suddenly with a 'hah' and the moment they were going to assault the rabbit-eared people, with a superb timing as though the apostles' breathing was completely read through the rabbit people's figure and presence suddenly vanished and they slipped between the knights.



A strange air flowed in the battlefield.



"U, UoOOOOOOOOOO!!"



David slashed at another apostle as though nothing had happened at all. It appeared that he had become a man that was quite able to read the mood. Surely he discerned that he must not get involved with that lot.



The apostles were also rushing toward the choir in order to obliterate them while putting up their guard somewhat. They would keep getting targeted even if they just stiffened in place, so although it wasn't with their whole force, but a number that was quite many compared to other places was heading toward the choir.



It appeared that at the sky it was already filled to the brim with apostles.



But, at that time,



{Flying is not permitted nano!}



A really cute voice of a little girl resounded, and then at the next moment, the apostles who were above the barrier protecting the choir were staggering with their balance crumbling like a bird whose wings were plucked, without any change the apostles were felled to the ground all over. With great care they were dropping at spot distanced from the barrier as though they were pulled there.



There, a figure of a golem with back armament that looked like parabola antenna deployed could be seen. It appeared the voice was resounding from the telepathy stone speaker version attached on that golem.



{Bel-chan, do your best!}



Listening to the young voice――Myuu's voice that resounded once more, Bel-chan who was also known as the living golem 'Belfegoor' waved his hand languidly while using the area gravity manipulation artifact "Gran Farensen' that he shouldered on his back which pulled at the flying apostles and dropped them down.



Beside 'Belfegoor' that dropped down several dozens of apostles altogether, a further six golems appeared.



And then, with some kind of mechanism, *BAANG!* a thunderous sound was raised and colorful blast flame rose behind them while the golems took a cool pose. Surely if the golems could yell then they would say this without a doubt.



――Great Sin Squadron Demon Ranger, has arriveeeeed!!



Like that.



The movement of the felled apostles stopped for a moment seeing that uselessly refined posing and the act that let them knew of wills that were unlike that of a golem.



There, a command from the golems' princess was handed down.



{Everyone, kill them all nano!}



The princess easily declared something terrifying with that lovely voice. It made the listener wanted to see the face of her parents. The gentle voice "My my, ufufu" of one of the parents that was standing at the side of the small commander was leaking out from the speaker.



But, regardless of the resounding soft voice, the starting attack of the Demon Ranger was really severe. Each of the seven rangers was displaying superb teamwork while defeating the apostles one after another.



"This is a good time. Let the puppet who can do nothing but looking down at people know what it means to fall. All Gran Farensen, activate!"



The moment Liliana's command resounded, the gravity generation devices placed on all over the battlefield activated all at once. As the result, the apostles who were at the position between the ground and five hundred meters high fell on the ground all at once. That scene was just like a pitiful bug whose wings were plucked. And then, the one waiting for them below were the soldiers of allied force with the preparedness for death. The heroes who shouldered the existential fate of mankind.



Great numbers of apostles were dropped on the ground, however, they didn't show anything unsightly like fainting after impacting the ground, they used their twin swords to blow away all the soldiers who came at them. Silver feathers that were scattered all over here and there, or possibly the silver flashes surged up and blown away the soldiers.



"…Even by dropping us to the ground, even if you harden your body using artifact, but in the first place you are all merely human. There is no way you can win against us. Hang down your head obediently and receive the judgment of god."



One of the soldiers got pierced on the stomach by a large sword and he vomited blood. But, even with a mouth smeared with blood and his ghastly condition, that soldier made a fearless smile on his lips.



And then,



"LIMIT BREAAAAAAKKK-"



"-"



Magic power in unthinkable amount welled up from the soldier's body from who knew where. And then, even with his stomach pierced, using the sword that he didn't let go even then, he cut off the right hand of the apostle that was holding the large sword which pierced him.



"-, why, that ability…now, even so it's only to this degree after all. Even with that rare ability you possess a single arm is――"



"But, a blind spot is definitely created yeah?"



Even the last attack that was unleashed by betting one's life using a skill that was the rare between the rare among mankind, stealing a single arm of an apostle was the limit. The apostle who was about to say that was interrupted by a voice that resounded from the direction of her lost right arm.



The apostle who couldn't swing her right arm immediately tried to drive away the owner of the voice using her silver wing, but faster than that the attack of that person――Hoelscher Empire's emperor Gahard D Hoelscher bisected the body of the apostle.



The apostle's body was split into two, but even so she didn't die instantly with her astonishing life force and directed her gaze at Gahard. And then her gaze turned into astonishment.



"That, radiance…"



That radiance was――the radiance of 'Limit Break'.



Gahard grinned fearlessly while grasping tightly a crimson orb the size of a small stone dangling from his neck.



"This is a battle where the existence of mankind is put into stake you know. It will be too lukewarm if we cannot break merely one or two limits isn't that right? Now then, I also just have gotten used with this normal limit break. The last limit breaker left behind by that monster, how about I show it to the underlings of the shitty god huh!"



While saying such thing, in front of the apostle whose eyes opened wide Gahard then,



"Limit Break(Supreme Break)–!!"



The magic power enveloping Gahard jumped up a magnitude higher. Like that he split the head of the apostle who at that time was trying to fire her last silver bombardment, at the same time,



"Informing all the heroes of allied force-!! Break your limit, and fight–!!!"



Immediately following, it resounded in the battlefield, that voice.



"Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



The last strengthening plan that Hajime left behind. It was this.



――Humanity's whole force's limit break.



Other than the basic equipment that were the artifact armaments, the whole forces were also provided by one other thing. That was this necklace attached with a small crimson orb. This artifact made it possible for common soldiers whose body might break from it without taking a dose of cheatmate to activate 'Limit Break'.



――Grade style limit break artifact 'Last Zell'



Using it for the first time brought about Limit Break, and after waiting until the body got used to it so that the body wouldn't self-destructing from the radical strengthening, the artifact would bring about the derivative skill of Limit Break, 'Supreme Break' next. Of course it was a double edged sword that couldn't hold out for long, but in any case it would be the end of mankind if they didn't win this battle. If this was to be a battle without next time, then they would use up their soul until the very last drop.



Gahard who faced a new apostle readied his sword while throwing at them words that represented the heart of mankind.



"Don't you dare-, to look down on human-!"



The decisive battle between god's apostles and mankind――the second curtain of it was now raised.





Chapter 173




Mankind’s Struggle (Second Part)



The fortress, at the front area.



There the apostles who were dropped down to the ground using gravity generation device ‘Gran Farensen’ were opening a fierce battle that was worthy to be called as mortal combat against the soldiers of the empire.



“oOOOOOOOOO-“



One of the empire’s soldiers raised a war cry while rushing at an apostle.



The large sword of the apostle was elegantly swung while emitting silver light, with a slash the head of that empire soldier was lopped off. And then her returning sword lopped the head of the empire soldier at the opposite side. The soldier’s armor could defend against the disintegration ability for several hits before giving out, so the apostle was aiming at the part where there was no armor.



“Damn it-, they are just too strong-! Our side is already breaking the limit twice already here-“



“You monsters-! Just die already-“



The specs of the apostles were already dropped by sixty percent, furthermore their movements were obstructed, in addition their side was fully equipped with age of god class artifacts, despite so the number of their allies that got defeated when facing an apostle was still overwhelmingly a lot. That fact caused the soldiers of the empire to hurl out abusive language.



“FUNNURABAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-“ (TN: Some kind of war cry, Kurita from Eyeshield 21 often use this.)



At that time when the soldiers were unconsciously getting cold feet from the apostles’ fierce attack, an angry yell that for some reason made a chill rushed through their spine and their groin tightened resounded. And then at the next instant, a fist that was like rock was swung furiously and pierced the back of the head of an apostle, the fist then pushed toward the ground without stopping――and it punched through.



The one who appeared behind hanging over the apostle whose head was pulverized, was a giant of a man, his whole body was covered by the provided set of equipment and his appearance was no different from other soldiers. However, the soldiers didn’t even praise that man for defeating an apostle, instead for some reason they were drawing away.



“Araaaan? What’s wrong everyone, are you all taking distance from moiiiii?”



“Hiih, forgive me!”



Thick lips and beastly eyes were peeking out from the opening of the helm. The man possessed inhuman level of muscle that was obvious even across the armor. Braided hair sprung out from the top of the helmet, a lovely pink ribbon was attached at the tip of the hair. That man who was a little bit strange was wriggling around while winking at the soldiers with feminine tone. It really was unavoidable for the soldiers to take even more distance while saying “Forgive me” reflexively.



After all even an apostle who was about to charge exactly right now came to a stand still with a twitch…



“NUURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-“



“DOOOSEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE-“



Even more throaty war cries resounded. When they looked, similar with the giant in front of their eyes――the monster nesting in the clothing shop at Brook city the shop manager Crystabel, an army of giants whose body was wrapped in so much muscle to the degree that made any onlooker wanted to say ‘you guys don’t actually need armor ain’t it?’ which was further equipped with similar set of equipment like everybody else was rampaging violently there.



One giant was hugging an apostle from the front, and then without even any time to activate her disintegration ability the apostle was bear hugged until death, and then another giant moved to another apostle with an artistic pile driver that pulverized the head of the apostle.



What was terrifying was, the embraced apostle received *puchuuuu* a feverish kiss from the giant, it was unclear whether it was for taking the aposlte by surprise or merely because of his tastes. While the apostle who received pile driver, perhaps because it was an irregular technique but the hugging direction was reversed from the usual pile driver, so the face of the apostle became exactly buried into the crotch of the giant in the end.



“How insipid this iiisss”



“Playing with a doll cannot make me fired up at aaallll”



The two giants who defeated two apostles also wriggled around while saying out such impressions with a feminine tone. The expressions of the two apostles who had been defeated and stopped functioning looked strangely teary eyed…but surely that was just their imagination.



The bizarre squad that was formed as a commando unit――also known as the manly women squad. The women(?) snapped their neck around to look for their next prey, and when they had finished designating their respective prey, the apostles who were confronting other soldiers shivered simultaneously. And then their gaze swam around expressing their wariness, which caused several of them to be taken by surprise and defeated.



They obstructed the movement of the apostles with mere (sticky) gaze and even forced the apostles to stiffen for an instant. That bizarre great contribution was decreasing the number of the apostles with certainty and backed up their allies. It backed up the ally…supposedly.



While monsters of a different kind were rampaging violently in the battlefield, a fierce fighting was unfolding at a slightly distance place.



One of the empire’s soldier readied the rifle he was provided with and fired in full-auto from middle range, nailing down an apostle in place. It was a hybrid weapon with excessive firepower that wasn’t influenced by the specs of the user. As expected even an apostle would have to be fixed in place if she defended against the swarm of flashes using her large sword.



However, an apostle wouldn’t be finished just with that. As though giving a return gift, an atrocious bullet that wasn’t outdone even by the railgun flew out――it was a counterattack using silver feathers.



The empire soldiers surrounding the apostle were mowed down. There were also people who barely endured using their defensive equipment or sword, but the low-level soldiers had their exposed flesh gouged out with certainty and their lives expired there.



*gachin* That sound of the bullet running out resounded. The empire soldier who was checking the apostle in place using his shooting was trying to reload the magazine in panic then.



Not letting away that opening, the apostle was going to fire silver bombardment. Despair flashed on the face of the empire soldier.



At that time,



“ZEAAAAAAAAAAH!!”



A loud scream of spirit that was clearly drawing a line compared to common soldier gushed out.



A large sword swung down from a sword held overhead at the apostle who was going to fire a silver flash.



The apostle looked annoyed while she lifted her large sword to block that attack…



“――”



The large sword that was swung down bent like a whip and its trajectory changed due to the holder’s arm, the vertical swing was transformed into a horizontal slash that made the apostle gazed in astonishment. And then, even when the apostle tried to defend but her movement was obstructed by the crimson light coiling around her and her neck got lopped off with her eyes still wide open.



The man who finished off an apostle alone, was the emperor of the empire who was emitting off unbelievable aura of supremacy――Gahard D Hoelscher was showered in the blood of apostle while he turned at the soldiers who got cold feet from that apostle’s fierce attack and raised a loud voice that sounded like explosion.



“You bastaards, don’t get cold feet-. Roar up! Fight until you turn into waste! This battlefield is a legend! All of you bastards are the spinner of the new legend! Do you want to get laughed by the guys in the future huh-!”



This battle where the existential fate of the mankind was staked on――it was certainly a legend itself seen from the viewpoint of the future generation. They were all the actors on this grand stage that would be talked without end at the future.



The soldiers of the empire and the mercenaries that were overflowing with ambition got roused up by those words. Fierceness lit up in their eyes, they blazed up with the desire to carve their existence in history!



Gahard’s violent passion swept over the battlefield.



“Imagine it. Whose figure is standing behind you bastards!? If you bastard get defeated, then that guy will die next-! Can you permit that? You cannot right!? Then blaze up your killing intent! Whether they are an apostle or whatever, who the hell cares, devote yourself to destroy all the enemyyy!”



The soldiers of the kingdom and the adventurers looked back over their shoulder for a moment, right now, even in this moment their eyes were seething violently with killing intent toward the silver monsters wielding fierce might. For whose sake they were standing in this place. That was obvious. It was to protect their friend, their lover, their family! This was a battlefield, where defeat was unforgivable!



At that time, the apostles who were offended by Gahard’s existence fired silver flashes at him all at once.



“Shield-, form up!”



Gahard immediately reacted. Just with that command, the imperial soldiers who had gathered around Gahard unnoticed combined their large shield and became the defensive wall for Gahard. The silver flashes were temporarily blocked with the special large shields that were also of Hajime made.



“Attack-!”



Gahard’s command surged once more.



Different imperial guards that were standing by behind the large shields kneeled and fired their anti-material rifle from the gaps of the shields.



The apostles who had just fired their silver flash were countered by the flying flashes which gouged their body and made them tumbled down.



And then, the moment the silver flashes stopped coming, Gahard rushed toward another apostle and then using his ever-changing sword attack that warped like a whip from the natural stance he began an equal fight against an apostle.



“Follow his majesty-“



“Surround and kill them-. They are not an opponent we cannot win against!”



“Don’t let these dolls doing whatever they pleased more than this-“



With that as the trigger, the allied force’s fervor rose and they battled with the apostles using similar teamwork. The soldiers wouldn’t shrink away anymore no matter how many of them were killed, that mettle and resolve that believed they couldn’t be defeated was gradually excelling the specs of the apostles.



In a corner of the fortress.



There a man that had been closing his eyes from the battlefield all this time quietly opened his eyes. And then, with a powerful voice that while sounded solemn yet contained passion, he called at the commander Liliana.



“Princess Liliana.”



Just with those words, Liliana guessed what he wanted to say and judging that it was certainly the time she handed down the command.



“Yes, Adol-dono. Now that the battle is moving toward a land war, it would be extremely bad if we get sniped from above the gravity barrier. …Please show how the strength of the dragon race that rules over the sky will usurp the air superiority in front of all these people.”



“Fufu-, acknowledged.”



With solemn and powerful footsteps Adol went out to a terrace that continued toward the courtyard where they dragon race people were standing in a row. His brethren below him, roughly three hundred people were filled to the brim with fighting spirit and looked up straight toward their clan head Adol.



“The persecution of five hundred years ago. There is no way for us to forget that. All of you who survived that time and made an oath for the vindication of our honor, and also all of you who were born since then lamenting all the irrationality while living in hiding…no need for even a drop of mercy or reservation-! Roar following your rage! The sky is our territory! Make all of them know that! All dragon race…we are departing-!”



“ “ “ “ “OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!” “ “ “ “



They all roared simultaneously.



That was the signal of the revolt of the proud race who had endured the rage and humiliation for five hundred years until now. All of the dragon race rolled upwind while flying to the sky at the same time.



The barrier of gravity was made undone with good timing by Liliana. The dragon race used that chance to rise to the sky, and then at the next instant they were all wrapped in light.



And then, the figures that appeared then were the flock of dragon that was the conqueror of the sky. They flapped their wings majestically and their pupils that split vertically glared at the puppets of god. The dragons emitted unbelievable pressure from their body alone. Right now, all of the dragons were fully equipped with Hajime’s artifact, turning up their majestic appearance even further.



Among those dragons, a majestic scarlet dragon that boasted a conspicuously huge body raised a roar along with an enormous pressure. Regardless of the distance of seven hundred meters that separated him from the ground, the rippling vibration of the air was also conveyed toward the allied force soldiers on the ground.



Right after that, it was as though the roar just now was the signal for the opening of the battle, three hundred dragons fired their breath attack simultaneously. The flashes that each had their own color based on the element of their forte rushed at the apostles who were dancing in the sky with a haughty face as though they owned the place.



The apostles wrapped their body with their silver wings and entered a defensive posture.



However, the breath of the dragon race bit and tore those defenses and exterminated the apostles.



{Hou, as expected from the spouse that Tio recognized. It’s astonishing for our strength to be raised up until this far.}



Adol raised a pleased voice seeing his breath that was displaying a might that was ten-odd times the usual. Adol and others who were equipped with similar equipment like the armed black dragons had their specs raised up by the sublimation magic that was enchanted into their armor. Naturally there was also the effect from the cheatmate and the limit break artifact ‘Last Zell’.



{Kuh, I won’t recognize him-! That kind of brat’s――}



An indigo blue dragon――Ristas made a voice that sounded vexed somehow. But, he held back his tongue after seeing an apostle who rapidly closed in on him in the middle of his speech swinging her large sword, yet that sword was splendidly blocked by the armor on his body and instead the apostle got blown away by the shockwave that was released by the armor.



Even though he wasn’t doing anything but the enemy got blown away. It felt like he got protected by Hajime that made his feeling to get really complicated.



{Then, you can just try to steal her. After all, that man too had said that he will accept anyone’s challenge.}



{Uguh}



There was no way he could do that. He could clearly imagine how he would be instantly killed the moment he challenged Hajime. The tone of Adol’s voice carried a tinge of teasing somewhere in it.



Ristas who was at disadvantage in this talk flapped his dragon wings and accelerated instantly to attack the apostles. It was like he was saying ‘I’m concentrating in defeating the apostles!’



The other dragon people were also smiling wryly at Ristas who was still young while beginning to wield their strength fully.



As expected from the ruler of the sky. With their jumped up specs and maneuverable midair battle, and also the blessing of the age of god artifacts, the competed against the apostles in more than even battle. The conflict where the air superiority was put on the line entered into a mortal combat where dragon roars and silver flashes mixed all over just like a presentation of a space war in science fiction movie that was worthy of being in legend.



The powerful roars of dragon resounded through the reddish black sky, the allied force that was on the ground raised their war-cry at that gallantness while their morale was rising.



In a corner of the battlefield――at the position nearby the choir, there was a group that was clearly making a great contribution which drew a line from other soldiers and sacred knights at the area.



“UOOOOOOOH!!”



Along with a war cry a man made a step that split the ground and charged an apostle with a body blow――Nagayama Juugo the let his fist that was like a rock fell on the face of the apostle before she could do something.



The special gauntlet artifact of Hajime transmitted impact into the internal and destroyed the inside. Whipped up flesh and blood flew out from the noble face of the apostle and dirtied Juugo’s cheek with blood splatter, but he only fixed back his stance in a calm state just like his taciturn appearance.



An apostle vertically slashed her large sword from overhead stance toward that Juugo behind him.



However, with a backstep Juugo slipped into the bosom of the opponent smoothly and like that he crashed the apostle on the ground with a splendid shoulder throw. The ground was smashed into a radial shape from the excessive might and formed a small crater. Juugo stepped on the neck of the apostle whose movement was obstructed for an instant from the impact and gave her the finishing blow.



Juugo finished off two apostles in the blink of eye. Although the apostles were weakened and he himself was superhumanized, but the way he was fighting was splendid that made it clear that he had constantly trained without negligence.



There, two additional apostles arrived that approached Juugo in a pincer attack.



But, at that moment,



“――Wind blowing from the bottom of the earth, dye the thing with life white――’White Majestic Breath’!!”



White smoke rode with the wind and rushed through the air like a snake, it whirled and became a protective wall around Juugo. The two apostles that approached Juugo were slightly entangled by the white smoke, yet they used their silver wings and blew them away while withdrawing for once.



“tsk, petrifaction.”



The spectacle of the body part that was touched by the white smoke petrifying creakingly from the tip made the apostles showing an expression that seemed to want to say ‘how impudent’ while they attempted to use magic power of disintegration to unmade the curse.



“I won’t let you.”



The caster that blew the white smoke of petrifaction――Nomura Kentaro waved a conductor stick artifact. Immediately the white smoke coiling around Juugo in protection parted into two trails and attacked the withdrawing two apostles.



The apostles judged that it would be dangerous for them to get hit with that in their current state where their magic resistance was lowered so they attempted to withdraw further, but unnoticed the ground swelled up and bound their legs and their attempts didn’t bear any fruit. The apostles pitched forward from the sudden restrain. That became a fatal opening.



At the next moment, the white smoke that Kentaro manipulated swallowed the two apostles whole.



What were left later were only two artistic sculptures that were completely made from stone.



Other than them, there were also Nakano Shinji and Saitou Yoshiki who had gotten back on their feet after Hiyama’s betrayal and Kondou’s death, they were unfolding a really great contribution with bloodcurdling look, while protecting the hole in their formation were Tamai Atsushi, Aikawa Noboru, Nimura Akito unfolding a fierce battle against the apostles without taking even a step back.



They were all perfectly supported from behind by Sonobe Yuuka, Sugawara Taeko, Miyazaki Nana, Tsuji Ayako, and Yoshino Mao.



The members of Ai-chan bodyguard squad were able to operate almost at the same level with Juugo’s party and Shinji and others who were already fighting at the front line since the very beginning were because since Hajime and others departed from the capital, they encouraged their heart thinking that at this rate they would be no good and so they performed extra hard training since then.



Other than them, there were also the other students whose heart had been completely broken, even though they were unable to go as far as fighting directly, but with their abilities that had been heightened they were launching support magic from the rear, performing healing magic, using rifle or magic to add in laying out barrage, and so on. They too were desperately backing up the other’s battle.



Every one of them had their broken heart to be lit up once more by Hajime’s speech at the devil king castle. If Hajime’s speech at that time were merely words, then the moment an apostle appeared before their eyes their heart would surely break again because it was only supported by paper thin words. However, everyone of them had seen Hajime.



He lost one of his arms and one of his eyes, what he had gone through even changed the color of his hair, he was in a tattered state and even his beloved lover was taken away. The wailing that he raised because of his lover’s disappearance was something that caused them to feel pain in their heart. Even so, at the end he stood back up and proclaimed that he would crush everything and take her lover back. That appearance of him at that time was too powerful, burning their soul that were smoke-stained all this time.



It wasn’t for the sake of the world or anything like that. It was merely a wish for returning home. A wish of not wanting to let their friend died. In order to grant just that much wish, they had to fight with everything they had leaving nothing to spare, finally they were convinced of that and they mustered their courage.



For the front line group, this support that they received came from a group who even though their heart was once smoke stained but they were still a group of cheat holder from another world.



As expected, even though the enemy was the apostles but with their specs lowered, taking on the classmate group who had been strengthened put them at disadvantage. Seeing the apostles being exterminated one after another, the allied force soldiers at the area raised their acclamation.



But, at that time, one of the apostles that broke through the front line rapidly approached one of the girl student.



“Hih!?”



The female student reflexively screamed.



But, at the next moment, the fear of death changed into shock.



The head of the apostle flew up with a plop, the body that lost its strength slid in vain beside the girl student.



Furthermore the apostles who were trying to surround the front line group had their necks reaped up in turn from the outside and their lives expired instantly. Regardless when they moved their gaze over there, other than the corpses of the headless apostles, there was nothing and no one there.



One of the apostles turned her gaze around at the surrounding with a grim gaze toward this obviously strange situation.



“Kuh, just where in the world the attack came fro-“



“Right in front of you here! Shithead!”



The apostle was startled that her murmur was replied right from the front and her gaze returned forward. In her eyes, the shadow of a kodachi being sucked toward her neck was reflected. And then that became the last view of that apostle.



Displaying a thorough covert action(thinness of shadow) that couldn’t be noticed even by apostles, this ghost crossed over from crowd to crowd and in an instant, it approached to reap the target’s head.



Cutting down the apostles who had the figure of a human female was a really great burden mentally. What became salvation was that all the apostles had the same appearances, their cold figure where no emotion could be felt made anyone that saw them felt that they were like a puppet.



Coupled with the miserableness of having a shadow so thin that made even the worst enemy to show expression of “Eh? He is actually there!?”, the young man with the vocation of ‘Assassin’――Endo Kousuke was earning kill point that was the highest among his classmates while half giving in to despair.



“As expected from you, Kousuke-! I don’t know where you are though!”



”Aawesome, Kousuke! Though I don’t know where you are!”



“Endo-kun do your beeest! Though I cannot see your figure doing your best!”



“Eh, ah, I see, Endo-kun is also fighting! Thanks for helping ‘kay!”



With a drop, something shining fell from Kousuke’s eyes. It appeared there was a rain falling down. If he said it was raining then it was raining.



There, “Ufufu” a voice that was slightly filled with bewitching tone resounded.



Kousuke who slipped inside a crowd peeking for an opening made by apostle felt something chilly in his spine before he turned his gaze over there. What he found there was a woman from rabbit race, she was giving a glance at Kousuke.



“You, your presence management is really skilled. Perhaps even I am no match against that.”



“He, ah, is that, so?”



The rabbit ear female smiled widely toward the perplexed Endo. Kousuke’s cheek unconsciously turned red from seeing that smile. In the first place, the rabbit race who was the greatest popularity as treasured slave in general had well-arranged face and figure. The female who was talking at Kousuke right now was also an amazing beauty.



Having such a beauty, added with her lovely rabbit ears on her head smiling at him, the virgin young man with the history of having no girlfriend was equal with his age had his heartbeat increasing without stopping. Although there was also the fact that he was feeling stimulation from being in a battlefield right now.



But, that violent throbbing in his chest that felt similar from heart fluttering was immediately supplanted by a cramping face.



“My name is Ranainferna Hauria of Rapid Shadow. I rushed like a gale, sneak up like a shadow, and presented a single lethal attack, one of the stealthy hand of Hauria race!”



“…I, is that so.”



“But, when I saw you, I became embarrassed to introduce myself with that nickname. That’s why, it’s vexing but I’ll hand over the nickname of ‘Rapid Shadow’ to you. Your name?”



“…Endo, Kousuke.”



Kousuke was unable to say that what was embarrassing was actually introducing one’s own nickname. If he was asked ‘do you like a beautiful Onee-san?’, then Kousuke’s answer was decided already.



“Then, from today you are ‘Rapid Shadow’…no, you have surpassed me so…you can introduce yourself as ‘Kousuke E Abyssgate of Rapid Fang Shadow Claw’ then! It’s vexing for me though!”



“No, that’s fi――”



“Well then, so that both of us won’t die, let’s reap the enemy’s neck with our all♪ See you! Kousuke E Abyssgate of Rapid Fang Shadow Claw!”



“…”



Kousuke already wanted very much to give a retort like ‘how can you say something like “let’s reap their neck♪” with such a lovely smile’ or ‘just where did this abyssgate something came from’, but the most shocking thing for Kousuke was that Rana had discovered him when he already even used his skill to kill his presence. She had discovered him.



And then,



――Do you like beautiful Onee-san, with rabbit ears on their head?



“Kousuke E Abyssgate of Rapid Fang Shadow Claw, has arrived!”



It seemed that a love that budded in battlefield really existed.



The claw and fangs of Kousuke began to become even more well-executed, it was to the degree that anyone who knew him might suspect that he had received some kind of other strengthening. He went on to take the head of all the apostles. (TN: Here the writing of Kousuke’s name changed, from the normal kanji of Kousuke into the katakana of Kousuke E Abyssgate)



On the other hand, nearby such classmates there was one other person who was making a strikingly great contribution. It was Aiko.



At the rear, she kept glancing at ‘You Can Do It-, Agitator! Compilation of Lovely Speech Learned Case by Case’ that was handwritten by Hajime while in a certain interval she encouraged the allied force so that their moral wouldn’t plummet using words that the classmates felt like they had heard from somewhere. She was also raising her voice for the sake of her own battle.



“I command in the name of Hatayama Aiko! O transient life, stand up once more and destroy the enemy!”



Right after she said that, several of the apostles that should have been defeated already were standing up in a swaying motion. And then, they attacked the apostles who were supposed to be their ally with a force that looked as though they had recovered their original unrestrained spec.



That was the effect of Aiko’s soul magic. She reproduced a pseudo-soul from her own soul and manipulated it to possess the flesh of the apostles. This magic combined ‘Soul Reproduction’ that created a transient soul and ‘Necromancy’ of darkness magic.



Aiko whose vocation as ‘Farming Master’ was the only non-combat vocation among the classmates if Hajime was excluded, became aware of her own powerlessness, since Hajime departed on his journey she became strongly conscious of looking for a way of fighting for the sake of protecting her students.



There she thought hard of how to make use of the soul magic that was her only advantage, and the result that she reached was this magic. It was really ironic that what gave her the hint was the betrayer Eri’s necromancy and soul bind, the aspect where this magic was making use of corpses also caused a fierce conflict in her heart, still Aiko took the plunge in developing this magic.



That time at the sky above the God Mountain, she had already stopped staying at a clean place while only making her students dirtying their hand.



Besides,



“Until he return, we absolutely won’t lose-!”



Yes, for the sake of the man who she gave her heart to despite understanding that such relationship must not happen, she absolutely wouldn’t lose. Because she wanted to meet him, one more time.



“Ahahah, good grief Ai-chan, her motivation of hiding it already dropped to zero isn’t it?”



“If Ai-chan mentioned ‘he’, then there is also one person it can possibly be isn’t it.”



Sonobe Yuuka and Miyazaki Nana grinned a bit at each other while glancing at Aiko.



“Nagumo-kun is seriously a demon king. It should be impossible to even make one’s own teacher to fall for her student.”



“There are also several girls in class that look like they fell already…a real harem is formed right in front of our eyes, what a sight. Well, exactly because of that they can think of something like ‘me too’ though.”



“Normally just by looking at his relation with that child named Yue, anyone would draw back already. Like, when you see a girl that is too earnest toward a boy, you will give up then, something like that. I wonder if this is also the attraction of the demon king. We too have to be careful, if not we are going to get charmed inadvertently too.”



“Isn’t that righttt”



This time the two of them smiled wryly. And then, they looked up to the sky together.



There, they could see the figure of their female classmate who had earned the most kill point in this battlefield. She rushed through the sky freely, using two large swords, or black silver flash, or black silver feathers, or magic, she used them all depending on the situation to overwhelm the apostles.



Four jet black wings mixed with silver radiance spread on her back and dress armor with black tone covering her body. Her hair that was fluttering from the caressing of wind was also black. That figure with an appearance that was worthy as a fallen angel which was slaughtering the apostles who looked like angel, no matter how anyone looked at it that person should be called as a general of a demon king.



Despite so, the angel side was the force that was trying to devastate the mankind, and the fallen angel one was the force trying to protect the mankind, it was really an ironic story.



That rampaging fallen angel which was Kaori was clad in silver black light while moving with a speed that left afterimages trailing behind, right now she was cutting down one more apostle.



Two apostles who aimed at that moment swung their large sword horizontally. Kaori blocked those using her twin large swords and black silver wings and then she rotated with fierce momentum. Immediately the two apostles were repelled away and their lives came to an end when black silver feathers pierced their forehead without delay.



Just how many apostles had she slaughtered with the addition of those two Kaori wondered.



“There is no end to this…”



Kaori complained like that unconsciously.



“Then, give up and fall.”



The one who replied was an apostle. When Kaori noticed, she was completely surrounded in a sphere shape, she was literally buried from all directions without any opening left.



And then, at the next moment silver flashes were fired. The apostles ignored the possibility of friendly fire against their compatriots in front of them and fired simultaneously without any reservation or mercy, they all aimed at the center of the formed sphere encirclement and fired.



However, Kaori was unshaken.



“I don’t know any words like giving up you know?”



Kaori made such frivolous talk before attempted to make a breakthrough from the front in a straight line. She used her twin swords as a shield and charged to the torrent of light.



The apostle whose gaze met Kaori’s was convinced that Kaori would break through and she readied her twin large swords.



Right after that, Kaori whose whole body was smoking came through, regardless of her state the glint of her eyes didn’t weaken even by a little bit and she approached the apostle rapidly with fierce momentum. And then, she shot out black silver feathers, aiming accurately at spots like shoulder or ankle in a dirty method.



Similarly the apostle fired her silver feathers in the attempt to offset the attack. However at that moment chain of light stretched out from below her feet and constricted the apostle’s movement for an instant.



The restrain was immediately disintegrated and dispersed, but that was enough. The black silver feathers caught the body of the apostle and broke her posture greatly. Kaori arrived at that timing. She drew back the large sword on her hand to the limit, and in an instant, she dealt a stab in god speed.



*gi gi gi* The sound of fellow large swords scraping at each other resounded, but in the end Kaori also had the momentum of her charge which the apostle was unable to neutralize, like that she was then skewered by Kaori’s large sword.



But, it seemed that it was still within the apostle’s expectation. The handle of the skewered sword――the hand of Kaori that grasped there was gripped tightly and the apostle restricted Kaori’s movement.



There silver feathers rushed in.



The attack intended to bury the apostle together with Kaori.



“Even though she is your comrade but you all treat her too lightly.”



Kaori who whispered that while making an exasperated expression prioritized at giving the finishing blow to the apostle before her eyes without feeling concern against the rushing silver feathers.



The eyes of the apostle opened wide slightly.



Although currently their specs were limited, but their disintegration ability was still working in full. Because Kaori had the same flesh with the apostles she would be able to resist the disintegration if she activated the same ability, but even so she would still be overwhelmed by the amount of attack and bore damage to the degree that couldn’t be ignored. Kaori herself should also understand that. Despite so, just why…that was what the apostle pondered.



Right after that, the body of the apostle was bisected by Kaori’s sword, almost at the same time Kaori was swallowed by many silver feathers.



“She is supposedly able to trace our experience but…after all she is just an imitation in the first place. What a foolish act.”



“That’s not actually true.”



The words that one of the apostles who fired the silver feathers whispered were immediately replied to.



The eyes of the apostle narrowed quietly from hearing that voice which didn’t sound uneasy or agitated at all.



Ahead of the apostle gaze, she could see the figure of a wounded Kaori at the spot where the silver feathers were fired at.



As expected, she could be damaged but she was merely putting up a brave front. The apostle who made that judgment deployed innumerable silver feathers to deal the finishing blow wordlessly. The other apostles were also deploying their feathers at the same time, so Kaori who was at the center of the attacks looked like she was drowning in a sea of stars.



But, just before those silver feathers could be fired the apostles reflexively stopped their movement completely.



The reason was because the wounds of Kaori were healed in the blink of eye before their gaze. With speed and vividness that resembled Yue’s ‘Automatic Regeneration’, even the wounds that were pierced by a silver feather or the gaping open hole returned to their former unblemished state, not only that even her clothing returned to as good as new.



The apostles couldn’t see her using magic. Apostle body also wasn’t provided with a function of automatic regeneration.



The bewildered apostles gazed fixedly at Kaori――and they noticed, behind the forelock that was swept by the wind, on Kaori’s forehead, there was a cross crest shining silver black that was carved there.



“That is…”



“’Holy Crest of the Fallen’――this is my magic. I used this before the opening of the battle. It’s not as great as Yue’s regeneration, however even if I’m wounded it will activate by itself and heal me, really a convenient magic.”



Metamorphosis and regeneration composite magic ‘Holy Crest of the Fallen’――by carving a cross that shouldered the role of a magic circle on a part of the body, this magic would activate regeneration magic in a prescribed time. This magic could even be called as a powerful version of auto-regen. Furthermore, by using metamorphosis magic the holy crest that was like a tattoo could be erased.



“…However, if we continue to fire saturation attack, sooner or later the damage should surpass the healing. Your magic power is also not unlimited.”



Hearing Kaori’s words, an apostle intentionally said out words to pull herself together. It was unclear whether the apostle was trying to persuade herself with those words or if she was seriously thinking so…



Kaori made a fearless smile. It was a provocative smile that was something Kaori from before would never make by any means. The influence that she received from a demon king somewhere or his wife was keenly conveyed through that action.



“You have two misunderstandings there.”



“…What?”



Kaori’s atmosphere made the apostle asked back with her greatest possible vigilance.



Toward such apostle, Kaori prepared her twin swords and spread her two pairs of wings widely while leaking out her words in a small volume.



“First――”



“――!?”



At the next moment, Kaori’s figure vanished and appeared right behind the apostle. She was in the stance of swinging out her sword.



“If I will it, then I am able to avoid any kind of saturation attack.”



“To, too, fast――”



While the other apostles surrounding them were bewildered, the apostle who Kaori conversed with until just now was gazing in astonishment with half her body sliding down diagonally and blood spraying everywhere.



Kaori swept her large sword to shake off the clotted blood, the apostles who witnessed that returned to their senses and fired simultaneously.



But,



“――’God Speed’.”



Kaori’s figure had already gone by the time they fired, at the next instant two apostles were bisected and fell toward the ground.



Even when the apostles moved their gaze to that spot in shock, just as expected Kaori’s figure was already gone by the time they looked, and another apostle at a different place was bisected again.



“Spa, space teleportation?”



One apostle raised a questioning voice. But, right after that, she felt the wind gently stroking her body and a diagonal split appeared in her field of vision. Like that her consciousness fell into darkness then.



“No way that’s true. I am not in possession of space magic just so you know. This is merely me moving at high speed.”



“Nonsense-. Something like a speed that we cannot detect is just-“



“I can produce such speed. More accurately I am merely shortening the time though?”



Saying that, the apostle who talked with a shrill voice from shock was instantly cut apart by Kaori.



Regeneration magic ‘God Speed’――a magic that shortened the time affecting every single event. If the time for an attack to reach an opponent was shortened then it would become a god speed attack, if the time for traveling was shortened then it would be possible to move with a speed that could be mistaken as teleportation.



If the root of regeneration magic was traced back then it was a magic that interfered with time. It was merely that the usefulness of this magic stopped at ‘regeneration’ as the limit if used on the human body. Since Kaori obtained this magic from Meljine, she had trained in it all this time until now. It was the first age of god magic that she obtained and something that fitted her perfectly who had the role as healer, so her attachment to this magic was also especially all the more.



As the result, just like her success in creating the hour crystal, Kaori also became able to directly interfere with time although within a limit, her possession of the body of an apostle was also a factor in her mastery of this magic.



Of course there was also demerit, this magic consumed a vast amount of magic power for every single use. That was the reason why Kaori didn’t immediately use it right after the battle started…



Seeing her brethren got exterminated one after another by an overwhelming speed that they were powerless to do anything against, an apostle changed the aim of her argument. Perhaps it was also her scheme to make Kaori got agitated even just by a little.



“Indeed, you are strong. As to be expected from someone who serves that irregular. However, a war is not something that can be influenced by an individual.”



“What do you want to say?”



“Look at the surface. Even while you are facing all of us, the people are dying continuously. It seems there are also places that are putting a good fight, but in the end they are humans after all. They cannot avoid the accumulation of fatigue and damage. Before long they too will be reduced into mere corpses.”



“…”



“We are still arriving here from the Holy Precincts you know? There is nothing that you can protect. Everything, is just a pointless struggle.”



Kaori stopped moving and looked back at the talking apostle quietly. And then, she gently smiled at the apostle who was pointing the point of her sword at her while proclaiming mankind’s death and opened her mouth.



“Your second misunderstanding. Something like the amount of damage, or something like the amount of magic power…just who are you saying that to?”



“What are…”



“Even if my body has changed, I am ‘Shirasaki Kaori’. I possess the vocation ‘Healing Master’, and I am the ‘healer’ of the demon king(Hajime-kun)’s party you know?”



Saying that, Kaori held her large sword in reverse grip and pointed the tip to the surface. That sword which had been added with improvement by Hajime so that Kaori could go all out in exhibiting her ability as ‘Healing Master’ shined brilliantly in black silver color.



And then,



“――’Mighty Breath of Heaven Turning’.”



Right after that, a single black silver drop fell toward the ground from the tip of the large sword.



That drop when it reached the height of several meters from the ground, it went *KA-!* with light exploding from it that spread a ripple of black silver through the whole battlefield. Two layers, three layers, the black silver waves surged above the allied force.



Then, at the next moment a soldier of the allied force that should have died already opened his eyes with a snap. And then he raised his body with a bewildered look and touched all over his chest that should have been slashed open, when he realized there was no injury there he tilted his head further.



There were also others, people who were gouged out by silver feathers or killed by elemental magic woke up one after another. And then when they understood that their body was somehow alive with their wound healed, they immediately stood up and rushed forward in order to assist their comrades who were fighting the apostles.



Not only the people who had died, naturally even the people who were still alive but got wounded were also healed in the blink of eye.



“Wha-, they are revived-!?”



From above, the apostle who confirmed that situation exposed her shock as though the claim of the apostles that they were emotionless was just a lie.



Soul and regeneration composite magic ‘Mighty Breath of Heaven Turning’――this magic picked out which were the allies using soul magic and carried out convergence-fixing-attachment of the souls that were in the process of dispersing, moreover it performed healing using regeneration magic. As expected, in the case where the corpse didn’t maintain their original shape like being bisected until the body become in pieces or the head was gone, or the time of death had gone past ten minutes, the effect of this magic wouldn’t work on the corpse that was in those states, but other than those cases all the allies inside the radius of four kilometers with the black silver drop as the center would have revival and healing performed on them by this army use recovery magic.



Even with just those properties, this magic was already like a joke. However, the show of Kaori’s true ability didn’t stop just there.



“――’Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’.”



Different from the large sword that was held in reverse grip its tip pointing below, the other large sword was held in front of Kaori’s chest with its tip pointed straight above. And then, along with that proclamation, the readied large sword became clad in silver black radiance.



It was like a black hole that swallowed the galaxy, and it exhibited a result that didn’t contradict that appearance.



“ts, this is, my strength is leaving-“



Even though they were already had their specs shaved off by the choir right now, but right now when they felt that their strength was shaved off even further the apostles showed their agitation.



Looking carefully, radiant lights were leaking out from all the apostles in the range of several hundred meters around Kaori, and then those lights converged toward the large sword Kaori held like a meteor shower.



And then, right after the lights were absorbed by the large sword, magic power was overflowing from Kaori’s body. Not only her consumed magic power recovered, it even looked that the magic power she possessed grew a lot more. Not only that, through the tip of the large sword facing the ground, a silver black drop fell to the ground once more.



Silver black ripples were spreading below once more like before. And the result, the movement of the allied force soldiers was obviously becoming better. The sharpness and power of their movement, and also their reaction speed were increasing.



“I just stole the strength of all of you.”



“Such thing…”



“It’s possible as you can see. I am a healing master. Transferring magic power to other people is also our role. Though it takes a bit of time to seize the magic power of you all.”



Saying that was easy but to actually do it was another matter altogether.



Soul and light element composite magic ‘Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’――this composite magic designated its target using soul magic, and then it used sublimation magic to light element magic ‘Divine Transfer’ in order to transfer magic power to other people. It plundered the magic power of the seized opponent forcefully to recover one’s own magic power, and then that magic could also be reused for things like ally’s strengthening and so on.



Of course, normally even using sublimation magic stealing magic power from apostle without even touching them was impossible. What was helping Kaori in using this magic was the twin large swords her hands were holding.



――Demon Sword of Circle Calamity Anima Erunte



――Holy Sword of Gospel Bel Rexion



The demon sword plundered the power of the opponent and turned it into its food, while the holy sword made that power into unlimited power to share with the ally. These two swords exhibited their maximum strength when they were used together, a demon sword and a holy sword that exclusively assisted Kaori in her use of ’Mighty Breath of Heaven Turning’ and ‘Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’.



“…Even so, even so, all of you cannot win. We the apostles are infinite. No matter how many little tricks you all play, no matter how much you all struggle, in the end only the destiny of ruin awaits you all. Because that is the great will of the god.”



“Human won’t perish. Surely it will be the same result no matter what kind of world it is. Just like how a boy without any considerable strength crawled up from the bottom of the abyss by himself, even when human is swallowed by difficulty, they will surely find out their path to survival. You see, human just doesn’t know how to perish. As long as there is just one person who wishes to live, wishing to protect someone, their determination will force something like a mere ‘destiny’ to yield.”



The gaze of the apostle and Kaori crossed.



“…Then, please show me the proof of that.”



With those words as the signal, the fierce battle was restarted once more.



The apostles attacked Kaori in a group, and Kaori exterminated them who attacked her.



If she saw the allied force became exhausted she would heal them, in a certain interval she would perform revival. When her magic power decreased she would steal from the apostles, sometimes she would carry out support bombing toward the surface.



At the other places too, the dragon race people were holding back the apostles with fierce efforts, on the surface too every single person were continuing to fight to the death.



It was unclear just how much time had passed.



Even the shadow of the sun had already gone from the reddish black world, the people was gradually losing their sensation of time. If they didn’t have Kaori’s healing magic, perhaps the allied force would collapse already since a long time ago. That was just how endless the force of the apostle was.



Even so the allied force soldiers believed that Hajime, the ‘Sword of Goddess’ who stepped into the Holy Precincts would bring an end to this for them, with that belief they mustered their willpower. There was already a lot of soldiers who met their end because the revival didn’t make it in time.



Gradually the sensation of being pushed back by the violence of number began to rule over the allied force.



But, at that time, suddenly one soldier who looked up at the sky above God Mountain whispered with small volume.



“Oi, what the hell is that…”



Ahead of that soldier’s gaze, there was the scene of the miasma reaching toward the surface with an obviously growing momentum.



Right after that, the muddy miasma overflowing from the crack of space increased in force all of a sudden.



And then, the miasma fell and covered all over the surface of the collapsed God Mountain, without stopping the miasma flowed and headed toward the fortress. Ahead of the miasma there was the capital, it passed through and touched the grass plain in front of the fortress. Just like the dust cloud that was produced when God Mountain crumbled, the black miasma approached them with a terrific force like an avalanche.



Reddish black lights were materialized in succession inside that miasma. Right after that, a great number of roar rose and countless monsters leaped out from inside the miasma. It seemed that it was the second wave of the monster army.



Furthermore, several thousand apostles also flew out all at once from the crack in space.



“Oi oi, a battle force augmentation after this far. Bring it on…this is a time to say something like that but…this is really bad huh.”



With a body that was dyed bright red from the blood spurt of the enemy, Gahard’s expression turned like someone who just had bitten a bitter bug. Not to mention the other soldiers, their expression were turning into despair.



Even though it was already absolutely the limit facing the apostles who were assaulting them without any pause, but after this long, tens of thousands of monsters swarm and several thousands of apostles were coming again――perhaps this deadlocked state would crumble for the worse like this.



“First and second division, concentrate at the front! Don’t let the monsters ride the momentum and charge into melee battle-! Stop them in place-!”



A formation was immediately formed by Gahard’s command.



The earthquake was spreading, the air was rumbling. The sound of the monsters charge and the roars’ shockwave were getting closer.



Looking at the overflowing large swarm of monsters while taking along an avalanche of enormous miasma behind them, damp sweating was flowing all over Gahard’s body. The dragons and Kaori were also held back in place by the similarly overflowing apostles. The cheat group from another world was also having their hands full with protecting the choir squad.



The distance was approximately one kilometer.



The expressions of the allied force soldiers were convulsing from the excessive pressure.



Perhaps this is hopeless. Unintentionally anyone was giving off that atmosphere. It was at that moment,



“――’Kalpa of Destruction’.”



The ground vanished. Along with the monsters.



“――’Kalpa of Destruction’――’Kalpa of Destruction’.”



A voice of a woman resounded thrice. That voice resounded with clarity even at the battlefield which was filled to the brim with noises.



But, rather than that voice, Gahard and others were shocked even more by the spectacle happening before their eyes.



The leading pack of the advancing monsters was completely vanishing into the bottom of the earth altogether. They were unable to even raise the scream of death agony.



Right after that, the voice that excessively reverberated and excessively irritated the listeners, the cause of this phenomenon showed her appearance sluggishly from a gate that opened at the plain in front of the allied force.



“Yahoooo☆ Appearing when the situation is in a pinch, the world idol, Miledy-chan has arrived-! Ahahaaa, isn’t this the greatest timiiing! Just-as-ex-pec-ted, me♪ A woman that can read the mood! Everyone of the allianceee, falling in love with me is-no-good-y’know♡”



What appeared was a giant golem, and a really tiny humanoid wearing a smiley mask, clad in a milky white robe riding on its shoulder. Miledy’s appearance that looked like she was screwing around a lot was taking a pose that felt like ‘Kyarurun☆’ toward the allied force army from the giant golem’s shoulder while making ‘tehehe-pero’ expression. The smiley face mask was somehow looking like that by some unknown mechanism. (TN: Tehehe pero. Imagine winking while chuckling tehehe and the person’s tongue sticking out.)



Including Gahard’s, the time of the allied force army was stopped.



Everyone without exception was having a genuine confusion of “Just what in the world is that” while at the same time their expression was turning into an indescribable irritation.



There an explanation came from Liliana toward the allied force. According to her, this person was a helper that Hajime and others called for, putting aside her annoying speech and conduct, this person was really quite useful. It was unknown what she had been doing until now, but she finally arrived right now, something like that.



“Geeezzz, everyone, what a tough crowd all of youuuuu. ‘Perhaps this is hopeless’…you all seemed to act pointlessly serious like that so I tried to enliven this placeee. Yet now you all are making Miledy-chan’s good will to go to wasteee, hmph hmph, Miledy-chan is extremely angry here!”



The irritation gauge of Gahard and everyone else almost exploded with that.



But, even while acting screwing off like that, Miledy pointed one of her hands at the approaching miasma behind and said a word.



“――’Severance Catastrophe’.”



The star of catastrophe created above the miasma immediately began to swallow the miasma with outrageous force. There was also the figures of monsters that were mixed inside the miasma there.



“Geeez-, daring to be a nuisance of Miledy-chan is something uuuunforgivable! Punishment timeee. ――’Demolish Yoke’.”



The gap between her screwing around voice and her chanting voice was absurd.



A voice of absolute zero resounded only in that instant of chanting.



The result from that was different from before, the feet of the monsters left the ground all at once and they flew beyond the sky with a preposterous momentum. Gravity was the resultant force from gravitational pull and centrifugal force. Therefore, those who had their gravitational pull severed would be flown away to the beyond.



The ten of thousand monsters were curbstomped by a lone person while helpless to do anything. Even the monsters who escaped the range of the large scale magic were exterminated by the rushing giant golems and knight golems one after another before the monsters could reach the allied force.



The allied force didn’t know that this person was one of the ‘liberator’, but even so they greatly comprehended that this was a helper that Hajime relied on. That this person was similarly a monster class character.



The advance of the monster of the ground was managed by Miledy and her golems, and then the monsters who broke through that was somehow managed by the allied force, like that relieve was slightly spreading among the soldiers.



But, that relieve was immediately crumbling right after.



The apostles who overflowed from the crack in space before this gathered into a single cluster. Their number was approximately a thousand.



The thousand apostle that formed their ranks like a single spear completely ignored the attack of Kaori or the dragons and began to descend in a straight line.



Naturally, anti-air artillery was also fired from the surface, but even while the apostles were falling one after another like scattered flowers, they relied on their number and kept advancing without hesitation. …They were heading toward the choir.



“tsk, I won’t let you-!”



{All hands, stop that apostle swarm-!}



With desperate look Kaori and Adol exerted all their strength to crush the large spear made from apostles.



Several hundred apostles were blown away in their descend to the ground, but even so the swarm of apostles that completely became a single cluster couldn’t be broken up completely…



“No good-, run awaaay!”



Kaori who was unable to oppose that pressure raised a scream while getting blown away.



Right after that, the large spear of apostles was emitting silver radiance like a divine spear that was thrown by god while stabbing at the barrier of the choir squad.



And then, before the people in the area could do something about the divine spear, cracks were spreading on the barrier that was protecting the choir squad…finally, the barrier was completely pulverized along with a thunderous sound.



The powerless members of the choir squad were vainly scattered to death before that tremendous might.



At this moment, the wedge that bound the apostles was broken.



The apostles of god exerted their ability in full.



Bloody wind was sweeping over the battlefield. Here and there silver lights were bursting up, the allied force soldiers that were making their resistance in those areas were instantly turned into a lump of meat in an instant. Their heroic war cry was turning into a mere scream.



“This is only a stopgap measure but――’Demolish Yoke’.”



Miledy was maintaining the picture of hell behind her while exercising the magic that cut loose the target from gravity toward the battlefield. The targets were easy to understand. The conspicuous silver magic power. She was only selecting those as her target.



Right after that, the apostles were simultaneously blown away to the sky. They were spinning while pulled until the distance of a kilometer from the ground instantly.



But, for the apostles in the strengthened state who had recovered their specs, this magic was really nothing but a temporary measure against them. They immediately fixed their posture. There the apostles who turned into the divine spear gathered. They didn’t stop there. As though to invite despair for mankind, a great number of apostles were coming out further from the crack in space.



The reddish black sky was filled to the brim with apostles to the degree that they could be mistaken as stars in the sky. And then, the apostles of god, as though to declare that fighting bit by bit was troublesome already, it even seemed to say that right now they would forget all the humiliation of the apostles of god being killed, they would merely rely on the overwhelming violence of number and began to focus their silver magic power.



The protection by the great barrier was already gone. The anti-air artillery and sniping attacks were shooting down the apostles with certainty. The dragons and Kaori were also exterminating the apostles who weren’t moving because of their concentration in focusing their magic power and they were falling like flies from the sky.



However, the apostles didn’t pay them any heed. They abandoned their dignity, they didn’t give any care of the damage done to them, they were merely focusing a light of destruction for the sake of destroying the mankind. No matter how many of them were killed and killed, the apostles’ number were replenished one after another, their number that was focusing their magic power was just too many that the rate of the allied force annihilating the apostles couldn’t catch up.



Right now, if the silver sun was fired, the result wouldn’t end with merely tremendous damage toward the allied force. The result that arrived would be ‘the defeat of mankind’.



“I won’t let you, absolutely-!”



Kaori glared at the sky with a gaze filled with determination while lifting both her hands above. In anticipation of this situation, the crystals that were placed in certain places on this battlefield reacted to Kaori’s will. Those lights connected to each other with lines of light and formed a single enormous magic circle.



――Kaori’s exclusive use Large scale protection barrier stone ‘Shutzengel’



This artifact assisted the barrier magic of Kaori who wasn’t a barrier master to deploy a large-scale barrier that was even more powerful than the great barrier using an enormous magic circle that covered the whole battlefield.



“Perish.”



“――’Indomitable Holy Severance’–!!”



When the silver sun was fired, a super large scale protection wall covering the allied force was deployed at the same time.



The silver spear and the black silver barrier collided.



Thunderous roar.



Flash.



The world was filled with those two things.



“Guh, UuuUUUUUaAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!”



Kaori’s scream burst out.



The impact felt like she was stopping a comet in its track, the pressure felt like it was crushing her. Her black silver wings were flickering, her altitude was gradually dropping.



The black silver barrier was Holy Severance that was enchanted with disintegration ability. Therefore it neutralized the apostles’ disintegration ability and changed the attack’s nature into mere bombardment. But, even so it was a full power bombardment formed from several thousand apostles, it caused cracks to form on Kaori’s barrier by pure might. Kaori was resisting that using regeneration magic that instantly restored the barrier.



Her magic power was flowing out from here in the blink of eye.



Kaori gritted her teeth while maintaining her altitude and the barrier desperately.



The apostles didn’t circle behind the barrier to attack from the rear, perhaps it was because of their minimum dignity as apostles of god, they were merely adding to the silver bombardment continuously to smash the resistance from the front.



{All hands, deploy barrier! Don’t let that girl shouldering this alone-!}



Adol’s angry voice roared. The dragons gathering behind Kaori laid out their barriers one after another to layer with Kaori’s.



“This should lighten up the burden more or less. ――’Calamity Sky’.”



Miledy’s gravity magic created gravity spheres around the part of the barrier that was directly impacted and weakened the bombardment by scattering its might.



Other than them the people on the surface that could use barrier magic――with Liliana and the classmates in the lead, all of them deployed their barrier and supported Kaori. The people who couldn’t use barrier magic were also desperately supporting Kaori by using another effect of ‘Shutzengel’, the effect of transferring the magic power of the soldiers to Kaori, in that way they were sending their magic power to help.



A few second passed, or perhaps it had been several minutes.



The world of thunderous roar and flash that felt like an eternity finally announced its end.



At the same time the barriers were also dispersing.



“Haa haa, we, endured…”



Kaori who had endured through the disintegration bombardment of several thousand apostles were breathing heavily.



Her complexion was obviously looking exhausted. The dragons at her surrounding were also the same. Liliana and others and also the allied force soldiers on the ground who had mustered their magic power were also in similar state. The expression of everyone was turning grim.



Even so they had pulled through. Thinking that Kaori was smiling while she was going to activate ’Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’…



A silver sun was illuminating the world once more.



“We the apostles of god are infinite――hadn’t we said that?”



Not only their number, their magic power was also infinite. The glaring apostles were whispering so while creating a new silver sun.



Kaori’s magic power recovery wouldn’t make it in time.



She wouldn’t be able to endure if they were attacked one more time by that.



Not only Kaori, all people of the allied force who looked up at the sky also realized that.



Despair,



Resignation,



Were filling the heart of them all.



The silver sun was falling down from the sky. It was the end…everyone thought like that.



But…



Kaori quietly lifted both her hands with her breathing still ragged. Her strong gaze that didn’t show anything like even a spec of resignation was staring still at the light of direction directly, a fire was burning in her soul, she scraped up even the fragments of magic power still clinging somewhere inside her――



She didn’t abandon her will to fight.



She didn’t give up.



It was unclear just how many people among the soldiers of the allied force could see her figure. If they could see her, then surely they would shed their tears from that noble and beautiful appearance without any doubt. Just like Adol and others whose heart was stolen by seeing that gallant figure from right beside her.



“Even just a second longer is fine. We are going to survive!”



If they could only just survive a second longer, at that time, perhaps that person that she loved the most would bring the end to all of this.



No, surely he would end all of this.



She believed that.



That was why, even at the verge of death, even just for a fragment of a second she wouldn’t give up!



The whole world was dyed silver.



The barrier that she could deploy looked so frail like a toy.



But, for a second.



Without any doubt, the attack was stopped in that second.



At the next moment,



“…Fufu-, see, just as I thought!”



Kaori made an expression that was enchanted from affection and unequaled trust. Ahead of her gaze, there was the scene of the silver light dispersing with a puff and the swarm of apostles slumping powerlessly.



Right after that, like a marionette that had its controlling string cut, the apostles stared at nothing with lightless gaze and they were falling to the ground like flies.



{This is, no, wait, what in the world is that…don’t tell me, is that Holy Precincts?}



Even while feeling bewildered from seeing the falling apostles, Adol’s voice was caught from an even stranger situation.



Ahead of his gaze, there, space itself was shaking, the sky was in an abnormal state where various sceneries which were projected like video recording were appearing and disappearing. It was as though there were several different worlds at the sky above, the sky looked like it was going to crumble and fall off anytime now.



That situation was like the prelude of the world crumbling, furthermore the atmosphere was starting to rumble which spurred on that bad imagination even more.



“Hajime-kun, Yue, everyone…”



Kaori too felt deeply moved only for a brief time, her expression immediately changed into a worried one. Looking closer the crack of space was also trembling, it looked like that it might vanish anytime.



With her state that had run dry of magic power, Kaori flapped her silver black wings to head toward the trembling space while maintaining her consciousness that was going to sink into darkness even now.



There was a person who caught her shoulder tightly.



“Leave them to me. To the one loved by everyone through many months and years, this Miledy-chan, ‘kay☆”



Saying that, Miledy Raisen stopped Kaori with an extremely gentle voice that ran counter with her tone.





Chapter 174




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



The Last Battle



Platinum light poured down.



The radiant pillar of light quietly stretched from empty space to the ground――toward a chalk white round pillar. And then, when the light touched the summit of the gigantic round pillar where seven or eight people could stand with room to spare, at the next moment it vanished completely without warning.



There was a shadow of a person kneeling on one knee after the light vanished. It went without saying that it was Hajime.



Hajime looked around with a dangerous gaze.



In that place, similar to the richly colored space where they arrived at right after entering Holy Precincts, there was a chalk white path that stretched straight deeper inside with the pillar where Hajime was standing as the starting point. However, the surrounding wasn't richly colored like the first space, but closed in a darkness that was like an abyss.



The chalk white path that was stretching in a straight line looked extremely visible. At the end of that chalk white path, it was connected with a stair that led to above.



(This is not a mineral huh…)



Hajime whispered a little in his heart while looking beneath him.



He used transmutation's derivative skill 'Mineral Appraisal' to investigate the chalk white path and didn't receive any reaction back. He also used his sensing skills at the surrounding darkness but there was no reaction.



(Well, there was only one path. There is no meaning in sparing some thought for the unknown or trap after this far.)



Hajime began to walk calmly in the quiet space that was too silent.



In the first place Hajime had no problem with doing something like erasing the sound of his footstep, but right now he was consciously not erasing his sound. Regardless not only Hajime's footstep, even the sound of his clothes rustling or the sound of his breathing couldn't be heard at all. It was as though the surrounding darkness was thoroughly absorbing all the sounds leaving none behind.



In that world without sound, Hajime stared straight ahead while advancing. He walked while thinking of her beloved who was waiting ahead. Fury toward his enemy and sorrow toward his beloved mixed inside his eyes, those eyes were filled with abyss exactly like the surrounding darkness.



Hajime's legs approached the stair. Looking up from below he could see the top of the stair being enveloped by faint light. Without pause, Hajime unhesitatingly threw his body into the light.



His field of vision was dyed white.



The space where he came out at was white everywhere. Whether above or below, or everything at the surrounding, as far as his eyes could see there was only pure white which made him unable to grasp any sense of distance. Despite the certain sensation that he felt by stepping on the ground, but when his gaze lowered there it became difficult to be aware of the ground's existence there. It felt like he would fall below without any end in sight.



"Welcome, to my domain, of its deepest area."



A voice called at Hajime who was looking around.



It was a lovely voice that sounded clear. The familiar voice of his beloved sounded pleasant in his ear like a flowing stream.



But, right now he felt something slightly cloudy in it. Surely it was because the will contained inside the voice was rotten the core, Hajime thought. A scowl was slightly appearing on his eyebrows.



At the same time, a veil of faint light shining behind him suddenly vanished. And then, the existence of Hajime who was clad in clothing that had black tone looked like a drop of ink that dripped on a pure white canvas.



Suddenly the space ahead of Hajime's gaze was swaying.



It was as though the curtain of the stage was raised, the swaying space was cleared and behind it, there was a tiered platform with a height that was nearly ten meters. And then, there was a young beautiful woman sitting on the throne installed at its peak.



Wavy hair of radiant golden threads, white and smooth exposed shoulders, voluminous twin hills peeking out from the largely opened chest part, long and slender beautiful leg stretching out from the slit of the dress. Despite being slender on the whole, the woman also strangely looked sensually fleshy. Her legs were crossed, and she was resting her chin on her hand at the throne with a faint smile on her lips, that appearance looked like the personification of the word 'bewitching'.



If an average man saw her, no, all human without any sex distinction would have their reasoning sent flying just by a fleeting glance sent by this woman, there was no doubt that they would then prostrate themselves before her with a tremendous emotion that was similar with faith. An overwhelming beauty to the degree that would make anyone unconditionally felt that was right there.



But, Hajime's face was still expressionless, he was staring straight at that beautiful woman――who for some reason had the appearance of adult Yue, he was only staring fixedly without any particular emotion that could be seen on his face.



Surely that was because in contrast with the beauty of that appearance, 'repulsiveness' and 'ugliness' could be felt from those eyes and smile that seemed to expose what were inside.



Whether the person himself was aware or not of that was unclear…Yue's body, Ehitorujue that took over that body was grinning broadly while his mouth was opening once more.



"What do you think? While I was seizing this body I was also trying to make it grow while I was at it. I can brag that the result is quite something I think? Hm?"



Ehitorujue said such thing with a tone that obviously sounded like he was enjoying this, to that Hajime was intentionally sighing deeply and shrugged lightly.



"It would be perfect, if only the filthiness inside not oozing out like this. Your score is minus a hundred. Everything is wasted just by you being the one inside there. This has already gone far past ugly. If you don't notice it yourself then how about I lend you a mirror?"



"Fufufu, what impudent talk. But, I understand you know? In your heart you are not as calm as your appearance. Your blood is boiling that your beloved lover is played around freely with like this right?"



"Isn't that obvious. What are you doing acting all wise like that? A warning from me. It's better for you to not open your mouth too much. After all the more you speak the more your lowliness get exposed."



It was a well executed poisonous tongue. During that exchange, Hajime's expression was still expressionless without change. That indifferent tone eloquently indicated that what he said wasn't sarcasm or anything but something that came from the bottom of his heart, which caused Ehitorujue's eyes to twitch in reaction.



And then, with a smiling face that was obviously a mask no matter who saw it he opened his mouth softly.



"I command in the name of Ehitorujue――'prostrate'."



The Divine Statement was spoken with extremely natural tone――it was the manifestation of god's will that made anyone obeyed without question. Once this 'foul play' caused Hajime to struggle on the ground desperately, and now hearing this once more Hajime staggered in place…



*DOPAN-!!*



"――"



And he responded with a shot.



The bullet was blocked by a barrier in front of Ehitorujue, a ripple was spreading in the air.



"…Divine Statement has no effect at all?"



"Just how many times you had used that in front of me huh. You think a petty magic trick like that will keep working forever?"



"…"



Ehitorujue's eyes narrowed toward Hajime who was pointing Donner's muzzle straight at him. But, his composure didn't crumble by any means, instead he held out his hand that wasn't supporting his cheek in an inviting gesture.



Immediately at the areas around Donner & Shuragen, 'Treasure Warehouse II', all the artifacts that Hajime carried, the spaces were warping like jelly. But the spaces immediately returned to their original shape with a snapping sound as though there was something that got repelled away.



"…I see. So you came here with countermeasures prepared."



"Rather, you thinking that I will come without doing that is the crazy one."



"Don't get cocky, irregular young boy. You really showed much arrogance just by defending against Divine Statement and Heaven Existence."



"It doesn't matter how you are looking at me, shitty bastard. I'll say it one more time, the words that I told you at that time."



"…"



With a click, Hajime fixed Donner's aim at the heart of Ehitorujue while declaring clearly and loudly.



"――I'm taking back Yue. I'll kill you. It will be the end with that."



The white space didn't absorb the sound. Rather it made the words echoed powerfully with dignity.



The expression of Ehitorujue that was bombarded with those words warped evilly, showing how he would enjoy trampling on that determination, during that his crossed leg went down and he lifted his resting cheek, before he suddenly stood up. And then, while glaring down from above with the throne behind him, an immense pressure began to leak out. Platinum magic power was painting over the white space.



"Very well. This will be the last entertainment in this world. Let's play for a little bit then."



Ehitorujue's body was gently floating up.



He lightly spread his hands while his abundant golden hair was undulating, the sleeve of his black dress flapped.



At the same time, the platinum magic power light converged rapidly with Ehitorujue at the center and it formed a shape on his back.



What appeared on Ehitorujue's back while shining brilliantly was three layers of ring halo. The size of those halos, with the floating Ehitorujue as the center the first halo had a diameter of around two meters while the third halo had a diameter of more than ten meters.



Countless light spheres were slowly being created from those halos. The number of those spheres really should be expressed as the number of the stars in the sky. But, in contrast with their splendor, the pressure emitted by those spheres was absurd. Every single one was obviously hiding a power that could easily destroy a human and could possibly change even the geography.



The figure of Ehitorujue with gigantic halos behind him, served by countless stars, and clad in platinum light, would make anyone comprehended, truly if anyone who didn't know of the ugliness inside saw him then he was indeed emitting divinity that was worthy to be revered as 'god'.



In respond Hajime was,



"No holding back. ――I'm going all out."



Resplendent crimson light burst up. A whirlwind of magic power that spiraled wildly flapped Hajime's black coat and wrapped his body in crimson color. Even in front of Ehitorujue's power, his one eye didn't show any sign of faltering, unnoticed it was shining with clear crimson like red spinel.



It was Limit Break's last derivative skill 'Supreme Break'. At this moment, Hajime's specs swelled up five times over in one go. Then he activated Sky Step's last derivative skill 'Light Speed' which reinforced his perception ability to a different magnitude.



At the same time, countless crosses were lining up midair behind Hajime. On the black fuselages that should be called as a color of darkness, a red pattern was carved, the total number of those crosses was seven hundred.



――New type versatile offensive drone Cross Velt



While being two sizes more compact than the crossbit until now, it was clad with sinister crimson light that made one felt a lump of ice sliding down their spine. Perhaps that spectacle should be called as the grave markers of the enemies slaughtered by the demon king.



'You too will be added to this funeral procession', the current Hajime who was wordlessly asserting that was emitting unprecedented rage and killing intent while being silent, he was emitting might that was truly worthy for a person who was trying to achieve godslaying.



Dazzling platinum halos and countless twinkling stars.



Violently wild crimson storm and dark funeral crosses.



The two sides resented and bemoaned each other while the space between them creaked, where they were about to swallow at each other.



Ehitorujue pushed out one of his hands with an elegance that looked as though it had been calculated thoroughly until his fingertips.



"Now, this is the beginning of the game. First――dance for me!"



Right after that, a lot of light stars rushed toward Hajime. And it wasn't something that simple, the great number of platinum lights from the halos behind Ehitorujue were flying out with a motion that was depicting geometrical pattern. The meteor shower of light would even make anyone watching to feel a certain kind of artistic quality from it. There were lights in a spherical shape, then there were also lights that drawn a curve like a blade, and also lights that were approaching while rotating like a boomerang.



"A dance invitation from you son of a bitch, I refuse. ――Full burst!"



Hajime snorted at Ehito's invitation and gave his order.



At the next moment, all the crosses pointed forward simultaneously and the seven hundred Cross Velt fired all at once. All of the bullets fired were electromagnetically accelerated, furthermore all of the bullet heads were a special bullet that released multi-stage shockwave concentrated to a single point――Burst Bullet.



The platinum meteor shower and the crimson bullets filled the space to the brim. That scene was just like a war in middle age, where both armies were yelling war cry just before they clashed. Those two armies that were even more atrocious than death god clashed and destroyed at each other right in the middle between their commanders. Thunderous roars and violent impacts, and flashes were surging out to the degree that one could be deluded to think that it was the birth of a star.



A great number of meteors were flying off, bullets clad in crimson were extinguished. The meteors and barrage of bullets were struggling for supremacy with their destructive power.



"Hou, so you can endure this. Then how about the next move. Don't you die so easily okay?"



Ehitorujue made a smile that displayed his joy, and then he waved his arm elegantly once. Then the brilliant radiance of the halos behind him intensified, right after that *zuzuzu* lights in humanoid form manifested. The silhouettes of person that were formed from light itself were also carrying two large swords made from light in their hand, giving them resemblance with the apostle.



"Their ability is at the same level with the apostle. However, amidst the illuminating attack of these halos, can you also deal with these attacking apostles of light that are moving independently in the end?"



Even while he was saying such thing, the apostles of light were created in large number. With Ehitorujue at the center and the halos behind him, the number of the apostles of light had already easily surpassed a hundred.



But, in front of such view that could be said as despairing, Hajime only snorted "hmph". And then, he spoke. The soul of language to summon his own army.



"Battle of resource is the domain of transmutation master. You are still using these old puppet dolls even at this stage, aren't you too behind the time? ――Come, 'Grim Reaper'."



Crimson magic power overflowed from the 'Treasure Warehouse II'. The magic power that swelled up together with an intense flash scattered everywhere like explosion wave, although only temporarily but the space that was full of platinum light was dyed with crimson. Like that, a beat later the flash settled and then,



"This is…a golem army, is it?"



Ahead of the murmuring Ehitorujue's gaze, a great number of monster swarm clad in crimson light could be seen. However, their body was formed from mineral that looked even harder than steel, behind their sharp fangs there was gun muzzle, while doors or missiles were attached on their back or stomach, their claws were vibrating in super speed where everything that they touched would be torn apart, the body of the golems were overflowing with bizarreness.



――Hajime's exclusive one man army Grim Reapers



Wolf shape, great eagle shape, spider shape, large turtle shape, large monkey shape, there was an abundant variation of the golems, it was an army of living golem. Their numbers easily surpassed a hundred, furthermore they were fully loaded with hybrid weapons inside their body. These were the massacring army of the demon king who knew no pain and no fatigue.



Ehitorujue whose corners of the lips were lifted up and Hajime whose eyes narrowed in absolute zero let their command resounded at the same time.



"Apostles of light, exterminate the unsightly monsters!"



"Death gods, tear apart the useless puppets."



Right after that, the light apostles flew out while shooting light beams, the metallic monsters roared while charging forward. The light apostles who were moving in high speed that trailed afterimages behind were surprisingly followed by the mechanical wolves who rushed through the air with rippling wave in their wake and afterimages similarly trailing behind. And then, the wolves deployed a small type gatling gun from their back and also firing a cannon from their widely opened mouth.



The large eagles that ignited their thrusters and climbed up in one go were trampling the battlefield by scattering cluster bombs like heavy rain from high above. The large turtles were letting loose large amount of missiles from their back, transforming into fixed batteries. The light apostles who approached near to aim at the turtles were blocked by the large monkeys who were forming a wall with the large shield they carried, and then the spiders charged through the gaps and carved apart the shell of the apostles using the sonic wave they generated.



Naturally there were also grim reapers that were done in by the light apostles, but each time a grim reaper got lethally damaged they would self-explode that swallowed the surrounding, even at a minimum they would bring their killer to accompany them in death.



"To rival my magic with amount of resources…it is really something unthinkable for a human. However, if it is said in reverse, even the specialty of the irregular can only rival me at bes――"



"Don't yap, you worthless god."



Hajime fired off Donner & Schlag, cutting off Ehitorujue who was speaking ridiculingly. There were two sounds of gunshot. But the flashes that cut through the air were six streaks.



Inside the clashing fierce storm of destruction, those bullets slipped through swimmingly and sniped the caster Ehitorujue.



*GIIIIIII-*



With such hard sound resounding the bullets were halted before the eyes of Ehitorujue. The positions of the stopped bullets were before his head, heart, and his four limbs. While those shots were a sniping that was like threading through the eye of a needle, but not even a single shot shifted for even a millimeter from their target. It was a special move that fired bullets through a space overflowing to the brim with shockwave and barrage without any deviation at all.



The first bullets emitted shockwaves consecutively within an instant to a pinpoint spot. They were burst bullet. The shockwaves that were directed to a pinpoint spot made a fatal crack on Ehitorujue's barrier just with one shot. And then, the second burst bullets right behind those first bullets that were fired with the same trajectory pushed in as though pile-driving the first shots and pulverized the barrier right away.



*PAAAAAAN* Faster than the resounding sound of pulverization, the magic bullets of simultaneous attacks on six vital spots approached to pierce Ehitorujue.



Ehitorujue quietly lifted his hand toward that. Even if he did something like that, the electromagnetically accelerated bullets should be unstoppable. It was obvious that a bullet would easily bite a hole into that palm and bore into the heart behind it, was how it seemed to be but…



"So you broke my barrier. Furthermore your personality that unhesitatingly aimed at your lover's heart even though she possesses automatic regeneration…you are making me enjoying this, irregular."



The palm and chest of Ehitorujue who was saying such thing with the corner of his lips raised didn't seem to receive any kind of damage.



The cause of that was surely the small whirling black sphere generated ahead of that palm. Most likely it was gravity magic 'Severance Catastrophe'. It swallowed the bullet and then crushed it with its super gravity.



His delicate control that could do such thing, also his reaction speed that could sense electromagnetically accelerated bullet and stopped it, were absurd as expected. It was unclear whether it was because he planned to play around or perhaps because of his dignity as a god that considered being touched was a disrespect to him that he didn't rely on the automatic regeneration.



Even during this few moment of offense and defense, there was a meteor shower that slipped through the barrage of Cross Velt and reached Hajime. The light stars the size of a fist rushed at Hajime.



Hajime was in front of the swarm of lights that completely filled his field of vision, however, his expression showed no unease at all.



"――fuu"



He shortly breathed out.



At the next moment, the swarm of light bullets passed through Hajime's body. While small strange sounds of *jijiji-* were resounding, the bullets of certain death meaninglessly passed through Hajime as though they were attacking an illusion of him.



"Hou, that's splendid."



Ehitorujue spontaneously leaked out words of praise.



What was the cause that made the light stars slipped through which made the enemy spontaneously praised in admiration? The cause was nothing special. Hajime was merely evading the lights in high speed with the necessary minimum movement. That was all. The sounds of *jijiji-* were the sound of the light bullets grazing Hajime's clothing. That was just how barely he was evading the lights, by seeing the attacks through until the millimeter degree.



For ordinary person, Hajime looked like he was not moving, but with Ehitorujue's perception, the reflected spectacle was as though Hajime's body was making many layers of shadow clones blurring in the same spot to return to their original position.



"Well then, how about this?"



Ehitorujue waved his hand relaxedly.



Immediately several stretching lights that were moving with an irregular motion like twisting snake were fired from the halos. It didn't stop there, huge light bullets with diameter around two meters were spewed out in large amount like soap bubbles toward Hajime.



"Chih"



Hajime clicked his tongue.



Hajime used 'Ground Shrinker' and 'Air Force' tp leap away from his spot. The light whips powerfully struck the place where Hajime was standing just an instant before while the light bubbles were flying off all over the place leaving not a single gap in space.



Cross Velts were flying in all directions and the Grim Reapers were commanded to aim at Ehitorujue from all angles. However, just by a single wave of a hand, Ehitorujue pulverized every machine that got close to him.



"…"



Hajime's eyes were narrowing from seeing that scene while he made his 'Treasure Warehouse II' shined.



Right after that, a huge weapon was gripped in his hand. From a glance, it was the gatling railgun 'Metsurai' with six rotating barrels. However, its size was completely different. It was enlarged by two sizes bigger. Furthermore, looking closer all the six barrels, each of them consisted of also six barrels.



――Super large electromagnetic acceleration gatling cannon Metsurai Disaster



It was a gatling cannon with 6×6 rotating barrels where each barrel had the same size with the barrel of the original Metsurai. It fired off seventy-two thousand round per minute, this weapon went even beyond being evaluated as a monster, an outrageous weapon where the idea of creating it could even be called as stupid.



Hajime pulled the trigger of such outrageous weapon.



*VOO–!!*



Such strange sound like the air itself was rupturing was resounding. Metsurai Disaster that instantly generated a squall of cartridges, pulverized everything in its line of fire――the meteor shower, the light bubbles, and even the light apostles just like scrap papers before approaching Ehitorujue.



The approaching attack was already like a muddy stream of crimson light, a storm of destruction in the same meaning of natural disaster that swallowed everything in its path.



"That's something dreadful. But, what meaning it has if it doesn't hit? ――'Great Vortex of White End'."



Ahead of Ehitorujue's two hands that he stretched forward, there was platinum light whirling. That sparkling vortex looked just like a silver river.



Right after that, the crimson muddy stream of magic bullets that broke through the likes of common obstacle like they were nothing, was split into two in front of Ehitorujue as though a single stroke had bisected it, and then the attack was swallowed by two silver rivers at two sides. Naturally not even a single magic bullet reached Ehitorujue.



"…So even this doesn't reach. Good grief."



A meteor shower rushed from the back at Hajime who was swearing reflexively. Perhaps they were even teleported that the many light stars had circled behind Hajime without him realizing, they approached to swallow him whole.



Sometimes with a movement that didn't even leave afterimage, sometimes with a swaying motion like fluttering wind, Hajime was evading while using Donner and Metsurai Disaster, added with Cross Velts he detected the gaps of the meteor shower and fired crimson flashes toward Ehitorujue. The mechanical monsters that were unfolding a fierce battle with the light apostles were also launching an attack at Ehitorujue if they found an opening.



The platinum lights that beautifully dance boisterously in the white space and the rushing crimson lights that weaved in between displayed a view that should be called as superb which would surely steal the heart of the viewer watching from the side.



Amidst that view, without relaxing his offense and defense at all while handling Hajime's shots and the Grim Reapers' attacks, Ehitorujue was showing a composed smile and talked to Hajime.



"Come to think of it, irregular. How did you finish off Aruvheit? He too was more or less my retainer that possessed divinity. Even if it was you, I don't think that he would be killed that easily."



The revolving light stars took a great detour while aiming at Hajime from all directions, Hajime was intercepting them with his Donner spinning like a wheel while he snorted and responded at Ehitorujue.



"Hah, that snob is a god you say? Don't make me laugh. He easily died while begging for his life unsightly. Even the monster in labyrinths has more guts than something like that."



"Hou, easily you say."



Light bubbles buried the space to the brim. Hajime stored in his Metsurai Disaster and in exchange he took out 'Agni-Orkan' and launched missile swarm to the front.



Terrific thunderous roars and flame blasts rose and a hole was created on the light bubbles cage.



Hajime instantly rushed through and he aligned the aim of Agni-Orkan at Ehitorujue and pulled the triggers.



But, at that moment Ehitorujue snapped his finger. At the same time suddenly thunders rained down from empty space. Those thunders that were focused and compressed to the limit already became spears made from lightning. If it had to be named, then it would be the lightning spear fired from god――the 'Lightning Divine Spear'.



"tsk"



Without even any time to react using his perception skill, the sparking platinum spears that flew in lightning speed from Hajime's blind spot within a few meter easily pierced Agni-Orkan. Just with that, the frame of the artifacts warped, in addition, the combustion powder packed inside the missiles caught fire which caused a great explosion.



Although Hajime had immediately thrown away Agni-Orkan and withdrew from that spot, the missiles that boasted tremendous might even by their lonesome were exploding all at once from really close range, in addition the lightning divine spears were also rupturing which scattered its compressed lightning to all direction, Hajime was unable to avoid getting damage. The blasts and thunders penetrated through his 'Vajra' and his clothing which was tougher than it looked because it was made from tough metal and monster hide, which clearly told just how terrible the radiated force was.



"Guu…(lightning speed attack from random coordinate that is instantly invoked…as expected, this guy is still holding many hands yet)"



Hajime was whispering in his heart while groaning unintentionally, Ehitorujue who glanced at such Hajime continued his talk as though nothing had happened.



"Nothing you could hide from me. I know already. You invoked a concept magic right? The situation at that time could be said as extreme for you. Although not even in my dream I could imagine you would produce a concept so powerful that could even possibly defeat Aruvheit, that was unexpected even for me…"



"…"



Hajime who lost Agni-Orkan displayed a look that pondered something for an instant, then he scattered explosion hand grenade at the surrounding which blown away the light bubbles while he took out Metsurai Disaster once more. Like that he held back Ehitorujue while he controlled Cross Velts and placed one of them above Ehitorujue's head.



"Perhaps, you have even created a concept of 'godslaying'? And then, you was hiding that trump card close to your chest, and holding the hope that you can do something with that you came until this far. Fufufu, how cute."



Ehitorujue didn't even glance at the Cross Velt above him, far from that he didn't even close his mouth while swiping his hand overhead.



Just with that the Cross Velt that was going to shoot was cut with an invisible blade and exploded. The loaded bullets scattered around lethally like a frag grenade, but even those were repelled at the space before Ehitorujue and didn't reach him.



Hajime saw that happened, but he didn't even click his tongue, he closely observed the state of Ehitorujue who was talking while basking in joy and he quietly narrowed his eyes. Ehito who didn't even pay any attention to such Hajime then licked his lips smoothly.



"By using that, it's possible to separate the soul of me and the vampire princess, and kill only me, that's what you are thinking correct?"



"…So you find out. Well, I also don't have any mood to lie. My trump card is powerful you know? That calm expression of yours is going to warp into terror and regret soon."



"Fuhah, so you still believe that the soul of this woman is safe. That figure of yours howling while clinging to a nonexistent illusion, is truly, comical to the extreme."



Saying that, Ehito snapped his fingers once more.



Right after that, Hajime's movement came to a sudden stop with his body pitched forward.



"――"



The cause was obvious. The Metsurai Disaster that Hajime held was caught in a distorted space. That space distortion was in a square block shape that tightly pressed together. Metsurai was fixed at the center of that.



Almost at the same time, a spear of thunder came flying once more from an empty space without any advance sign.



"Shit-"



While swearing abuse reflexively, Hajime tried to release Metsurai Disaster by storing it into 'Treasure Warehouse II'. However, as though that action had been foreseen, Ehitorujue whispered "――'Manifestation of Perceived Nightmare'."



Hajime's neck flew off. His four limbs were plucked off, and his heart was gouged.



"KAAAH!!"



A loud yell of fighting spirit surged.



The source of the yell was from Hajime who was thought to be dead. The scene just now was the illusion that was prepared by Ehitorujue. The illusion was so real that if the victim wasn't careful they might die for real just from that. Hajime exploded the magic power in his body and used the momentum to invigorate himself and blew away the illusion.



But, it didn't change that his consciousness was stolen for an instant. The compensation for that opening was his Metsurai Disaster.



The divine lightning spear stabbed. Metsurai Disaster met the same end like Agni-Orkan.



――Strong



Hajime honestly appraised his enemy.



Deployment of technique, the scale of invocation, power, every single aspect was easily surpassing Yue of before. There was also no sign of his magic power running out. The great number of meteor shower fired from his halos might be moving almost automatically, there was no sign at all that Ehito was having trouble in controlling them, the light apostles were also created without end, and even with all that he was still rapidly invoking age of god class magic that was extremely powerful.



If it was anyone else than Hajime fighting here then they would instantly be killed inevitably.



As though to further cornering Hajime who had completely lost two of his prided artifacts, Ehitorujue opened his mouth exultantly.



"It echoed quiet lusciously."



"Aa?"



"The vampire princess――Yue is it? The scream of your woman, it was really meltingly sweet."



"…"



Hajime's expression fell out.



"With the ownership of her body stolen, she who had become only a soul resisted admirably. But, the more she resisted the more intense the pain running through her. …Ku-ku-ku-, it was visible for me, the figure of the vampire princess enduring desperately with clenched teeth inside this body. But even that didn't continue forever, she couldn't endure and screamed. And then, she felt terror feeling her soul vanishing from the edge, while trembling…her last words were, […Hajime, I'm sorry]. Fufufu."



"…"



"After that she disappeared. Everything happened while she was tasting terror and despair. Do you understand, irregular? The hope that you came chasing doesn't exist right from the beginning-! Fuhah, fuhahahahaha-"



Ehitorujue raised a loud laughter. Indeed, Hajime's magic eye couldn't see Yue's soul, he could only perceive a silver soul taking root inside melding everywhere. It was as though that view was displaying the truth of Ehitorujue's words…



Hajime wordlessly threw several hand grenades to the air. He shot them all using Donner. At that moment, the light stars around the hand grenades dropped on the ground altogether.



What Hajime used was gravity grenade――it had a special effect that created super gravitational area when it was activated. With that effect, the surrounding light bullets were felled.



Hajime's hand was holding Schlagen AA. It completed its charging in a moment and the eighty-eight millimeter sniping cannon(Acht Acht) specialized in penetration roared.



The fired crimson flash charged straight through the barrage zone that was thinned by the gravity grenades just like going through a no man's land.



Ehitorujue lifted his hand. Barriers were visibly layered by two, three layers before him.



The fang of Schlagen AA blasted the first layer of barrier, bit a hole in the second barrier after a moment of opposition, and smashed even the third layer of the barrier and assaulted Ehitorujue. But, the three layers divine barrier had obviously decreased the strength of the shot, in that state naturally it was unable to ignore the effect of the two white vortexes staying at both sides of Ehito. The eighty-eight millimeter shell had its trajectory vainly twisted and got swallowed into the vortex of compression.



"I am a god. As long as I have automatic regeneration than you attack won't even make me feel itchy but…know that even touching me is an insolence."



And then, even while saying such thing Ehito waved his hand in a complicated gesture with a wide grin as though saying that this was payback.



"――"



Right after that, the space all around Hajime including above and below burst open. What was produced from that was a tremendous impact. It was a space rupture that was even more detailed and powerful than the 'Quaking Sky of Four Directions' casted in the devil king castle. Furthermore, from behind Hajime, perhaps even using teleportation, a lot of light stars were already there unnoticed moving toward Hajime.



This too was also an overwhelming attack where there was no time to react and no place to escape. Hajime took out his variable great shield 'Aidion' to face this. The spherical shield instantly operated its gimmick and deployed to cover Hajime.



Thunderous roar.



The impact of space rupture from all directions blown away the first layer of 'Aidion' into pieces with one attack. The fierce impact was transmitted through 'Aidion' that caused Hajime's left hand which was supporting it below to scream.



Storm of pursuing attack came right there. Light stars in immense number attacked one after another, not giving any time for the shield to restore itself. 'Aidion' which was swallowed by the storm of light looked shining just like a star.



Even so, its hardness that didn't allow penetration should be called as an impregnable fortress.



But, even that defensive power was nothing more than an interesting side show for Ehitorujue, he suddenly lifted his hand and created a bluish white flame on his palm. And then, he blew it off gently to fly toward the shield.



The blue flame soared softly without any sound, it then impacted 'Aidion' that was still receiving concentrated fire――like that the protective wall was easily penetrated.



Right after that,



"GAAAAAAAAAA-!?"



A scream resounded.



The gimmick of 'Aidion' was released and from inside Hajime who was wrapped in flame leaped out.



Teleported meteor shower approached him in no time at all, the Grim Reapers defended Hajime as the substitute of their master which resulted in a rain of scrapped steel raining down. At the same time, Cross Velts were also called closer from the surrounding to lay out barrier, but they too were pierced by lightning divine spears by the dozens and exploded to all direction. While clenching his teeth to the sacrifices around him, Hajime broke through the encirclement and compressed his crimson magic power with an expression that warped in pain. At the next moment, he converted the compressed magic power into impact and just barely blew away the blue flame and the rushing light stars.



At the same time, 'Aidion that was left behind' had its iron wall broken and light stars rushed inside from the opening, it then received attacks from inside and outside and got pulverized into pieces.



"Haahahahahah, what happened with your big talk from before? You have turned into a really shabby appearance right now."



Ehitorujue laughed in amusement.



Ahead of his gaze, there was the figure of Hajime breathing roughly with burn injuries here and there every single part of his clothing damaged by fire. It also appeared that he had converted a considerable amount of his magic power into impact to blow away the blue flame and light stars, so his magic power had decreased considerably. 'All Element Resistance' and 'Vajra' were reduced to mere consolation as protection in front of the attacks' might, Hajime couldn't help but shudder from that.



"Haa haa, just now was…Yue's…"



"No, it was mine. It seemed the vampire princess could use it, but from the beginning this magic was something that I used. It penetrates every obstacle and destroys only its target. It's called 'Divine Flame'. How is it? It has quite a good flavor isn't it?"



"…"



Hajime didn't reply. Rather than that he was pouring his mind to convert his magic power into healing power to heal his damage even just for a little. If possible he wanted to drink healing medicine but, whether Ehitorujue would allow that or not, was unclear in the end…he couldn't show an opening after receiving a fierce attack.



If Shia and others were here, they would undoubtedly stiffen from shock seeing Hajime being cornered this overwhelmingly. In actuality, even Hajime himself couldn't help but smile bitterly inside from witnessing the true power of Ehitorujue who had completely seized Yue's body.



But, naturally Hajime didn't let that show in his expression, in exchange he struck Ehitorujue with a gaze of defiance and persistence.



"Hmm, even when I told you that your beloved woman was already gone, you still don't show any sign of breaking…"



"Obviously. Just why do I have to believe your words? If you like bullshit then just talk to yourself until you are satisfied."



Ehitorujue smiled wryly from the way Hajime talked. It was as though he was waiting for Hajime's recovery, he relaxed his attack and talked.



"Your existence is truly irregular. Because of Freed's appearance, the balance of the game was almost broken, so in order to make it more enjoyable I brought in people with power from another world yet…you become a strong person that not even my favorite could bare his fang to."



"…Why, did you do something like summoning limited at just this time?"



A war game of human versus devil. The nasty game that Ehitorujue held. His words about Freed breaking the balance made Hajime slightly scowled. It was slightly surprising that Freed's labyrinth conquering was something irregular outside of god's will.



And then, about great labyrinth's conquering, Yue's uncle Denreed also did the same thing three hundred years ago. However, from what Hajime learned from historical fact, at that time there was no record of hero summoning being performed and he also didn't hear any story about anything like that.



Why it was only at this time, such question was only something natural to be thought of by a person who got dragged into it. Though Hajime going along with Ehitorujue's story also had the purpose of merely buying time to recover.



"Different from in the past, there was no capable person in this present era that was capable of opposing Freed you see. Never I imagined that other than the vampire princess, even the dragon race is also still surviving. Both of them were hidden skillfully. …If there is no good pawn in this world then nothing could be done except by providing it from another world."



"…Another world, huh."



"Correct. Although the connection to your world is completely a coincidence. It was a result that coincides with me searching for a person with high affinity that could possibly become my vessel. Even for a god body, crossing the boundary of the world is not something easy. To say nothing of a soul without a vessel, even directly interfering with outside Holy Precincts is difficult. As the result, I somehow succeeded dragging down someone from above world but…including an irregular like you, there were also a lot of extras coming along here."



According to Ehitorujue's story, Kouki was similar with Yue, he was chosen based on his possibility to become a vessel. Most likely Ehitorujue was using a magic like the compass of guidance to search. But, Ehitorujue who had no vessel that was a flesh body could only wield his power completely within Holy Precincts, furthermore it seemed that his power was repressed in the earth because that world had superior rank so his effort didn't go well.



The result of that was the summoning of all the classmates. In other words, everyone else other than Kouki only seemed to get 'dragged in' unintentionally by god. There was no story more annoying than this.



"Although, thanks to that the best vessel that I thought had been lost three hundred years ago was discovered, that's why this could be said as a windfall. Fufu, with this I can exhibit my power in full even outside the Holy Precincts. Crossing over to another world is also easy."



Most likely even the body of an apostle was insufficient as god's body because it would lower his divinity. If that wasn't the case then he would not be this delighted from managing to obtain a vessel.



Ehitorujue opened and closed his hand basking in joy. Hajime then asked something that he had actually wondered about all this time.



"Ehitorujue…what are you?"



"What a really abstract question that is, irregular. But, no matter what is said, naturally the answer has been decided. I am the god that created and ruled over everything."



Ehitorujue introduced himself as the transcendental creator god and also the ruling god.



But, Hajime snorted to that.



"No, you or no god or anything. You didn't create this world, you are also not ruling over everything. You are not a supernatural existence that mankind imagined You are merely an existence that is possessing power mightier than mankind."



"…Hou. With what kind of basis you are saying such thing?"



Perhaps he got his interest attracted from that, Ehitorujue then asked Hajime back.



"Isn't that simple? Your perception cannot detect Yue who was at the bottom of the abyss, and also the dragon race who hid outside this continent. Your strength only reaches this continent, even then it's only at the scale that doesn't reach the abyss. Power at that level is just too tiny for the creator right?"



"Ku-ku-ku-, to call someone like me as tiny. And? If I am not a god then what am I?"



Hajime thrust his answer with an expression that vaguely looked like he was chewing a bitter bug.



"…You are a 'human of another world' the same like us."



"Hmm. Because I am not a god but I possess a mighty power, then I must be a human from outside world the same like you all…that's your reasoning."



"Not only that. In the first place it was already strange by the point of time that you know about the concept of 'outside world'. 'Because there is none in this world then search for a capable person from other world'…such idea won't come out unless you know about the existence of another world right from the start. Even in our world that is overflowing with fantasy entertainment that concept is only a wild idea. If you are an existence in the level that is able to create the world then I can accept that, but just like I said just now, you are not an all-knowing and almighty supernatural existence, based on that it's only natural to think that you know about the existence of another world by the same reason like us."



Hearing those words, Ehitorujue went "hmm" and nodded once, then he began to clap dramatically.



"Splendid, perhaps that's what I should say. Indeed I am a human from another world. Originally, I only reached the height of magic. Although, through the passing many months and years the gathered faith granted my divinity that sublimated my soul, through that there is no doubt that I am a god."



And then, he suddenly lifted his hand. Right after that, thunder boomed in empty air, blue flame exploded, strong wind stormed, the air froze, white smoke whirled.



For Hajime, those were a sight he was used to. However, the dimension of the power focused there far surpassed what he had seen in the past.



Five heavenly dragons were created. They were the magnificent incarnations of atrocious tyranny that Yue created from the fusion of gravity magic and the highest class elemental magic. Those heavenly dragons were fiercely glaring at Hajime with dark red eyeballs.



The presence of these heavenly dragons was clearly different with Yue's heavenly dragons. Hajime's magic eye detected materials other than the core of the heavenly dragon that was formed from magic. That pulsing dark red ore was clearly magic stone.



It appeared metamorphosis magic was used on the heavenly dragons which transformed them into a monster. Perhaps the material to form them was gathered by using space magic. Not only monster, there was also the presence of apostle from the dragons. Hajime was thoroughly knowledgeable of how troublesome these heavenly dragons were, now these dragons were added with the function where they could move independently separated from the caster's control to attack the prey, these caused Hajime to sweat coldly in his heart.



(I cannot overwhelm him in resource battle, now on top of that, there is also these troublesome newcomers in addition…well, I already imagined that this won't be easy. If I resolved myself, I can do this.)



Ahead of the gaze of Hajime who was talking to himself in his heart, the five heavenly dragons were coiling in the air with Ehitorujue at the center.



That figure of the adult Yue obeyed by the magnificent dragons was exactly like a goddess in a legend. No, any goddess from any mythology would surely be overshadowed in front of the current Yue who was obeyed by the heavenly dragons with halos behind her. There was no doubt that even the goddess of beauty Aphrodite would flee barefooted in front of her.



The person inside that body which made that divine beauty to be spoiled opened his mouth with a repulsive grin.



"Now then, irregular. You have recovered a little haven't you? We have to begin the game once more any time now. During that time, let's reminisce a bit about the past. You are going to struggle as long as you can right? It has been really a long time since I talk about myself. Entertain me-"



At the next moment, the five heavenly dragons simultaneously roared, violent killing intent and pressured weighed down on Hajime. At the same time, the meteor shower from the halos also resumed coming. The white space was filled to the brim with the heavenly dragons turned monster and the torrent of lights.





Chapter 175




The Specialty of Common Job



The roars of the five heavenly dragons shook the air.



The heavenly dragons that were turned into a monster while being half magic body left the control of the caster and aimed at the prey independently. The emitted pressure far surpassed the heavenly dragon that Yue often used before. The five elements magic that formed those bodies were also evolved where now they possessed a worthy wickedness that was clear to see.



“My former world was a world where magic was the foundation. I’m not boasting, but I remember that the development there was remarkable. There was abundant variety of artifact, people flew freely in the sky, they could get in touch with a far away place, they moved using teleportation, even their lifespan could be prolonged by a few hundred years more using magical treatment. Magic and technology that were based from that made that world abundant.”



*pashii!* That light sound resounded and the figure of the lightning dragon vanished. No, that large body changed into a streak of lightning and it moved with lightning speed. At the next moment, it appeared beside Hajime.



(Fast…but, if it’s only as fast as lightning then-)



The dragon raised a roar of thunder while its opened jaw rapidly pulled everything in the surrounding. Even the light stars were swallowed and extinguished inside there, Hajime who was almost got pulled in similarly like the light stars immediately took out several gravity hand grenades to empty air.



The gravity hand grenades that were easily pulled in exploded with a good timing just when they entered inside the mouth of the lightning dragon and generated super gravitational area.



The lightning dragon that swallowed everything while approaching was flattened by the downward pressure that was suddenly generated and passed through below Hajime who was hovering in midair using ‘Air Force’.



“But, what is waiting for the world that is over developed is only their end. Our world too wasn’t an exception to that. Something like a war of the end that happened because of exhausted resources, or sense of values, or possibly because of economical problems or different political idea, those weren’t the cause. The reason was something more, something that couldn’t be helped. Do you know what it was, irregular?”



“ts”



Ehitorujue’s questioned, however Hajime couldn’t answer. He had no composure to answer.



Because after he staved off the lightning dragon, the azure dragon circled right behind him and pressed hard on him along with an immense amount of heat.



In front of him was the meteor shower. Below was a lightning dragon, at left and right were the storm dragon and ice dragon. If he evaded then he would undoubtedly aim from right behind and forced to bear damage that would be hard to disregard.



Therefore, Hajime took out the variable chakram ‘Orestes’ to empty air.



A *kashun* sound came out immediately and wire that was divided into three part formed a round shaped gate. The azure dragon charged straight into the gate, right after that the azure dragon flew out from above the ice dragon that approached from the right side. Hajime had applied ‘Presence Isolation’ to one more variable chakram and made it flew there.



The suddenly appearing azure dragon collided with its natural enemy the ice dragon which caused the ice dragon to roar in agony. And then, the ice dragon glared at Orestes which teleported the azure dragon and breathed out ice and snow. With that the Orestes froze instantly as though it was bathed with liquid nitrogen, right after that it was impacted by a light star and was easily smashed.



Regardless of the roar of the ice dragon and the sound of Orestes getting pulverized, Ehitorujue’s voice still reached Hajime’s ear smoothly.



“They arrived at the truth. The magic technology was developed thoroughly until they could interfere with the information of the world itself, to the material, to life, to the star, to time, to the environment. And then, no matter the era researcher is always unable to restrain their curiosity. They fumbled with the technology that interferes with the truth spreading in the world like playing with a toy…and that became the cause that destroyed the world. Our world was killed by the curiosity of the people who handled magic.”



Hajime neutralized the light stars using Cross Velt. Furthermore, he commanded the Grim Reapers to aim at Ehitorujue. Eagle type Grim Reaper scattered cluster bombs above Ehitorujue. However, the squall of explosive was easily pulverized by the meteor shower fired from the halos, resulting in only sparkling particles scattering around. Hajime’s attacks didn’t reach Ehitorujue at all.



Ehitorujue’s expression didn’t even show any annoyance.



“The truth crumbled and the world was rapidly crumbling…the situation at that time was exactly like a picture of pandemonium in hell. There was nothing that could be done at all. Mankind had no other path other than destruction along with the planet. With the exception of a part of ‘the arrived’.”



Hajime took out all the Orestes that he could control in his attempt to deal with the five heavenly dragons, but Ehitorujue snapped his fingers while talking.



Right after that, several hundred lightning divine spear rained down from the empty air and fried all the Orestes without leaving even dust behind. Furthermore, the lightning that was thoroughly packed inside the spears was released and attacked Hajime from all direction like a spider web. While reinforcing his body with ‘Vajra’, Hajime evacuated hurriedly but he was unable to leave with no damage. His flesh was roasted which harmed his nerve slightly.



There the earth dragon attacked him.



“’The arrived’――these were the people who were able to individually operate the essence of what all of you called as the age of god magic. They, only they were able to discover the method to be saved. That method was the teleportation to another world. Fufu-, isn’t that laughable? After all only the ringleaders who destroyed the world were able to escape from ruin.”



Amidst the reverberation of Ehitorujue’s laugh that was filled with irony, a wire with ores attached at both its ends soared through empty air.



The wire entangled around the approaching stone dragon and lightning dragon midair in many layers. Right after that, a fierce ripple spread from the ores. It was the binding artifact ‘Bola’ that had been strengthened by really far.



Operating together with the ores, the wire part that was also a developed model was fixed directly to the space, so the half magic half physical heavenly dragons were also firmly bounded in place.



The two heavenly dragons roared and rampaged violently to escape from the binding.



Hajime took out Schlagen AA once more and fixed his aim using his magic eye stone and pulled the trigger.



Spark traveled the barrel and Schlagen AA roared, the bullet then flew into the mouth of the lightning dragon and advanced forward without paying any heed to the lightning and destroyed the magic stone of the dragon.



At the same time, six bullets that were shot from Donner along the same trajectory gouged further the hole inside the stone dragon’s mouth that was hollowed by the concentrated fire of the Cross Velts. The bullets were instantly petrified and became brittle stone, but even so, the bullets advanced inside the stone dragon and the last bullet shot through the magic stone without getting petrified.



The last bullet was a bullet coated with sealing stone. Hajime only had a bit of it remained because he wasn’t frugal in using them for the weapons of Shia and others or his large shield, this bullet coated with sealing stone was something that he needed to think carefully before using.



Hajime splendidly defeated two heavenly dragons, but because of that his feet stopped moving. The compensation for that was large.



“Like that ‘the arrived’ including me arrived in this world. At that time we were surprised. After all, this world was so primitive that it shouldn’t even be compared with our world. Mighty creatures with special power were running rampant, while mankind was hiding in shadow like cave or hole in the ground while living barely scraping by.”



Ehitorujue had a distant look in reminiscence while waving his hand.



Immediately Hajime’s legs were fixed in a place altogether with the space. Even though he was concentrating on his story but he perfectly grasped the instant Hajime’s feet stopped, a compressed space in block shape that was the same like the fixed space which captured Metsurai Disaster completely seized Hajime.



(No good-)



Unease showed in Hajime’s expression. He immediately converted his magic power into impact to attempt to break the fixed space.



But, the opponent wasn’t that sweet to let such opening escaped.



Storm dragon roared while attacking the unmoving Hajime. Its jaw swallowed Hajime before closing with a snap. The wind blades and pebbles contained inside its body mercilessly assaulted Hajime. The damage went through to Hajime who persisted using ‘Vajra’. Blood sprayed everywhere and graphic unpleasant sound *gokibeki-* resounded.



Inside the storm of violence that was equivalent to a torture, Hajime fixed the aim of Schlagen AA along with a yell of fighting spirit and tore the storm dragon from inside its body.



Ehitorujue continued his talk without showing any care that the monster he created was killed.



“In that kind of world, we ‘the arrived’ decided to cultivate it. We exterminated the monsters that had lived since the ancient times, and granted wisdom to the native people. The small village turned into town before long and then became a city, and then before we realized it had become a country. At that period we had already been revered as gods. We used the secret technique of the truth and converted the religious faith into power, we attempted to reinforce and sublimate our soul was also around that period.”



Hajime smashed the storm dragon and blasted out from inside it, his body became soaked in blood which made his appearance looked wretched.



But, the ice dragon roared without even any time to breathe.



Hajime threw all the ‘Bola’ that he had toward the azure dragon that was approaching from the opposite direction, he also held the dragon back further using Cross Velts, ordered the Grim Reapers for concentrated fire, then he turned toward the ice dragon’s opened jaw and aimed Schlagen AA. Instantly Schlagen AA was freezing with dreadful momentum from its tip.



“Coordinate attack huh-“



It appeared the ice dragon was able to directly lower the temperature at the coordinate it targeted. It was an ability that the ice dragon Yue handled didn’t have.



Hajime was already unable to pull the trigger, the freezing kept moving with the momentum that almost froze even his artificial arm. Furthermore, with Ehitorujue’s instruction, a meteor shower and light apostles rushed Hajime’s left side with good timing.



Although he was able to somehow repel back only the light apostles using the suicide bombing Grim Reapers and Cross Velts, but he was unable to neutralize the whole meteor shower, Hajime received a direct hit on his left arm.



Although the armor of the artificial arm slightly decreased the damage he received, the Schlagen AA that he unintentionally let go because of the impact was sucked into the jaw of the ice dragon. Like that it was obvious how the artifact would end up. The Schlagen AA turn into little pieces at the same time when the pure white freezing ice dragon closed its jaw.



“A few thousand years later after that, this world became greatly developed. But, as though in inverse proportion, one of ‘the arrived’, and the one more person lost their will to live, regardless of how they had transcended the truth of death they ended their own life. I was unable to understand that but…the last person who stopped prolonging his life said this, ‘It’s already enough’. In the end, the remaining ‘arrived’ became only me.”



Hajime threw countless grenades at the surrounding and immediately shot them.



Right after that, a flame blast was generated in the air which created a crimson flame wall between Hajime and the ice dragon. For an instant, the sight of the ice dragon was obstructed, but something like that was completely swallowed into its jaw instantly like nothing.



But, after that flame blast cleared up, at the other side was a gigantic weapon――a gatling pile bunker held by Hajime was there.



At the next moment, a crimson spark crackled and two-ton giant stakes fired with a rate of twenty shot per second were fired and turned into flashes. The barrage of giant stakes that should be called as a crimson wall rushed the ice dragon from the front, coupled with the gravitational pull by the gravity spot in its mouth, the giant stakes stabbed into the dragon’s large mouth without any deviation.



The freezing ability of the ice dragon was instantly freezing the giant stakes, but because of their force the giant stakes couldn’t be resisted, they advanced unstoppable and gouged in. And then, one of the giant stakes hit the magic stone inside and splendidly succeeding in destroying the dragon. While raising scream of death agony, the ice dragon changed into mere mist and dispersed.



“I became the last one, since then how many months and years had lapsed then…was it a thousand or five thousand years…I don’t remember anymore but, day by day I watched the humans came to me lifting up prayer and offering, and then one day, suddenly I thought. ――Let’s destroy them.”



Hajime directed the cannon turret of the gatling pile bunker toward the azure dragon. The rushing meteor shower and light apostles were all blown away by the Cross Velts and Grim Reapers.



Like that, he turned toward the azure dragon who even now was almost finished burning the many Bolas binding itself and he pulled the trigger――just before he could do that, Hajime suddenly felt a chill and leaped away from that spot.



It appeared that his choice was correct. The place where Hajime was at a moment before was pierced by several dozen lightning divine spears, they spread immense thunders everywhere.



It was just a hair’s breadth. While trickling out cold sweat and blood, Hajime sent a sidelong glance at Ehitorujue. Ehitorujue was still looking at empty space with faraway look while talking about his path in the past. And yet, his attacks were still tormenting Hajime accurately with superb timing so there was nothing more irritating than this.



After being toyed around until this far, Hajime confirmed that Ehitorujue was sensing him accurately and he made a frustrated expression. At the same time, he decided that first, he should slaughter the last remaining azure dragon and so he was moving the gatling pile bunker toward it.



But, as expected it seemed he had let escape the timing for a sure kill.



The azure dragon that was restrained using all of Hajime’s bola roared fiercely. At that moment, the crimson ripple was enveloped by blue flame. The lit blue flame traveled along the bola’s wire before rushing all over everywhere and the blue flame swallowed everything.



Explosive sound resounded and blue beams of light illuminated the space, amidst that Ehitorujue showed an ecstatic expression. With Yue’s beautiful face, that smile emitted an amazing sex appeal,, but for Hajime it only made his blood boiled without end.



“You understand right? Just like how a man wants to defile woman, just like how someone wants to step on fresh snow, beautiful things, those precious things that you desperately piled up, they give off their true beauty when they are broken. The pleasure you obtained from that is something that is really difficult to be substituted by anything. That time when I trampled everything that I had protected the whole time for several thousand years let me tasted unimaginable sweetness. The people screaming, the shriek that asked for help from me…even now, that’s the only thing that I remember clearly.”



All the bolas were burned to nothing. The azure dragon resumed its advance with blazing rage.



Hajime was going to make the dragon into the prey of the gatling pile bunker right from the front, but then the space all around Hajime shook.



“――”



Omni-directional space blasting.



While holding his breath, Hajime leaped out from the encirclement before the space could generate shockwave.



A severe earthquake.



Although Hajime at least avoided a direct hit, he got hit by the after wave and blood sprayed everywhere grandly from Hajime’s wounds.



“Guu”



Hajime unintentionally groaned and his expression warped, there was a flickering azure flame at the corner of his sight. Contrary to the approaching heat, an ice lump was sliding down his spine.



He tried to use ‘Air Force’ to escape while reinforcing his body with ‘Vajra’, but the meteor swarm whirled and danced boisterously in anticipation of that and blocked Hajime’s path of escape.



“Even though I have forgotten completely how long I have lived, only the pleasure I felt at that time when everything crumbled is unforgettable. Therefore, I decided. That this world is my toy.”



Ehitorujue’s gaze finally returned back from the past.



He faced Hajime who was trying to break through the dance of the meteor shower using Donner and Cross Velts, and then he snapped his fingers.



That was the signal for the explosion.



All the meteors following Hajime like a whirlwind exploded simultaneously. The generated shockwave was equal with the hand grenade that Hajime used. Hajime immediately used Cross Velts to lay out barrier and furthermore the Grim Reapers used their body as a shield in their master’s danger to soften the impact even if just for a bit.



Hajime who was swallowed by flame blasts and the light was swallowed by the fully opened mouth of the azure dragon. The jaw of azure flame closed with a snap. Everything that was touched would be mercilessly returned to ash by the hell fire of the highest class of magic. Thinking normally, it was impossible to survive after getting eaten by that flame.



However, the torso of the flaming azure dragon――inside the azure flame there was a shining crimson that showed Hajime’s survival. There were four Cross Velts around Hajime. They connected to each other using string of magic power and laid out a barrier of space isolation, ‘Four Point Barrier’.



But, in compensation for that, the surface of the Cross Velts was melting down second by second. The seven Cross Velts that Hajime directly controlled were naturally enchanted with ‘Vajra’ and also coated with sealing stone, yet even so these Cross Velts couldn’t endure. It was something that he understood, but as expected the heat of this dragon far surpassed the dragon that Yue used.



“Guh, don’t, underestimate mee-!!”



Inside the stomach of the blue heavenly dragon, a voice that paused intermittently yet filled with tenacious will resounded. The astonishing thing was that even with the laid out space isolation barrier Hajime was still enveloped in a lot of flame.



It seemed that this azure dragon had penetrating flame the same like the Divine Flame slipped into it. Scorched by that flame, Hajime was stepping forward while trickling greasy sweats, he took out Orestes which made a gate that connected the inside and outside the barrier. Ahead of the gate was the azure dragon’s magic stone.



Donner fired crimson flash along with bursting sound, the bullet passed through the gate and pierced through the sea of azure flame. The magic bullet coated with sealing stone accurately shot the magic stone of the azure dragon. The magic stone became little pieces with an explosive sound, at the same time the blue flame was dispersing.



“Yes, everything is my toy, irregular.”



A sinister sound that he had already heard many times from Ehitorujue echoed. The sound of a finger snap.



As expected, the dispersing azure flame wriggled like living thing, it intruded smoothly into the four Cross Velts surrounding Hajime.



Right after that,



“Gaah”



Hajime’s short scream accompanied a grand flame blast rising up. The four Cross Velts ruptured from their inside. The penetrating Divine Flame caused chain explosions from the bursting bullet loaded inside. Followed by crimson ripples, grand and countless shockwaves and scattering Divine Flame tormented Hajime thoroughly from four directions.



Hajime immediately scattered hand grenades. It was for the sake of drinking god water and forcefully making an opening. As expected, his damage had reached a level that he couldn’t ignore.



But, the wind of death caressed his skin chillingly at that time. Hajime’s instinct was ringing the alarm bell in full.



Right after that, the crimson wall that bloomed fully at the surrounding from Hajime’s hand grenades was pierced by a blowing down wind.



Hajime obeyed his instinct’s command and twisted his body, and right beside him a dislocated space passed through.



At the same time, his left hand that took out god water was fixed in space. It was a perfect timing that took advantage of the opening when Hajime took evasive action. The next move was also the same. The Lightning divine spear flew out from empty air and shot down the god water.



“Damn-――”



Hajime raised his voice unintentionally, but it was already too late. The god water had been lost from Hajime’s hand. On the same occasion, his artificial hand was also pierced and his palm dissolved.



Hajime immediately repaired his artificial hand using transmutation while leaping away in order to avoid the rushing meteor shower.



“Shit-, even though that’s the last god water-“



A swearing leaked out. Ehitorujue who heard that lifted the corner of his lips.



And then, he lifted his hand before dropping that hand quietly pointing at Hajime. Immediately, light swelled up explosively and light star shot out from the halos like missile moving in an arch with light trailing behind.



Hajime took out his gatling pile bunker, aimed it at Ehitorujue and then he charged forward while firing.



From above, like stars falling from the night sky, radiant stars were raining down, the Grim Reapers whose number had decreased considerably before one knows used their body as a shield, several Cross Velts laid out barrier above Hajime’s route, with those the momentum of Hajime’s charge didn’t stop. Even while that was happening, like a countdown going down, the autonomic weapons of Hajime’s quality products were bursting, their fragments scattered everywhere.



But, as though mocking that determination of Hajime who was forced to make those sacrifices…



“What do you think the devil and demi-human are?”



Such question resounded from right behind Hajime.



Hajime felt a shudder running through his spine. He used the intense recoil of his artificial hand to rotate at high speed and fired Donner behind him without even confirming anything.



But, there was no one there, in exchange a presence appeared at Hajime’s left-hand side where he was holding the gatling pile bunker. Hajime opened his eyes wide while sending his gaze there, at the same time a hand gently caressed the artifact.



And then, just like what happened at the devil king castle, the gatling pile bunker was easily returned to dust.



The one who was there was Ehitorujue. From his three layers of halos, in his back now there was only the first layer of halo, he skipped over even Hajime’s perception and his figure appeared in very close range.



(Teleport without using gate…as expected, he can actually do something like that.)



Hajime’s eyes narrowed from how one of the concerns that he harbored came true. It appeared that the magic which allowed the lightning divine spear to appeared suddenly from the empty air and teleported the artifact he possessed――’Heaven Existence’ could also be used for teleporting the caster themselves. And then, Ehito could also turn artifact into dust just by touching them.



The figure of Ehitorujue vanished quietly once more.



At the same time, a chill ran on his back.



Hajime fired bursting bullet behind from the elbow of his artificial arm, but the light emitted from the halo blocked it. Ehitorujue’s arm was swung down without even paying any attention to Hajime’s counterattack.



Sword of light attacked Hajime following the trajectory of that arm. Hajime rotated using the impact from firing bursting bullet and back-stepped to evade. He took a distance of more than ten meters within an instant using his super speed but…



“–!?”



A diagonal laceration was carved from Hajime’s shoulder until his flank. Even though he should have gotten out already from the range of the sword yet he was still hit. Hajime’s face warped in pain while his severe gaze stabbed Ehitorujue.



“No need to be shocked. This is called as ‘Divine Sword’, a magic sword that can freely contract and expand, it also can jump through space to attack. It can penetrate your defense is because it also has the penetrating ability like ‘Divine Flame’.”



Hajime had been reduced to a tragic appearance that was obvious at a glance. Ehitorujue was explaining to such Hajime who was breathing roughly while his hand was caressing along the divine sword.



That composed expression expressed how Hajime’s fang couldn’t reach him at all.



In contrast Hajime was all tattered. His black coat that was weaved with metal fiber which was stronger than even armor had become just like scrapped rag, the clothes under it was heavily soaked from absorbing blood. His skin that was visible from the gaps of the torn clothes was dyed bright red, his white hair was especially soaked with blood color from the fresh blood pouring out from his head, just looking at Hajime right now felt painful. The blood trickling down his head was like tears of blood.



Even the equal fight when the two fought a battle of resource was easily tilted completely into Ehito’s favor when he used age of god magic consecutively. The many artifacts that were the greatest trait of Hajime’s specialty were also being mostly destroyed.



What were left with Hajime was Donner & Schlag, Cross Velts, and then Grim Reapers…



“Hmm, it has become a little bit bothersome now.”



Ehito swung his divine sword. Not even afterimage could be seen from his hand motion. It wasn’t even clear whether he had swung the magic sword or not. But, the result was obvious. The Cross Velts and Grim Reapers that had been decreased until nearly fifty machines were cruelly turned into small pieces before they exploded everywhere they were.



“…”



What remained was only three Cross Velts that Hajime directly controlled. The army of demon king had been completely annihilated, even the crosses that symbolized death fell on the ground. Now Hajime only possessed mainly grenades of various kinds. Most likely Ehitorujue was intentionally aiming to destroy the artifacts in order to grant Hajime despair.



“Well, such thing doesn’t matter. Rather than that, I talked about devil and demi-human. What do you think they are?”



Without even showing particular care about the several hundred artifacts that he had cut apart instantly, Ehitorujue repeated his previous question. It appeared the talk of Ehitorujue still wasn’t over. He toyed around with his divine sword while staring at Hajime who looked like he could fall anytime with a wide repulsive grin.



“…Aren’t they…haa haa…the native here.”



Hajime answered the question in order to recover even for a little in this second opening he was given.



“No, you are wrong. The native people of this world are only the ‘human’. Whether the devil or the demi-human, they are the illegitimate children created by my magic technology.”



“…So you even, guh, synthesizing?”



“Fufu-, you have fast understanding. The devil and demi-human are synthetic organisms created by the combination of my monster and human. They are my genuine creation.”



‘Why did you do such thing?’ Perhaps Ehitorujue surmised that unasked question of Hajime, his tongue was moving smoothly to answer.



“No matter how much I was trying to sublimate my soul using faith and secret technique, no matter how much restoration and improvement I attempted on the body, the long several millenniums brought my body to its limit. Naturally, I searched for new body but…there was no flesh that could accept the soul of god.”



“If there is none, then just make one…huh?”



“It really helps that you have a quick understanding. Devil has high aptitude with magic factor, and the demi-human has powerful physic, they each came from me combining human with primitive organisms that possessed those essential aspects. I also tried creating the likes of dragon people by combining those two aspects but….they were a failure. They could only be used for side entertainment, like how the strongest race became persecuted.”



Just how many sacrifices came out along the course of those experiments? Even Hajime couldn’t help but sympathize with the people in the past. To say nothing of the fact that the reason of the persecution toward Tio and others was merely this guy venting his anger, knowing that caused Hajime’s killing intent to intensify further.



“In that process, I also created the currently existing monsters and apostles, but because of some unknown factor, in the end I was unable to obtain a body that could possibly become my vessel. Although some could endure to a certain degree, they would soon self-destruct.”



“…So the Holy Precincts…was because you had no vessel”



“Fufu. Correct. This place is so I can continue to exist only as soul and also a place where I can use my strength. Here I was enjoying the game while waiting. Extremely rarely there would be people with aptitude like Aruvheit or the ‘liberators’ that were born.”



Based on the truth that Hajime was told, it seemed that the people who were called as ‘true ancestor’ like Yue or Shia were more accurately people with aptitude. Although even the people with aptitude in the past like the liberators were insufficient as Ehitorujue’s vessel.



Hajime’s eyes narrowed quietly.



“Like, that…haa haa, three hundred years ago…you finally, discovered it, huh”



“Yes. At that time my heart danced for the first time after a few hundred years. Although, my vessel was immediately hidden after that…even though at that time I had even personally granted her the title as ‘miko’ specially. You know, at that time I was driven by fury that I even destroyed several countries unintentionally while destroying the vampire country. After that I thought of the possibility of another miko being born once more before I was able to finally calm down.”



Ehitorujue swept his divine sword. The halo on his back and the halos at the distance visible above the throne began to shine brilliantly.



“Let me say my thanks once more, irregular. You discovered my vessel and made me enjoyed myself until this much, you have truly done a great service. As the prize, I’ll consign you to oblivion personally by my hand.”



Platinum magic power painted over everything.



Hajime too also emitted his crimson magic power, he readied Donner-Schlag and lined up the three Cross Velts behind him.



A beat passed.



The figure of Ehitorujue disappeared.



Hajime fired the readied Donner & Schlag as they were. The launched flashes passed through the last Orestes that was placed in front of the gun muzzles and reappeared behind him.



Sure enough, there was Ehitorujue there.



However, without any hurry Ehitorujue surprisingly cut apart the bullets that came flying from Orestes with his divine sword.



Although Yue was a prodigy in magic but her close quarter combat ability was lower than average. Based on Ehitorujue’s feat just now, it seemed that because of the possession the body’s physical ability and battle skill were increased up like a joke.



The penetrating divine sword stretched toward the frowning Hajime. The sword flash that was impossible to defend against was somehow evaded by Hajime bending backward. At the same time the Cross Velts fired burst bullets wildly.



Those bullets were shot down by the light stars fired from the halo. The spreading ripples of impact bloomed everywhere between Hajime and Ehitorujue.



“There is nothing to feel surprised about. This is my original sword art that I learned for killing time. The twin large swords art of the apostle is also based on my swordsmanship. I can do not only magic you know?”



“Chih, so what.”



“Fufu-. At first, I put distance and stole the artifacts of you who were desperately struggling like plucking off your arms and legs. Next is close quarter combat, that’s how it is. There is no hope for you no matter what you try, I’ll teach that to you personally. How are you feeling getting overwhelmed with one hand by someone who was talking leisurely about the past? Hmm?”



Saying that Ehitorujue cut apart the shockwaves themselves and charged forward.



Hajime rapid fired Donner & Schlag. The bullets that he used were Living Bullet. Furthermore they were coated with sealing stone.



But, at the next moment Ehitorujue’s figure vanished as expected. And then, he appeared instantly at Hajime’s side.



Hajime who foreseen that used the recoil of his artificial arm to throw away his body. Immediately following that, the bullets that Hajime fired before this flew out from the space around Ehitorujue. Hajime understood that Ehitorujue would teleport using Heaven Existence so he made use of Orestes to teleport the bullets.



A storm of flashes that aimed at the moment Ehitorujue teleported. No matter even if it was Ehitorujue, it seemed that he would get drilled through by the bullets before he could teleport once more.



However, the moment the bullets impacted, the arm of Ehitorujue that was holding the divine sword vanished. No, that arm was moving so fast that it looked like it vanished. The sword moved flexibly like a whip, and sword lines rushed around Ehitorujue as though a barrier was layered surrounding him.



As the result, the bullets were wrecked into pieces. The sword was swung with a speed that even the Living Bullets’ trajectory correction couldn’t follow. Even the perception skill that Hajime had could only perceive the sword slightly as a streak of light. It was a terrifying speed.



“To be able to read my movement in this short time…that prediction came from experience rather than sense I guess. That’s really something. But, in front of my ‘God Speed’ that is still too slow.”



God Speed――it was the magic that Kaori used limitedly. But Ehitorujue used it with more refinement. It was beyond the pale that he was able to cut apart twenty shots of electromagnetically accelerated bullets that approached from a meter. Before this when he instantly cut apart several hundred Cross Velts and Grim Reapers was surely also because his sword attacks that were done within shortened time.



“Now then, how many artifacts you have left? Or else have you used up all of your plans? If not then you can use them all. I’ll crush everything you have and dye your brave face with despair!”



Ehitorujue used Heaven Existence.



Instantly, he appeared right in front of Hajime’s face.



“Kuh”



The sword flashes that were swung while Hajime groaned were ten times. All of those were evaded by Hajime who mostly relied only on his instinct. But, his dodging couldn’t be called as perfect with how he was unable to defend, he was grazed, or even thinly sliced all over his body.



The recoil of Hajime’s artificial hand forcefully threw away his body to an angle that was normally impossible. Hajime rotated like spinning wheel while desperately taking distance, during that time he randomly scattered a lot of grenades from inside ‘Treasure Warehouse II’.



Many of the grenades were cut apart by the lengthening divine sword, and destroyed by the meteors from the halo. The grenades that weren’t even allowed to explode were scattered as sparkling particles and fell on the ground.



Ehitorujue laughed disgustingly to that useless effort of Hajime who couldn’t even buy time while teleporting consecutively. He appeared and then vanished, appeared and then vanished. Just like an illusion. It was like he was being omnipresence around Hajime.



And then the divine sword that reached regardless of distance carved multiple layers in the air. Although Hajime avoided lethal wound each time that happened, wounds were mass produced with certainty on his body. He also counterattacked with the combination of Donner & Schlag, Orestes, and Cross Velts, but in front of the elusive Heaven Existence and God Speed, Hajime was unable to inflict even one telling blow.



The second and third layer of the halos and the halo behind Ehitorujue were dyeing the white space with platinum light by endlessly firing meteor shower. However naturally those meteors were automatically avoiding Ehitorujue himself and rushed only Hajime.



Hajime was clenching his teeth while shooting back, he was staving off the storm of death sometimes with grenade, sometimes with Cross Velt, and sometimes with Orestes. Amidst that he was trying to somehow arrest Ehitorujue’s movement but…



He couldn’t reach.



Hajime was being overwhelmed even in close quarter combat just like Ehitorujue planned. Each time he was attacked, blood splashed while he was being rapidly cornered, just like a chess match.



“What’s wrong? Won’t you use your trump card(godslaying)? If you use it while praying, perhaps you will be lucky and reach this body you know?”



“Shu, shut uup-!”



Hajime was already holding out only by his guts. Even the vocabulary of the words that he returned to Ehitorujue’s provocation was poor. Perhaps because Hajime was bleeding out too much, or perhaps because of the limit break that he continued to use, Hajime’s eyes were beginning to strangely get out of focus and looked blank.



“Hmm. You don’t look like you will take out a new artifact, your body is also on the verge of breaking apart…are you waiting for a favorable opportunity?”



Ehitorujue snapped his fingers. Lightning divine spear was flying out from empty air.



Its target was naturally the heavily wounded Hajime. Even now it felt like his consciousness would fly away, his body felt like it would crumble down anytime. Even so, he still somehow avoided a direct hit, really what an astonishing survival instinct.



But, even his resistance only went that far.



The lightning divine spears that fired rapidly destroyed the last Cross Velts and Orestes altogether, on the same occasion the lightning the spears contained were also liberated nearby Hajime.



“GUAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-“



Terrific impact and thunderous sound, and then lightning hit Hajime. Hajime screamed and then fell on the ground with a smoking body.



Hajime bounced several times on the chalk white ground before collapsing face down. Then blood dripped out. Hajime’s tragic appearance that had been chopped up, beaten many times, and also grilled thoroughly, just from a glance he already looked like a corpse. It was hard to judge him as alive.



Ehitorujue descended soundlessly in front of Hajime. Looking at Hajime who was licking the ground in an unsightly state, while wondering if it was the end with this, Ehitorujue lifted up his divine sword in order to deal the finishing blow with an expression like a child whose toy was taken away.



But, ahead of his gaze Hajime’s finger twitched.



“Hou”



Ehitorujue reflexively leaked out an admiring voice. Even during that time Hajime’s body was moving and his body was rising up while dripping blood was dirtying the chalk white ground.



“Even with the majesty of god engraved to your flesh and bones, you are still going to stand up?”



Ehitorujue’s words were replied by Hajime with intermittent words that sounded like they were going to die out anytime along with his heartbeat.



“I’ll, keep…saying it. You are…not a, god. Rather, even, compared…to the ‘human’ fighting on the surface right now…you’re weak.”



“What are you basing on saying that? And with that heavily wounded appearance at that. Even though not even a single one of your power reach me.”



Ehitorujue made an exasperated expression, wondering if Hajime would still bluffing even after reaching this point of time.



“…Indeed, your strength, is astonishing. …Since I, got out, of the abyss, I have…never, felt death…this close”



“Hmph, if you understand――”



“But, that’s all.”



Hajime cut off Ehitorujue’s words. The focus of his eyes was disappearing. However, anyone would understand if they looked from close by. Far inside the wavering eyes, a flame that would never be snuffed out was residing there. As though to display that, strength was filling Hajime’s words little by little.



“Inside you, there is no…will to overwhelm others. That’s why, no matter how much…strength, that you show me, my heart…won’t waver. ――It’s like you are not scary.”



“…Are you making excuse?”



Ehitorujue talked provocatively, however, this times it was Hajime who was talking with a distant look. About the strong people that he met, or he knew in this world.



“I, know. …even though she is the weakest race, yet with a single feeling…that fellow stepped into a deadly no man’s land.”



Her face looked like she was going to cry, even so ‘to be together’, just for that little wish that rabbit ear girl kept running desperately



“Even though…despair, was thrust before her eyes…she just wouldn’t break, a fellow that continued to believe in hope.”



With a single feeling, even when no one believed other than her, she didn’t abandon hope. An earnest girl who in the end even chose to change her body to get close to him.



“For the sake of her comrade…in order to protect…a fellow that can use her body as a shield.”



Just how many times had he been protected by her? Even though usually she would screw around, but when push came to shove she would risk her life more than anyone, a wise woman with deep emotion.



“Even at the verge of death…a fellow that can think of her best friend, as the most.”



Surely, she was the most ‘girlish’ among his comrades. Despite so, she would take up weapon for the sake of someone, even many times at the verge of death, the one who she would think at the end would always be her best friend, it would always be somebody else. A kind girl who was too kind.



“Even when, the world changed…even when her own naivety was thrust before her, that fellow didn’t cast away her own dignity.”



Hesitating, scared, distressed, hurt, even so she didn’t stop being what she determined as herself. The teacher who admonished Hajime who only kept pushing on so he would stop and looked back.



“Even though she is just a little girl without any strength, that girl can risk her life in order to stop her idiot father.”



The time they spent together didn’t even reach a month. She was also just a four-year-old little girl. Despite so, she worried for her injured mother, she personally went to meet the father who informed her of their parting and spoke out, and in the end, that child could convey her feeling without taking even a step back against her rampaging father.



And then,



“…And then, even with her body taken, still, that fellow is continuing to fight.”



He believed. Yes, he believed. At her strength.



Hajime’s gaze, the gaze of someone who had been overwhelmed until he couldn’t move even a single finger and was almost died, pierced Ehitorujue.



The person whom that gaze was directed at didn’t notice himself. Of how the shining flame deep inside those eyes that were peaceful like a calm water surface yet dark like the abyss, was overpowering himself to shrink away with a step back.



“Even the monsters in the abyss emitted overwhelming killing intent and survival instinct. But, there is nothing in you. You are empty. Surely, since the time the things you have piled up together with your comrades were destroyed, you have been empty.”



Hajime stood up completely. In his hands, Donner & Schlag were clutched tightly.



“Your words were loud and clear. In short, you don’t learn anything since the past, you cannot even endure loneliness, however you are scared to even die…the point is that you are just a spoiled brat right?”



The meaning of “enough already” that Ehitorujue’s last comrade spoke was surely, because he believed that even if they let go of the hand of the people they guided in this world, it was enough, they would still be able to live prosperously.



That person was surely thinking of their destroyed home world, that existences like them who had touched the truth weren’t needed anymore, and then, seeing the activity of this world, surely that person thought that there was nothing left that he needed to teach to the people of this world.



Not noticing that feeling, unable to even sympathize, not learning anything from the past, scared of the fear of death despite being able to interfere with truth, and then unable to endure the loneliness, he went into a rampage. In the end, the existence named Ehitorujue was still ‘childish’ no matter how long he had been alive.



“…Fuh, is this a scheme to make my mind waver with that kind of provocation? After all it will be the end if your trump card fails to reach me. What a moving endeavor. But, at this rate your ‘godslaying’ cannot possibly work.”



That was why, he didn’t understand the meaning of what Hajime was talking about. Exactly the same like how he didn’t understand the meaning of the words of his comrade in the far past.



Hajime slowly drew back one of his feet and took his stance. Even though he was already at the death’s door, a supreme will was overflowing from that body.



“Perhaps.”



A calm word of affirmation.



But, right after that…



“That’s only if I am still like before yeah-!”



Immense power burst out from Hajime. It was incomparable with his ‘Supreme Break’ until now. A torrent of power that was equal with several times his former power whirled with Hajime at the center. It was just like a tornado of level F5. The crimson color got deeper into a deep crimson, the space was rumbling as though it was screaming.



“What the-“



Hajime who he thought to be almost died just now suddenly exploded out with power so great at this point of time, for the first time Ehitorujue’s calm expression crumbled. That was undoubtedly an expression of shock.



Giving that expression a glance, Hajime stepped forward. No, his figure was erased.



Where he appeared was right in front of Ehitorujue’s face. Ehitorujue gazed in astonishment.



Just by being fast wouldn’t be able to surpass Ehitorujue’s perception. No matter how much Hajime was strengthened, it would still be impossible by nature. But, even so there were many ways to fight. Just who decided that an instant space teleportation was the technique exclusive for god?



“Haah!!”



“Nuu!?”



The hand of Hajime that was holding Donner softly shifted the hand of Ehitorujue that was stabbing toward Hajime. At the same time, the bullet that flew out from Schlag ricocheted on the ground and aimed at Ehitorujue’s heart.



Naturally, Ehitorujue escaped with Heaven Existence. Instantly, a raging killing intent blew from behind him.



“-!? You bastard, as expected, you use Heaven Existence!?”



“Who knows, I wonder about that?”



Two gunshots resounded. However, there were twenty streaks of flashes that attacked Ehito violently. Half of them were slashed by the divine sword, but he then judged that he wouldn’t be able to deal with the rest of Hajime’s acrobatics rapid shooting that Ehitorujue escaped using further space teleportation.



But, at his next teleportation Ehitorujue saw it. Before his eyes one floating bullet vanished quietly, at the next instant, Hajime appeared at that bullet’s former spot. Yes, it was as though the position of Hajime and the bullet was exchanged.



――Special bullet Exise Bullet



This special bullet that was transmuted from combined space-sublimation magic had the ability to exchange the coordinate position of the starting point and each bullet. Bullets so many like the number of stars in the sky had been scattered in this battlefield since the start of the battle until this moment. But, not all the bullets were attacking the enemy. Several bullets among them were scattering to the whole area and floated midair to become Hajime’s teleporting coordinate.



Ehitorujue used his divine sword to intercept Hajime who appeared in front of him.



However,



“Mu-“



He struck empty air. The blade passed through a bit in front of Hajime. With a returning strike Ehito attempted to shower Hajime with slashes――but when he noticed, Hajime had already slipped right in front of his face once more.



Hajime rushed at the opening of Ehito’s mind. He read Ehito’s breathing and made his timing and distance to miss. Hajime also intentionally disturbed his presence to make it difficult for Ehito to perceive his state. He used taijutsu to give an illusion to Ehito’s sense of distance. The more sensitive the senses of the opponent, the more these techniques could be used to throw the opponent’s perception out of whack. Furthermore,



――Illusion projection artifact ‘Novum Idola’



This artifact layered shadow on the user, it strangely shifted the user’s position and enveloped the image-presence-magic power-etc of the user, at the same time it interfered with the opponent’s perception and made them misrecognized the camouflage and the truth. Hajime’s figure and presence that blurred in two or three layers, combined with Hajime’s own taijutsu realized a close quarter combat that was like an illusion.



“You bastard-, after this far, you still show new cards――”



Ehitorujue’s discarded voice was cut off. Seeing this person who had become that ragged, showered in words of humiliation, and made to snuggle really close to death, yet he was still preserving his cards until this time, as expected it was beyond the imagination of even god. For example even if someone actually was still hiding some plan inside their heart, but in a situation where it wasn’t strange that they could die anytime, the courage needed not to expose their hidden hand was already something that surpassed the realm of human.



Ehitorujue who felt a slight shudder going through his back unleashed attacks that were like surging wave.



“OOOOOOOOOOO-!!”



Hajime’s war cry reverberated, at the same time a crimson flash exploded like a solar flare.



Even when Ehitorujue swung his divine sword and fired meteor shower from his halos, his disarrayed perception couldn’t capture Hajime. Hajime’s attack was also becoming closer and closer to hitting before he noticed, that fact was already a godly feat that surpassed superhuman feat――no, perhaps it was more fitting for Hajime for this to be called as a demonic feat.



Hajime bared his fang using everything that he had analyzed and pounded into his body from the battle until now!



Ehitorujue teleported consecutively once more. However, Hajime who was starting to grasp his teleporting habit rapidly approached within zero comma several seconds. Hajime wasn’t using only the speed of the coordinate exchange and his discernment. His raw speed that was continuing to increase second by second was also progressively entering the realm of god speed.



Even so, the sword flashes of Ehitorujue was impossible to defend against, therefore he possessed overwhelming advantage against Hajime in close quarter combat, was how it was supposed to be.



*GAKIN-*



“Wha-!?”



This time it was Ehitorujue who leaked out a shocked voice along with the resounding hard sound.



That was only natural. The divine sword that should pass through everything except Hajime was blocked by Schlag after all.



With no delay the right Donner aimed at Ehitorujue. The fired crimson flash was evaded by Ehitorujue using teleportation by a hairbreadth with shocked expression pasted still on his face.



“Just, what in the world――”



“It’s only transmutation.”



Hajime answered concisely without telling everything.



The cause that blocked the penetrating ability of the divine sword came from the transmutation that was done on Schlag.



――Soul magic neutralization artifact ‘Delischanors’



If the attack could pass through everything except the target using soul magic, then he only needed to enchant Schlag using ‘Soul Reproduction’ to create a pseudo soul in it. Originally this was a ‘decoy’ artifact that was produced from the assumption that the ‘Divine Statement’ which forced a command on the selected soul in subconscious level couldn’t be defended using Miledy’s artifact, but it was also sufficient to misalign the target of the divine sword.



And then, the decoys that were applied with Delischanors weren’t just Donner & Schlag.



Ehitorujue swung the divine sword at the stepping forward Hajime, which was blocked by the muzzle of Schlag. At the same time,



*DOPAN-!!*



A single gunshot. The flying bullet knocked back the divine sword that should be in a state where its penetrating ability was activated. Yes, what was enchanted with Delischanors wasn’t just Schlag. The bullets were also rejecting the penetration ability!



“Irregular-“



“You talk too much, small fry.”



The impact from the divine sword getting knocked back forcefully made Ehito’s posture to form a one-handed banzai, Ehitorujue who was making a humiliated expression fired meteors from his halo.



But, as though knowing that move ahead, Cross Velts and Donner’s bullet barrage repelled them. Hajime smoothly closed the distance and launched a fierce round kick. That attack, finally, run into the solar plexus of the god that Hajime had no hope to touch before! The kick that had ‘Strong Leg’ and ‘Impact Conversion’ applied to it was extremely intense. Ehitorujue’s body bent forward into ‘>’ shape and he was blown away.



“Kuh”



Hajime pursued, but as expected Ehitorujue didn’t intend to allow him going that far and used Heaven Existence to make his escape.



Yes, he escaped. Different from all his evasion until now from the thinking that it was inexcusable for god’s body to be touched, now he was purely escaping. Of course, Ehitorujue had automatic regeneration. Even so, that he escaped was because his heart was shaken. It was an instinctual action.



Because of that, the humiliation that was welling up in his chest was great. As though to display that, the expression of Ehitorujue distorted grandly.



“You-, your new artifact, that power-. You bastard, you didn’t fight me at full strength!”



“Oi oi, what kind of gullible fellow would believe his enemy’s words. Of course, that was obviously a lie.”



While unfolding an offense and defense against Hajime who was saying such thing boldly, Ehitorujue suddenly noticed. That Hajime’s tone didn’t even sound pained at all and flowed smoothly. That his wounds from being tormented thoroughly had been mostly healed.



What was the reason that Hajime was healed? The reason was the same with how his strength was increased even after activating ‘Supreme Break’ already.



It finally melted, the capsule inside his stomach. The capsule filled with god water and cheatmate that Hajime had drunk beforehand.



Ehitorujue didn’t know about that, but he conjectured that it was impossible for such rapid healing to happen except by god water and he raised an angry voice.



“What you said about the god water being the last was also a lie-“



“It was a really delicious water that is worthy to be called god water you know?”



Hajime spoke indifferently. Toward such Hajime, Ehitorujue took distance without fussing over close quarter combat where he was about to launch space blasting and lightning divine spear. The humiliation of being fooled was oozing out from that expression.



As though to promote that displeasure further, Hajime constantly closed the distance smoothly not letting Ehito got away.



While the divine sword and Schlag were locked with each other, Ehitorujue asked from very close range.



“Why, only now.”



“Naturally, in order to obtain certainty. I’m not underestimating your strength.”



There was only one chance for the ‘godslaying’. Hajime didn’t understand what kind of strength Ehitorujue who had perfectly seized Yue’s body possessed, because of that it was necessary to make Ehito showed out his hands that Hajime hadn’t seen before in order to use that one chance with certainty. Ehitorujue intended to play around with Hajime, but Hajime was also doing the same thing albeit for a different reason.



The strength of Ehitorujue that surpassed the imagination was to the degree that made Hajime felt the scythe of the death god, but by paying compensation of pain and many of his artifacts, somehow Hajime was able to confirm the battle strength and hands that Ehitorujue possessed to a certain degree, also, he became able to grasp the ‘habit’ of Ehitorujue.



Ehitorujue regained his footing from the shock and his expression suddenly changed into looking amused. And then, he instantly invoked a large scale space blasting that didn’t even spare himself from being dragged into it.



The space creaked and the meteor shower that was sweeping over all around was popping off. Among them, Hajime whose expression distorted was also included inside. It seemed that he endured using ‘Vajra’ that had its output increased, but he bore a damage that didn’t look light. Hajime vomited out blood while coughing.



But, Hajime immediately rallied himself and detected Ehitorujue. Ehitorujue had returned once more to his throne where three layers of halos were behind his back. It seemed that he was injured by his own damage but he immediately recovered using ‘Automatic Regeneration’.



“Then, whether you are really not misunderstanding me or not, the might of this true god will ascertain that!”



Right after that, light exploded. The halos were releasing light so intense to the degree that would make anyone hallucinated that. And then, Each halo were beginning to rotate while shining brilliantly.



Even during that time, Hajime was approaching while slipping through the meteor shower that had been doubled in intensity, right after that, a very thick beam of light was fired from the halos. If anyone saw it, then they would think that it was just like the ‘Heaven Might’ that Kouki unleashed. Although, the power and scale of this one from Ehito were in a different league.



“This cannot be avoided you know, irregular! This light of ruin will continue to chase after you forever until you die!”



In contrast with Ehitorujue who was raising a loud voice, Hajime fiercely bared his fang and answered.



“Then, I’ll breakthrough frontally.”



A crimson flash with honed killing intent surged straight ahead.



At the same time, Hajime scattered all the grenades that he had, furthermore a huge assault lance coated with sealing stone was deployed in the front. A mechanical sound was reverberating from that assault lance, the lance was spreading like an umbrella while it was elongating by three stages and it began to rotate at high speed.



――Target dispersal assault lance ‘Lob Regenschirm’



A three-stage assault lance that rotated at high speed with its surface engraved by sealing stone and particular unevenness, that was to say it was a drill.



The target that was touched would be pulverized and dispersed as though being dug out. Hajime floated it in front of him, he used it as a shield while spreading intense ripples in midair, immediately after that, he charged toward the bombardment of ‘True Heaven Might’ along with a fierce impact.



While the coated sealing stone was being broken in the blink of eye, Lob Regenschirm was forcefully scattering the god’s might while leading its master Hajime toward the target’s position. Hajime also used ‘Vajra’, ‘Magic Power Emission’, and ‘Impact Conversion’ as explosive reactive armor and charged through the light of destruction!



“-uaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!”



Blood spurted out from the wounds that just got healed due to the after-effect that couldn’t be dispersed, his internal organs, his flesh, his bones were screaming. The crimson aura he was clad with and another red were scattered around him, even so Hajime screamed without stopping his advance. He wouldn’t stand still even for an instant! Overwhelm back the overwhelming torrent! Crush the absurdity with even more absurdity! Just like how he came this far until now, tear apart all the obstacles-!



“You are breaking through even this-“



Ehitorujue saw Hajime who was advancing inside the Heaven Might he unleashed and got stabbed with that eye glint that was filled to the brim with tenacious determination and tremendous killing intent――and he prepared to run away once more.



He was going to withdraw from that spot using Heaven Existence. He was taking that action mostly subconsciously.



But, Hajime didn’t allow him to do such thing.



The whole area at the surrounding was enveloped by explosive sound. It was the grenades that Hajime scattered. The spaces at the center where the explosions happened were distorting like jelly, shockwaves were blowing violently due to the side effect of the spaces trying to return to normal.



The cause of this was the space explosion grenade that distorted the space and generated shockwave. Originally it was something that made use of space to attack the enemy using shockwave, but right now it was displaying a different effect.



That was the destabilization of space.



Whether the direct teleportation magic ‘Heaven Existence’ that didn’t use exact and delicate gate could be used in this place or not…



“――tsk. Another artifact again-“



It seemed Ehitorujue himself understood well the answer. At the very least it was something dangerous to the degree that made him spontaneously hesitating to activate the magic. And then, he was also unintentionally swearing from witnessing new artifacts appearing one after another.



Using that opportunity, Hajime finally broke through the True Heaven Might. The Lob Regenschirm was smashed up, Hajime himself was also worn out, but that terrifyingly sharply gleaming eyes pierced Ehitorujue that was right nearby.



Ehitorujue immediately changed plan from escaping to intercepting. He was already materializing divine sword in one hand and swung it with God Speed. The sword lines that were drawn within an instant easily surpassed a hundred. He was seriously serious. This was the full strength sword play of Ehitorujue.



It didn’t matter that his perception was shifted or whatever, that was irrelevant if he was just filling the space to the brim with sword slashes. Therefore, even Hajime appeared unable to react against that, without even any time to put a defense all the sword flashes passed through that body. There wasn’t even any resistance that could be felt from the sword cutting through flesh.



At the same time, the Hajime that should be cut dispersed lightly, from its shadow Hajime leaped out.



“Impossible-. Something that only has small effect of shifting perception is――”



“Just who said that such thing is the effect huh?”



Ehitorujue’s surprised voice was easily responded by Hajime. Illusion projection artifact ‘Novum Idola’ fundamentally only had the effect of derailing the perception. But, nobody was saying that was its whole ability or anything. Even if, that was the only ability it showed even when in a critical time.



The corner of Ehitorujue’s sight caught a bullet that was transparent like a crystal floating there.



――Illusion projection assistance artifact ‘Vision Bullet’



Combined with ‘Novum Idola’, an artifact that completely projected Hajime’s illusion was put in the core of this bullet. The moment Hajime broke through the True Heaven Might, he predicted that a severe interception attack would be waiting for him, so Hajime fired the Vision Bullet to the front while he himself drew back from Ehito’s sword range.



Ehitorujue who had just finished swinging his god sword, in addition to the shock, became slow in reacting, with an intense step Hajime threw away Schlag and he turned his artificial palm toward Ehito. Right after that, the gimmick in the palm worked and the five fingers there greatly elongated. Now it looked just like a skeleton hand of a giant.



Hajime struck with that expanding mechanical palm toward Ehitorujue. And then, in a flash the five fingers curled and restrained Ehitorujue’s body, then Hajime hurled himself forward which carried them through the halos immediately.



“aAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!”



Hajime roared and then the gimmick of the artificial hand activated which let out many spikes that pierced Ehitorujue’s body like iron maiden, furthermore Hajime activated a space fixation that was limited to inside his palm and completely restrained Ehito.



Ehitorujue immediately attempted to use magic, but tremendous magic power radiation came out from the artificial hand that was glued close to his body――the magic power cannon ‘Glanzen’ loaded inside the artificial arm performed bombardment of pure magic power that stirred up the magic power inside Ehito’s body, due to that Ehito was unable to invoke magic instantly. Furthermore, Ehitorujue was able to swing his divine sword just by reversing his wrist, but that too was beyond his power due to the anchor and steel thread flying out from the artificial arm which bound his body and operated vibration pulverization.



“Raah!!”



“-!?”



Like that, at the end of dense offense and defense that happened for less than a second, Hajime succeeded in throwing down Ehitorujue on the ground.



The gazes of Ehitorujue who was held down on the ground and Hajime who was straddling him crossed each other. At the same time, along with a *kacha* sound, something hard was pushed on Ehitorujue’s heart from the opening of the five fingers.



It was the gun muzzle of Donner.



“This is check. The ‘godslaying’ that was born at the end of drowning in alcohol, taste it to your heart’s content.”



“Wa-――”



Instantly,



*DOPAN-*



A single gunshot.



Ehitorujue’s body twitched up.



What was fired was naturally the godlsaying bullet that picked only the god to destroy. The ‘Short Sword of Divine Crossing’ where the liberators’ tenacity resided was condensed, processed, and then remanufactured into a bullet.



Finally the trump card pierced through Ehitorujue.



Behind the halos were crumbling down as though they were weathering down into dust.



Silence filled the white space.



The closed eyelids of Yue quivered along with her long eyelashes. And then, on the eyes that slowly opened, the worn-out figure of Hajime was reflected…



“How unfortunate, irregular.”



“――”



Right after that, Hajime’s left arm was pulverized into very small pieces, and his body was spraying blood while getting blown away.





Chapter 176




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



The Beloved Vampire Princess



A thunderous roar.



Scattering metal fragments.



Those fragments that rained down in pieces raised metallic sounds while falling on the ground, by that time a groaning voice resounded from a corner of the tiered stand where the throne was on. At the center of the crumbling chalk white stand that was crumbling down with clatters, there was the figure of Hajime buried from his back with his face distorted in pain.



That figure became bloodstained as though the healing by the god water previously was nonexistent, it didn't stop there, even his artificial left arm became gone and now he looked really tragic just from a glance.



"Guh, gahah"



While vomiting blood by a lot, Hajime tried to aim Donner to the front. The blood dripping down from his forehead entered his eye, dyeing his sight bright red as though the warning of red alert was turned on in his field of vision.



Inside that red field of vision, Ehitorujue who rose up lightly without feeling the gravity was making the gesture of snapping his fingers.



At that moment, a fierce impact hit the right hand holding Donner. Hajime mostly wasn't feeling pain because his sense of pain was paralyzed when he was blown away by the impact, but he understood what was being done to him. At the corner of his sight, the five fingers of his right hand were bending to the wrong direction because his partner that he should be holding was pulverized into pieces.



The fragments of the broken Donner fell on the ground, at the same time the 'Treasure Warehouse II' that Hajime fitted on the middle finger of his right hand was also rolling on the ground *roll roll* with a cute sound that felt out of place. It seemed that the artifact slipped off when his right hand was impacted.



"Splendid, it was splendid, irregular. For your trump card to strike this me, that is worthy of praise. Although, if a question of whether a trump card will always be worthy to be called as a trump card is asked, then the answer can only be no."



"…"



Ehitorujue walked closer with a composed and thin smile. Normally his footsteps wouldn't make any sound at all, but this time *step step* the footsteps echoed likely like the countdown to Hajime's death.



Furthermore, a step, each time Ehitorujue advanced by a step, the artificial arm and Donner, and then Schlag that fell on a slightly distant place were wrapped by platinum light. The artifacts of Hajime was shaking *shake shake* in resistance, but before long they became unable to endure and their shape broke down, at the end, they were completely annihilated not even leaving dust behind.



With the artifacts separated from the hand of their master Hajime, if they were continuously bathed in a focused light of destruction then even the countermeasure Hajime applied wouldn't hold.



"Are you wondering why? Certainly the bullet filled with the concept of 'godslaying' gouged my heart, yet why, I can be calm and composed like this. Ku-ku-ku-"



"…"



Ehitorujue watched Hajime with amusement, or perhaps with ridiculing while soaking in joy. Hajime didn't answer. Perhaps he didn't even have any leeway left to talk, Hajime only kept leaning on the broken stand limply with his eyes closed. Only his right eye with the eye patch covering it sliding off was slightly opened, but the magic eye stone wasn't created to obtain normal vision, so in reality Hajime was unable to see Ehitorujue's expression.



But, without even paying attention to such Hajime, Ehitorujue's tongue moved smoothly. The unsightly figure of Hajime whose plan to recover from the hopeless situation, to overturn the table with one attack had been crushed, was greatly pleasing for him.



"Indeed, if it was the me of the thousand years ago, perhaps I could possibly be destroyed by that. But, during all that time the secret technique to convert faith into strength to sublimate my soul has been continuing until now you know? Naturally, the status of my existence is also rising up. Something that is only like the concept created by a human at best means nothing against me. Furthermore, right now I have the body of this vampire princess. This flesh body itself becomes the protective wall that protects the soul taking root in it."



"…"



Hajime's artifacts that scattered at the surrounding were completely annihilated. All the artifacts were thoroughly annihilated with care, including the Schlagen AA and Cross Velts that had been crushed previously, the bullet cartridges, and even the fragments of the grenades.



Undoubtedly Ehitorujue was intending to cut off all the hope of Hajime with thoroughness. Although, Hajime already looked dead already with how he kept lying down without even any twitch but…perhaps this was only a simple entertainment for Ehitorujue without any regard to anything else.



"Although, even I didn't have the conviction that I will really end up safe from that, so I had no intention to get hit with it. Therefore, the attack just now made me a little uneasy. Truly that is a brilliant achievement, to do something like making a god feel uneasy. You can be proud, irregular."



"…"



*gyarit* Ehitorujue's foot trod on the 'Treasure Warehouse II' that was rolling on the floor. And then, he stepped down forcefully while purposefully making a sound. A beam of light leaked out from the stepped spot. As expected, the artifact was surely annihilated into nothing there.



With this, now the only artifact Hajime possessed was only his magic eye stone. It was unclear what was reflected in the eye of blue crystal peeking out from the faintly opened eyelid. Even though it couldn't show normal sight, naturally the eye artifact was able to distinguish the existence and the flow of magic power, so Hajime should be able to see how all his partners, the artifacts were annihilated.



However, even in front of that scene, where one of his important thing, and then one more important thing was hinted to be lost, Hajime's expression was still unmoving. The effect of the god water had gone, his left arm was lost, his right hand was broken, even his internal organs were beaten up so badly, lacerations were carved inside his body, and he couldn't even twitch his finger, it was unclear whether it was a dying figure or a figure that had given up on everything in despair.



At the very least, what Ehitorujue was seeing was that finally Hajime's heart had broken, that he had fallen into the abyss of despair. Like a demon whose meaning of existence was making people fall, his expression distorted into a chuckle.



And then, Ehitorujue who had walked before Hajime's eyes bent his knee in front of him, he matched his gaze to the same height with Hajime's and suddenly he swept his hand horizontally.



"――"



At that moment, a pebble of light star pierced Hajime's both legs. Hajime's femurs were pulverized. Wind holes were literally opened there.



One more of Hajime's power to resist was stolen, then Ehitorujue's slender and beautiful fingertip softly caressed Hajime's chin. And then, he lifted Hajime's head forcibly.



Toward Hajime whose left eye was opened slightly, Ehitorujue smiled composedly and brought his face closer to a kissing distance. And then, toyingly he changed the path of his lips just before it came into contact with Hajime and then he sweetly, repulsively, muddily, and stickily whispered into Hajime's ear while gluing close to him in half-embracing posture.



"I'll break everything important to you. Your comrades that stepped into Holy Precincts together with you, your compatriots that continue to resist on the surface, the family of your birthplace, I'll trample all of them underfoot, toy them, and let them raise agonizing cries."



"…"



Hajime didn't reply. He was merely staring, straight ahead at somewhere, there was no expression of emotion that could be seen from his body. He was really like an empty shell, as though his heart wasn't in his body anymore.



Ehitorujue stared at the side face of such Hajime with an expression of ecstasy.



"But, you can rest assured. I will treat only this amazing body of the vampire princess courteously. Because this is my important vessel, I'll handle it courteously, to every nook and cranny, to my heart's content, okay?"



His beloved woman was used by another as he pleased. Those words that were really hard to endure…made Hajime reacted. Suddenly his broken right hand moved, that hand reached searchingly toward Ehitorujue, no, toward Yue's chest.



"…Finally…I found you."



"Hm?"



A small, small whisper. Furthermore it sounded hoarse, that Ehitorujue who was right nearby missed it.



For Ehitorujue, Hajime was already an existence that solely existed to torment. A toy whose every hope had been crushed to nothing. There was no way he could do anything from here on, and so Ehito thought that small whisper was nothing more than Hajime's last lamentation, or possibly his pitiful cry that called on his beloved who didn't exist anymore.



Like that, intending to taste the nectar that was the last despair of human, Ehito brought his ear closer to Hajime's lips.



Hajime slowly opened his mouth. That was originally a chant that he didn't need to recite anymore. Be that as it may, it was Hajime's greatest weapon that was his lifeline until now, the word that showed his only talent.



"'Transmute'."



Instantly, Ehitorujue was about to say "what are you" with a scrutinizing suspicious look, but he was unable to do that.



The reason was,



"――Gaah, gahah!?"



Suddenly, countless blade flew out from Ehitorujue's chest.



Metal blades grew out like a mountain of blade soaked in blood, biting and tearing flesh from inside. That happened not only in Ehito's chest, but within an instant everywhere on Ehito's body there were blades flying out, furthermore the metals that were adjoining each other would be glued together using metal fragments from that came from somewhere unknown as an intermediary, restraining Ehitorujue's body gruesomely.



The strange phenomenon of blades flying out from inside the body caused Ehitorujue's thought to halt completely for a moment. That was just how shocking this surprise attack was combined with the conviction in his victory.



The blades piercing the body and the sparking crimson metal fragments which came from somewhere were physically obstructing Ehitorujue's movement together, the sealing stone component that seemed to be included in the metal hindered him from using magic, furthermore the very strangeness itself was halting his thought. The opening that was made from those lasted only for a few seconds.



But, that opening was invaluable. This moment was exactly the timing that Hajime had waited eagerly for, the true critical moment that he was aiming for.



"'Transmute-'!"



Once more Hajime yelled his own talent.



This magic was merely processing metal, that was all it could do. Right now, at a glance the metal that existed in this place was only the blades that flew out from Ehitorujue's body, no matter how there was no way this magic could work on an opponent who overcame even the 'godslaying'.



However, the broken right arm of Hajime――using direct operation of magic power he forcefully moved that broken hand to touch a spot…his own abdomen.



Immediately, crimson spark surged and at the same time blood soaked blade flew out from Hajime's stomach.



"――!?"



Ehitorujue gazed in astonishment. His astonishment didn't come from the fact that Hajime was hiding metal lump inside his stomach, or because that lump was now piercing open his own stomach.



He was astonished because he sensed the abnormal presence filling the flying out blade. His spine was having goosebumps, his instinct was ringing the alarm bell noisily. This presence was undoubtedly the same presence like what he felt previously――a presence of concept magic.



In a world of instantaneous moment, Ehitorujue immediately tried to use Heaven Existence. However, the clusters of micro blades stirring up inside his body(blood vessel) obstructed his thinking and magic usage, even his automatic regeneration was slowed down. In addition, the metal shackle that had sewed through both his legs before he noticed prevented him from physically jumping away.



That opening which was exposed for less than a second was enough for Hajime's blade to reach. It was hard to understand because of all the blood, but the small knife that looked like toy contained god crystal, its transparent blade was clad in a deep crimson light which was thrust toward Ehito…and then, accurately the knife plunged into Ehitorujue's body.



Instantly the deep crimson magic power swelled up. At the center was Ehitorujue's body. At the same time Ehitorujue's scream resounded.



"GAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!?"



A scream of uneasiness and agony that was impossible to come from merely getting stabbed by a small knife resounded. The blades that came out from inside his body were annihilated by platinum light and the restrain was undid, Ehitorujue then stepped back in staggers while holding his head and his body writhing in agony.



Ehitorujue's body began to *dokun, dokun!* pulsate.



That was the beacon of the awakening. The yell of determination that original owner of the writhing body was raising.



"Impossible-, the vampire princess should have been annihilated completely!"



Indeed, Ehitorujue had felt the soul vanishing in annihilation. Ehitorujue's face warped from the torrent of power welling up inside his body trying to push him out while he yelled the question that expressed his bewilderment.



The one who answered that was Hajime. While his body was unable to even wake up, his mouth was showing a fierce smile.



"Yue was a cut above you, that's all there is to it isn't that right?"



"――"



Ehitorujue guessed from those words. That was to say, Yue's annihilation was actually a feign that she intentionally showed to him. She feigned using up all of her strength before vanishing, and then she concealed her own soul and lurked at the deepest depth of the body.



She believed that in time help would surely come.



By any chance the scream that Ehitorujue heard might also be Yue's acting performance.



"But, but-, why-!?"



Ehitorujue writhed, and finally he fell on his knee while holding his head before unconsciously whispering his indescribable question.



To that, Hajime pushed out his hand and he answered while running spark on his hand.



"The bullet of 'godslaying' shook your soul and awoke Yue's soul. The 'Blade of Blood Pledge' severed your invading thought and granted strength to Yue."



"What do you――, don't tell me-"



Ehitorujue almost leaked out words of bewilderment for a moment there because he didn't understand what Hajime meant, but he immediately made a shocked expression in understanding.



Hajime who saw that lifted the corner of his mouth further.



Concept magic 'Godslaying'――that was a magic that exterminated only the soul with divinity without giving any influence at Yue's body. However, Hajime followed the warning of Miledy who gifted him with that power and didn't rely on it.



Therefore, he used it only for its special characteristic with the objective of supplementing his true trump card. That was to say the godslaying bullet gave a not small effect to Ehitorujue's soul even though it didn't become a lethal damage, which created an opening and woke Yue up, and then it also further gave the opening for Yue herself to wield her strength.



And then, Hajime's second blade(the true trump card) separated Ehitorujue and Yue's soul with certainty. Hajime was faintly opening the magic eye in his right eye was in order to ascertain that. The words "I found you" that he whispered faintly was because he had caught sight of Yue's soul that lurked in the deepest part of the body.



Artifact Blade of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Rezvie)――that artifact which Hajime hid inside his stomach in round ore shape was enchanted with the concept of [Thy art forbidden to touch(Don't touch my woman)]. That was to say, this concept magic forbade interference to Yue's soul and severed the intervention that was already there.



The weakness of this magic was the point where it couldn't display its true worth if it didn't directly hit Yue's soul, because of that Hajime had to make the 'godslaying' hit with certainty no matter what, and so he had to go through that much hardships to reach this point…



Anyway, with this Yue's soul that was completely cut loose from Ehitorujue's influence was now in a state that was protected by a barrier, and so she could wield her power completely. Furthermore, this Blade of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Rezvie) was intentionally made to have a hollow blade, using capillary phenomenon the blade was filled with a lot of Hajime's blood.



Yue's skill――the 'Blood Pledge Contract' drastically amplified the effect of blood sucking only from the sole partner that she designated. Using that skill, Hajime directly poured his blood through Blade of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Rezvie) and strengthened Yue's soul.



"You are saying, you are aiming for this-, right from the start!?"



"If I can overcome you using overwhelming resources, then that's great. But, what is at stake here is the life of my beloved. Isn't it obvious that I'm going to prepare two or three tricks for this?"



The power of Yue's soul was increasing in force second by second. It raged to chase away the foreign contamination from inside herself. This is my body, the only one who can touch it is just Hajime, the soul screamed. The platinum magic power that whirled violently flickered and the color of the radiance was changing to golden, that light was pulsating as though to display its determination and hit Ehitorujue's soul hard.



Ehitorujue was hallucinating. A pair of eyes slowly opened, and those crimson eyes of the beautiful figure of the vampire princess pierced him. the immense trust toward her beloved partner was dwelling in those eyes, that look eloquently told of how she had been waiting for this moment.



That meant that both Yue and also Hajime had the same feeling. Without using any will communication skill or artifact, they mutually understood what each other would do.



Ehitorujue thought. At that time, although he succeeded in hijacking Yue's body but he overlooked Hajime and let him gotten away after receiving resistance from Yue. He wondered if since that time by any chance he was dancing above the palm that was the bond of these two.



A tremendous humiliation and indescribable displeasure jarred Ehitorujue's mind. Ehitorujue then yelled with that raging heart.



"Don't underestimate me-, vampire princess-. This body is mine! I won't let any seed of anxiety in the future get left behind! I'll pinch and crush your soul for sure this time-. Then next it will be you-, irregular! Hahah, in front of my power a concept of just this level will――"



In actuality, even after being stabbed with Blade of Blood Pledge, the conflict between Ehitorujue and Yue's soul for the leadership of the body was in a stalemate. That was just how immense the soul of god that had been sublimated using the secret technique of faith conversion.



But,



"I thought you'd say that."



Ehitorujue's words were cut off by a single sentence, by a light tone as though everything was already within expectation.



"――Wha, t?"



Ehitorujue's eyes snapped wide open. That wasn't because his words were cut off.



It was because ahead of his gaze, there was the figure of Hajime still leaning on the tiered platform with his trembling right hand aimed at Ehitorujue.



And then, what was hard to believe for him, what he didn't want to believe, was that from the bullet clutched by that hand――there was a presence of a new concept magic that was emitted out.



Just from where in the world Hajime took out that bullet from? Looking from how the bullet was soaked in blood, perhaps it was hidden inside his body as expected.



"So, something like that, after this late! You don't even have artifact!"



Ehitorujue couldn't move his body from his struggle against Yue's soul, but even with unease oozing out on his expression he still yelled mockingly.



Indeed, even if Hajime possessed a bullet but without Donner or Schlag then he wouldn't be able to shot it. Hajime's legs were drilled through, looking from how those wounds were still not healed yet, he also shouldn’t be able to directly strike it to Ehito.



But, Hajme was only too aware of such thing.



Hajime, for the third time, chanted his greatest magic.



"'Transmute'."



Vivid crimson spread. It was spreading to the surrounding space and gradually the color was changing to thick deep crimson. At the same time, the held out bullet was glittering brightly in the hand clutching it and wind gathered. It was gradually forming a shape of something small.



"…Metal, particle?"



Ehitorujue whispered dumbfoundedly. That whisper was entirely spot on.



"I order to take back Yue with certainty, I estimated that at the very least three stages of a process are necessary. …I told you already. That I swore I'll certainly take her back."



"Don't tell me, in the middle of that fight…then, you also aimed for this since the start…"



Why, in the middle of an instantaneous battle that he was forced to do, Hajime frequently used weapons with time lag like grenades and the like until he used them all up? Why, did the Grim Reapers and Cross Velts would explode everywhere even when they got hit by slashing attack? Just what was the metal that flew out from Ehitorujue's body?



The answer was this――the metal particle.



The metal particles that were unseen by eyes and floated in the air made by disintegrating metal very finely were filled into all the grenades, Cross Velts, and the Grim Reapers. And then they were exploded and scattered everywhere through the whole area. Among the grenades there were also those that were filled with nothing but metal particles, among the eagle model Grim Reapers there were also individuals that were only scattering particles all the time.



In the middle of that battle, when Hajime judged that he couldn't overcome Ehito in a battle of resource, he made a Cross Velt to be shot down above Ehitorujue's head which caused metal particles to be scattered, Ehitorujue sucked in the particles and after Hajime confirmed that he didn't notice that, Hajime moved on to the second stage of the plan.



That plan was to give Ehito the impression that he was fighting desperately just to make his only trump card the 'godslaying' hit Ehito, but in fact he was sprinkling the metal particles that would become his transmutation material to the surrounding, for the sake of attacking and restraining Ehitorujue from inside his body. That was the second stage of the plan.



And then, the reason that the transmutation which should be unusable without touching the target could now transmute by gathering metal from wide range was because of the final derivative skill of transmutation, 'Convergence Transmutation'. This was one of the two things that Hajime obtained at the same time when he obtained the innermost secret of transmutation, the 'Imagination Composition' that Hajime was awakened to at that devil king castle.



The effect of this skill was simple. It would gather the metal at the surrounding and the user could transmute without touching it, that was all. It had a plainness that was fitting for a common job.



But, what would happen if it was used with the metal that was taken inside the body? Ehitorujue's lung and stomach that had absorbed a lot of the metal floating in the air were surely smeared with metal particles inside.



And then, that restraining using the artificial arm. Even the spikes that flew out from the artificial hand and stabbed Ehitorujue to bind him in place dissolved metal particles and poured it into his body. If those metal particles flowed into the bloodstream and then turned into splinters, it was self-evident that Ehitorujue would be hacked into pieces from inside.



"I got overwhelmed in the battle of resource. You showed me the gap between us at close quarter combat. I used all my trump cards, and went further than that. All of my hands(artifacts) were crushed. That was why…"



――you thought you had win right?



Hajime's mouth that split like a crescent moon diabolically and his words, proofed that Ehitorujue's conjecture was correct. Exactly because he was convinced of his victory, exactly because he had endured the trump card and became convinced that there was an overwhelming gap between him and Hajime, that Ehitorujue glued close to Hajime's body so defenselessly like that. He was convinced of victory and showed an opening.



Having that opening which was actually Hajime's true aim taken advantage of, and then taught that Hajime had been laying down preparations all the time in the middle of that breathtaking battle, and furthermore witnessing Hajime's mercilessness of hacking to pieces his body from the inside even though it was the body of his lover regardless of the possession, all of those factors greatly shaken Ehitorujue's mind with agitation. And what made it unbearable for Ehito was that agitation was then taken advantage of by the vampire princess.



While Ehitorujue was agitated and his mind split to handle Yue's attack, finally the converged metal particles took shape and became a tiny gun of a single shot. It had really small and simple make that couldn't be compared at all with Donner or Schlag.



Nevertheless, the bullet that was loaded into it was a lethal fang.



Hajime's fingers that should be broken were forcefully moved using magic power operation and fixed on the trigger.



Ehitorujue was roaring while annihilating the blades flying out from his body and the metal shackle coiling around his body, while also trying to move his body, possibly he was trying to teleport away. But, immediately the pulsation became a level fiercer and obstructed all of his efforts. Even the automatic regeneration's activation was stopped completely.



It was as though the pulsation was covering for Hajime's attack.



Surely, that wasn't just the imagination.



The blood soaked Hajime, with a fearless grin even now made the gun that looked like a small derringer pistol sparked with deep crimson electricity.



And then,



"I'm having her back. That woman, every single drop of her blood, every single strand of her hair, and even every single piece of her soul, everything is mine."



The crimson flash pierced Ehitorujue who was screaming with a desperate face.



What was fired was the artifact Bullet of Blood Pledge(Blood Fea Bullet). The concept filled in it was [The Knitted Bond Into This Hand(I'm No Good Without You)]――this concept magic made the souls of Yue and Hajime that seek each other to resonance, it explosively strengthened Yue's soul, at the same time it would forcefully tear off the joining of the foreign substance(soul) rooting inside the body, while at the same time granting horrific agony toward the intruder that felt like the nerves getting directly broiled.



"――!!"



A soundless scream. It was unclear whether in the end it was the scream that Ehitorujue raised, or else the loud scream of fighting spirit that Yue raised.



Right after that, a golden light exploded.



That color was far warmer and more vivid than the platinum radiance of before. It illuminated as though enveloping Hajime, making him feeling hopelessly heartrending. It was the light of his beloved without a doubt.



Right after that, two eyes opened as though awakening from the sleep. The striking rubies caught her beloved straight ahead.



And then, like a flower bud that was blooming proudly in its full glory, or possibly like the sun that showed its face by driving away the dark cloud, she displayed a bewitching smile that emitted glorious radiance.



Yue's body floated gently.



She was blood-soaked, but such thing did nothing except promoting her glamor instead. With her figure that gave and adult charm, her abundant golden threads fluttering softly, both her hands spread wide open as though in welcome, or possibly it was her desire to welcome, she leaped forward, such figure, just what kind of words in the world that could possibly be used to express it?



Like a goddess――such words felt so hopelessly clichéd for this.



Hajime was merely, with an earnestly affectionate expression, he gently narrowed his eyes while his hand reached slowly in order to grant the wish of his lover.



Yue leaped to there. She dropped her waist above Hajime softly just like silk floss, without letting him felt anything like weight, without stopping her face rubbed on his chest. Her arms that circled around him tiiiiiiightly constrained Hajime, wordlessly, as though she was pleading for the two of them to melt together into one.



Hajime too circled his arm around Yue and embraced her tightly. Thing like the pain at his arm or stomach, was so small like a hair strand compared to the pain of his heart when he was separated from her.



Before long, Yue lifted her face that was buried on his chest. Those eyes were moist in a display of the emotion filling inside her, the breath leaking out from that lovely pink lips was so hot that it felt scalding.



Hajime softly put his hand on the cheek of Yue that was dyed in rose color, while he gifted her with words overflowing with affectionate tone.



"I came to pick you up, my vampire princess."



"…Nn, I have faith. My demon king-sama."



Hearing the joking names they called each other with, both of them let out a chuckle smilingly.



The kiss happened naturally. Their lips were merely touching each other, yet it was a gentle kiss that carried their whole feeling. The taste of blood was entertaining. Yue's small tongue swiped out and licked the clotted blood pasted on Hajime's lips.



But, at that time, as though trying to tear apart once again the two who were gluing at each other, a tremendous killing intent along with an immense torrent of light assaulted them.



Immediately, Yue turned behind with only her upper body while pushing out her hand. Instantly a barrier of light was deployed.



There, a shockwave that creaked the space along with a bombardment of light crashed.



"…Nn-"



Yue slightly leaked out her voice. Her eyebrows frowned mightily.



Yue herself was also quite spent after chasing out Ehitorujue's soul, but this bombardment was filled with a force even more than that that made Yue's barrier creaked along with the space.



She didn't have any spare strength to use age of god magic. While Haijme was wounded all over his body and couldn't move.



Therefore they were determined. With that will, Yue continued to hold up the 'Holy Severance', and Hajime leaned close to her. There, words that sounded like curse filled with madness were resounding.



{Kill-, kill-, kill-, I'm going to kill you-, irregularrrr!}



At the other side of the barrier, at the origin of the light bombardment. Over there, a human form made from light itself was floating. At the spot that seemed to be the head of that floating light human form, the mouth was irregularly distorted in an expression of rage.



Even thought that figure was blurred, but they understood well who it was. Even though the voice was different, even with rage coloring the look, that oozing out vulgarity couldn't possibly be mistaken.



That lump of light was undoubtedly Ehitorujue.





Chapter 177




Arifureta Shokugyou de Sekai Saikyou (The World’s Strongest By Common Job)



*creak, crack* The barrier that Yue deployed was cracking.



The bombardment of light was unceasingly increasing in power in order to annihilate anything and everything.



{This place is Holy Precincts. Despite my body is being only a soul right now, just overwhelming the exhausted you two is not a difficult matter-! I’ll blast away irregular before the eyes of the vampire princess, and then, I’ll plunder that body once more!}



Ehitorujue’s voice echoed through the whole space.



Seeing how Ehitorujue didn’t use both penetrating attacks like the divine sword or divine flame, or space crossing attack like lightning divine spear that used Heaven Existence, the damage from the conflict against Yue’s soul and Bullet of Blood Pledge seemed to make Ehitorujue considerably exhausted.



But, even so the light bombardment was still tremendous. That was surely the original magic power light of Ehitorujue. From a glance, the light was radiant in a display of its divinity. But, it continued endlessly just like a bombardment, loud laughter that contained rage and madness were making the divine aura of the light to end in vain.



{Come, stop your useless resistance and repent. Now that your last hope has been severed, there is already no meaning in anything that you do!}



The light swelled up. The cracks on ‘Holy Severance’ were gradually getting larger.



It seemed that Ehitorujue’s pride was greatly wounded from being done in by Hajime and Yue, to the degree that he didn’t give careful consideration for Yue’s body state with his attack. He was surely thinking that he could just use ‘Automatic Regeneration’ after he repossessed the body. Rather than that, he put more importance in creating a spectacle where Hajime got erased away in front of Yue’s eyes without her being unable to do anything.



It appeared that Ehitorujue was convinced that such tragic future would come true. Hajime who was wounded all over with his two trump cards, the concept magic used up couldn’t possibly have any reserve power anymore, he thought. Even the liberators where they had seven members before could only create three concept magic.



Hajime creating two concept magic could even be said as a miracle due to the strength of his feeling toward Yue.



For that reason,



“It’s the end with this, just who was saying that’s the case huh?”



{Still bluffi――}



Ehitorujue’s words stopped midway.



That was because behind the barrier, he saw the figure of Hajime floating a diabolical smile, his lips splitting widely like a crescent moon. Even though Ehitorujue didn’t have a flesh body, yet that expression made a chill to rush through his body.



“Yue.”



“…Nn. Leave it to me.”



The two were on the same page. Even without knowing at all regarding the detail about the card that Hajime had, Yue clearly understood what it was that Hajime wanted just like the back of her own hand. That was why, excessive word was unnecessary. With the resoluteness that this would be the last, Yue roared her magic power and poured strength into ‘Holy Severance’.



Metal particles converged on Hajime’s hand. What he was transmuting was a single bullet. There was nothing special in it at all, it was just a mere bullet.



However, there Hajime gritted his teeth audibly. And then with a ‘puih’ he spat out something, the last concept magic that he crammed and hid in one of his teeth――Reject All Existences(Anything and Everything, Just Disappear)



That concept magic which was thought to be lost together with the breaking down of the chain where it was enchanted in, Hajime somehow managed to use Convergence Transmutation to secure some of it even though he could only gather about the amount of his pinky finger, he then processed it and put it at the back of his teeth beforehand. It was for the sake of this time.



Hajime himself was surprised that the concept still remained when he gathered it even after the chain turned into very small pieces, but surely that showed just how extreme the emotion of emptiness that he felt when Yue was taken away. It was a terrifyingly deep emotion.



To the very end, the Blade of Blood Pledge and the Bullet of Blood Pledge were for the sake of rescuing Yue. Therefore, since the start, the finishing blow was intended to be carried out by this bullet of concept, filled with the pure wish of destruction. The tooth was small, but nevertheless it was emitting a definite presence, using transmutation the bullet was then got coating by it.



{That’s-}



“The reason Aruvheit died wasn’t because he was a god. He was merely got dragged into my rampage when I snapped because you all laid your hand on Yue, that’s all. Something like the concept of godslaying, there is no way I can create something like that don’t you think?”



{You, you basta――}



Hajime corrected the misunderstanding that Ehitorujue had.



That whether it was Ehitorujue, or whether it was Aruvheit, Hajime didn’t oppose them because they were ‘god’ that acted tyrannically in this world.



They incurred the wrath of Nagumo Hajime.



That was all there was to it, the reason that Ehitorujue and his conspirators got ruined.



Being informed that implicitly, Ehitorujue lost his words. Because he noticed, that for Hajime, there was not that much difference between him the god and the random monster that attacked Hajime.



Regardless of the overwhelming gap in power between them, but Hajime’s attitude against Ehitorujue was exactly the same like how he treated all the opponents that came to crush him until now. That was, ‘you are the enemy so I’ll kill you’. Truly there was nothing special or anything in how Hajime acted against this god.



{Do, don’t screw, you bastard-}



Ehitorujue talked with babbling words. The humiliation he felt was too great, and not only that, the concept that was now aimed at him was too atrocious, the black purpose that wanted to destroy Hajime right now without delay and his instinct that wanted to run away right now were struggling inside him.



That hesitation became fatal for him.



“This is checkmate, small fry.”



With fearlessly crooked lips, Hajime loaded the bullet he held in his mouth into the derringer pistol, and then he pulled the trigger without hesitation along with some sharp words. The loaded Existence Rejection bullet became a crimson flash that was fired. Yue made the barrier to be able to be passed through with a superb timing, regardless of the bombardment of light, the attack of destruction was annihilating what it touched from the outset.



Although it was too late, Ehitorujue chose the option to evade which displayed his unease but…



“I command under the name of Yue-, ‘Don’t move’!”



{Ridiculous-}



After having her body taken over, Yue felt the flow of power inside the body many times over, she watched and listened to its result. For the genius of magic that was counted as a part of the strongest people in a war-torn era when she was merely a ten years old, there was no reason that she would be unable to do that.



Her magic power had already reached the very bottom. But, so what, she scolded her mind that was blacking out with her strength of will, she forcefully twisted her body that was pleading to her that it was the limit and squeezed out magic power, she also circulated the magic power that she was consuming for ‘Holy Severance’ and activated the magic――Divine Statement.



Surely Ehitorujue never thought that his own magic would be used back on him even in his wildest dream. Compared to the Divine Statement that Ehitorujue used, what Yue used was somewhat of a shoddy quality, however, it still splendidly restrained the target.



{I am-, I am the god!! Irregulaaaaaar!!!}



A shriek.



The crimson flash of ruin approached. Even though there was no face, but it was clear to see. Ehitorujue right now was showing an expression of terror. The impossible scene, the unbelievable reality, the sound of his path that he believed, without a doubt, would continue for eternity was crumbling fragilely resounded.



However, no matter how much he was denying reality, no matter how godly he was, even though he yelled how absolute he was…emotionlessly, heartlessly, irrationally, the murderous roar that the monster raised destroyed anything and everything in this world.



That was the reality.



Therefore,



{――—!!!!!!}



The crimson flash pierced through the torrent of light, erased the shriek, smashed the gruesome future――and penetrated the mad god’s chests.



Soundlessly, the crimson flash disappeared toward the faraway white space.



The torrent of light dispersed, Ehitorujue trailed his hand on the hole gaping wide open in his chest. And then, he raised a wordless scream while his hands moved as though tearing off his chest, or possibly desperately attempting to plug off the hole, exposing a state that even made anyone felt pity to him.



{aaAA, ridiculous…such thing…impossible}



Although he leaked out words that denied the reality, his body of light was still crumbling with the hole on his chest as the center of the breaking down.



And then, at the end, with one more whisper of “…impossible”, the light humanoid form that was Ehitorujue melted into empty air and vanished.



The radiance of ‘Holy Severance’ melted into the empty air at the same time before Yue limply fell down and sat on the ground femininely.



Hajime slowly lowered down the small gun.



Silence wrapped the area.



Other than the slightly rough breathing of Hajime and Yue, there was no sound at all.



Yue earnestly lifted up her eyelids that were trying to close even now while slowly looking back over her shoulder with a smile.



Toward that, Hajime too returned a smile…it was at that moment,



“Yue-!”



“――”



Hajime’s impatient voice resounded in warning.



To that Yue held her breath, at the same time a weird shrike that sounded unthinkable to come from this world resounded.



――aaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!!



At the same time, an invisible violent impact became a storm that attacked the two.



Unable to even resist Yue was sent flying, sending her on Hajime’s chest with her back to him. Haijme immediately circled his hand around Yue and twisted his body, covering her from the shockwave with his own body.



Thunderous sound.



That was the sound of the tiered gallery Hajime was half buried into getting pulverized into small pieces. It was lucky that he wasn’t pressed by the impact onto the chalk white wall, but it didn’t change that the abnormal shockwave was showering on him.



Hajime kept covering Yue in his embrace while he got blown away like a leaf toyed by a storm along with the wreckages of the tiered gallery, he then got bounced on the ground many times before he finally stopped.



“Guh, gahah, Yue-…”



“…Nnh, Ha, jime…”



Hajime called to Yue while vomiting blood everywhere. Yue only got a little damage because Hajime covered for her, but even so she seemed to be injured to the degree that she was unable to properly move.



Both of them linked their hand together and somehow stood up by supporting each other. And then, they observed the surrounding while sweating coldly.



“Oi oi, what the hell is that…”



“Haa haa…looks like…the Holy Precincts itself, get affected.”



Exactly as Yue said, here and there cracks entered the white space, there were also spots that looked twisted like jelly, showing that the space was clearly getting unstable. At the distorted spots, sights of unknown worlds, familiar worlds, and the scene of the surface were projected and disappeared, the sceneries were repeatedly projected and vanished.



And then, the source of the weird shriek and tremendous shockwave was…



“…Actually, the last boss, still has two transformations left…is this something like that? Well, in a sense, this is a normal template though.”



“…Nn. He is, already, just a monster…”



At the place where Hajime and Yue’s gaze were directed, clad in muddy black miasma that was being spouted out from the distorted space, or possibly it was absorbing the miasma, even now the thing that was Ehitorujue was raising a strange shrieking voice.



{uuu, AA, aa–――}



As though getting attracted by that extremely unpleasant groan which rubbed the mind of the listener the wrong way, miasma was gathering endlessly from the distorted space at the surrounding, from inside the miasma they could perceive figures that seemed to be monster or apostle. But, all those figures were being sucked into Ehitorujue without showing any resistance at all while staring blankly into empty air.



And then, there was more unpleasant sound resounding. *beki-, gokyu, gucha, boki-* Just like the sound of bone and bone grinding at each other, or like flesh and flesh crushing each other, graphic sounds were echoing from inside the miasma.



At the same time, intermittent words were spreading with echoes.



――Don’t want…to die-, don’t want, to…di…e



――Why…eno, ugh…you, said…I don’t, understand…don’t, want…to, die-



――Etern, nal……ly…everything…



――Go, d…I, be…come…god, already…ye, t…why…



――Mis…taken, no…..such, thing, I, am the…



――O, bey…everything…..break…sma, sh…



――Cho…ke, ye…ll…lament…gri, ef…



――Don’t, want…don’t, wanna…di, e-



Those words were an obsession to life, a deep resentment toward others, a childish self-righteousness, a vulgar self-conceit, merely an inexcusable outburst of anger.



But, whether it was the feeling of not wanting to die, or even the feeling of wanting to become alone and destroy anything and everything…it was something that he really didn’t want to acknowledge that he felt disgusted from the bottom of his heart but, Hajime could understand those feelings completely.



His heart changed at the bottom of the abyss thinking that other people were worthless, he pawed on the ground to survive even by slurping blood and flesh. When Yue was stolen, he rampaged wildly and even created a concept that brought about extreme destruction from his empty feeling.



“…That is, by some chance, if I…wasn’t able to meet Yue and others…that――”



Might be me. The lips of Hajime that were going to murmur that were blocked by the slender index finger of Yue.



And then, she silently shook her head and gently denied it with a whispering voice.



“…Hajime is different from that. …Even that thing, surely had people who thought of him, someone that he ought to reach out to, and also someone that reached out to him. The result of not looking back on those, is that.”



Yue’s crimson eyes gently squinted.



“…The path, Hajime has walked until now. That is Hajime’s everything.”



Even when his heart changed, the scream that was raised at the bottom of the abyss reached him. Even while saying that the matter of this world was inconsequential, in the end, he saved a lot of people. The path that he had walked like that stopped Hajime’s rampage.



That was why, even though the two might look similar, but the two of them were completely different.



That was why, Yue said, don’t look down on my Hajime.



She told that. Conveyed that to him.



“…If that’s what Yue said, then that must be so.”



“…Nn-“



Hajime made a wry smile from basking in sentimentality in the middle of this absolute great crisis of all place, and also from being scolded at this very late hour. Toward such Hajime, Yue also smiled gently.



Even while they were doing that, the thing that was Ehitorujue continued to spout out his selfish emotion that was unbearable to listen on, on the contrary, its soul was absorbing the miasma and the ruins of monsters and apostles with terrific momentum.



Ehitorujue was obviously losing sanity. Thinking from how the space was getting unstable, the cause wasn’t only because of the previous shockwave, obviously the cause was from Ehitorujue’s abnormality. In other words, that meant that the bullet of Existence Denial had certainly granted a lethal damage to Ehitorujue.



Even so he didn’t vanish, in his rejection he took in the miasma and the monsters into himself to compensate for his vanishing existence, this was surely Ehitorujue’s earnest desire of survival and the strength of his obsession for control.



Ehitorujue that could vanish anytime was holding out only with his tenacity, however, Hajime and Yue didn’t have any way to give him the finishing blow.



Their magic power had dried up, they were wounded all over and unable to even stand up properly.



The trump cards that Hajime prepared had been all used up. Hajime could do nothing but smiling bitterly toward that fact. Truly, this world’s difficulty level was a bit too hard to be expressed with the word of fantasy which was packed with dream and hope.



But, at that time, the miasma that was covering the area around Ehitorujue ruptured and blew off.



The thing that was Ehitorujue was still enveloped in whirling black mist, but now his full figure could be seen clearly.



“That is seriously a monster huh.”



“…Nn. Rather that looks pitiful.”



The impression of the two was frank.



What was there was a lump of meat. Flesh, bone, and skin of several races were haphazardly combined with limbs jutting out from the wriggling meat lump. Several tentacles were undulating, looking extremely grotesque. That figure would make people lost their sanity and felt like vomiting just by its appearance.



The thing that was Ehitorujue which was reduced into that meat lump suddenly shrieked.



――GiiaaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!!!



A storm immediately blew violently. Black miasma whirled, invisible shockwaves that centered on the meat lump blew away the chalk white ground.



The shockwave was emitted radially without any direction, even so it hid a force to the degree that even Hajime and Yue who were already thrown to considerable distance were blown away even further.



Hajime and Yue were blown away while leaking out agonized voice, even then their linked hands didn’t let go no matter what while they struck the ground. Hajime shrugged in exasperation even while his expression distorted from pain and he gave instruction to Yue.



“Yue, suck my blood.”



“…-, but”



“It’s fine.”



Hajime’s words made Yue hesitated. Hajime said that it was fine, but there was no way that was true. He was already bleeding to the degree until one of his feet was already inside the grave, or possibly it had already surpassed even that. The wound on his stomach and also the wounds on both his legs weren’t treated yet or anything. Hajime had tightened his muscles and held back his bleeding, but he was in a state that it wouldn’t be strange for his heart to stop anytime from bleeding too much.



He was holding on to his consciousness, and even now he was wracking his mind in order to survive, to kill his enemy, he was able to do those thanks to his tough body that could be earnestly titled as a monster. Even so his condition was really on the brink. If here Yue sucked his blood, that might really become the finishing blow for him.



At far away, Ehitorujue was raising a roar that shaved on sanity once more. The space fiercely distorted each time with the shockwave destroying the chalk white world. Furthermore, the undulating tentacles could also be seen wandering searching for prey. At this rate, it was clear they would die without doing anything. Even so, Yue was still hesitating, to that Hajime showed her a smile.



That smile, was the bold and fearless smile that always made Yue’s chest to tighten. His canine was bared, his eyes gleamed fiercely, the ally gave immense trust to that smile, and the enemy was granted with a traumatic shudder by that smile, the smile of the demon that made the vampire princess as its slave.



“Didn’t I tell you? This is the template. Do you think, that I didn’t foresee this kind of situation?”



“Hajime…”



“Indeed, all my trump cards are used up. However, there is still the prepared finished product, see?”



Yue already didn’t have any word. Aa, truly, this person that I loved…was really diabolical. Such feeling throbbed loudly in her chest, Yue leaked out a feverish breath and she nodded briskly.



And then, while she felt the sensation of Hajime’s arm that was embracing her tightly, she put her teeth on his neck. The flowing in blood recovered Yue’s magic power for just slightly――no, at the next moment, a terrific pulsation came. *dokun dokun*, a really slight amount of blood that normally wouldn’t do anything for her was now restoring Yue with a momentum that was far surpassing the effect of ‘Blood Pledge Contract’ or anything else.



The reason for that was one.



――Yue exclusive artifact Nagumo Hajime



Blood that had the effects to sublimate Yue’s ‘Blood Pledge Contract’ by several levels, to make the skill ‘Limit Break’ be possible, and then with the iron content of the blood abundantly bestowed with the ingredient of cheatmate, such blood liquid was flowing inside Hajime’s body.



By assuming a situation where he lost all his artifacts, where the taken back Yue was in exhaustion, and in addition the Bullet of Denial Existence was unable to kill the opponent, Hajime prepared himself to be the exclusive artifact of Yue. Exactly like the naming, this artifact was a secret treasure class artifact that brought about power and recovery which surpassed even the god water limited only for Yue.



“…Nna”



Feeling the extremely sweet and burning pleasure from inside her body, Yue unintentionally leaked out a heavy gasp. But as though sensing that recovery of Yue, countless tentacles shot out with a blur from Ehitorujue. The tips of those tentacles were sharp, what they touched would surely get pierced in one attack.



Yue separated her mouth from Hajime’s neck and she directed one of her hands like a shield toward the approaching tentacles. Immediately, the space before her eyes distorted.



The tentacles rushed there.



But, all of them didn’t reach the two. It was because the distorted space swallowed everything. No, more accurately the tentacles were dismissed into another space.



In order to build a reliable defense using little magic power, Yue made use of the unstable space. Yue didn’t have the power to create a gate using space magic from zero that shut out the space, and so, in that case she just needed to create a gate to a different world using the space that was already shaking. If it was only expanding a hole in space that was already open, then it wouldn’t consume that much strength.



After Yue confirmed that the barrier of space dismissal had displayed a reliable effect, she moved her gaze to Hajime once more.



Hajime’s eyes were beginning to lose focus slightly. As expected, his limit was coming just by sucking the slight amount of blood just now. His face was growing pale, even now his consciousness looked like it would fell off anytime along with his eyelids. He was in a state that was barely clinging on consciousness by concentrating on the pain of his wound.



To Yue who was supporting his body, Hajime talked to her with a hoarse voice, nevertheless strength could be felt from that voice without any sign of giving up.



“Yue…you can, recover me…to a certain degree, right?”



“…Nn”



“I have…no card left. But…if there, is none――”



“…it just needs to be made.”



Understanding Hajime’s intention, Yue manipulated the space while continuing his sentence. To that Hajime made a faint smile and continued.



“…Destroy, that guy――”



“The concept, will be created right now. But, with only the magic power of me alone, it’s still insufficient.”



“With metamorphosis…magic. Make me――”



“-…subordination. Because there is blood in me”



Hajime grinned widely. This plan that made her wondered just how far he had predicted, and then the great recklessness in it, yet with his tremendous faith to her as the premise of the plan right from the start, made Yue unable to say anything anymore.



“…The material?”



“My, eye.”



Obeying Hajime’s instruction, Yue’s slender fingers were held aloft above Hajime’s right eye, and then, the fingers plunged in all at once. A groan slightly leaked from Hajime, but Yue unhesitatingly pulled out her fingers while her lips tightened into a straight line.



On her palm was a small bluish-white crystal. The magic eye stone.



“Yue…plea, se.”



“…Nn. Leave it to me.”



Like that the rite of metamorphosis began.



In order to obtain the necessary magic power, Yue sucked Hajime’s blood further which weakened him more and more. Hajime looked really frail that it wouldn’t be strange for his heartbeat to stop anytime.



But, the moment Yue’s hand touched Hajime’s chest, fierce heartbeat sound resounded as though an electric shock had just been applied there. *dokun, dokun!* Pulsating heartbeat was increasing in strength second by second.



That was a magic that transformed Hajime into a vampire just like Yue. It had the same principle like how Tio transformed another monster into her underling. If a frail and delicate human that was different from monster was used, normally that human wouldn’t come out of it safely, not to mention if it was a metamorphosis magic that changed a human’s race, the difficulty was of the highest degree.



From how Tio who was an expert of characteristic magic dragonification which had the origin from metamorphosis magic needed the black slave whip for assisting her success, it was clear to see just how difficult this grand magic was. And now Yue who wasn’t particularly skilled at metamorphosis magic was using something like that to a human target without any training beforehand.



Yue was a rare genius, but this magic had the possibility of success existed only because the target was Hajime who possessed inhuman toughness in body and mind. No, surely from the beginning Hajime who proposed this method was convinced that this would succeed. It was because of his trust from the bottom of his heart toward Yue.



The meat lump of Ehitorujue could be felt approaching lumpingly from far away. That was surely the countdown toward their death.



Because Yue split her strength for the metamorphosis magic, her control of the space became lax and several tentacles began to graze their body.



But, even in such an extreme situation, her beloved monstrous partner perfectly responded and bewitched her.



“Yu, e-“



“…Nn. Come here, Hajime.”



Hajime exposed his canine tooth with his pupil dyed crimson like Yue’s, and he bit at Yue’s smooth nape that looked so slender it felt like it would break when touched. And then, Hajime converted the blood into strength using the special trait of the vampire.



“…Nnaa”



Each time Hajime’s throat sounded, a sweet feverish breath escaped Yue’s mouth.



Even though she understood that strength was leaving her body, and even though she understood that now wasn’t the time for that, “more”, yet she was thinking of something like that.



Amidst the resounding sweet gasping voice, Hajime’s magic power was recovering in the proportion of the amount of blood flowing out.



However, Yue thought while feeling impatience.



(Not enough…)



Yes, it wasn’t enough. It really wasn’t enough to create a concept magic no matter what. With an amount of magic power that was even far from enough for Hajime’s complete recovery, it wouldn’t be sufficient to create a concept for finishing off the monster of the Holy Precincts which was getting close to them even now.



The limit of the blood flowing inside her would reach the limit soon. She was also grasping the amount of Hajime’s recovery. At this rate, they would have no other choice than putting a stake of sink or swim with their insufficient magic power. In addition that stake would be one with a considerably bad odd.



“It’s fine. Do you think, that the artifact(me) which is dedicated to you is only at this level?”



Perhaps looking at the impatience displayed on her face, Hajime who separated from Yue’s neck was saying such thing while he leaned forward to plunder Yue’s lips this time. And then, “nnu” Yue’s lip that was leaking small voice was wounded by Hajime’s canine tooth, at the same time, Hajime’s own lip also got cut.



Like that, while they were kissing each other repeatedly, it came.



*GOU-!!*



Magic power swelled up with terrific force.



The magic power that should be a step from drying up burst out from Yue and whirled in gold color. At the same time, a tremendous magic power that was unimaginable coming from the recovery amount just now also burst up from Hajime. With the two as the center, a torrent of magic power climbed as though piercing the heaven, no, it was actually piercing the space of Holy Precincts and pierced toward the heaven with violent blowing.



Golden and crimson entangled with each other, as though expressing the relationship between the two people, they mixed with each other, forming a complete harmony that raged violently.



――Particle style artifact ‘Vow of Entwined Branch’



Hajime’s blood that was turned into an artifact, and the metal particle that Yue took into her body. This metal particle was actually an artifact that activated only when under the prescribed condition. The effect and activation condition of this artifact was, the two who had tied the contract of blood pledge could then convert blood into power in a chain reaction with the two of them turned into artifact for each other and they exchanged blood with each other. The strengthening effect would continue endlessly until they stopped exchanging blood(kissing).



“…ahn”



The swelling power, and the happiness of intermingling with her beloved, it caused Yue to moan while her body was trembling. Hajime was also in the same state. The vampire princess in his embrace was so hopelessly lovely that he slightly repeated the blood tasted kiss.



The former shadow of Ehitorujue had arrived until right nearby them. It emitted an immense shockwave along with its tentacles.



――aaaAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!!!



Toward that, Yue canceled the distorted space without even directing her eyes there.



She did that because she understood that such thing wasn’t necessary anymore. To display that, the golden and crimson magic power towered high like a protective wall. And then, at the next moment, the magic power released a tremendous shockwave that neutralized all shockwaves from the meat lump. It was the ‘Impact Conversion’ by Hajime.



Even during that time, the two were still gluing earnestly close with each other.



The figure of the Holy Precincts monster that was left alone, to be frank was pitiful.



Unable to forgive that, Ehitorujue increasingly emitted an extremely unpleasant strange sound while unleashing severe attacks.



While repelling all of those with magic power impact, Hajime and Yue who were accompanied by the tremendous magic power that already swelled up to the degree that it might destroy the white space, slowly separated their lips. The silver bridge hanging down between the two looked really captivating.



The sweet atmosphere of the two already far surpassed the territory of being out of place, however, people who could obstruct them didn’t exist anywhere in this world.



Both of them kept hugging, their hands softly overlapped. Between them there was the magic eye stone that was partly made from god crystal, and the tiny gun that Hajime didn’t let go at all even when they were sent flying.



And then, Hajime’s trump card(commonness) was chanted.



“’Transmute’!”



Right after that, golden and crimson melted into each other, and light so bright as though a sun was created manifested.



That beautiful and powerful radiance made the Ehitorujue monster to writhe and draw back. It was as though it hated that warm light.



The light was converging.



At its other side, there was the figure of Hajime pushing out his hand toward Ehitorujue with fierce eyes that glared sharply. A small gun was clutched in that hand.



The terrible exhaustion was causing the worn-out right hand to tremble all over, unable to fix the aim. That hand was scooped out from below softly and supported by a graceful hand. It was Yue’s hand.



While snuggling close to each other, both of them readied a single small gun. The running sparks were crimson and golden. The sure-kill bullet that would end everything was buzzing, impatiently waiting to be fired.



What was filled into that bullet was unmistakably a concept magic.



――GIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII-!!!



Ehitorujue madly unleashed its tentacles. It instinctually comprehended the mighty power that was aimed at it.



But, there was no way such random attack could go through the golden and crimson the two were clad in, all of those were easily swept away by the impact of magic power.



And then,



“Giving victory to a man with a kiss, that’s really heroine-like huh, Yue.”



“…Nn. Hajime plucking off the victory at the end without fail, is just like a hero.”



Both of them were talking frivolously while aiming the brilliantly shining gun right at the middle of Ehitorujue.



“Well, putting that aside, there is one thing I want to say to that.”



“…Nn-“



For a moment, both of their eyes met. The fearless smile was floating on their respective face.



The spoken words were the concept of the newborn concept, the words that returned the favor toward the repeated calamities that were wretchedly forced on them. And then, surely, these words also represented the feeling of the people that were toyed around by Ehitorujue in the past.



“ “――The Scattered Pains Right Back Toward You(now you really have done it you shitty bastard-)” “



Soundlessly, a streak of light cut through the air.



That stabbed right in the middle of Ehitorujue without the slightest deviation.



Concept magic The Scattered Pains Right Back Toward You――this magic returned all the pain and wounds that the target had given to other people until now.



Just like the holy man that was once pierced by a holy spear on the hill of Golgotha, the thing that was once a god spurted out blood in a large amount from the wound opening. Although, the flowing out blood wasn’t something holy like that holy man, but something muddy black which looked sticky and unpleasant.



While the lump of meat was crumbling, the agglutinated mere shadow of Ehitorujue a beat later was,



――GIAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA



It raised a hair-rising shriek.



And then at the next moment, flesh and blood exploded to everywhere, silver magic power mixed with muddy black miasma climbed to the sky.



That was undoubtedly the scream of the death agony of the mad god. The repeated inhumanity that it had piled up for a few thousand years, or possibly tens of thousands of years were all returned to its own body. Although it had been reduced to a monster without any reasoning, it surely felt the pain of tens of thousands of years within an instant where even the torment of hell would feel lukewarm in comparison.



The flash that contained a shriek within pulverized the space, and it came out to the familiar dark red space at the other side.



Without any doubt, that must be the last scenery of Ehitorujue, the god of this world.



“…”



“…”



Hajime and Yue had no word.



They were merely staring at the last light of Ehitorujue that was vanishing toward the empty space that was gradually getting smaller. The gun their hand was holding couldn’t endure the burden and crumble into pieces.



The palms that weren’t holding anything now naturally held each other, their faces looked at each other. The magic power was already dispersing and the area around the two was quiet. Both of them had used up their stamina and magic power and everything else, they supported each other’s body leaning to one another and embraced the other party closely. And then, they smiled softly.



Perhaps because the creator of the place was gone, the white space began to rumble. The unstable space was gradually getting stormy, here and there breaking down was starting. Hajime ascertained the state of the surrounding and themselves and then he opened his mouth with a bitter expression.



“This is, bad. This doesn’t seem, to be the time, for looking…melancholic.”



“…Nn. Hajime, you can stand?”



“…Chih, my legs…not just that, my whole body, cannot move satisfactorily. Yue, you?”



“…Just sitting…take my all”



Both of them looked at each other and smiled wryly. It appeared that the true pinch only came after they consigned the god to oblivion.



“My bad, Yue. …The truth is, after killing Ehito, I planned, to wait for recover…and then used the particles…for creating gate key but…”



“…Nn. Doesn’t seem we will have that much time. There is, not even a drop of blood left to exchange.”



“Yeah. Besides…the particles themselves, are swallowed…by the unstable space, there is none remaining. At the worst case, I expected to use…the bone of the arm, or the leg…to make one-time use artifact…but…”



The crumbling of Holy Precincts was too fast that they wouldn’t make it in time if they wait for recovery, that caused Hajime’s expression to turn sour as though he had bitten a bitter bug. It wasn’t like he hadn’t imagined it, but Ehitorujue’s excessive obstinacy was to the degree that made Hajime had no extra leeway, that he had to pour all his strength to defeat him. Because of that, the composure to spare some recovery medicine, and also the blood for magic power conversion had run out already.



At the very end, Hajime curse inside his heart to himself “I’m an idiot”, however, there was not even a bit of despair in himself.



“To end…after coming this far…is unacceptable. We are going home, even if we need to crawl-“



“…Nn-“



They lent each other their shoulder and advanced bit by bit literally by crawling on the crumbling white world. They were walking slowly without any progress, but there wasn’t even a drop of the color of resignation in their eyes.



Even so, the reality was always callous, the crumbling of the surrounding was getting increasingly intense, approaching to swallow them altogether with their determination. Ahead of Hajime’s gaze, there was a veil of light that appeared unnoticed. That was the exit and entrance of this space.



The crumbling was approaching. Death was sneaking near. They desperately advance toward the veil of light.



But, the veil of light collapsed before their eyes.



“Shit-“



“…Hajime.”



Witnessing the path of their escape vanishing into sands, a curse leaked out spontaneously from Hajime’s mouth. The hand of Yue that was grasping Hajime’s hand clutched tightly to soothe him that was like that.



“…We are blocked from every direction. What’s left, is only…to gamble.”



“…Nn. Leap into, the crumbling space.”



There was already no other choice but that. Just like what Shia and others almost did, Hajime and Yue would also aim for the scenery of the surface that became visible sometimes and leaped right toward the crumbling space itself in a desperate gamble.



But, no matter how it was unthinkable that they would have future by doing that. It was a mad attempt that wouldn’t even be a gamble. If an example had to be made, it was something like someone who was holding a bomb was trying to skillfully use the explosion so they might be able to be sent flying to far away. Even before thinking about being sent flying, there was no assurance that they wouldn’t be turned into small pieces beforehand.



But, even so they didn’t have the slightest intention to give up.



“…Yue.”



“Nn?”



“I love you.”



“Nn-, me too…I love you.”



With a calm condition that was unthinkable to come from people who were in front of a crumbling space, both of them expressed their feeling to each other. At last, the safe spot also became gone. The crack was also entering into the spot where the two were at.



Like that, *creak* an unpleasant sound resounded below them, both of them resolved themselves and they were going to leap into the space where the surface was visible, it was at that moment



{Choa―――! Appearing at a miraculous timiiing, the beautiful warrior, Miledy Raisen-tan☆ Has arrived! The one who is calling for me is you two isn’t ittt? Isn’t ittt?}



Something came out.



“ “…” “



Hajime and Yue’s eyes turned into dot spontaneously.



However, without paying any mind to such pair, the intruder opened her mouth with jetting up tension.



{What’s with thiiiisss, even though I have come with great pain to save you two from something like a piiinchhh, just where is the reactiooonn. Miledy-chan is going to cry here! I’m going to go hics hics, glance glance you knooow?}



“…Annoying.”



“…Nn. This is certainly Miledy.”



The staggering annoyingness finally lets the two to accept the spectacle in front of their eyes as reality. And then when they looked around, it seemed that the crumbling had been held back before they realized it.



“This is…your doing?”



{Fufun, I guess. Something this much is really easy for the liberator Miledy-chaaannn. Although I say that, it won’t last for more than several minutes though☆}



“…By any chance, you can, escape?”



{But of courseee! I came here after tossing away Rabbit-chan and others to the surface already see☆ What’s left is only you two pyon! As expected, me! What an able woman-! Yes, applause applause!}



The smiley mask was sparkling with some kind of mechanism while saying that kind of thing, putting aside how annoying the words were, the two of them were seriously feeling admiration and gratitude to Miledy. But at the same time, Hajime and Yue also became endlessly vexed.



But, Miledy’s next words broke the half-smiling face of the two.



{Hoi, this is the Degraded Arrow of World Crossing, the last one of it. It’s a defective product that is usable only in this kind of unstable space, but it should be enough for escaping. Next, a healing medicine for service! This should recover you to the degree that you can activate the arrow’s ability pyon! After you two drink that quickly gooo from here! Gooo! Leave the rest to Onee-san okaaayyy☆}



“…And you? You aren’t, going to get out with us?”



Glancing at the thrown Degraded Arrow of World Crossing which Yue caught, Hajime threw his question at Miledy. Because from her speech it was as though Miledy was going to stay behind in this crumbling space.



That guess appeared to be correct.



{Yep, I’m staying hereeee. If this kind of codswallop space is left alone, the surface will also get swallowed and cause a chaining crumbling after all. I’m going to straighten this up.}



“…From how, you speak…it’s like you are going to die here.”



Thanks to the healing medicine, Hajime had recovered to a degree that he could indeed activate the artifact, he then asked with a tone that had turned somewhat smoother.



Miledy answered to that question frankly.



{Yep. My, the plan is for my Super Secret☆Magic to guide the crumbling of Holy Precincts and compress it pon pon. The space is on the verge of breaking down, if this body of mine and my soul are used as a medium to magnify my magic power then it will be enough. That’s why, I’ll end here.}



“Self-sacrifice? That doesn’t suit you. Rather than that――”



Hajime whose nerves were rubbed the wrong way by the resigned speech was going to argue vehemently, but then a blonde beautiful girl around fourteen, fifteen years old appeared overlapping the Miledy-golem. It seemed to be the projection of soul, this must be the original appearance of Miledy.



In contrast with her joking around tone, that girl figure of Miledy was putting an extremely satisfied and also gentle expression toward Hajime and Yue.



{This is juuust self-satisfaction. My promise with my comrades, with my important people――’Let’s destroy the evil god and save the world!’ reaalllly, that sounds like a fairy tale and it looks stupid, but we exchanged that promise seriously, I want to fulfill it, that’s all pyon.}



“…”



{At that time, we couldn’t do anything and lost, everyone became scattered, but thinking ‘even so’, we created the great labyrinths…right now, in this time, in this place, is where I’ll use my whole strength for the sake of people, this is exactly the reason that I survive for this long mon.}



Hajime and Yue listened quietly to Miledy’s words that sounded like a monolog. The reason Miledy wanted to do this wasn’t because she wanted to bask in the joy of cheap self-satisfaction, they comprehended that right now in this time, Miledy was going to realize the feeling that she had continued to hold in her heart from so far in the past that they couldn’t even imagine.



Looking at such pair, Miledy narrowed her eyes with even more and more gentleness.



{Thank you, Nagumo Hajime-kun, Yue-chan. For granting our dearest wish. For using our magic correctly.}



“…Nn. Miledy. Your magic is the most useful.”



{Kufufu, naturally! After all it’s me! What I said before was also like that right? ‘As long as you keep being you, you will achieve godslaying without fail’, I said.}



“…’You can just live following your wish. After all, your choice will surely be the best for this world’, you also said that. Was my choice the best for this world?”



{Of course! Presently, after all, that shitty bastard has been blown away until beyond that world, and I am right here! And then this dreg of a life can be used now for the sake of people following my oath. …Finally, I can head to where everyone is in peace.}



Surely if this was a flesh body than glittering things would be overflowing from the corner of Miledy’s eyes. That was just how intense the flood of emotions that Miledy’s words were filled with, which made them thought that.



{Nooow, both of you. Soon it will be the limit for me to hold back the crumbling pyon. You two need to return back to the place of the people waiting for you. I too, will head toward the place where there are people waiting for me.}



The stagnating space was beginning to rumble once more.



Even while staggering, Hajime and Yue stood up somehow thanks to the healing medicine, the two of them activated the Degraded Arrow of World Crossing that was clutched by Yue’s hand while staring back straight at Miledy.



“…Miledy Raisen. My greatest respect to you. Many months and years have elapsed, yet, there is not a single scratch on that strength of will. That determination is the best article under the heaven beyond any doubt. Oscar Orcus. Naiz Guryuen. Mail Meljine. Laus Vaan. Ryuteris Haltina. Vandour Shune. I will never forget, you and your important people.”



“…Nn. There wasn’t a single thing, of the path of the struggles of you all that was pointless. We will impart it to the next generation, without fail.”



{Both of you…wha, what’s with you twoooo. Like that, I, cannot say anything at all! If you said something like that! Come on, this is really the limit! Just get lost already, get lost!}



Her expression looked embarrassed somehow, and yet it also seemed to be almost overwhelmed with emotion. Miledy faced away with a huff and she waved her hand to shoo them off.



The rumbling was getting fiercer and fiercer, the crumbling was beginning to approach once more.



Hajime and Yue displayed a faint smile at Miledy who wouldn’t meet their eyes while advancing to the edge of the crumbling chalk white surface. And then, they nodded at each other.



“Good bye, protector of the world.”



“…Sayonara.”



Saying that the two leaped down toward the crumbling space that looked like an abyss.



Miledy that was left behind sighed “Fuuuu”.



{Protector of the world, is it. Thaaat feels itchy. Saying that at the very end, is just foul. …Should I think of it, like a payback or something.}



While talking to herself, a black whirling sphere was created with her body as the center. While the sphere was sparking with something like black thunder, Miledy quietly lifted her gaze to the center of the black star of calamity.



Before she knew it, there, she could see the figures of her important people that didn’t lose color no matter who many months and years passed.



{Everyone…}



There was no word that came back. Perhaps this was the revolving lantern before one’s death, or just her hallucinating.



But, such thing was inconsequential.



{What, so you all came to pick me up. Ehehe, then, perhaps I should say it. Finally, I guess I can say it!}



The star of calamity was swallowing anything and everything at the surrounding. Other magic like ‘Severance Calamity’ or whatever couldn’t compare with this. It swallowed everything and pulverized them inside, yes, so to speak this was a black hole.



While the golem artifact which was used as the medium was vanishing without a trace, Miledy’s soul yelled with a voice and expression that were the very picture of innocence.



{Everyoneee, I’m homeee――!!}



At the next moment, the white space was soundlessly annihilated along with all light.



Part 2



The silver angels were falling down to the ground one after another like falling star, the dark red world was rumbling unceasingly, above where the sky should be visible originally, reversed other worlds could be seen wobbling dangerously. Those reversed many worlds could be seen starting to crumble from a glance.



The end of the world.



Such words passed through the brain of the people of the allied force. Even though the apostles who wielded furious might had stopped functioning, but they honestly couldn’t feel happy because of the scream that the world raised which they felt.



“Aa, god…”



Someone whispered so.



In front of the collapse of the world, the sword in their hand felt really tiny. Everyone was merely staring at the shaking above worlds in a daze without being able to do anything else.



At that time, a dignified voice resounded. It wasn’t someone like a god that couldn’t be seen or anything. But it was someone who was right on their side, the ‘Goddess of Harvest’ that had struggled through the line of death together with them――the voice of Hatayama Aiko.



{Everyone, there is no need to despair! That person is over there! Right now, even in this moment, he should be fighting that evil god! The apostles falling, the worlds in the sky breaking, they all are the proof of the evil god’s suffering! That’s why-, let’s pray! For the victory of that person! For the victory of mankind-! Now, match your voice! Let’s show our will!}



The battlefield fell as silent as grave.



Aiko’s words weren’t something that came from the speech compilation Hajime gave her. The proof of that could be seen from how she was calling Hajime as ‘that person’ rather than ‘my sword’. It was undoubtedly a yell that came from Aiko’s own heart. Those words displayed Aiko’s will that believed on the safety of Hajime and others, and also of their victory.



The one who responded first was Liliana.



{To victory-!}



The lovely voice which was amplified with artifact echoed on the battlefield.



And then, the one who hailed at that voice with a blood soaked figure yet powerful yell was Gahard.



{To victory-!!}



Continuing after him, Karm, Adol, and Alfrerick yelled.



{To victory-!!!}



In that situation, the people’s heart was connecting to each other naturally.



――To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-! To victory-!



A Loud chorus of victory resounded in the battlefield. It swallowed the rumbling of the space, numbed the ground, and reached to the heaven, the will of ‘human’ swept the darkness and rose up like the light of the sun.



Human, demi-human, human from another world, those classifications were irrelevant, yells for their victory, and then yells of their faith for the people fighting at the heavens, they were all repeated with impossibly beautiful harmony.



Amidst those, one person didn’t join the chorus and stared wholeheartedly to the sky, a black angel. It was Kaori who was looking forward to the return of Hajime and others believing in Miledy. She kept floating midair and continued to stare at the collapsing Holy Precincts as though she could see nothing else.



And, at that time, Kaori’s senses was caught by something.



The place was, around the sky at the collapsed God Mountain.



She returned to her senses in surprise and turned her gaze there. The space about eight kilometers above the God Mountain distorted like jelly, right after that an elliptical hole opened with a pop. It was a distance that normal human couldn’t perceive, the hole itself was also only as big as several people could go through it so nobody other than Kaori noticed it.



Driven by her premonition, Kaori flapped her jet black wings. At the same time, with *hyupo-!* silhouette of people flew out from that hole.



“Aa――!!”



“NuOOOOOO!!”



White and black shadows. Even from afar she understood that those were her comrades’ figures.



“Shia-, Tio!”



Kaori accelerated in one go. For some reason Shia and Tio were falling straight toward the ground without any sign of slowing down. Kaori became a black silver meteor that rushed through the sky.



Midway, Shizuku and others flew out in panic riding their skyboard from the hole Shia and Tio fell off from, but for now Kaori didn’t stop accelerating and rapidly approached the screaming two people.



And then, Kaori splendidly caught the two altogether a few dozen meters near the ground. Looking closer, near the ground there was a shining barrier deployed that seemed to come from Suzu so it really wasn’t that big of a matter.



“Shia, Tio! Welcome back-!”



“Fue, a, Kaori-san! I’m back desu!”



“Thou saved us, Kaori. Also, I’m back.”



Shia and Tio clung at Kaori’s arms midair while sighing in relieve. Kaori flapped her wings and landed gently on the ground, she then gently put down the two on the ground where they sat with a flop.



There, Shizuku, Suzu, Ryutaro, and Kouki landed down from the sky.



“Kaori!”



“Shizuku-chan!”



Shizuku got off the skyboard and leaped toward Kaori. Kaori too caught Shizuku.



“Kaoriiiin! I’m back!”



“Suzu-chan. Welcome back!”



“Yo-, looks like you are also safe huh.”



“Ryutaro-kun too, welcome back.”



Still hugging Shizuku, Kaori then welcomed Suzu and replied to Ryutaro’s words smilingly. And then, she abruptly showed a soft smile at Kaori who was looking a bit awkward.



“Kouki-kun, welcome back.”



“…Yeah, I’m back. Really, sorry, for everything. Truly, sorry. Also…thank you.”



He had attacked Kaori at the devil king castle, because of that Kouki had resolved himself to not receive words of greeting. But now tears were gathering at the corner of his eyes and his head looked down. He was absolutely grateful that Kaori didn’t forsake him just like Shizuku. Of course, he wouldn’t make misunderstanding anymore.



After nodding once at such Kouki, Kaori looked up to the sky. And then, her gaze moved around searching for something. It was obvious who she was searching for.



“Kaori-san…..Hajime-san and Yue-san are not together with us.”



“Shia…that’s”



“Don’t fret, Kaori. We only separated in the middle because it was necessary. Goshujin-sama and also Yue, they will cometh back without fail.”



“Tio…”



Tio called at Kaori who was looking uneasy admonishingly.



After Miledy came for them, Shia and others received Degraded Arrow of World Crossing from her which opened a hole in space and they leaped into it.



Naturally when they heard that Miledy would go to Hajime and Yue right after, everyone said that they would go together with her. Shia, Tio, and Shizuku were especially determined, their blazing eyes told that it was impossible for them to escape ahead.



However, Degraded Arrow of World Crossing was necessary to cross space, there was no spare for them to go to Hajime and Yue’s position. Although there were several arrows that were created because they were failed work, but different from the real thing these degraded versions could only be used once before breaking and on top of that it could only open the hole for a few seconds.



In addition, the size of the hole that could be opened by the arrow was limited. It was unthinkable that they would have the leeway to pass through the hole in turn under a few second in a world that was collapsing with increasing momentum. Thinking that Haijme and Yue would be added for their return home, in the worst case the situation might turn into one where they would need to choose who would escape and who would be left behind.



In the end, Shia and others had to escape first. They were really reluctant though. They could do nothing but understand when they were told that perhaps not all of them could go back if they accompanied Miledy. Besides, “I swear I’ll send Hajime and Yue back without fail” the state of Miledy when she promised that was unusually filled with determination, that was also a factor that pushed their back to escape first.



Even so, there was no way their worry toward Hajime and Yue who were still in the collapsing Holy Precincts could vanish, Shia and Tio also looked up wordlessly to the sky. Shizuku and others were also similarly praying while looking up to the sky.



At the battlefield, the people of the allied force were still resounding their prayer powerfully.



It was unclear how much time passed. It felt like an eternity, but surely not even dozens of minutes had passed.



It was at that time, that happened.



“Ah”



The one who spontaneously raised that voice was Kaori.



Shia and others, and then the allied force too, ahead of their gaze a pillar of light that was a mix of golden and crimson suddenly pierced the space and stabbed at the sky.



That torrent of magic power which couldn’t be expressed enough even with the word tremendous, and then, the undulation of the overwhelming will that was filled in it, caused the war cry of the battlefield to stop unconsciously. Everyone without exception gazed in enchantment at the dichromatic magic power which ascended to the sky in spiraling motion.



“Hajime-san! Yue-san!”



Shia yelled, with a voice that overflowed with joy.



Right after that, the golden and crimson magic power began to converge back like in a playback.



And then,



A scream of death agony reverberated in the world. Immediately after, although the volume wasn’t to the degree that tore the eardrum, but, that voice of the end was certainly heard by everyone throughout the world. Without any reason, anyone thought, that it was the blood flowing out from the god.



Before long, a muddy silver light was dispersing toward the empty sky, and silence returned to the world.



What happened now, in the middle of everyone thinking that with their breath caught, the distortion of space covering the sky and the collapsing world of heavens that was visible in it, suddenly, they were all shrinking toward one point. It was as though something was sucking them all, or possibly it was like they were all being compressed.



The next moment, the world of heavens that was gathered into a point scattered.



There was no sound.



There was merely several layers of ripples with a vibrant color like the blue sky, radiating silently. Unnoticed, the rumble(scream) that shook the world stopped, the scared trembling of the ground also stopped.



Ripples were spreading through the world.



Not only the color of the blue sky, the color of the evening or possibly sunrise, the color of the midday sun, the clear color of the moon, the color of vivacious plants, the color of powerful earth, the color of enveloping night, they all laid on top of each other.



The beautiful ripples of seven colors spread to the end of the earth, before long, cracks began to enter the dark red world. That change wasn’t something violent that gave the impression like the crumbling just now, but a gentle change that quietly repainted the world…



“Aa…god”



Someone whispered. That wasn’t a prayer that wished for salvation anymore. But merely something that came from the deep emotion filling the chest.



The world was recovering its color. It was a truly a splendorous scene that should be called as a legend.



The dark red world was shining sparklingly while becoming broken fragments.



The ripples of the sky were gradually weakening in intensity, however, they didn’t vanish, as though watching over the people who were silently shedding tears drops by drops, it became a rainbow aurora drifting in the air.



“Hajime-kun…Yue…”



Amidst those, a voice that leaked out from between the clenched teeth resounded. Kaori clenched her hand so tightly it was bleeding while glaring at the annihilated Holy Precincts.



“Hajime…”



“Nagumo-kun.”



“Shit-, what’s going on-, that idiot-“



“Nagumo-“



Shizuku, Suzu, Ryutaro, Kouki, they gritted their teeth while facing the sky with a grim gaze. Tio too was looking up at the sky with narrowed gaze without averting her eyes even for a moment.



The dark red world vanished.



The sun began to illuminate the world with its natural radiance.



They waited for a long time, but the figure of the people they waited for couldn’t be seen.



Before long, that fact became unbearable and Suzu whispered.



“…This is a lie, right”



Ryutaro gritted his teeth hard.



“Damnit-“



Kouki opened his mouth in a daze.



“Don’t tell me…both of them…really, won’t co――”



And then, when that worst assumption was going to be said half unconsciously…



“It’s alright desu-!!”



Such electrifying loud voice interrupted.



Kouki and others returned to their senses suddenly and moved their gaze there. Over there, was the figure of Shia, her rabbit ears standing straight while she looked straight to the sky.



Shia didn’t avert her eyes from the sky and spoke with a voice that was full of conviction.



“Right now, Hajime-san and Yue-san are together desu. That entangled golden and crimson magic power is the proof. As long as they are together, they are invincible!”



That was why, they would blow away a mere difficult situation like this and came back with a smile. Those words which contained Shia’s immense faith became a power of words that resounded in the world. (TN: Power of words or soul of language. Called kotodama in Japan, some kind of believe that words which were said have some kind of power in them.)



Mysteriously, the heart of the people who were driven by unease became light.



“…..Yep. That’s right. With those two together, I cannot imagine any difficult that cannot be smashed through.”



Kaori was in agreement. It wasn’t a voice that was blurred with unease like before, but a powerful voice filled with conviction like Shia.



“Truly. Surely if those two become serious, the word ‘fail’ will be erased from dictionary. Rather, perhaps they art busy flirting right now that they art late to come back.”



Tio jokingly said such thing. And as expected, the grimness in her face was taken away and changed into conviction.



“Isn’t that right. They might, no, they are absolutely flirting right now. This is their emotional reunion after all. Perhaps the matter of us is already thrown to the beyond by them.”



While smiling wryly, Shizuku nodded thinking that it was probably the case. The way they talked also softened the expression of Suzu and others.



Right after that, as though to proof that the words of Shia and others were correct…



“Ah…fufu, see-“



Shia pointed her finger.



Over there was naturally…



Part 3



The rainbow aurora hanging in the sky. A small hole was opened between the veil.



“Uoh”



“…Nn-“



A silhouette of two people glued close to each other flew out from there along with shocked voice. It went without saying, they were Hajime and Yue.



Hajime firmly held Yue tightly with his one arm, Yue too also circled her hands around Hajime’s neck, clinging to him.



Like that, *gou-gou* while feeling the howling of wind on their ear, the two of them began freefalling leaving it to the gravity.



Based on the height it would be thirty seconds until the ground.



Hajime who was falling with his face up saw the mystical aurora they were rapidly distanced from and the distance to the ground that he confirmed by looking across his shoulder and instantly calculated. It seemed that the place they were going to impact was a spot slightly distanced from the allied force.



“Yue, can you fly?”



“…Impossible. Magic power was used up from the arrow’s activation.”



“Well, I guess that’s true. It’s going to be a bit rough, so hold on tight.”



“…Nn. I catch you. I absolutely won’t let go.”



“…”



While experiencing a skydiving without a parachute, Hajime and Yue conversed filled with composure like that. Listening and seeing Yue’s bewitching voice and gaze from very near like this, it couldn’t be helped that Hajime’s words got caught in his throat.



While being exposed against awful wind pressure midair, Hajime ignored his slightly ringing eardrum to the best of his ability and then rolled his stance while still holding Yue. And then, his body became clad in faint crimson magic power. With that he somehow controlled his badly balanced one armed body that was toyed around by the wind.



Although he had drunk recovery medicine, but the healed amount was insignificant. In the first place there was the effect from the depth of the damage he received and the creation of the concept magic that caused his magic power recovery to be slow. There was also a limit to the number of times he could use ‘Air Force’.



While he was controlling his posture, he had to land down on the ground by perfectly dropping his speed. Honestly speaking, the ‘Air Force’ could only be used for ten-odd times more, furthermore, in his current condition that could only use ‘Air Force’ which couldn’t be said to be displaying its complete effect, making a skydiving from altitude of several kilometers to succeed was nothing but a superhuman feat but…



“So the end is me skydiving with Yue huh…it’s not bad.”



Hajime said such thing. Something of this degree wasn’t even a danger.



Hajime gently straightened up his body. Immediately a crimson ripple spread below his feet, it collapsed instantly. However, he was definitely decelerating. He repeated that.



The people of the allied force also noticed them. Crimson ripples were spreading and scattering many times from between the aurora, and silhouette of people was descending like a comet.



At that moment, a deeply emotional voice resounded. The voice of the goddess.



{Thi, this is our, victory-!}



A beat.



――oOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!



At the battlefield, no, at the new world the people raised shouts of joy that sounded like an explosion.



As though to reply to that cry of triumph that was like the first cry of a newborn raised by the world, glittering light particles were raining down from the rainbow aurora covering the sky. The light of the sun that recovered its radiance shined, making the world to gleam like a diamond. Surely that was the blessing toward the new world.



Amidst the raining shower of light, Hajime kicked on the last ripple and splendidly reduced his speed, he kept embracing Yue and landed on the ground. Even so, the wounds on his both legs still weren’t healed, using ‘Air Force’ also finally exhausted the magic power for his recovery, so like that he collapsed limply on the ground with his face up.



“Haha-, the finishing is totally messed up.”



Hajime wryly smiled while lying down with his body unable to even twitch. His expression somehow looked refreshed.



Yue who was embraced all that time then straddled Hajime and flopped down on top of him in a tight embrace, and then with a really close distance where it looked like their face could touch each other anytime, Yue shook her small head while staring at Hajime.



“…Not messed up. It was the coolest.”



“Is that so?”



“…Nn. Hajime, thank you. I love you.”



Like that, with bewitching and melting smile, Yue pushed those soft and sweet lips on Hajime’s.



Yue enjoyed to her heart’s content Hajime who could only lie spread-eagled without being able to move, where he could only let Yue do whatever she wanted to him. Although, even if he was able to move, but if this was what Yue wished for then there was no way for Hajime to resist.



Yue’s appearance was still in her adult form. Although the charm that was brought about from the gap between her external appearance and her mental age had gone, now she was emitting sensual pheromone from her whole body, perhaps the brutality of her sex appeal had increased instead with this.



Her adult appearance was most likely due to metamorphosis magic. In that case, perhaps when her magic power recovered she would be able to change between woman and girl appearance freely. It felt like he could see the future where he was toyed around by Yue’s demand. Although, Yue’s heart was also captured by Hajime to the same degree with his heart captured by her though.



The endless kiss erased even the cheering of the allied force, forming a world of only the two of them.



But, a voice that the two couldn’t ignore reverberated into that world.



“Aa――! As expected you two are flirting! You two don’t even care about other people’s feeling! No rather than that, Yue-san is…”



“She is turning aduuuuult! Yue is attacking Hajime-kun with adult charm!’



“Humm. Just as expected. No, the adult appearance art outside expectation though…let see, how about I join too.”



“Uu-, what amazing sensuality…bu, but there is no option for retreating! A maiden can only charge ahead!”



Shia, Kaori, Tio, and Shizuku, those four people. Behind them Suzu, Ryutaro, and Kouki also rushed to here.



With a lively state that was unthinkable for a deeply moving reunion, Shia and others leaped at Hajime. Yue who separated her lips saying “I’m back” got dragged into it, and Hajime became piled with beautiful women and beautiful girls.



And then, hearing the words “welcome back” filled with a flood of emotions from their mouths, Hajime also spoke “I’m back” like Yue.



Diamond dust rained down from the sky, making the world to sparkle. Around him were the important people with teary eyes and joyful smiling like blooming flower. From afar, he could feel many existences that dashed toward here while calling his name.



The warm enveloping him, the welling up senses of accomplishment, and then the content feeling, caused Hajime to smile. It was a mysterious smile where fearlessness and gentleness were entwined tightly…



While that smile of ‘Nagumo Hajime’ caused a tightening to happen inside the girls’ chest, Hajime entrusted his body to a pleasant fatigue and slowly closed his eyes.





Chapter 178




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



Epilogue



Legendary Great War.



The people naturally called the battle like that, a month had passed since that decisive battle where the fate of the world was staked.



After that decisive battle, the gates that were set up at every place were opened once more and the voices of a lot of people that celebrated their reunion and victory filled the prairie in front of the capital.



A few days after that, although there was some chaos due to the healing of the wounded, the confirmation and burial of the deceased, and the annihilation of the capital which caused the people to lose their place, due to the hard work of every representative that worked together for a common cause, the post-treatment of the war was carried out relatively smoothly.



Due to the collapsed God Mountain, the Hairihi kingdom capital was also destroyed by getting swallowed into it, the non-combatant that was unable to participate in the legendary great war――especially the craftsmen were wholly mobilized for the reconstruction, in addition the merchants and the common citizens also gave their maximum support and the work which caused the progress to move rapidly. On top of using magic, there was also the good will and proactiveness of the people all over the world which crossed over race or country to reconstruct the capital, it was to the degree that they calculated the capital might be able to recover its former appearance within half a year.



At the prairie where fierce ravages of the battle remained, using the wreckage of the fortress a lot of temporary residences were established that were mainly used for the people that engaged in the reconstruction to lodge at. There, kitchen and inn, general store and the likes were created one after another, to the degree that it might possibly turn into a part of the capital by linking it with the city's expansion. Surely, the city would become even livelier even compared to when it had the God Mountain behind it.



The temporary establishment of the holy church was also created in that temporary housing town.



At that battle, the story was that the enemy was an evil god that pretended to be the god Ehitorujue, so the people still had their heart supported by the holy church which worshiped Ehito as a god. Although the God Mountain and the holy church's headquarter had disappeared, but suddenly taking away that support would only make the people uneasy.



Having said that, for the people who knew the truth, they felt more than a little reluctance for the holy church to keep using the name Ehitorujue exactly as it was until now.



There with the speech of the 'Goddess of Harvest' Aiko, this kind of story was dispatched to the world.



It said, that the true name of god Ehito was Ehicliberei, for a long time the mad god――Ehitorujue had stolen this true name.



It said, that the 'rebels' or rather the 'liberators' who knew about the danger to the world from Ehito once challenged the mad god in order to regain the pure faith, but because of the mad god's foul play, they were unable to defeat him.



It said, that in order to grant their own power to people who could possibly defeat Ehito, the liberators slept at the bottom of the great labyrinths. And then, the chosen people who were summoned from another world by god were awarded this power. Aiko was the spokesman of these people, while the person who received the most power was the 'Goddess's Sword'.



It said, like that Hajime and others splendidly defeated the mad god Ehitorujue that was hiding in Holy Precincts. However, due to the last resistance of the mad god Ehitorujue, it caused a collapse in order to take along the world to accompany him in his death. In response to that, the last liberator――Miledy Raisen who made her soul to possess a golem and had watched over the people all this time, she exchanged her soul for the world's salvation.



A complete lie, it was not. The story matched the gist of the truth. By the way, the name Ehicliberei was a coined word with the meaning of 'seven liberators' put into it. It was the consideration for them that they would surely felt unpleasant to have the story of them cooperating with Ehitorujue to be taught to the future generations. If it was asked whose consideration it was, then it must be the one who thought of this story which was not a lie but also not the truth which was complicated in various meaning, a certain white haired eye-patched man somewhere.



Due to this speech of Aiko, the historians who were excited to leave this time's legendary great battle's record in writing at once raised the name of Miledy and others to the front stage of history once more as the seven great wise men who saved the world.



Regarding the new top brass of the church, it was composed of the priests of the remote region. The people who participated in the choir squad at that battlefield and managed to survive became the core of this new top brass. Most of them were people who clashed with the central church and then got exiled to the remote region, so their thought and ideology were also exceedingly sensible, many of them were a man of character so it was thought that there wouldn't be any particular problem.



Regarding Raisen Great Labyrinth that was left behind by Miledy, Hajime created a living golem as the replacement of Miledy Raisen and stationed it there. It was equipped with gatling cannon, missile pod, and even pile bunker, so the difficulty level might be jumped up there.



Hajime didn't particularly do anything to the other great labyrinths. Perhaps it had no more meaning, but his stance was that if anyone searched for power and wanted to challenge it then just challenged it.



Regarding Hajime's quality artifacts that were lavishly used at the legendary great war, after Hajime awoke from fainting, he destroyed all of them. Gahard and some other people yelled "Stooop―!" while clinging to him, but Hajime turned everything into garbage right in front of their eyes. Hajime created an artifact to gather all artifacts that had his stamp, so there wouldn't any that got overlooked.



Of course, the artifacts that Kam and others of Hauria possessed were left alone in their possession, though Haijme applied various work on those first.



It was irritating for Hajime when Gahard's resentful eyes, or rather the eyes that looked like a child whose important toys were taken away were staring fixedly at him, so while he was at it Hajime gifted him with a small version Fernier. And at the next day, for some reason Hajime became the best friend of his majesty the emperor. It seemed that Gahard was really pleased with Fernier.



In preparation of the worst case that Gahard used Fernier to invade another country, Hajime made Liliana and Karm carry the remote switch for the self-exploding artifact. If Gahard knew of this…just what kind of face he would make. Hajime was really curious about it but with an effort, he endured to not ask.



Regarding the relationship between demi-human and human race, not only the people from the empire, the other humans were also in the process of changing their feeling toward the demi-human with whom they had fought together with through the legendary great war. As expected the fact that they had entrusted their lives to each other was enough to repaint their discriminatory view.



Of course, if it was asked if the two side could immediately join shoulders together, it wouldn't be that easy, but even so, none was holding animosity to the degree where they could act hatefully with recklessness. There was also how they had witnessed the gallant effort of the dragon race, and above all else, there was the fact that a rabbit-eared girl and a dragon woman were among the comrades of the savior hero who stormed into the Holy Precincts.



The demi-human weren't called as the abandoned race that didn't possess god's blessing anymore. Rather, it was obvious that the two demi-human would leave their page in history as a great person that stood side by side with the hero. No word of contempt could possibly be directed to such people.



Due to such reason, the social status of demi-human was beginning to be reevaluated rapidly among the human without anyone even needed to do particularly anything. As one part of that process, the holy church wouldn't call them as 'demi-human race' anymore, from now on they would formally name them as 'beastman race', the official notice for that had been created.



Because of that too, the 'Necklace of Pledge' that had been attached on the royalty of the empire had also been dismantled. After reaching this stage with great pain where it might be possible for an amicable coexistence, to keep holding the life of the empire royalty would only break the 'equal relationship', causing a halt at the compromise between the two side.



Although, just because of that didn't mean that there was no more guarantee from the empire side to stop the persecution to the demi-human and making them a slave.



"Meteor and sunlight laser, or fully equipped Hauria, which one is better?"



At the occasion where the 'Necklace of Pledge' was dismantled, Gahard asked "Do you believe that the empire won't move for revenge?" with a fearless grin, and the sentence that Hajime gave back to him was that. It went without saying that after that all the close aides of Gahard swiftly demanded for a handshake of friendship. The empire was based on strength supremacy doctrine…



Now then, talking about equality between races there was the matter of the devil race.



They were invited into Holy Precincts and made to sleep at the lower strata domain, but for some reason they escaped the collapse of Holy Precincts and got thrown out at the wasteland at the outskirt of the devil race capital which was far away from the battlefield, after that they were discovered there still continuing to fast asleep.



Even at the present a month after the battle, that situation still hadn't changed. Most likely they could be awoken immediately if regeneration magic was used on them, but right now everyone was busy with the post-battle treatment and rebuilding, there was really no leeway to wake up the existences that could possibly become a seed of conflict, so now they were sealed at a corner of the devil capital under strict monitoring. The seal was using Hajime's artifact.



By the way, regarding the devil race people who were deeply carved with the terror of Hajime at the devil king castle, Hajime only said a word of "troublesome" and put them to sleep too. It would be troubling if they said something like 'We are going to save our brethren!' and rampaged, so Hajime quickly took measures.



Although, for them who had been planted with a lot of terror by Hajime, and furthermore, after they knew that Hajime had even accomplished the destruction of God Mountain and godslaying, it was really unthinkable that they would do anything stupid.



Now then, Hajime and others had busily moved around doing things like the kingdom capital reconstruction, the artifacts' withdrawal, driving in the wedge to the empire, fabricating history, restoring the honor of the liberators, and various other things, but that didn't mean that they were lending their hand in this and that of this world because of mere whim or sophistication.



Naturally their first objective was to return home to the birthplace earth――Japan.



During this one month, they continued to stay in this world and moved around was also doubling as killing time, and that was merely because they couldn't go home. Having said that, it didn't mean that they didn't have the method to go home or anything, and it wasn't also because they were unable to create the concept magic.



The reason was simple. There was no material to create the 'Compass of Guidance' and 'Crystal Key'.



Concept magic was powerful. Even though Hajime was able to enchant mineral, but using average material would cause the item to explode when activated because it wouldn't be able to endure the effect. Before the difficult undertaking that was crossing the world, they didn't want to take any risky venture like 'It should be usable if used only for one time!'



Besides, even though they were taking along Myuu and Remia together, but as expected Hajime wanted to prepare a return path home to this world for them, regarding Shia and Tio too, Karm and Adol and many other people were remaining in this world, Hajime thought that they would want to go home here sometimes to meet with their family.



And so, an artifact that would break after just one-time use would be troubling for that.



Having said that, speaking about a mineral that could endure concept magic and also had high affinity with magic, Hajime couldn't think of anything else but the god crystal. But, they had finished confirming that there was no god crystal anymore at the abyss. Now that they didn't have the compass, it wasn't realistic to search for god crystal around the world when there was not even any guarantee that it existed.



And the idea that Hajime got when thinking of that, was that if it didn't exist then he just needed to create it.



God crystal was the crystallization of magic power where magic power accidentally piled up for a long time of a thousand years. It was the solidification of the magic power of nature that was so vast it was absurd. The process was like water drops that bore a hole on a rock.



But, Hajime had no interest at all in staring at water drops boring a hole into a rock. Therefore, he just needed to twist such theory with foul play.



And then what he did based on that was creating an artifact that converged natural magic element in high speed using gravity magic which was a magic that interfered with the power of star, and then he used space magic which was a magic that interfered with boundary to pump the gathered natural magic element into artifact(pool of human population magic power).



Added with that, with Hajime who was a possessor of inhuman magic power as the first in the list, the otherworlder cheat group pumped in their magic power every day into the artifact.



As the result, after a month passed, they succeeded in creating a god crystal with diameter around fifteen centimeters. It only had around half the size of the god crystal that Hajime first discovered and it also didn't produce 'God Water', but it was still an amazing material that could endure concept magic satisfactorily.



And then, finally, today Hajime started making 'Compass of Guidance' and 'Crystal Key'.



The place was the fountain plaza at the outskirt of Fea Belgen. It was that place where Shia's feeling came to a realization. Hajime and others, in this one month they were using this Fea Belgen which was the easiest place to spend time in as their base, so Aiko and the classmates were also staying here. They were human, but the beastmen were in great joy with the hero party's stay there.



At the plaza, Shia and Tio, Kaori and Shizuku, and then Myuu and Remia were there. Other than them all the classmates had also gathered to look at the moment when the artifact for going home was completed. In addition, Liliana, Karm, and everyone else from Hauria clan and others were also there.



"Yosh, let's do this Yue."



"…Nn-"



Hajime and Yue were facing each other at the center of the plaza. Yue's appearance now was her original girl figure. Sometimes she also turned into adult mode depending on her mood of the day, but this girl mode was used a lot because it was convenient for sitting on Hajime's lap or getting hugged.



Hajime too now had his new artificial arm and eye back, the vampirization from Yue was also undone. Until they returned to earth, Hajime planned to get his hair turned black and coated his artificial arm with skin and so forth, as much as possible he wanted to return to his original appearance.



The excessively lovely Yue whose body was wrapped with chic goth loli outfit and Hajime were closing their eyes in concentration with the god crystal between them.



The classmates who were watching over them at the surrounding gulped.



In such atmosphere, the ceremony of concept creation finally began.



Inside the forest of Fea Bergen, golden and crimson magic power calmly began to twist up. From the beginning the magic power of two colors was spiraling while mixing with each other, it looked as though the two color was getting intimate with each other.



Before long the leaves of the trees were blown and scattered around while a torrent of magic power was climbing to the sky, a clear will began to reside in it. Regardless that it was unseen by eye, everyone who was there felt it, an overwhelming will that made the skin to have goosebump.



At the same time, the god crystal began to shine. The stormy torrent of magic power was focused and absorbed into the god crystal with amazing force.



Calmly, yet sonorously Hajime spoke the power of words.



"――'Transmute'"



Immediately the god crystal split into two. The ores other than god crystal that had been prepared beforehand instantly mixed and they were forming shape.



Unnoticed the stormy magic power was shining like a star between Hajime and Yue, the forest of Fea Bergen and the surrounding people were illuminated, their heart was charmed by the spectacle.



That radiance was also getting smaller bit by bit. "Hou" Here and there a sigh of admiration was leaked. It was unclear whether the cause of that was because of the artifact's creation, or else if it was because Hajime and Yue who created this miraculous spectacle while snuggling close to each other.



And then, the light finally settled down, Yue and Hajime quietly opened their eyes. Ahead of their gaze was a compass and crystal key that were sparkling bright.



"…Hajime. Test it."



"Okay."



Yue said that while separating their hand gently. Obeying that, Hajime tried activating the compass. There was no problem, it seized the location of earth intuitively. And then the crystal key was also operating on space properly.



"O, oi, Nagumo. How is it? Everything fine?"



Endo Kousuke asked timidly after becoming unable to endure the tension. By the way, Kousuke who had received an amazing nickname from Hauria clan, and got a lover from the same rabbit clan (in this one month he had worked very hard. Especially he paid a lot of compensation with his shame while mass producing dark history of his life), now he had a lot of common point with Haijme, the two of them were unexpectedly getting along and in this one month they were building a relatively familiar relationship.



Looking at Hajime who reacted to Kousuke's call, several of the classmates gulped loudly.



Hajime ran his gaze around the classmates whose expression was stiffening from nervousness.



And then, he grinned widely and wordlessly gave a thumb up. The meaning of that was obvious.



"Yossha―――!!"



"Hurraay!!"



"UOOOOOOO, we can go home! We seriously can go home!!"



"Nagumoo, no, you are Nagumo-sama already! Really thank you!"



"Fueeeeeeeen, I'm really glaaadd. Nagumo-kuuun, Yue-saaan, thank you!"



"Hajime-samaaa, please make me your slaveeeeee!"



"Yue-san, make me your peeet!"



Joyful cheers exploded, words of thanks rose one after another. It felt like there were some dangerous words mixed in, but it would be troubling if perverts came out even from among the classmates so Hajime beautifully ignored it. But, the guy who made a strange request to Yue would be strangled later, while making that vow, Hajime sat down with a thud from fatigue.



Yue also sat on his lap in a tired state. He circled his arms around her slender waist to support her and then she snuggled in real close.



There, *sutetete―* cute footsteps resounded.



"Papaaa!"



"Myuu"



Hajime skillfully caught Myuu's small body that jumped energetically and placed her on the knee opposite of Yue with his support. As expected, Myuu was also snuggling in real close on him.



"Hajime-san! Me toooo"



Shia jumped *pyon* like a rabbit. The place that she embraced was Hajime's right shoulder. His hand that was supporting Yue temporarily let go and patted Shia's rabbit ear. Shia happily snuggled close to him.



"Hajime-kun, you did it."



The one who was saying that while quietly snuggling close was Kaori. And it wasn't with an apostle body. Now she was in her original body. Thinking of the difference of lifespan between her and Hajime and others, it would be better if she stayed inside apostle body. Kaori herself thought that, but Yue who had comprehended the secret technique of apostle creation during the time she was possessed by Ehito said that it was possible someday to turn Kaori's body into apostle and surpassed the limit of her lifespan, so in the end Kaori returned to her original body. In actuality, she was already able to change into apostle mode temporarily, where in that state she was able to use silver wings and disintegration ability and also handled twin swords art.



That Kaori clung tightly on Hajime's left shoulder. When she got her head patted, as expected she then snuggled close to him.



"Goshujin-sama's world is surely fun isn't it?"



"Surely you will be shocked by it there."



Tio and Shizuku arrived. There was only the back that was left open. The gaze of the two crossed. A spark scattered between them. When they were about to aim at the last clinging position…



"My my, a good place is left open here. Ufufu. Dear, please excuse me."



Remia who smoothly cut in clung tightly to Hajime's back. " "Aa-" " Tio and Shizuku's voice was raised. As expected from a widow. She couldn't be made light of.



"Shia-san, haa haa, let's get along well with me?"



"Gee, Altina-!"



Unnoticed Altina appeared behind Shia with her breathing getting rough "haa haa". She was walking unsteadily like a zombie while approaching Shia's back to cling there.



Shia whose rabbit ears stood tall with shudders running through them separated from Hajime to repel back Altina.



To take advantage of that opening, two more female approached with a jog…



"…Aiko-san? What could you possibly be planning to do?"



"Liliana-san yourself, what business do you have with him?"



Here too sparks were sparking off.



Hajime's surrounding became noisy suddenly, even the classmates who cheered joyfully with each other began to notice the commotion.



Amidst all that, Yue sighed "fuu" toward the female camp who was noisily quarreling for Hajime. Hajime tilted his head asking "What's wrong?" with his gaze, immediately after that Yue's atmosphere changed from sweet to bewitching.



And then, Yue's body shined flashily, and at the next moment, the adult version Yue appeared. Right after that, the adult version Yue easily tore off Kaori and Remia from Hajime, because of the sudden growth the length of the clothes became comparatively short, and with that amazingly risqué and seductive clothing, she hugged Hajime's head onto her breast and Hajime's head was buried *munyuu!* into those splendid twin hills.



The quarreling female camp raised "Ah" voice while Hajime leaked out a muffled voice "unmu-". Myuu was still supported in one of Hajime's arms.



"…By the legal wife's authority, the noisy child will be prohibited."



Gushing out sex appeal. The devilish beauty that would charm anyone without distinction of sex. The words of the adult mode Yue that was the personification of bewitching made everyone's breath taken away. The female camp immediately tried to object, but when they were forestalled by the sidelong glance Yue sent them, immediately their cheeks reddened and their words "uu" got caught inside their throat. Even Yue's self-acknowledged rival Kaori was like that. Speaking clearly there was no one that could go against Yue.



By the way, if it was asked what was the prohibition was referring to, it was referring at the permission to enter Hajime's bedroom. In this one month, Hajime and Yue, and then Shia too had passed through several sleepless nights, but that was something that didn't happen every day.



And then, even at night where Yue and Shia were not there, there were still women that warmed Hajime's bed. It went without saying just who those women were. And it also went without saying just who was the one that was holding the baton of command. It could be easily guessed from the words 'legal wife authority'.



"…Nn. As punishment, I will monopolize today."



"Wai-, Yue, umu-!?"



Hajime who became gutless from getting buried in the twin hills, was raised up by Yue and at the same time he received a hot, and not just normal hot but a scalding hoooot kiss from Yue.



The female camp suddenly became noisy. And then, the classmates were also became overdosed with sweetness and got flustered (including a part of the female students who became excited in a dangerous sense).



Kaori and others raised a voice of protest and pleading toward Hajime and Yue whose lips separated with rough gasping.



"Tha, that's not fair, Yue! I too with Hajime-kun…" (Kaori)



"E, err, me too…with Hajime…" (Shizuku)



"Goshujin-sama, please be with me." (Tio)



"My my, dear, please take care of me too okay?" (Remia)



"Hau, Na, Nagumo-kun, me, me too…" (Aiko)



"Hajime-san…please…" (Liliana)



In addition, Shia who had just finished burying Altina to the ground with a backdrop was wordlessly sending Hajime a moist gaze. Myuu was tilting her head because she was not really understanding what was going on.



There, Yue opened her mouth while smiling softly.



"…Hajime. With whom you will do it?"



If Hajime was mischievously asked that by Yue, then his answer could only be one.



"Yue is the only option."



"Kufuh…then, I'll be kidnapping him."



Saying that, Myuu was then enveloped gently by the wind and handed over to Remia, then Yue's figure vanished with a whoosh while still embracing Hajime. It was the magic 'Heaven Existence' that Yue ripped off from Ehitorujue. In truth when Yue kissed Hajime she recovered by taking Hajime's blood.



The plaza of Fea Bergen was once more filled with the protesting voices "Aaa――!!" of the female camp that was in love with Hajime.



"…God damnit. I'm so deathly jealous."



"Yeah. Me too, I want to get kidnapped by that kind of beautyyy"



"But, this me who is feeling that if it's Nagumo then it can't be helped, it feels like I already lost something."



Tamai Atsushi looked up to the sky and whispered, while Aikawa Noboru was earnestly in agreement, Nimura Akito shrugged and exposed an expression that couldn't say anything.



"Aa, I totally understand you. It feels like I cannot make any word."



"'Well, it's Nagumo after all', this sentence is the recent popular phrase huh…"



Nomura Kentaro and Nagayama Juugo that heard the conversation of Tamai and others were smiling wryly while nodding. To that Nakano Shinji and Saito Yoshiki also made a dry smile that similarly couldn't say anything.



"Haa haa, I want to be stepped on by Yue-san. I want to get ground down hard while getting scorned by those eyes…"



"You are going to the hospital right away after we go home okay? Have them look at your head."



Amidst a part of the boys that were turning perverted, the other boys were smiling wryly while feeling envious and understanding, while also feeling complicated because they could be that understanding.



Nearby those boys, Miyazaki Nana was similarly leaking out a voice was filled with envy.



"How enviouuusss"



Sonobe Yuuka who tilted her head asked back "Which one that you mean?"



"Rather than which one, I think I'm more envious of that kind of relationship itself."



"I really get what you mean. Certainly that's envious isn't it?"



Sugawara Taeko was making a girly expression while leaking out an admiring sigh "hou". Yuuka smiled wryly toward her two best friends that didn't even hide their longing while staring at the demon king harem members who were rushing into the forest to chase after the vanishing Yue and Hajime before she opened her mouth.



"How should I put it, Kaori-chan and Shizuku who stepped into that relationship, and then Ai-chan who got over various things, they are amazing."



"…What's with you all, getting like this. Crap, Nagumo-kun is seriously demon king-sama."



"Haa haa, Hajime-samaaa, please make me your slave…"



"Let's go to the hospital together when we go home. You need to get your head looked at."



The conversations of the girl classmates came into hearing too, they expressed their feeling that envied Hajime and Yue's relationship, while also giving their praise at Kaori and others who entered the harem. At the same time, their cheeks reddened from knowing that the harem already did it. Actually, quite a number of them harbored the feeling that if Hajime asked for them then they would respond to him. But Hajime wasn't asking for them, so those feelings didn't come into realization though.



"Suzu is not going after them?"



"No no, I'm not going. Just what are you saying so suddenly, Ryutaro-kun?"



Suzu was staring at the progression of the commotion while cackling, to such Suzu, Ryutaro who was at her side asked her that for some reason, to which Suzu tilted her head as though to say "Just what is this person talking about?"



"…No, if you ain't going then that's fine. See, your inside is a perverted old man yeah, so I thought that somehow you would get carried away saying 'me too' and charged into there or something."



"…Oi, are you calling me a pervert without integrity, you bastard. I wonder, do I actually need to have a talk with Ryutaro-kun regarding your impression of me?"



"No, because, you see, fundamentally you are a pervert after all…"



"Okay, you are asking for a fight right? You want to fight aren't you? I'll let you eat to your heart's content you know, this evolved Barrier Burst of mine."



Ryutaro scratched his cheek lightly while speaking his honest opinion, hearing that a vein appeared on Suzu's forehead while her hand reached toward her restored iron fan. Looking at that, Kouki rushed in panic to stop her.



"Su, Suzu. Calm down-. Ryutaro doesn't mean anything bad with what he said, rather――"



"Kouki-kun shut up. This muscle brain who had forgotten the concept of delicacy inside her mother's stomach, he had to get talked strictly with at least once!"



Suzu cut off Kouki's words and howled fiercely. However, if Suzu talked about him until that far, then it would make Ryutaro wanted to at least object.



"Oy you! I don't want to be told that I get no delicacy or whatever by the girl who wanted to go peeking at the bedroom of Nagumo and others at the middle of the night! You yourself, you actually had thrown away this thing called a woman's shame at the roadside around there ain't you?"



"Tha, that's, because! I just got bothered! This is the love affair of one-sama and others you know!? It will be a loss of your life if we don't burn that scene into our eyes at least once you know!?"



"Who give a damn! Besides, if you want to see it that much then you can just go alone. Think about my feeling who got woken up at night and got taken along to peep!"



"That was my kindness to the no good Ryutaro-kun! Understand that!"



"Don't bullshit! Something like getting invited by a girl of the same age, to peek at the ero scene of the classmates, there is a limit even to being awkward! Or rather I don't get what you mean!"



The giant and tiny girl quarreled(?) noisily *gyaa gyaa*. The surrounding sent lukewarm gaze at the two who recently caused this kind of spectacle relatively often. And then, the gazes toward Kouki who was completely flustered around the two was also lukewarm.



The shining charisma when they were first summoned here was already gone, in this one month, Kouki had earnestly lowered his head to everyone and his former impressive presence was thoroughly disappearing. The gaze of the surrounding to him was still cold, filled with wariness and suspicion. Kouki who had resolved himself was merely accepting those emotions silently.



His expression was constantly hard, smeared with guilt and regret. The classmates who knew the former Kouki who always helped people without distinction, although at first they held suspicion at Kouki who betrayed them, but seeing Shizuku and others who had staked their lives to take him back, and their own feeling who simply didn't want to lose anymore classmate, and then looking at Kouki who felt more regretful than anyone else, working hard trying to change himself, caused the classmates to try to accept him for the moment.



Kouki who lost his former smile, but at the side of Ryutaro and others, he was showing a slightly soft expression even while looking flustered, seeing that expression made the classmates feel a bit relieved. Because even though they had lost a lot of things, but somehow, the important thing from before they were summoned was coming back for a little bit, they felt such feeling from that expression.



With the commotion of Ryutaro and Suzu as the center, coupled with the confirmation that they could go home, the classmates also started making a ruckus with a bright expression.



The smiles of them who knew firsthand that in life, there were times where they had to fight with their life on the line…were really powerful.



Now then, if it was asked where were Hajime and Yue who teleported went….currently both of them were under the great tree. Hajime asked for a place where no one would intrude and also had a tasteful atmosphere, so this was the designated place that fulfilled both conditions.



Hajime was holding hand with Yue who went back into girl mode, their fingers interlocked with each other, the two of them were relaxedly walking toward the base of the great tree.



The weather today was clear, sunlight brightly poured down through the trees in this place where mist didn't enter.



"Yue, use regeneration magic."



"…Nn? Understood."



If the entrance to the great labyrinth was closed, then the great tree would return into a dead tree. Presently, the great tree in front of their eyes was withered. If regeneration magic was applied, it would recover its green color. Yue understood that, but she didn't understand why it was necessary when they had no plan to enter inside.



Yue tilted her head with slight doubt, but she somehow guessed that Hajime was merely wishing to see a more beautiful scenery, she smiled while applying the magic.



Instantly the great tree was overflowed with green while emitting light. The sunlight that shined through the branches and leaves were creating several angel’s ladders. If the tranquil atmosphere was combined with the splendorous great tree that could be associated with the world tree Yggdrasil in myth, the place would become something beautiful that was even more fantastical, or even mystical.



Hajime nodded in satisfaction before he took Yue's hand and led her to the base of the great tree. And then, like that he sat down and put Yue on his lap. It was a posture where he was embracing her from behind. The Yue in girl mode settled snugly on Hajime's chest.



While feeling each other's warmth and pulse for a while, they tasted the silence. The sound of leaves rustling that was audible sometimes and the breeze that caressed the skin felt pleasant.



Before long, after enjoying the nature enough to their heart's content, Hajime softly opened his mouth, whispering into Yue's ear.



"Yue."



"…Hm?"



"There is something I want to show you."



"…Something to show?"



"Yeah. Actually, this is something that should be shown to you faster but…it's something important so I was looking for a good timing, but it got postponed until the end like this. Sorry."



"…? I don't really understand but, if Hajime thinks that now is the right time, then that's fine."



Hajime's eyes softened at Yue who looked up from his chest to stare at him. And then, he kissed softly at her beautiful golden threads that rustled in the wind while taking out an artifact.



That was a small transparent ore that looked like a diamond. The image recording artifact that he discovered at the sealing room in the abyss.



Hajime kept embracing Yue tightly and lifted the artifact forward before activating it. The artifact shined, and suddenly an image was projected. Seeing the person that appeared there, Yue opened her eyes wide in shock and murmured in a daze.



"…Oji, sama?"



Hajime wordlessly strengthened his arms that were embracing Yue. It was unclear whether it was unconsciously or consciously, but Yue was also gripping tightly the hands of Hajime around her waist.



In front of those two, the person in the image recording――Yue's uncle, Denreed Gardia Wesperitirio Avatar slowly began to talk.



{…Aleytia. Long time no see, I wonder if saying that is a little wrong. I think that you are surely hating me. No, surely word like hate will not be enough at all. What I did……aa, that's not it. This is not what I want to say. Even though I have been thinking of various things, now that the time has come to leave my last will I cannot speak smoothly.}



While making a self-depreciating wry smile, Denreed pulled himself together by clearing his throat.



{That's right. First let me say my thanks. …Aleytia. Surely, right now on your side there should be someone who you are trusting from the bottom of your heart. At the very least, that person must be a strong person who could obtain metamorphosis magic and able to challenge the true Orkus, a person who didn't abandon you from the guardian that I prepared and rescued you.}



Hajime's eyes were closed. As though to listen to those words, or possibly to lament the departed.



{…You. You there who is close to my beloved niece. I wonder if you are male? Or else are you female? For Aleytia, what kind of existence are you? Are you her lover? Are you her friend? Or do you become her family, or her comrade? My apologize that I cannot meet you directly to say my thanks, but I still want to say it no matter what. …Thank you. For saving this child, for being close to her, thank you. I offer you my greatest gratitude in my whole lifetime.}



Yue didn't even twitch. What Hajime could see were only her glittering golden threads that were sparkling from reflecting light.



{Aleytia. Surely many questions are flooding inside your chest. Or else, perhaps you have already know the truth. Just why, that day, I hurt you, and buried you inside that bottom of darkness? What kind of existence are you, and who is your true enemy?}



The story that was talked from there was the facts that they already knew and speculation that didn't miss from the truth.



Namely, that Yue was born as a miko (TN: Usually miko is a shrine maiden, but from the kanji it can be interpreted as god child), and she was aimed by Ehitorujue. Denreed who noticed that pretended to kill Yue in his coup d'etat with the disguise that he was blinded by greed, he then sealed her in the abyss, the room where she was sealed itself was a hidden place that could fool even the god. The sealing of Yue was also a bitter choice for him so that her presence couldn't be possibly detected even for a bit.



{I was hesitating whether to tell you the truth or not until just before that day. But, for the sake of deceiving those guys with certainty, I judged that I shouldn't tell you. I also thought that if you hate me, then that would be a motivation for you to live.}



Surely Denreed also couldn't stay for long in the sealing room. That was why, after pretending to kill Yue at the palace, there was no doubt that there was also no time for him to talk with her.



Just how filled with bitterness that choice that he made, it was shown by the strength of his hand clutching at the other side of the image.



{Even so, it doesn't change that I had hurt you. I won't say anything like your forgiveness after this late. However, I want you to please believe only this. I want you to know this.}



Denreed's expression changed from anguish, into an expression of smiling while crying. That look was overflowing with gentleness and kindness, at the same time, it was also filled with a hopeless sadness.



{I love you, Aleytia. I love you from the bottom of my heart. I have never thought of you as bothersome, not even for once. ――I thought of you as my daughter.}



"…Oji, sama. Den-ojisama. I-, I too…"



Thought of you like a father. That feeling was flowing down along with the tears that traced through her cheek, unable to form into words. But, the strength of the hand that was clutching Hajime's hand conveyed that feeling more eloquent than anything.



{I'm sorry that I couldn't protect you. I'm sorry that I couldn't do anything but to entrust you to someone in the future. I'm sorry that I act like a pathetic father.}



"…Such things-"



What was in front of their eyes was a recording of the past. It was nothing more but Denreed's last will. But, such thing was irrelevant. Yue couldn't help but yell no matter what.



Something shining was gathering at the corner of Denreed's eyes. But, he didn't let that flow by any means. While enduring tightly, he spun words toward his beloved daughter with all his heart.



{I wanted to be at your side, seeing your figure when you grasped your own happiness someday. It was my secret dream to punch the man standing at your side once. And then, after that, I wanted to exchange sake with him, and say "please take care of my daughter". It was the partner that Aleytia chose. Surely, he would make a firm promise with a serious face.}



Denreed was looking at far away as though seeing a dream at the other side of the image. By any chance, there might be the Yue of the past at the direction of his gaze.



{It will be the time soon. There are more things that I want to talk, various things that I want to convey but…with my creation magic, I can only make an artifact of this degree.}



"…no-, I don't wanna-. Oji-sa, Otou-sama!"



Denreed smiled wryly at the approaching limit of the recording, to that Yue reached her hand while crying. Her uncle, no, her father's deep and deep affection, and that tragically tough resolve fiercely shook Yue's heart, indescribable feelings were overflowing out.



Hajime hugged Yue even tighter.



{I cannot be on your side anymore, but even if this life is about to run out I'll continue to pray. Aleytia. My beloved daughter. I wish for infinite happiness to shower above your head. For you to walk a path that is warmer than sunlight, and gentler than moonlight.}



"…Otou-sama-"



Denreed's gaze wandered. Surely that was because he was imagining the person who was being close with Yue.



{To you who is very close with my beloved daughter. It doesn't matter what kind of shape it is. Make that child, to be the happiest girl in the world. Please, I beg you.}



"…Naturally. I swear it with my life."



There was no way Hajime's words reached him. But, without any doubt, Denreed was smiling in satisfaction. Surely he was convinced of how the person in the future who listened to his words would answer. In various senses, he was a preposterous person. Perhaps it was just as expected from Yue's father.



The recording was fading down. Denreed's figure melted into empty air. It was as though his soul was going away…



Yue and Hajime were snuggling to each other so close that they wouldn't separate no matter what while gazing straight ahead, there the last words of Denreed resounded.



{…Sayonara, Aleytia. I wish that the whole world that is surrounding you, to be filled with happiness.}



Inside the deep forest, a crying voice was echoing.



It contained sadness. However, that was not all there was to it, it was a voice that was choked with warm tears of gratitude. That warmth gently enveloped Hajime.



Yue rotated her body and clung to Hajime's chest. There she vented her emotion to her heart's content.



It was unknown how long time passed like that.



Before long, Yue quietly lifted her face that was wet with tears. Hajime's hand gently wiped on those cheeks.



"Yue."



"…Nn."



While holding Yue's cheeks, Hajime spun his words along with a gaze that was filled with love and resolves.



"I, am the happiest man in the world. The proof of that, is inside my arms like this right now."



"…Nn. Then, I too, is the happiest woman in the world. The proof of that, is how I'm embraced like this right now."



In a distance where their lips could touch anytime, while feeling each other's breath, the two of them stared at each other. It felt funny for some reason, both of them chuckled a bit.



While chuckling like that, Hajime suddenly took out a ring. It was a simple silver ring. There was no special ability that was enchanted in it. If he had to say what was special about it, then it was a staggeringly tough ring, that was it.



That ring which was glittering brightly from reflecting the sunlight, was stared by Yue whose eyes were similarly glittering brightly.



"…nn. Proposal?"



Once, those words were said jokingly when Hajime handed her the accessories of magical bright stone series in the Orkus Great Labyrinth. At that time, Hajime spontaneously retorted but…



"That's right."



"…u"



This time, he responded straight back. His serious gaze was seriously conveying his feeling to her. As expected, Yue got shy and couldn't even say her usual "…nn". Her cheeks were already bright red like an apple.



"At Japan, the custom is for the man to say [Please give me your daughter] to the partner's father. That's why, I thought to say it in this place where Yue realized the true feeling of your father."



"…Nnu"



Because the one these words should be said to have gone, Hajime said it to the person herself.



"I want Yue. Everything of you, give it to me from here on until the future ahead too."



"…au"



Yue writhed.



Things like a reply or whatever, were obviously decided already.



A flower bloomed. The loveliest flower in this world. If there was a flower language for it, then the meaning would be unquestionably 'happiness'.



Yue answered, along with a smile that was gloriously blooming in full.



"…Nn-!!"



The ring that indicated eternity was fitted into the ring finger of the left hand that Yue presented forward. There was one more ring. This time Yue was the one who fitted it into Hajime's ring finger.



They showed the ring to each other, and then, they chuckled together.



After a while, Yue floated a mischievous smile while asking.



"…Then? How many rings Hajime are preparing after this?"



"…Yue. I think asking that in this kind of time is problematic."



"…Give it to Shia next."



"That's why, enjoy the afterglow a bit more before saying that…"



Hajime was about to protest at Yue who was leaking out a teasing smile, but then his lips were blocked by a finger. Like that Yue directed her gaze to the beyond.



Hajime who got lured by that and followed her gaze caught the sight of Shia and others running from inside the sea of trees. It appeared that Yue made such question because she noticed their presences.



"…Fufu. If it's Hajime, then you can make everyone happy together."



"If looked with common sense, I'm just a lowly bastard though."



"…Common sense doesn't work for the demon king-sama. Besides, no matter what shape it is, if the people themselves are happy then there is no problem."



"Well, I have determined and resolved myself so I have no hesitation anyway. Everyone, is mine."



"…Nn. That's my Hajime. But…"



Yue's eyes shined.



And then,



"…I won't hand over the 'special' position."



Saying that, Yue seized Hajime's lips.



From afar, with Shia, Tio, Kaori, Shizuku, Myuu, Remia, Aiko, Liliana as the first on the list, people were gathering one after another. The quiet and mystical place immediately became noisy like in the middle of a city.



While half of his sight was filled with the lovely vampire princess, Hajime looked at the girls at the other side and thought…



(Now then, when I introduced to Tou-san and Kaa-san, that everyone is my wives, what will happen huh…)



It seemed doubtless that even in Japan, Hajime would be in a whirlpool of turmoil.



However, surely Hajime would overcome everything of those. Crushing irrationality with irrationality, rewriting absurdity with absurdity, and if needed even fate would be destroyed, together with the 'precious' that he obtained in this world.



While making a gentle and also powerful smile, like now.



The tale of the young man who was summoned into another world, gifted with nothing but the talent of a common job, getting rid of even god while arriving as the world's strongest, had the curtain lowered now with this.



After returning to Japan, due to the turmoil that was caused by the return of the group who got spirited away, the wives problem of Nagumo family, the rabbit ear legend of Akihabara, etc, etc, it went without saying that Hajime and others would go through uncommon everyday filled with turmoil.



Those stories, would be told at another chance someday…



The End





Chapter 179-180




Arifureta Chapter 179-180



Arifureta After – Morning at the Nagumo House Part 1



AN: Thank you very much for a lot of the review about the completion.



From here on too, I, Shirakome, will enjoy myself while discharging wild ideas bit by bit, and it will make me happy if you readers can keep accompanying me.



「……Wake up. Wake up, Hajime.」



His dozing off awareness was led to awakening by a soft voice and a gentle shake. Because of the brightness seen through the back of his eyelids, he could tell the curtains had been opened. It was morning, and the sun was insisting on its presence.



「……Don’t mind me. Go on, ahead.」(TN: Here, Hajime is using a line like a hero who will stay behind so that others can escape safely)



「……It’s no good using a clichéd line like that. Breakfast will get cold. So wake up.」



He tucked himself into the bed like a bagworm and tried to take a journey into the dream world, this man who was trying to journey to the dream world with a voice that was going to disappear anytime, was the eldest son of this household――Nagumo Hajime. And then, the one who was making a troubled smile to such Hajime even while they kept urging him gently to get out of the bed, was Hajime’s beloved vampire princess that came from another world――Yue.



Yue sat down beside the bed and she gently stroked the black hair of Hajime who was curling in to himself. Her slender fingertips caressed through Hajime’s hair, combing them down. And then, her eyes squinted affectionately and she quietly brought her lips towards Hajime’s ear.



A small *chuu* sound resounded and Hajime twitched in reaction. Perhaps enjoying that reaction of Hajime, Yue’s look was increasingly bursting open in happiness, next she held Hajime’s earlobe into her mouth. Hajime once more twitched in reaction. Yue kept playfully nibbling, while Hajime kept twitching from that.



Yue separated her lips from Hajime’s ear with *chupa* sound before she opened her mouth while blowing a feverish sigh on Hajime’s ear.



「……If you don’t wake up……Hajime will be the breakfast.」



「I’ll wake up.」



It was a lovely speech, but there were his parents downstairs, other than them there were also the freeloaders and his daughter. Making a ruckus complete with moaning sound 「aah-」 from morning would be problematic in various meanings. The neighbors too would be guaranteed to look at him later with grinning expression saying 「oh my」. Therefore, Hajime pushed aside the futon with a snap and woke up.



「Good morning, Yue.」



「……Nn. Good morning.」



Hajime’s hair that was curling up here and there was fixed attentively by Yue using her hand as a comb. Since the morning the atmosphere of the two was already teeming with mushiness. It even felt like the morning sunlight brightly shining in through the window was growing dim in reservation from these two’s lack in prudence.



Hajime who was exposing a dazed waking up face, which was unthinkable if it was in the period when he was journeying through the other world, Tortus, was narrowing his eyes toward his lover that was caressing his head in front of his eyes. While he was at it he was also running his gaze through the surroundings relaxedly.



Inside the room, seventy percent of it was buried in bookshelves filled with books and games that were placed there, and then there was a desk and a reclining chair, a good quality desktop PC, and also a closet between the bookshelves. A window was attached to the wall that was facing south, and a navy blue curtain of the same color as the bed was hanging over it.



(…..I’m still feeling that this room is ‘nostalgic’. It must be because the experience on the other side was too strong. If I still feel like this even after going home for a year, then it might take a half year more to be able to live without feeling that anything is out of place.)



Hajime sighed a bit inside his heart. And then, he clenched his left hand repeatedly as though to ascertain it. That arm didn’t shine with a dull metallic gleam, its appearancewas that of a normal human arm. It had elastic skin and slight mark of suntan similar to his right arm.



Furthermore, Hajime also gently traced his right eye with his fingertip. There, he didn’t feel the sensation of an eye patch that was in the process of becoming his trademark in Tortus. Far from that, there wasn’t even the bluish white shine that was the trait of a god crystal. The eye’s appearance was a dark brown eye that looked like the eye of a normal Japanese person as expected.



「……Nn? Hajime, what’s wrong? It feels uncomfortable?」



Yue noticed Hajime’s state. She then brought her face closer until their nose tips almost touched while tilting her head. The sweet fragrance that tickled Hajime’s nasal cavity slightly bewitched him while he shook his head.



「No, there is no discomfort in both my arm and my eye. Thanks to Yue and the others’ cooperation, the artificial skin and the artificial eyes are all in extremely excellent condition. No one would notice them as long as they don’t get scanned in detail at a hospital. If I have to say, perhaps I’m feeling discomfort from this situation where there is no discomfort.」



「……? Hajime feels discomfort from the appearance of your body?」



「Yeah. After all, the experience over there was just too dense. The metallic arm, the crystal eye, and also the white hair, all those were already me. That’s why, rather than calling this appearance getting back to normal, it feels like I changed again. Well, its going to be really bad if that kind of unknown automail and strange crystal eye got discovered on this modern earth, so that can’t be helped though.」



While smiling wryly, Hajime tapped on his left hand using his right hand. The artificial skin that used metamorphosis magic had reproduced a splendid skin texture, making the one touching it unable to sense the existence of the metallic artificial arm hidden beneath it.



The one who accomplished this was Tio. The technique of Tio that was the only expert in metamorphosis magic among his comrades, added with Hajime and Yue’s help, remade the artificial hand smartly and disguised it as a normal arm in outward appearance and texture.



Also, Hajime’s artificial eye was something that was remade using creation magic, while his hair color was due to Kaori’s regeneration magic returning the hair color to before.



Of course, for Kaori whose hand had reached to the territory of time intervention, if she used regeneration magic seriously then it was possible she could even restore Hajime’s altered body to a normal human body. Whether it was his loss limb or his change due to eating monsters, all of those could be reverted if Kaori just returned Hajime’s body back to its previous state.



But, Hajime didn’t wish for that. Actually, by returning back to earth, things like a tough body were unneeded. But for some reason, it felt like turning his body back to how it was before was like making light of his journey in that other world. And above all else, he couldn’t be growing senile first and leave behind Yue who would be living for a long time.



In the end, possessing a monster class body where it wasn’t even definite that it had a life span was in agreement with Hajime’s own wish. By the way, if they were using Yue’s secret technique of apostle creation, then the problem of life span could be resolved to a certain degree even if they were using their original normal body, so Kaori and the others also didn’t view this matter as a problem.



「……Nn. Personally, there is no problem for me because I can enjoy various Hajimes. Rather I feel happy.」



Yue said that and gave kisses in turn at Hajime’s left shoulder, right eye, and his head. Every single action of Yue was overflowing with affection.



On that day, after they established the method of going home, since that day when Yue was proposed to under the great tree of [Haltina Sea of Trees], Yue’s expression of love had increasingly become polished. She had never been seen without the ring that was fitted on the ring finger of her left hand, and when Yue saw the matching ring that was fitted on Hajime’s left ring finger, an aura of happiness would be scattered in full from her.



「Speaking of that, what about Yue? Have you gotten used to the world over here?」



「……Nn. There are still a lot of things, that I don’t know, that I am not familiar with. This is really, a different world. There are a lot of unbelievable things……. But, it’s fun. Every day is fun like opening a jack-in-the-box.」



「I see.」



「……Nn. Besides, I will be happy anywhere if that is a place where Hajime is. Mother-in-law and father-in-law are also really kind. They treasured me like their real daughter, it feels really happy. Everywhere in Hajime’s world, is filled with happiness.」



「I, I see……somehow, it feels hot even though it’s morning huh.」



The gaze of Hajime who ate a straight punch of love was wandering around. Yue who understood that Hajime was being shy chuckled 「Nfufu」while snuggling at him like a cat. Hajime’s hand was subconsciously moving and gently caressed Yue’s fluffy hair.



An atmosphere that was overflowing with sugar content was running rampant since the morning. Yue quivered her long eyelashes while quietly closing her eyelids, her faint pink lips were pushing out to Hajime. Hajime easily surrendered seeing that obviously coaxing pose. His face was approaching near……



「Geez~, Yue-oneechan! Is Papa still not awake nano!?」



The one who opened the door of the room loudly with a bang while entering with a huff was a five year old girl who puffed up her flat chest. She was Hajime’s daughter Myuu. However, now her emerald green hair became emerald blond, while her fan shaped ears that were the trait of the merman race had changed into small and cute human ears.



The cause of the change was the illusion that was created by the ring artifact hanging down from Myuu’s neck. The artifact was something excellent that surprisingly could reproduce even the touching sensation, so even if Myuu’s ears were touched, the person touching wouldn’t feel the texture of a fin, but the sensation of a human ear instead. And so, Myuu’s appearance was completely that of a beautiful little girl with blond hair.



The moment that Myuu energetically entered the room, she pointed her finger at the clichéd childhood friend morning scene which entered her eyes and raised a protesting voice「Aa~~!」.



「Geez-, Yue-oneechan! I always told you every time! Doing that to papa right from the morning is a no-no! Why aren’t you protecting your promise nano!」(TN: Here Myuu said ‘me-‘ to Yue. This is the way people in Japanese scolded their naughty child or pet, it’s like saying ‘bad’ with scolding tone in English, though I translated it into no-no here.)



「……uu. Tha, that is because Hajime is……」



「Blaming others is a no-no!」



「……au. I’m sorry.」



Toward Myuu who pointed her index finger at Yue’s nose while saying 「Bad-」, Yue could only dejectedly hung her head down regardless of her big sister status.



It had been about a year since they moved into earth. Recently Myuu who had grown up remarkably was acting really proper and strict. When all the onee-chans who often became hopeless characters that couldn’t read the atmosphere when they got entangled with Hajime, like Yue right now, Myuu would remonstrate them with ‘Bad’ like this.



Actually, in order for Myuu to become used with this world quickly, and also because it was desirable for Myuu to have education in good taste, she was then enrolled into a nursery school about two months ago, but it seemed that in the school Myuu became awakened as ‘onee-san’ for some reason.



There was the factor of how based on her age she was included in the senior group in school, but additionally there was also how she had been piling up experience that should be too dense for a mere infant. She had been kidnapped, auctioned, traveled through a desert, struggling through a scene of carnage at the Devil King’s Castle, and even participated in a legendary decisive battle. Looking from the point of view of such a Myuu, the children the same age as her who were born in a peaceful country like Japan were, as expected, looked upon as really young and naïve.



Thinking ‘I have to be proper and strict!’, she imitated the outrageous onee-chan group around her and her mother that was overflowing with kindness, like that she acted too helpful towards the other kindergarteners……when she noticed, she had become the trusted and beloved leader of the kindergarteners.



However, her call of 「Gentlemen! And ladies of Myuu’s friend!」 when she was gathering the kindergarteners, or how she said 「Right now is exactly the time to blaze our souls!」when encouraging a child that felt down, or how she showed a fearless grin when there was a child that looked uneasy, those actions that looked a little bit unlike a kindergartener were conspicuous so the teacher there reported it to the Nagumo household……regarding the state of Hajime when he received that contact from the teacher, let’s just say that he was rolling around on the floor for real at that time.



「Really it’s my bad, Myuu. Come on, I’ve already woken up here.」



Yue who possessed the absolute dignity as the legal wife towards the other wives was seriously feeling down from getting scolded by Myuu. Hajime sent a glance at such a Yue while crawling out from the futon. Myuu listened to Hajime’s words and nodded, she then faced Hajime and reached out both her hands.



「Myuu? What’s with those hands?」



「Papa, Myuu wants to be carried nano.」



Even though she was scolding Yue just now, but right after that Myuu demonstrated a spoiled kid request. Yue went ‘hah’ in shock and moved her gaze to Myuu. Her eyes were clearly narrating her dissatisfaction 「Even though I was scolded when acting spoiled……」which was looking a bit lacking in maturity.



Toward that, Myuu said,



「Mama said, 『When Yue-san pulled back, immediately act spoiled(attack)』, like that nano.」



「……I’m going to speak a bit with Remia.」



Yue became enveloped with faint golden light, right after that, she became adult mode. And then, in order to speak a few words with the mother who taught woman’s battle tactics to a little child, Yue silently, but quickly, exited from the room.



And then, Myuu who kept holding her pose asking for a hug directed a shuddering gaze toward Hajime who was left behind. This little girl in front of his eyes was steadily mastering the lessons from the seniors around her. From here on, just what kind of growth this beloved daughter would show him after accepting the teachings of the women who had one or two peculiarities, Hajime wondered……



「Papa, carry me nano.」



「……Okay」



With a cramped expression, Hajime hugged Myuu who was making a cute request with a cute grin, and then he exited the room while listening to the tumult that was audible from downstairs.



Hajime who entered the living room on the first floor with one of his arms carrying Myuu witnessed the scene of Yue laying down complaints incessantly towards Myuu’s actual mother Remia. In regards to Remia, similar with Myuu, she was also exposing emerald blonde hair and human ears, right now she was showing her usual 「my my, ufufu」smile while dodging Yue’s complaints flightily――was how it looked like, but her cheeks were faintly blushing.



With the adult mode Yue as her opponent, as expected even a professional widow would find herself at a disadvantage. Even though they were the same gender, yet being stared at by the adult Yue fixedly from a very close range would make anyone unable to calm down. Adult Yue-sama, how terrifying.



「Ah, you finally woke up Hajime-san.」



「Fumu, as I thought perhaps having Yue in charge of waking up art no good.」



Shia who was helping with the preparation of breakfast was saying such a thing with an exasperated face while giving her morning greeting, and Tio who was watching morning news in the living room looked behind while also similarly greeting him.



There was no change in Tio’s appearance, while Shia’s prided rabbit ears were similarly hidden with artifact like Myuu and Remia. Right now her straight faint blue hair was put together using hair tie located around her neck and the bundle of hair was hung down forward.



「My, Shia-chan and also Tio-chan, you two are saying such things, but if it’s the two of you who are going to wake up Hajime won’t you two also dive in?」



「Naturally desu, Kaa-sama.」



「Of course, Hahaue-dono」(TN: Both ways of calling have the same meaning of mother, but the kanji they are written with has the meaning of mother-in-law.)



Carrying breakfast from the kitchen……wasn’t how she appeared, this person who appeared from the washroom as though to say that she had woken up just now, was Hajime’s mother, Nagumo Sumire. Sumire was a famous shoujo manga artist, so there were a lot of times where she was staying until late at night in her workplace, she was extraordinarily weak in the morning. Because of that, in the Nagumo household there was no regular habit of taking breakfast properly but……



There, Shia who was in charge of the cooking while in Tortus and Remia who was a mother with a child, came in. Hajime took home Yue and the others from the other world, and not long after that the girls became freeloaders, the kitchen became entrusted to the two of them.



「Everyone, good morning. Maaan, it’s great that the house is brilliant right from the morning. Even after a year has passed, my heart is still dancing every time I see this. You damn son, how dare you came home after becoming a great man! Really, thank you very much-」



「You are full of energy from the morning huh, Tou-san. And then, don’t grin like that while looking at them. You are going to get punched flying you know……by Kaa-san.」



The short haired middle-aged man with tall stature who had been continuously in a state of ‘Right now, I’m intensely moved!’ since a year ago, was the central pillar of the Nagumo household, the company president who managed a game company, Nagumo Shuu.



He who was a pure otaku seemed to be deeply moved everyday from witnessing Yue and the others who seemed to come straight out from 2D. And then, most likely, being called as 「Otou-sama」 by beautiful girls and women was also undoubtedly greatly related with that.



Shuu laughed in a good mood from being surrounded by his daughters-in-law, Sumire was in a daze, and Hajime was doing Myuu’s hairstyle while the breakfast was lined up on the dining table.



By the way, Shuu and Sumire’s yearly income far surpassed the earning of an average salary man, so the Nagumo household was quite large. And so, even when their family increased all of a sudden, the home didn’t feel that cramped even when all of them lived in one house.



Although, because of the sudden increase in the number of residents right now the renovation of the house was in progress, after several months passed the house would surely be completed into a splendid building twice the previous size that the neighbors would notice.



In addition, regarding the administrative concern of Yue and the others like their resident registration and the like, Hajime had snuck into the government office and finished forging the documents. For their peace of mind, Yue even used her soul magic on the government workers to plant suggestions in them so that there would be no problem. It was hard work because there were a lot of documents that needed to be put in order, for example passport and identification papers and so on, but at the very least there should be no one that could discover any unnaturalness with their existences in Japan.



Even for example that they got found out, they could just use soul magic to deal with it every time, they were also planning to slowly leave behind evidence of their existences at the foreign governments too. The government officials of the world would be opposed by age of god magic!



「Yup, Shia-chan, Remia-chan, today the food is also delicious. Before this I thought that putting food into your stomach right from the morning, “Is that some kind of torture huh?”, like that……but if it’s like this then I can eat no matter how much.」



「I get what you mean. Hajime, Tou-san is happy. My son became a splendid cheat harem bastard when he returned back. There is nothing that I can teach you anymore like this.」



「Tou-san, I don’t understand whether you are praising me or speaking ill of me from your words, but I have never received any lesson or anything about being a cheat harem bastard at all.」



Sumire sent an exaggerated praise at Shia and Remia excessively, while Shuu was sending Hajime words with condescending attitude, hearing that Hajime replied back with an exasperated state. To that, Shuu opened his mouth with irritating atmosphere as though to say 「Good grief, yareyare daze」.



「What are you saying? Haven’t I beaten up the soul of an otaku into you since you had awareness of your surroundings? In other words, that was also me beating up the soul of cheat harem into you. The reason that you were able to create a cheat harem in another world, is exactly because of that. How is that? Can you feel the gratitude for your Otou-sama keenly in your heart now?」



「I think I have already talked with you about my experience in another world, but where is an otaku soul is proving useful there――」



Shuu and Sumire had listened to all that Hajime experienced in the other world. About how much effort it took to recover his normal appearance, about how his arm and eye were artificial, about how his gaze turned sharp now, and above all about how his atmosphere now was completely different from in the past, Hajime told all of those personally without any falsehood or manipulation, nor he was even trying to do those.



In other words, Shuu and Sumire should have known about the sequence of events of their son’s grand experience starting from his experiences in the abyss. In spite of that Shuu now declared that otaku knowledge was useful in those experiences, hearing that Hajime was a bit unable to accept it.



And so, Hajime normally objected to Shuu, but Shuu and Sumire immediately grinned widely while cutting off Hajime’s words.



「『Ladies and gentleman-, all of you warriors-』」



「-」



「『Right now in this time, is exactly the time to blaze your soul-』」



「!!」



「『If you said you are going to get in my way, I’ll kill you.』」



「!?」



「『I’ll protect Yue, and Yue will protect me. With that we are――』」



「I got it already-! Otou-sama, really thank you very much-! That’s why, stop it-」



Hajime writhed while asking them to stop with a voice that sounded like a scream. Toward their son who was enduring his shame that much, the father and mother were mercilessly dealing the pursuing attack.



「Oi oi, what’s wrong Hajime? What are you feeling ashamed for? You were cool you know? In real life, there is almost no chance to say those kinds of speeches you know? When Tou-san watched the image recording Tio-san showed to me, my heart was trembling hard. Oh man, it was really an amazing chuu――cough-, really an amazing heroic speech you know?」



「Yes, truly. Not only to the girl partner, but you even said 『she is my woman』 to the girl’s parent, when I watched that I thought, “Just from what galgame this conquering character came from?”. Really……」



After giving a glance at Hajime who was shaking while holding his chopstick, Shuu and Sumire paused with a superb timing before continuing with splendid harmony.



「「Hajime-san, those were seriously awesome –ssu. Truly, thank you very much-!」」



「You two are noisy-. Don’t screw around, stop messing with me using that material-」



Shuu and Sumire knew about the events in the other world not only from Hajime’s story. While keeping it secret from Hajime, Tio used regeneration magic to leave behind recording images of every memory――obviously the events in the abyss were not included, other than that, the time when Hajime accepted Shia, the time when Hajime spoke resolutely to Tio’s grandfather Adol, and even Hajime’s speech to his classmates in the Devil King’s castle, etc.――and showed it to Shuu and Sumire. Since then, at every opportunity Shuu and Sumire would praise Hajime 「As expected from our son-!」 with teasing mixed in it to mess with Hajime.



The corners of Hajime’s eyes lifted up fiercely and brutally put pressure on Tio in an outburst of anger. With a cough, Tio choked in the middle of slurping her miso soup. Miso soup was dripping from her nose while her breathing was getting rough ‘haa haa’.



「A, as expected from the parents of Hajime-san. Recently I have become used to it, but as I thought, seeing the figure of Hajime-san being toyed around, the uncomfortable feeling that I get is not half-baked desu.」



「……Nn. But, the bullied Hajime……is also nice.」



「My my, Yue-san. Recently, it feels like if it is about Hajime-san then everything is fine for you. Fufu, Myuu too has to work hard like this. Also Tio-san, this is the dining table you know? Please don’t go *haa haa* while dripping snot like that, eat your food properly. Right now your face is looking quite “over the age limit” you know?」



Shia smiled wryly towards the exchange between Hajime and his parents, while Yue’s cheeks reddened for some reason, Tio was going *haa haa*, and Remia was going ‘my my, ufufu’ smilingly. This was the ordinary day of the Nagumo household recently.



Just when Hajime was going to snap from the mess, Shuu and Sumire easily drew back and concentrated on their breakfast as though nothing had happened. Hajime who was trembling from losing the target of his anger was then comforted by Yue and the others altogether.



With a sidelong glance at their son who was being taken care of by beautiful women and girls, Shuu and Sumire faced each other and their expressions burst into a smile.



「Nevertheless, that time when Hajime suddenly returned home, and in addition he also introduced Yue and the others, it was really shocking huh.」



「You’re right. For him to really go to another world and return home bringing a cheat harem, that’s something that I had never even dreamed of.」



While exchanging words with small whispers, both of them recalled that time when Hajime came home.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspellings and omitted words.



For the time being, I’m thinking of writing a bit about the story of post-going home.



After all there are considerable requests and also hope for a present-day story (lol).



Shirakome himself is swelling out with wild ideas.



Next will be the story of Hajime returning to his home and reuniting with Shuu and Sumire.



I think it most likely can be posted at 6 P.M Saturday next week.



Please take care of me from here on too.





Chapter 181




Arifureta Chapter 181



Arifureta After – Morning at the Nagumo House Part 2



AN: Regarding the autograph session at [Tora no Ana] that is planned to be carried out on 22 November because Shirakome is diagnosed with influenza, it was suddenly canceled in a hurry.



Please see the details in my action report.



Really, my deepest apologies to those who are looking forward to it.



I think I will get better if I can recuperate at home.



Please treat me well.



A year after a whole class from a certain high school was spirited away which made a stir in the world.



At first, the impossibility of a group kidnapping in the middle of the day inside a school, within an instant, without any other classes noticing, and the unlikeliness of it being a group disappearance from the half-eaten lunch, the unfinished homework, the kicked down chairs, etc., all of those heated up the media excessively toward this modern time Mary Celeste case that happened in a school.



However, what was called as the flow of society was quite callous, even the interest towards such a major occult incident didn’t continue for long. After half a year passed, with the news that there was no concrete progress within that short time, there were only impertinent commentators or self-alleged occult researchers harboring ulterior motives trying to use this case as their chance to make it big who kept trying to attract attention to this topic from various kinds of viewpoints while the media was sprinkled with new topics one after another, like some celebrity couple divorcing or getting into an affair, or some big shot politician having their dirty laundry aired.



Like that, the heated mass media calmed down and the interest of the people began to move to other topics. Even so, at that time, the family of the students, who were still missing without any information, and the police were still frantically searching for their whereabouts. However, unable to obtain even a single clue, every one of them was beginning to be encroached by fatigue and resignation.



Shuu and Sumire were also the same. They became exhausted from continuing to search for the whereabouts of their vanished son. While desperately believing that Hajime was safe and that he would definitely return home, they could definitely hear the flow of time that was heartlessly flowing away and the sound of despair that was gradually approaching them.



So that Hajime could come home anytime, they never missed a chance to clean up Hajime’s room for even a single day. And each time they cleaned the room, the coldness of the room that had lost its owner chilled their body. Even when they were in the living room, or when they were having a meal, what was echoing inside their ears was the voice of their son. While understanding that it was only their hallucination, many times they still suddenly looked around at their surroundings in surprise. It was already forgotten how many times they dashed to the front door every time they heard small sounds from there.



Even the 「family association」 that was formed together by the families of all the disappeared students only seemed to infect Shuu and Sumire with a chill to their hearts from looking at the faces of the parents who were losing their expression day by day.



And then, soon it would be one year since Hajime disappeared. For the two of them, that meant that the shadow of despair would only become thicker.



The tick-tock sound of the clock was echoing excessively clearly. Shuu, who was looking at his PC display, suddenly opened his mouth without turning away or stopping his hand that was clicking on the mouse.



「Sumire, how about going to sleep soon? Yesterday you already stayed until late right?」



「It’s no problem. If you are saying that, then you yourself, isn’t it better for you to sleep? Yesterday at work you had a lot of problems, right? You had almost no time to sleep at all.」



Late at night, Shuu and Sumire who had gotten thin due to their anxiety were checking the bulletin board on the PC and producing the flyer that called for information with a movement that was like a programmed machine. They were both exchanging words without even lifting up their face to look at each other.



「There is no problem with work. After all, my guys are all reliable. Even when the president is not there, it really doesn’t matter for them. Rather, I would just be a bother for them if I go to work with a face that looks like a ghost. Like that, they would even chase me out. Besides, doesn’t Sumire have it worse than me? You missed your deadline again right?」



「……Yes. But, that was only one time. My assistant is also excellent after all.」



Both Shuu and Sumire, in this one year they often took days off in their respective works of managing the game company or the manga serialization. Everything was for the sake of finding their son. Normally that kind of consecutive days off would make them lose the social trust from the people around them, but their coworkers and subordinates who knew about the circumstances of the two showed their understanding and even proactively cooperated with them. Thanks to that, they didn’t end up unemployed.



That was really an appreciated consideration so that in the case that Hajime came home, there would be no complicated situation like him witnessing both his parents becoming jobless altogether. There was also the factor that both of their work environments were special, and also how Hajime often showed his face at both his parent’s workplaces so the people there held favorable impressions of him. So the people at Hajime’s parents’ workplaces were also really worried about Hajime from the bottom of their hearts that Hajime had disappeared after getting involved with a sudden occult situation.



But even those people’s gazes were gradually changing into a gaze that was filled with a lot of pity, as though they were looking at something painful. Surely resignation had already grown thick inside them. There was no way they could say anything to the parents whose son’s whereabouts became unknown, but everyone had begun to think 「It’s possible, that Hajime is already……」



There was also no way that Shuu and Sumire wouldn’t notice such atmosphere. It also became a factor that cornered their minds needlessly, but the fact that they could take the time to search for Hajime like this now was also thanks to those people, so there was no way they could do something like exploding in anger towards them.



Even with their gloomy hearts, while both understanding that there was no way they could rest, they still exchanged barefaced words like recommending each other to rest.



After a while, Shuu and Sumire still continued to exchange dialogue that was really empty, but before long, after looking at the information board on the internet that was not only lacking in plausible information but filled with obviously fake information or inconsiderate writings instead, Shuu finally took off his gaze from the monitor screen.



And then, while sighing deeply, he put both his elbows on the table and his head hung down with both his hands covering his eyes.



「……Hajime. Just where is he right now……」



「Dear……」



Even though Shuu was still in the early half of his forties, right now he looked like a tired old man. Sumire who saw him like that also stopped her working hand and lifted her face.



「As expected, how about we rest a bit?」



「……You know that’s impossible, right? I won’t be able to sleep soundly anyway.」



「That might be true but……」



Sumire’s words were caught up in her throat. What Shuu was saying was wholly correct, she herself was also like that. No matter how exhausted their body and mind had become, but day by day the fire of uneasiness in their heart only kept broiling stronger. Such a thing stole their ability to have a quiet sleep.



「It will be fine. It’s still only a year. Even if it would take several years, we will find him without fail. No way am I going to collapse until then.」



「……You’re right. It’s just as you say.」



Her husband lifted his face with a wry smile, even so, there was a dark shadow that couldn’t be hidden there. Sumire smiled at him even while feeling concern, and then she stood up from her chair to nestle close to him.



But just before she could do that, suddenly *pin poo―n* there was a chime sounding from the entrance.



Naturally, at this time of day when the date had already changed, there was no way there would be anyone who would visit. If it was a relative then they should have contacted them beforehand, so the two of them faced each other suspiciously. That they were unable to reach ‘that possibility’ immediately, showed how exhausted the state of their heart was.



Shuu slowly raised his heavy waist and took the receiver off the intercom. When he did that, naturally the figure of the visitor was projected at the display……



『……Aa, that, what to say……this is, me, here.』



The state of the sudden visitor who was unable to smoothly decide what words to use while his gaze was wandering incessantly. If the people who knew of this person in this one year saw this attitude, they would surely stare in amazement reflexively.



Even from across the display, they knew.



This person’s air, look, and even height were different from the one in their memory.



Even so, they knew.



Shuu perfectly, and instantly knew. That person, who was looking awkward somehow with a frowning face that looked troubled was……the one who they had continued to search for, the one they believed would surely come home……



――it was their beloved son.



With a smacking sound, Shuu threw away the receiver phone and threw open the door of the living room with a force as though he was kicking it open. Without even hiding his impatience he roughly opened the lock of the front door, and then, he threw the door open.



And then,



「Aa……that…………I’m home, Tou-san.」



「「Hajime-」」



Shuu’s voice overlapped with Sumire who had chased after him unnoticed. They called the name of their son with a volume that might rip open their throat. At the same time, they tackled the son who was scratching his cheek awkwardly in front of the house’s gate.



「Hajime-, you, this stupid bastard! Where the hell have you been running around until now-」



「This stupid son-. Do you know how much you made us worry!」



Father and mother embraced their son altogether strongly, so strongly that it made it hard to breathe. Right now, in this moment, they were confirming that this son was really standing before their eyes. So that he wouldn’t disappear for a second time. They strongly, strongly embraced him.



The dim street light, the lighting leaking out from inside the house, and then the perfectly round moon in the sky were gently illuminating the family who became one once more. Amidst that Hajime was stiffening in a banzai posture while being hugged tightly by the two. (TN: Banzai posture, if you screamed banzai in celebration, usually you will also raise both your hands in cheers right?)



Hajime thought that his parents must be worrying about him. He was convinced that they were believing that he would return home.



But, even so, the figure and atmosphere of the current him, even though his hair color, his artificial eye, and his artificial hand were returned to his former appearance as much as possible, the him right now should be really different from how he once was.



That was why, he thought that they would surely feel confused. He even resolved himself in preparation for them to say doubting words like 「Are you really Hajime?」 in suspicion. Depending on the situation, there might even be a need to spend the time to reach an understanding, that was what Hajime was thinking in the corner of his heart.



It was just like how Hajime’s false image pointed out in one of the seven great labyrinths――at the 【Ice and Snow Cave of Shuune Snowfield】 before this, that in the depth of Hajime’s heart, he had the fear that the person who had been acknowledged by both himself and other people as a monster couldn’t be accepted by his parents, that was the cause of this emotion of Hajime’s that couldn’t be varnished over, which was both like himself but also unlike himself.



But, now that he had tried to open the lid, this was how it turned out. Shuu and also Sumire didn’t even give any attention to Hajime’s change, they gave him a tight hug that was overflowing with conviction and anger, and also a helplessly great relieve.



Inside Hajime’s body, a hot, yet silently strong emotion that was unfathomably deep was rising up. Every grand experience that he had experienced in the another world, were passing through his brain as though he was experiencing a revolving lantern.



And then, there was only one thing that he was thinking.



――Aa, finally, I came home.



Hajime’s two arms silently held the backs of his two parents. And then, with a trembling voice, he spoke it one more time in a small, but clear voice.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san――I’m home.」



Shuu and Sumire, with their eyes still overflowing with tears, separated themselves from Hajime slightly, and with a firm straight gaze, they gave him those words together with the escaping smile――surely for Hajime, these words were the mark that informed him of the end of his long and dangerous journey in the true meaning.



「「Welcome home, Hajime.」」



After that, Hajime and others who noticed that the neighbors were stealing peeks at the situation from the gaps between the curtains, excitedly returned inside the house.



It was a home that he left only for a year. Even so, Hajime narrowed his eyes in nostalgia, he couldn’t help himself to lightly caress his hand on the railing and the ornaments.



Entering the living room, Hajime saw a large amount of the leaflets scattered on the table. He took one of them into his hand and stared at it closely. After that, he also discovered the PC that was left opened displaying the site that asked for information on missing people.



「……This one year after you were gone, we tried everything we could to look for a clue. But, in the end, we couldn’t obtain even one clue. ……Hajime, you, no, all of you, just where in the world did you all go?」



「Also, Hajime. A year ago on that day, just what in the world happened?」



「……About that. Explaining it is simple, but also difficult. There are a lot of things that must be talked.」



The deep gaze of their son that already couldn’t be called as young at all, made Shuu and Sumire gulp. And then they guessed that Hajime had gone through a tremendous experience that they couldn’t even imagine.



「I see. Then, let me straighten up the table quickly, we are going to talk a lot after that. Wait a second. I’m going to brew a delicious milk tea now.」



「Yeah. Thank you, Kaa-san.」



「Fufu, somehow you completely feel like an adult.」



While drinking the sweet and warm milk tea that Sumire prepared, Hajime told the truth of the group’s disappearance to the two. Hajime’s experience was too dense to have everything said in one sitting. Therefore, he talked only about the summary of every important point, but even so, the summoning to another world, survival in the abyss, the separation with his classmates, the conquer of the great labyrinths, the legendary decisive battle……by the time Hajime finished talking about those, the sky was already starting to grow light.



Hajime, who had finished talking about the general event, emptied his cup that had been refilled several times, and then he sighed. Shuu and Sumire were also sighing tiredly. Shuu was rubbing on his eye with his finger while Sumire was dropping her gaze at the empty cup. They were silent from feeling lost as to how to respond.



「As I thought, is that hard to believe?」



Hajime asked while smiling wryly.



「That’s, obviously. Tou-san and also Kaa-san, due to our work we have plenty of knowledge about something like that but……thinking, that it happened for real……」



「That’s right. But, thinking about the extremely unnatural group disappearance, we cannot really reject that it might be true. There is also no reason for Hajime to lie in this situation. That’s why, our worry is, the possibility that someone is making Hajime believe such thing.」



「Haha, indeed, that way of thinking is way more realistic. Me too, if I were in the position of Tou-san and Kaa-san, surely I would also think that at first.」



Being kidnapped by unknown people, and then the group was then brainwashed and had the memory of fantastical nonsense inserted into their brain……indeed, rather than believing that he was going to another world and fought against monsters and gods there, that explanation sounded more plausible. Rather than they weren’t believing the words of their son, it was more that they were thinking realistically with worry that if such a thing was really done to their son then they would need to get him treatment quickly.



Hajime’s wry smile deepened to the two who were worrying about him, then he opened his mouth because there was something that he had to confirm no matter what.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san. Whether what I’m saying is the truth or not, there is a method to prove that. That’s why, assuming for now that what I’m saying is the truth, I want to ask something. ……Regarding the things that I had done, what do you two think? No, what do you think about the current me?」



That was the question that Hajime feared the most from the depths of his heart. If his parents held disappointment and fear, avoidance and disgust toward him then……as expected, that would be hard for him. Surely if that happened, Hajime would exit the house, and then he would leap into the chest of his beloved lover.



But, in contrast with the anxiety and nervousness inside Hajime’s heart, as though they had guessed the concern in Hajime’s heart, Shuu and Sumire showed a smile that looked troubled, or possibly exasperated.



「Now see here, Hajime. I and also Sumire, we aren’t saints you know?」



「Eh?」



Shuu and Sumire stood up from their seat and approached close to the side of Hajime who was perplexed.



「Rather than other people’s death, our son’s safety is far more important. Perhaps you think of that as cold-hearted, but that is what is called a parent. Good grief, for you to feel that nervous……I wonder if you are thinking of something like, perhaps I’m going to be chased out from home? Really, what a big idiot you are.」



「However……Kaa-san. Indeed, I killed because it was necessary, but I didn’t even hesitate in killing. That was how much I changed. A guy who is not even holding any avoidance or disgust for killing, can you accept someone like that?」



What a hopeless kid, Sumire who was brushing his head as though to say that was replied back by Hajime with an expression that was lost for words. Hearing that reply, Shuu opened his mouth in exasperation for real this time.



「It’s not about accepting or not, we are family you know? Something like stop being family doesn’t exist in the Nagumo family. Don’t you know? There is nothing that can make you stop being my son. The end result is, 『You cannot run away from Otou-sama!』」(TN: Might be a reference to something.)



「No, don’t make any quote at a time like this……」



「Hahaha, well, putting that aside. Hajime is my son, and I am a father. As long as that holds true, then me and also Sumire will be your ally anytime. There is no way anyone can worry about other people while their son’s survival is being threatened. Also, if you are feeling guilty, if you say that you want to atone to the family of the deceased then I’ll atone for it together with you, and even if you become a psychopath killer then I’ll stake my body and life to stop you.」



Most likely, if it was thought from the viewpoint of common sense then the way of Shuu and Sumire were doing things were mistaken. As a parent, no matter what kind of circumstance there was, they had to question the right and wrong of the killer. And if it was something unforgivable then they had to admonish the person. As a parent, they had to reprimand their child about their wrongdoing.



And surely Shuu and Sumire also understood that. But even with that understanding, they were still undoubtedly happy that their son returned home alive even by killing someone else. If Hajime had come to terms with it then that was fine, if for example, he wanted to atone for his sin then they as his parents would accompany him, and if he ended up as a fiend, then they would stake their lives to take him back to the right path. They declared that clearly to Hajime.



「Hajime, do you regret what you have done until now?」



「No, I have not even a bit of regret. I don’t even think that I’m mistaken. I decided to do what I did with the resolve against everything.」



「Yep. That’s how it has to be. But Hajime, that way of doing things won’t work in Japan you know?」



「I know. The journey that I started with the determination to kill all the guys antagonizing me is over already. That’s why I too have to change my way of living. Well, I might at least do something like planting trauma to those who stand in my way though.」



「I see, then that’s fine. Even if Hajime’s heart has grown to become unreluctant in killing people, reasoning and emotion still pro~perly exist inside Hajime. Then, that’s fine. It’s just as Shuu said, if Hajime actually steps on the wrong path, we are going to take you back even if we have to spank you, and take the responsibility together with you.」



「Kaa-san……」



Hajime thought, even when he had obtained the power to slaughter even god, but as expected, he was still no match against his father and mother. And then, he recalled his beloved daughter that he obtained in the other world, and he keenly felt how he was still lacking as a father.



Shuu and Sumire gently patted Hajime who was closing his eyes quietly. If they actually saw Hajime murdering someone with their own eyes, there was no way they wouldn’t be shaken. Perhaps it would become a trauma for them. Perhaps they wouldn’t be able to give him their words unhesitatingly like this.



Even so, one thing that they could say with certainty was, that them getting scared of Hajime, their son, and then distancing themselves with him due to that, was the only thing that they would never do.



That feeling was certainly conveyed to Hajime. Therefore, Hajime could only say one thing.



「……Thank you. Tou-san, Kaa-san.」



The eyes of Shuu and Sumire squinted gently.



While feeling the warmth of these parents, Hajime opened his eyes and showed a wide and mischievous grin to them. His heart was perfectly cleared. Hajime recovered his usual self due to the acceptance of his parents towards his changed self.



In that case, what was left was the report that in a sense was the most important report that he had to tell them. It would also become a proof about the other world that he told them about just now, so it would be two birds with one stone.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san. Do you remember, in the past……about the stupid talk of what am I going to do if I am summoned into another world?」



「Hm? Aa, I remember. If you are a man, then in a world of sword and magic you will surely want to defeat the demon king and build a harem, that was what I said, while Hajime, I think you said 『If it’s me, it doesn’t feel like I can defeat the demon king at all. What I can do, at best is to return home. And then if I find someone important for me there, then I’ll return together with them』, right?」



「Tou-san remember that well huh. Well, that’s how it is. I think I mentioned it a bit in my explanation before but……I found important people there. I want to introduce them to you, so is it fine right now?」



「Right now? It’s already dawn you know? Or rather, you made a girlfriend there!? Furthermore from another world? No, wait, I still don’t know whether the story of another world summoning is true or not……」



「Tha, that’s right, isn’t it? By any chance, that person might be the one who planted false memories in Hajime……. And then, that person will say something like 『If you want your son to return to normal, then please buy this holy vase. Don’t worry, if you buy it right now, I’ll give you a special fifty percent discount for this million yen vase you know?』!」(TN: In Japan there were cases of fraud where a salesman was selling a vase/pot, that they claimed was holy, possessing various effects, at a crazy price.)



Shuu who heard the full blown wild delusion of the frankly wary Sumire instantly went 「Sumire, are you a genius!?」 in agreement. While smiling wryly from witnessing his beloved being considered as a crooked salesman, Hajime’s gaze wandered at empty air.



「……Yue, can you hear me? It’s me.」



「Oi, Sumire! For some reason Hajime is talking to empty air see! Is this that? What is called as air girlfriend!? What should I do as a father like this!?」



「Calm down dear. We were careless……surely they had set up listening devices in our house! After this, the woman who will sell us the holy vase will arrive after getting called by Hajime you know!」



「What, the? Bastard, making my son as the stooge of your vase selling……don’t think that this is going to end up well for you. With my marvelous haggling technique, I’m going to beat down the price until below fifty thousand yen!」



Shuu and Sumire who couldn’t possibly understand that Hajime who was suddenly talking to empty air was using “telepathy” were greatly shaken up. Sumire was strangely speaking up a realistic assumption while Shuu became slightly panicked and hardened a slightly off determination. And then, before Hajime knew it, Yue had become a holy vase seller girl.



Hajime continued his telepathy while giving a sidelong glance at such parents.



「Yeah, it’s fine already. ……Yeah, I already talked about the gist of the events. I want to introduce all of you quickly. ……That’s right. You know the coordinates right? Yeah, then open a gate and come here directly. It’s at……let’s see, open it around a meter from my east.」



Actually, right now Yue was at the school building that Hajime attended before. When they returned to earth from Tortus, Hajime made the rooftop of the school building as the place where the gate was opened. From that place, it was easy for him to imagine his home’s position, and even if they arrived in the afternoon, normally that rooftop was locked and people were forbidden to enter there, the location was also outside of the public’s gaze. That spot was convenient to use.



And then, after the classmates returned to their own homes one after another, Yue and the others proposed to stay at the school. It was so they wouldn’t hinder Hajime’s reunion with his parents.



Naturally, Shuu and Sumire who didn’t know about that circumstances could only face each other in wonderment about their son who continued to talk towards empty air――they stiffened right after that.



With a distortion, the space right beside Hajime suddenly formed a vortex, and then it formed an ellipse shape right after that, and then a moment later a familiar scenery――a place that seemed to be a classroom of a school could be seen.



「A, Any**ere, Door?」(TN: Reference to anywhere door from Doraemon)



「E, eh? Wai-, this is just too fantasy so suddenly!」



While Shuu and Sumire were greatly flustered, Yue’s face peeked out with a plop from inside the gate. Those crimson eyes were wandering through the room with deep interest, and then those eyes narrowed joyfully when they captured Shuu and Sumire, at the end of which those eyes turned to Hajime and wordlessly inquired 「It’s fine to enter?」



「Welcome, to the Nagumo household. Come in without reservation.」



「……Nn」



With Hajime’s welcoming words, Yue slowly stepped into the Nagumo house. The space hole that suddenly opened inside the room and the beautiful girl who was like an awakened bisque doll that appeared from there caused Shuu and Sumire to open and close their mouths wordlessly in obvious turmoil.



Hajime stood beside Yue, and while grinning mischievously like a kid who succeeded in his prank, he introduced his beloved lover.



「Tou-san, Kaa-san. Her name is Yue. She is my special person. By the way, she is a person of another world, a vampire, and a former princess.」



「「-, Template attribute!?」」(TN: I think what they mean here is how Yue has so many clichéd character attributes.)



Shuu and Sumire splendidly returned a response that was impossible for run-of-the-mill people. Inside her heart Yue was feeling warm and fluffy thinking 「Aa, they are really Hajime’s parents」 while at the same time, feeling a bit nervous in this important event where she was greeting her lover’s parents, she pinched at the edge of her skirt, and showed a courtesy gesture that was overflowing with elegance and beauty.



「……How do you do, Hajime’s Otou-sama, Okaa-sama. Please call me Yue. Please take care of me for many years to come.」



「E, o, ou. No, I need to be polite here. Please take care of me too desu?」



「Ple, please take care of me, desuwa?」(TN: Both of the parents also used extremely polite language here)



The shock from witnessing the blond-haired crimson-eyed beautiful girl that looked like she came out from a picture book, and also this being the introduction to their son’s lover for the first time in their life, caused the end of their sentence to actually turn strange. The figures of his parents lowering their head repeatedly and incoherently deepened Hajime’s grin, however, as though to say that 「It won’t end with just this much yeah!」 he opened his mouth once more.



「Shia, it’s okay now!」



「Hai desuu! Tou-sama, Kaa-sama, I am called Shia! Please take care of me desuu!」(TN: The Kaa-sama and Tou-sama used by her is the kanji for in-law.)



「「Rabbit eaaar, it cameee―!?」」



Shia leaped out from the gate with a wide smile while her rabbit ears were flopping around. Shuu and Sumire showed a splendid harmonious reaction to the appearance of this second beautiful girl. Without even any composure to reply, their eyes became nailed to the rabbit ears that were moving around.



「Tio, come!」



「Uh huh. This art our first meeting, Chichiue-dono, Hahaue-dono. I am Tio Clarce of the dragon race, a mistress of Goshujin-sama, and also his sex slave. Please take care of me forever from here on.」



「「Sex slave!?」」



With twin hills that looked like they were going to spill out anytime, and dragon wings spread and flapped behind her in order to expose her true form, Tio made that greeting that was relatively no good. Hearing that caused Shuu and Sumire to spontaneously stagger. It appeared that the consecutive shocking developments made their feet unsteady.



「Remia, Myuu!」



「Yes dear. Nice to meet you, I am called Remia. Please take care of me, together with my daughter.」



「E, err, err……I, I am Papa’s daughter Myuu desu! Ojii-chan, Obaa-chan, please take care of me nano!」(TN: Ojii-chan=grandfather, obaa-chan=grandmother)



「O, Ojii-chan!?」



「Da, daughteeer!?」



The beauty who lowered her head politely with a graceful appearance, and the small Myuu who gave her all in greeting. Shuu and Sumire were finally paralyzed from the astonishing words of Myuu. And then, *gigigi* their gaze moved toward Hajime like a machine that had forgotten to be oiled.



Their eyes were speaking their feelings more eloquently than anything. That was to say, 「Explain what is the meaning of this!」



Therefore, Hajime answered concisely.



「Myuu is my daughter, and all of the others are my wives. Well, please take care of them okay.」



「「So casual!?」」



「Ah, by the way, there are four more wives, so I’ll have them give their greeting on another day.」



「「Real cheat hareeem!?」」



As expected, the two of them splendidly synchronized in a splendid reaction.



And then, the parental heart that was unshakeable even when their son confessed to being a killer went 「You, are you really my son!?(Shuu)」 and 「You, are you really that son of mine!?(Sumire)」 in great agitation and fluster, and then Shuu suddenly went ‘I revealed the trick!’ and yelled 「No, wait, Sumire! There is no way girls this cute are real! Everything is CG! Don’t get tricked!」, hearing that Sumire yelled 「Dear, you are a genius! Hajime, open your eyes! Even if 2D girls are converted into 3D, in the end, they are just false images. It will only end in vain!」 with a sorrowful expression……



Anyway, the room already descended into a grand pandemonium.



However, even that pandemonium didn’t continue for long.



It was because Myuu who sensed that they weren’t welcomed from the state of the two parents got depressed, then she asked 「Ojii-chan, Obaa-chan……is Myuu no good?」. The result from that went without saying.



「How do you do, I am Myuu’s Ojii-chan you know?」



「How do you do, I am Myuu-chan’s Obaa-chan you know?」



They splendidly got back on their feet within an instant. Their figure that was knocked out helplessly by Myuu’s sly loveliness was exactly the same as Hajime as expected.



Like that, after they managed to get back on their feet, seeing the fantasy phenomenon that happened in front of their eyes and the beautiful girls who were not human, the two people who right from the start had high resistance to this kind of thing due to their nature of work immediately confirmed the truth of Hajime’s words.



After that, there was a great commotion of ‘hip hip hurray’. The too real this and that which their son experienced, and the real harem of beautiful girls……their otaku soul ate it up energetically before they threw a barrage of questions at Hajime and the others with eyes shining brightly.



When Tio used regeneration magic to get out the image recording of Hajime’s battle that she recorded, strange voices resounded through the residential area in the morning. 「UoOOOOOO-, AWESOOOOMEE! Did you know, did you know huuuh!? That’s, that’s my son! Thank you very much!」or, 「KyaAAAA-, you heard that!? Just now, he said something amazing you know! This is bad! This child is seriously demon king-sama! And then, demon king-sama is my son desu! Thank you very much!」 and so on. Perhaps because the two were also staying up all night without sleeping, their tension kept raising and raising up, in the end, the two of them continued to make a commotion until Hajime who became unable to endure the shame made them go ‘abababa’ using Lightning Clad. (TN: That abababa expressed cartoonish electric shock, where the person that got shocked exposed their skeleton and ended up with only smoking body and curled up hair.)



「……Nn. As expected from Hajime’s Otou-sama and Okaa-sama. They are completely out of the ordinary.」



「Certainly, it feels like that they are really Hajime-san’s parent like this desu.」



「It can even be said, that this is only natural for Goshujin-sama’s Chichiue-dono and Hahaue-dono.」



「Ufufu, they resemble Haijme-san, what a unique personage.」



「Yep-, Papa, really resembled Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan nano!」



Yue and others spoke their impression while lukewarmly staring at Shuu and Sumire who fainted with great smiles.



To those impressions, Hajime said a sentence.



「What the hell do you guys mean by that?」



Hajime’s expression turned speechless.



Shuu and Sumire who returned from their reminiscence called with wide grins at their son’s family who were flirting and frolicking in a sense at the morning dining table.



「Which reminds me, Hajime. You are going to meet with Kaori-chan and the others today, right? You are not going to be late?」



「Aa~, it will be at past noon, so there is no problem.」



「Shizuku-chan will also come, right? What about Ai-chan?」



「It seems that Shizuku will come together with Kaori, but Aiko, I think she can come, but perhaps she will be late. She has her work and also her position after all.」



Hajime shrugged, while Sumire lowered her eyebrow in sympathy thinking 「Ai-chan also has it hard eh.」



Today Hajime had the plan of having dinner with everyone, including Kaori and the others too. The classmates would also participate so it would be something like the class reunion of the people who got summoned to the alternate world. Although currently all of them were still active students, so the nuance was a bit different.



「Oi, Hajime. Tell Kaori-chan and the others to show their faces here more often. About beautiful daughters in law, the more the better.」



「That’s right. Or rather, if the houses reconstruction is finished, it’s okay for them to live here instead you know? Isn’t it the best when the house is lively and merry?」



「……The girls themselves don’t really mind that……rather, they seem to want to come normally, but their families don’t seem to approve. Well, that’s the sensible decision.」



At the corner of his mind, Hajime recalled the time when he met the family of Kaori and Shizuku while shrugging.



「H~mm, there is that. Well, just tell them that Kaa-san will welcome them anytime. Also……fufu. I won’t mind if you are going to stay over tonight you know?」



「Debauchery party eh! What a terrifying child even as my son.」



「You are noisy. I told you already I’m going to come home normally. Really, Tou-san and Kaa-san are……」



Hajime’s expression turned somewhat tired right from the morning. The wives from another world watched over that exchange between parent and child smilingly.



What was unfolding before their eyes, was certainly a peaceful and gentle, normal every day of a family.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspellings and omitted words.



I think in the next chapter, I’ll try writing about going out around the city with the wives.



It seems that the heartwarming story without much development will continue, but I’m also wanting to write a long extra story before long so I will be happy if you all can read while feeling the heartwarming atmosphere.



……If Shirakome has more time……real life, you bastard……





Chapter 182




Arifureta After – Downtown Date? Part 1



AN: I’m sorry, this chapter is a bit late……



It’s short but, please have mercy.



At the station plaza several blocks away from the neighborhood of Hajime’s house, there was quite a splendid fountain installed. Many people were bustling around on this holiday.



Naturally, there were a lot of young males and females in that spot who seemed to have rendezvous appointments. Their gazes often moved alternately towards their watches and the direction that the person they were waiting for would come from, or they were playing around with their smartphones to kill time.



Amidst those young people, there was the figure of Hajime. What seemed to be different from him compared to other people, was that he never particularly looked at his watch or played with his smartphone, he kept sitting on the bench beside the fountain while staring absentmindedly at empty air, like a father who was taking his children out to play on a holiday while slackening from the fatigue of his everyday work.



Yet, regardless of his slackening atmosphere, there was a vague presence from him as though his back was standing straight, perhaps it was because of the abnormal experience a normal youth of the same age would never encounter that Hajime had piled up.



While Hajime’s body was in a really relaxed posture, the attention of the surroundings was naturally attracted to him because of that presence he exuded. Despite the strange sense of security that his calm atmosphere caused, there was also the slight aroma of danger that came from him.



Due to that, perhaps it could be said as only natural that sometimes there were groups of girls who kept glancing toward Hajime. There were also girls whispering to each other with slightly reddened cheeks among those groups, who were on the verge of doing reverse picking up. (TN: Gyaku nanpa: Instead of a man calling out to a woman on the street, it was the woman who called on a man in reverse.)



It was a popularity that was unthinkable for Hajime before he got summoned to the alternate world Tortus.



「……Should I use presence isolation like this?」



Naturally, for Hajime who possessed monstrous specs, the movements of the surroundings were leaked into his ears, he muttered such thing while his posture and gaze stayed unmoving.



Like that, a group of girls with courage(?) finally approached timidly in order to call out to Hajime, at that time when the surrounding girls and boys were observing carefully, an energetic calling voice that caused them to open their eyes wide in shock resounded.



「Ah, you are there nano~. Papaa~~~~!」



*sutetetetete―* The one who dashed from the street of the station was Myuu, her emerald blond hair was lightly fluttering while a full smile was pasted on her face. That lovely figure of a foreigner beautiful little girl running with her all caused the gazes of all the people at the station plaza to move to her.



As though to say ‘who cares about those gazes!’, Myuu didn’t show any reaction at all and keeping her momentum she dived at Hajime who was slacking up on the bench.



Like a bullet, Myuu leaped at full power without a single shred of reservation or mercy. Normally, Hajime would match the timing and sway back to perfectly kill the impact and gently catch her, but right now he was sitting on the bench so he couldn’t do that.



And so, one of Hajime’s hands gently scooped the jumping Myuu’s shoulder and he skillfully converted the charging momentum into rotation. So to speak, it was something like Aikido. Just before Myuu impacted the stomach of Hajime in midair, she was twirled in a rotation and like that she was dropped down to sit on the lap of Hajime.



「Oy, Myuu. I told you many times already, don’t jump because it’s dangerous.」



「Ehehe~, I’m sorry nano~」



Myuu blinked for a moment because she didn’t understand what happened, but seeing Hajime who was warning her with a wry smile, she immediately grinned loosely and leaned back snugly at Hajime’s chest.



Hajime made a troubled smile seeing the state of his beloved daughter who didn’t seem to reflect on her action at all. He then used his hand to change the way he held her and then he stood up.



From the surroundings, 「E, eee? Papa? Just now, that girl called him papa?」 or 「Lies, he has a child!?」, or 「Oi oi, how old is that guy……if that kid is his child, then just when was she born……」, or 「Rather than that, just now was amazing wasn’t it? That kid was rotated in a full circle you know?」, the topic was spreading with an amazing momentum in the plaza.



But, the entrance of Myuu was still only the beginning. All of them would witness even more shocking scenes after this.



「My my, Myuu. Mama told you that it’s no good for you to run off alone, right? After all, it’s easy to get lost in this world……」



「Mamaa. But, Papa is here so……」



「Ufufu, Myuu really is a daddy’s girl. Dear……thank you for waiting.」



With her sandals making cute sounds *patapata* from each step, wearing a long skirt and elegant cardigan, also swaying emerald blond hair that was braided with a hair tie, Remia finally arrived.



Seeing the entrance of an older, or rather a foreigner onee-san who had plenty of sex appeal of a widow, *gulp* the sound of someone gulping their saliva could be heard from somewhere. Several men were already sending piercing gazes of envy towards Hajime who had beauties as his wife and daughter.



But, still not yet. It still wasn’t over yet with this!



「Hajime-saa~n, thank you for waiting~.」



「My apologies for making you wait, Goshujin-sama.」



The ones who were saying that with their arrival were Shia, with her faint bluish white long straight hair swaying, wearing a miniskirt from which her white slender beautiful legs were generously exposed, and Tio who wasn’t wearing her usual kimono but instead wore loose trousers and a V-shirt along with a long cardigan.



Both of them were owners of good looks that could make idols or actresses run away barefooted in shame. Two such girls were approaching towards Hajime who seemed to already have a wife and child with obvious good will coloring their whole face.



The gazes of the people at the station plaza were already in a glued state towards Hajime without being able to take their gazes off. Their curiosity kept rising over the limit.



While completely ignoring those people, Hajime shrugged while still carrying Myuu.



「You all wanted to try having a rendezvous, right? I don’t really mind. Spending time not doing anything only staring absentmindedly at nothing is not bad sometimes.」



Yes, it was just as Hajime said, if it was asked for what reason these people who were living at the same house were meeting at the station plaza at an appointed time, that was because of the request of the female camp. Hajime thought in his heart that it was better to go together, but if he was requested for something like this then he couldn’t reject it. It was a cute request for him.



「So, what about Yue? You all came together, right?」



Hajime tilted his head seeing that there was only one of his lovers who hadn’t yet appeared at this place.



「Aa, I think Yue-san will arrive soon. There were some guys picking up women in the train, so Yue-san was taking care of them while telling us to go ahead.」



「Taking care……don’t tell me, she isn’t going to smash them, right? Spare me from that. If the monster of the clothing store will be overflowing even until this world……I’m prepared to even wage war you know?」



「Even though Goshujin-sama is a godslayer, thou art still not very good against Christabel and the others huh.」



Hajime’s expression cramped from listening to Shia’s explanation. Tio was being somewhat exasperated seeing that state of Hajime, but when she thought from the point of view of Hajime whose ass kept getting stared feverishly each time by those manly women of another world, her gaze was changing into sympathy thinking that it might be something that couldn’t be helped.



By the way, according to Shia’s additional explanation, it seemed that Yue would only toy with the guys’ memory and mind using soul magic, and she wouldn’t use the crotch smash. For the time being, Yue and the others had also learned of the proper method of dealing with trouble in Japan, which had strict laws to maintain order compared to the other world.



While they were talking like that, Hajime suddenly felt a restless sign from the direction of the station street, so Hajime turned his gaze there.



Sure enough, from there he could see the figure of a beautiful girl with crimson eyes and golden hair that looked as though she came right out off the screen, walking with a calm air majestically, and also with elegance and gracefulness at the same time, as though she was a queen walking on a red carpet.



Yue wasn’t in her girl mode that was normally in the appearance of a twelve year old. She had transformed her appearance similar to Hajime, into an age of around seventeen years old. There was no need to mention her bewitching air, the faint smile that was pasted on her lips might be from her feelings towards her beloved that was at the end of her sight. That smile also exposed tenderness, which was magnifying the charm of her perfect beauty by several times over.



Yue, who should be called as a peerless beauty from just a glance, was exuding out an adult charm, but the clothes that she came wearing were a loose parka and lacy skirt that honestly seemed to be rough yet cute. That style of clothing pushed aside the difficult to approach aura that was characteristic in a beautiful person which further boosted up her charm.



Anyone who caught sight of Yue, regardless of their age or gender, they would have their gaze drawn in without exception. The sounds of *gon-*, or *gashan-*, or *bachikon-* that could be heard from here and there, were the sounds of disaster that were played by the victim of Yue. In a sense, she could be called a walking disaster.



A youth crashed into a telephone pole because he was walking while watching Yue, a group of boys that seemed to be students were stampeding over a store’s signboard, a girlfriend who came back to her senses slapped her boyfriend beside her to drag him back to reality.



However, Yue didn’t pay attention to those at all. She walked forward dashingly, and before long, amidst the gathered attention, she had approached Hajime’s side.



「……Nn. Hajime, thank you, for letting us to have a “rendezvous”.」



Yue then put her lips on top of Hajime’s. That act was really natural, as though doing that was only a matter of course, like how if the wind blew then the leaves would sway.



Yue put her hand gently on Hajime’s chest with her feet standing on her tiptoes to make herself a little taller in order to kiss Hajime. Seeing such a Yue caused the surroundings to get shaken.



「Geez, Yue-oneechan is unfair nano! Myuu is going to do ‘chuu’ too!」



「My my, then I too……」



「Uu, it’s a little embarrassing in front of a crowd like this desu, but……」



「Art that so? Rather, this makes me a little excited though?」



Right after Yue separated from Hajime, Hajime nonchalantly evaded the octopus kiss of Myuu who aimed at his lips and redirected it on his cheek. After that, he accepted Remia and Shia’s kiss while gifting a slap to Tio. In the end, the female camp cheeks were blushing, and one pervert was going ‘haa haa’ while holding her slapped cheek.



The scene of a real harem, where one man with a child was exchanging kisses with multiple beautiful girls and women, caused the tension of the people in the area to break through the limit. 「What the hell is that!? What is going on!? Is this a shooting of some show!?」 some panicked, 「Tha, that man, what kind of person is he!? Is he the son of a financial conglomerate somewhere?」 some were imagining the true identity of Hajime,「Thi, this is Japan right?」 and some were doubting their own whereabouts, the crowd was getting really busy with their thoughts.



At last, some people with smartphone cameras appeared, deciding that there was no way they were going to let go of this rare scene.



But, without a single exception,



「E, eh? Wai-, the screen light vanished suddenly!?」



「What’s this, it got noises all over!?」



「No way, is it broken!? Spare me from that!」



Like that, all the smartphones suddenly became out of form and the people couldn’t take pictures using their phones. The cause of this was naturally, Hajime. By performing a minute adjustment to his characteristic magic “Lightning Clad”, he emitted out electromagnetic waves that disrupted the electronics in the area. Of course, if the electronic device got away from Hajime then they would return to normal.



「……Nn. It became noisy. Hajime, let’s go soon?」



「No no, what are you trying to do attempting to depart naturally like that. There are still members who haven’t arrived here yet.」



「……? Hajime, you are feeling tired right now.」



「You think I’m Agent Mu**er. Don’t try to avert the topic with X-Fi*e make-believe.」(TN: X-Files series, FBI agent Fox William Mulder. Don’t know what this refers too though, never watched X-Files)



Even while knowing that there were members who hadn’t arrived yet, Yue urged them to depart with a really natural gesture. To that, Hajime smiled wryly while making a retort.



「……It’s fine, there is no problem. Those two had severe constipation and cannot co――」



「Yuee~~~~! What are you saying~~!」



「Wait a second, no matter what, that lie is just too cruel don’t you think!」



Yue’s deceiving words that were too cruel to be targeted to a maiden were cut off by Kaori who was running to here wearing a feminine one-piece dress, with her body returned to her original body, and Shizuku, whose trademark ponytail was swaying behind her.



The further addition of two more beautiful girls caused the surroundings to become hectic. Kaori only gave that a glance before glaring sharply at Yue right away. And then she immediately turned her gaze to Hajime and smiled gently.



「Sorry, Hajime-kun. You’ve waited long?」



Hajime was going to open his mouth, but before that happened,



「……Nn. He waited feeling bored to death. As punishment, Kaori is to go home right away. Now, quickly go home. Now, now.」



「I won’t go home! Yue you bully-. Yue who is saying something like that is the one that has to go home!」



Yue kept pushing away on Kaori, to that Kaori reacted honestly and pushed back at Yue. This was what was called as “Hand Four” in pro-wrestling. The two girls were grappling with each other putting all their strength into it. Both of their foreheads pushed at each other without any side taking a single step back. (TN: Don’t know if that’s the correct name, Yue and Kaori here were pushing at each other with their hands grasping the other’s hands and also their foreheads coming into contact.)



By the way, that Kaori was able to face Yue equally despite not being in the body of an apostle was because Kaori’s original body itself was inserted with the factor of apostle flesh and changed into a specially made body.



It was a body reconstruction for the sake of clearing the problem of the difference in lifespan between her and Hajime and the others, but that wasn’t all, she was also able to activate “Apostle Mode”, in that case, her hair would change to silver and she could let out wings from her back. Of course, she could also use the disintegration ability and twin sword arts without any problem. ……Though those were something extremely unneeded in this peaceful Japan life.



Yue and Kaori were always quarreling about something, but the one who took the lead in the body reconstruction of Kaori was none other than Yue. Perhaps due to the influence when she was taken over by Ehito, Yue somehow understood the method to create apostles, so by using all age of god magic and with the help of Hajime and Tio, the apostlefication of Kaori succeeded splendidly. Their closeness was as great as how much they were quarreling……perhaps this phrase existed to describe these two.



「Err, Hajime. I think we came right on time but……I wonder if we made you wait?」



Even while looking troubled at the quarrel of the two, Shizuku asked timidly at Hajime. Of course, Hajime said no to the question. Shizuku sighed in relieve hearing that, and then after she looked around feeling a bit embarrassed, she asked Hajime with reservation.



「Say……I wonder if I look strange?」



That question was naturally referring to the fashion she was wearing. Shizuku, before she was summoned to another world and even while she was in another world, basically kept wearing pants, but today her appearance was wrapped in a flare skirt and no-sleeve shirt. Although looking from the length of her skirt that reached around above the knee, and the properly fastened buttons on her skirt, this appearance was also really like Shizuku.



「Yeah, I think you look cute. Or rather, before this too, I told you already that you don’t need to get that shy just from wearing a skirt, right? After all, it really suits you.」



「Is, is that so? Fufu, thank you.」



The appearance of Shizuku who was shyly fiddling around with her skirt, if the self-alleged little sisters who idolized her as Onee-sama saw this then they would surely faint without a doubt. That was just how lovely the figure of Shizuku who was letting out her natural girlishness in front of Hajime was.



And then, Yue and Kaori whose hands were still grappling each other with only their heads turned towards that exchange between Hajime and Shizuku were,



「……So nonchalantly, taking the delicious part like that. Shizuku, what a terrifying child.」



「Shizuku-chan……recently, you are not stopping me even when I was quarreling with Yue aren’t you……」



Even the whispers of those two didn’t reach the ears of the swordswoman-sama whose maiden power was in full throttle right now.



After that, Kaori who noticed that Yue and others had kissed Hajime pressed Hajime for a kiss as expected while Shizuku whose face became bright red thinking ‘such a thing is impossible in front of the crowd!’ got a little depressed that it would be only her who didn’t get a kiss. But Hajime, who was unable to be indifferent to that state of Shizuku, forcefully kissed her which caused her to faint. It went without saying that the station plaza became a pandemonium after that.



Seeing that the commotion was also getting larger, Hajime and the others set out to the city for a date until five o’clock, when the dinner party with the summoned classmates would start.



「I have……seen something amazing.」



After that, someone among the people who were left behind whispered that. That sentence was exactly something that represented the feelings of everyone in the station plaza.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspellings and omitted words.





Chapter 183




Arifureta After – Downtown Date? Part 2



On the street that was slightly distanced from the downtown main street, in the fast-food restaurant that was facing the street, at the window-side seat on that restaurant’s second floor, the figures of three young men who seemed to be high school students could be seen slacking up listlessly on the chair, as though to say that they had too much free time to spare.



Above the tray that was put on the table in front of the three, burger wrappings that had been crumpled up into a round shape and empty French fries containers were scattered about carelessly.



「Aa~」



While scowling at the juice which had become thin due to the melting ice, one of the high school students was discharging out a strange groan. Hearing that, the remaining two students directed an annoyed gaze and an understanding gaze at the first student.



「I know that we got nothing to do, but don’t make that kind of voice. It’s embarrassing.」



「You are saying something like that huh. On this precious holiday, three men are jabbering like this……haaa~. On top of having nothing to do, this is just empty……」



「Don’t say that. That’ll just make you feel emptier.」



These three who had been friends since middle school were currently first-year high school students. Harboring a faint hope that if they advanced to high school then it would be an exciting springtime of their lives that didn’t exist in middle school……that something would happen. In actuality, there wasn’t really anything particular that happened, and they were spending normal days that held no difference with their middle school period.



Actually, the school they were enrolled into, was the high school where the world-shaking occult case happened a year ago, and among the current third-years, there were also the seniors who were directly related with that case. That too became the primary cause that inflated the hope they were harboring that “something” might happen in their high school life (they received fierce opposition from their parents when they chose this school as the first choice but they persuaded their parents) but……there wasn’t really anything that happened.



Of course, there was also a decisively different point before and after the occult case, and that was something that undoubtedly made them delighted from the bottom of their hearts that they enrolled into their current high school. That point was……



「Aa, I want to have a date with Yue-senpai.」



「I want to marry Shia-senpai.」



「Shirasaki-senpai……is great isn’t she.」



The three were facing up to the ceiling while leaking out their wild delusions, that rather than with these male friends with whom they had a stuffily undesirable but inseparable relationship, they would rather walk around the city on a holiday with the seniors they yearned for. And then hearing each other’s words, they exchanged glances among them. And then, they spoke words to each other at the same time.



「「「Don’t say something like that. It feels empty.」」」



The three simultaneously sighed so deeply to the degree that it would surely let out all the happiness that they possessed. While the images of the seniors they yearned for were floating at the back of their minds, at the same time they lamented the fact of how the gaze of their yearned person was directed only at a single person. Furthermore, that person was the same person for the three different girls they yearned for, and that fact was known not only in school, but even the whole neighborhood had already known that fact. (TN: In Japan, there is the saying that sighing will cause your happiness to get away from you.)



In addition to that, it didn’t stop with just those three seniors, something like that was just……



「Shit, even though in this world, there are many people in love poverty like us, that shitty bastard-」



「O, oi. Stop that. Did you forget already, about the guys that were turned like that after speaking ill of that “you-know-who” behind his back?」



「……Are you talking about the captain of the karate club, how he got transfigured into a big sis the next day?」



「There is also that, but there are also people like the ace of the soccer club who got planted with a phobia of females, or the math teacher who was always acting sarcastically one day suddenly started using polite language at “you know who” like a military personnel……」



「Bu, but, those were lies, right? Those were just like urban legends, right? Look, those guys, they are the ‘returnees’. Those kinds of stories were created a lot half for fun……in fact, there aren’t any seniors or teachers like in those rumors.」



「That’s, you’re right but……」



Stories that sounded like an urban legend――but speaking about that, even the story about the “real harem” also “sounded like an urban legend” in that case……In the end, that was what the three of them came to think but they didn’t say it out loud. It was the truth that students and teachers that became the basis of the rumors couldn’t be found in the school, but at the same time, there were also rumors that those rumored guys had transferred schools or changed jobs.



It was unknown what was truth and what was a lie, and that also granted uneasy feelings that they couldn’t describe. Especially because the new first-years didn’t know about the ‘returnees’――the people who returned back from being spirited away in mass were called like that by society, and like that the naming stuck―― school life right after they returned from the occult case.



Naturally, there were also a lot of first-year students who were ignorant of the ways of the world and got carried away. They attempted to go on the offensive towards the beautiful seniors and foreign students that were among the ‘returnee’ group; but……most of them were turned into ash after being shown the relationship of those beauties with “that person”, or they were stopped by the male seniors of the ‘returnee’ group with kind gazes when they attempted to take malicious actions out of jealousy. After a few months passed, those kinds of people eventually became a little bit more adult like from understanding in their hearts that “it’s just how it is”.



Even so, as expected, there was no way the yearning towards the seniors who were so beautiful that even celebrities couldn’t win against them would disappear, and that went even truer with the jealousy towards that “you-know-who” who was literally monopolizing those beautiful seniors like a joke. Grumbles or cursing would sometimes leak out suddenly toward that you-know-who like this.



「Haa……hm? O, oi, that.」



「Hm?」



「Aa?」



One of the male students for some reason turned his gaze outside the window, and then he noticed that group and raised his voice. The other two got curious and moved their gazes to follow his, and there, at an unbelievable timing, the rumored group was walking on the street on the other side.



It was that “you-know-who” ――Nagumo Hajime, and his wives.



「Oi oi, just why are those people here?」



「That is, no matter how you see it, this must be a date.」



「As always, what an amazing line up, huh……wait, that child riding on “that person’s” shoulder, is that the rumored daughter? So it’s true that he has a child? Isn’t that bad……」



*bita-!* The three boys clung on the window glass, staring hungrily at Hajime who was walking nonchalantly while being surrounded by extraordinarily beautiful girls and women in enjoyment. Seeing it from the viewpoint of the people inside the restaurant, the figures of those three were like geckos that were clinging to a window, it was a relatively strange sight. It almost caused the 0 yen smile of the restaurant waitress to crumble. (TN: 0 yen smile=a free smile, a business smile)



「Yue-senpai, Shia-senpai……also Shirasaki-senpai and Yaegashi-senpai are there too. Next are the black haired beauty and the blonde beauty that were sometimes seen at the school festival or after school……」



「Just what kind of perfect lineup is this. Dammit it all-」



「Aa, also that child……she is super cute. There is even a beautiful little girl……how envious.」



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



The last statement caused the three to spontaneously leak out stupid sounds while they faced each other. Or rather, two of them were making 「Eh, this guy is seriously, that kind of guy?」 look at the last one while drawing back. That last person seeing that tried to solve the misunderstanding in panic.



「Ah, those senpai are getting farther see.」



「Yosh, we got nothing to do anyway, let’s try following them yeah. What kind of date a real harem man is having, this can be used for future reference.」



「Hey, you guys are misunderstanding, okay? I’m not like that, okay?」



「But, will it be okay? From the rumor, those people for some reason are really sharp I heard. Won’t it be bad if we got found out?」



「This is in the middle of the city. There are also a lot of people so there won’t be any problem. Besides, this is that group of beauties we are talking about. There is a high chance some punks are going to pick a fight with them. At that time, what kind of action “that person” will take……perhaps we are going to understand a bit, whether those rumors about the senpai that got turned into a big sis or the teacher that got turned into pseudo-military are the truth or not, don’t you think so? You are curious, right?」



「He, heey, listen to me. I really, don’t have any interest for little kids at all. I was just simply……」



「Indeed……wait, this is bad, they are seriously getting farther. For now, let’s go first.」



「Yoosh. Well, even just paying respect to the figure of Yue-senpai and the others in casual clothing on the holiday is already the best anyway.」



「Yeah-」



「Oi wait! Don’t ignore me here! You guys are seriously mistaken! No, really!」



Until the end, the noisy three students didn’t notice the previous waitress whose eyes weren’t smiling anymore even though the lips were still smiling. They exited the restaurant with noisy footsteps. And then, from the entrance downstairs, a yell of 「Rather, I am someone that gets excited from adult woman, like female teachers, or widows heree-」 that would cause headaches could be heard……the waitresses sighed deeply hearing that.



「Heeey, you guys are really mistaken. okay?」



「Geez, we got it already.」



「You like female teachers or widows. That was what you were saying, right? Rather than that, don’t make so much noise. We are going to get found out here.」



「Even though I was on the brink of getting treated like a perverted lolicon just now, you guys……」



By the time he did a coming out with his outrageous fetish at the fast-food restaurant, he was already definitely a pervert, but no one there made such a retort. Rather than that, it was more important to observe carefully the party of Hajime and the others, who were currently enjoying window shopping, at the end of their gazes.



While they were observing, Hajime’s group entered a large three-story store that was fairly famous for its ladies fashion. From across the glass window, the trio could see how the shop employees and other customers were taken aback for a moment, but the shop employees were immediately recovering their usual attitudes like a pro while the other female customers were sending their gazes as though they had encountered a celebrity. The males who were taken along with the female customers were staring in fascination in a daze.



Amidst those, the aforementioned group didn’t look particularly bothered with all the attention and they only looked around inside the store. Sometimes the female camp would ask for Hajime’s opinion and try on some clothes. To that, Hajime changed Myuu’s position from on top of his shoulders to carrying her with one hand, and then he seemed to say one or two sentences back regarding his impressions of the clothes. Just from looking it could clearly be seen that Yue and the others were swinging from joy and nervousness when they were listening to what Hajime was saying.



「……By any chance, is that man giving back different impressions to all of them respectively?」



「If he is just saying “that suits you”, then at the very least it will be said six times from only one round you know. That would make him look like a broken record in that case.」



「Based on the expressions of all those girls, it seems that man is saying different impressions each time without fail. ……Is this, the true power of a harem man……」



The trio were continuing to observe by hiding in the shadows of merchandise even while being seen suspiciously by other customers and employees. Their expressions changed into a shudder. If it was them who were asked for impressions by that many women changing clothes multiple times like that……without a doubt, in their case they would be turned into a broken speaker saying the same thing.



But, after that, after the group was feeling satisfied walking around inside the store, the three mediocre high school students (first-years) were made to taste further the dreadfulness of a real harem man’s deed.



「Wa, wait-. Don’t tell me, he is planning to pay for that many clothes!?」



「That’s a lie right-. This store, it’s really expensive you know! Even if each of them only buys one piece of clothing, there will be six pieces……is that guy’s financial strength a monster!?」



Ahead of the gaze of the trembling trio, were six pieces of clothing that were put on the register. Yue, Shia, Tio, and Remia looked happy, while Kaori and Shizuku looked a bit apologetic. Even so, they were staring with undisguised happiness at the back of Hajime who was speaking with the clerk.



Hajime handed a card to the clerk and finished the bill, then he wrote the address for the mailing destination and turned back. He only shrugged towards the thanks that were said to him by the female camp before urging them to continue the date. And then there was Myuu who repeatedly lightly hit Hajime’s cheek in protest because it was only her who wasn’t bought some clothes due to the lack of size that matched her body, but as though to say that he got it, Hajime turned a gentle gaze at her and nodded before leaving the store.



The customers who were accompanied by lovers or friends, and the employees who were left behind then let out a deep sigh that was filled with various thoughts.



「Come to think of it, once, I heard a rumor. “That person’s” parents seem to be the president of a game company and a popular manga author. Also, it seems the person himself also did some part-time work, and it was said that he earned quite a lot.」



「Aa. I also heard something like that. In addition, there was also some joking rumor that the person himself was starting up a company related to jewelry. They said that that black haired beauty and that blonde beauty are the company director or the secretary or something.」



While following behind Hajime’s group, the trio were laughing dryly after conversing about the rumors that originally sounded like a joke but now seemed to have some truth in it after what they witnessed.



In fact, that rumor hit the bull’s eye. When Hajime just returned back to this world, he got really busy with taking care of large problems, like the forgery of everything that was related to government administration, including family register, etc., and also countermeasures against the mass media. By the time all of those calmed down, he was faced with the problem about providing for Yue and the others. Although he was still a student, as expected it was unacceptable for a man to keep relying on his parents for that. In order to raise his dependability status, he pondered for a way to earn money.



One of his ideas was starting up a jewelry shop. If he was asked why a jewelry shop, of course, it was because he was a transmutation master, and through that, he possessed an unfair method regarding the processing technology of jewels. Depending on the situation, even without any raw ore, as long as he had the Structural Component skill he could possibly create precious stones from scratch.



As for designs, he left it to Remia who unexpectedly displayed a good sense in her ideas while Hajime only transmuted following her designs. Furthermore, just by wearing these accessories that Hajime created, it would improve the physical condition of the wearer, improve the skin, or raise the memorizing ability, anyway the accessories had miraculous effects.



At present, the business was carried out from a small office, with their sales mainly coming from the internet, but even so, Tio, who in this one year was learning economy and management, carried out the administration of the business so he could work while also going to school. Rather, through word of mouth the good design sense and the miraculous effects were promoted further and the business produced quite an earning.



Furthermore, Remia and Tio who weren’t attending school respectively showed their interest in the various design style or economic system of earth, so this jewelry shop that Hajime established wasn’t just killing two birds with one stone, it was already killing three birds with one stone where Remia and Tio also could pursue their interests. Hajime himself was also stretching his hand towards various trades in his own way.



「Magic merchandise is selling like magic huh.」 Seeing Hajime who was making a really crooked smile while saying that caused Shuu and Sumire to avert their eyes at the same time while it went without saying that Yue and the others were enraptured with that Hajime.



「O, oi, it’s finally the development just as we thought! As expected from those seniors. The predator that snapped at the bait is nothing half-assed.」



「Wait, is this, going to be okay? From their appearance, they feel like college students, they are absurdly huge.」



「Le, let’s at least, prepare so that we can contact the police.」



Ahead of the gazes of the trio who were hiding by the nearby signboard while seeing the situation, Hajime’s group, who were going to enter into a children’s clothing shop, were being approached by five men with great body builds that seemed to be college students. The five college students were approaching with smiles on their mouths. Dyed hair, rough clothing, rough expressions, and rough atmospheres, from all those it was obvious that they were the type of people you wouldn’t want to get involved with.



The people in the surroundings were also somehow sensing the trouble that would happen, an uneasy air could be felt from them.



The approach of those fellows caused Hajime to look back and narrow his eyes. And then, the five men arrived before Hajime’s group, the sound of someone gulping could be heard from somewhere, immediately following,



「Hajime-san, also all the girlfriends, greetings ―su-!」



「「「「Greetings ―su-!」」」」



The five scary guys bowed their head simultaneously. Voices and expressions of 「Eee――!!」 were overflowing from the surroundings. The unexpected development also caused the trio to go 「Whyyyy!?」 with their bodies leaning out from the signboard. Amidst those, Hajime was,



「……Aa? Who are you guys?」



He returned a suspicious stare at the scary guys. Getting flustered and a bit shocked by that reply, a man with dyed blonde hair and piercings opened his mouth in a panicked rush.



「I, it’s me, me. Don’t you remember me?」



「Hmph? So this is a “It’s me, me” fraud right to the face……you are quite a novel guy huh.」(TN: “It’s me, me” fraud, when someone unknown called your phone and suddenly said “it’s me, me” without saying any name and in a panicked tone. They would claim that your friend or family just got into an accident and rush you to transfer money to them.) 「Tha, that’s not it! Half a year ago, I picked a fight with Hajime-san together with twenty of my friends. I am Hide that got beaten up black and blue at that time! After that, Hajime-san gave me introductions to my current workplace, and from that, I work together with Hajime-san a few times as an information dealer don’t you remember-」



「……Aah, yep. Hide huh. Hide. Yep. I remember you now.」



「Do, do you really remember mee-」



Hajime obviously didn’t seem to remember, but it would be scary later if this Hide kept asking doggedly (half a year ago, he had tasted “true fear”) so he stopped insisting. That scary face changed into a pathetic look like a puppy that was thrown away.



「So, beaten up information dealer Hide, what’s your business with me?」



「That name feels like it’s going to end up as my nickname, so please spare me from that. Eeerr, I don’t really have any business, but I just caught sight of Hajime-san by chance, so I only came to give a greeting, that’s all.」



「I see. What an honest guy huh. Aa, somehow I recall you. If I remember correctly, you guys are that bunch who got the cold shoulder from Yue and the others, and then you tried to take Myuu hostage as revenge, and in the end, you guys did dogeza while crying to me, right?」



「……Please don’t say anything about that anymore. That is a past that I really want to erase……」



The eyes of Hide and his friends turned empty altogether while their bodies were shivering. One of them looked like they could burst out crying anytime.



After that, Hide and the others who talked a bit with Hajime said that if it was children’s clothing then they knew of a shop of an acquaintance nearby that was little-known yet had good merchandise, and upon receiving that information Hajime and the others headed there. Seeing the five scary guys who were like well-trained soldiers from how they continued to lower their heads until the figure of Hajime’s group disappeared from view, it went without saying that it caused the gaze of the surroundings to become wordless.



「Somehow, it was different from expectation……」



「What we expected had already happened, and it was settled by “that person”, and this is the result huh.」



「……“Settlement” that made that dangerous looking older bunch act like loyal dogs, huh……those guys, did you two see they were trembling……」



「「……」」



For some reason, the bodies of the trio shuddered suddenly. And then at that time when they were pondering whether to continue tailing or to just stop it already, they witnessed the spectacle of Hajime’s group exiting the children’s clothing shop and the delinquent bunch who caught sight of that once more bowing their heads to Hajime just like before.



The trio somehow missed their chance to speak of stopping their observation. And while that trio was still watching attentively, they saw Hajime and the others who asked for a good café this time before they walked away and the delinquents who, as expected, bowed their heads for seeing them off.



Even during the walk to the café, the scene of the young bunch who obviously had preferences of living in a back alley standing up in a panic to give a greeting while bowing their heads when they happened to catch sight of Hajime, entered their sight many times.



Even when they returned back to the main street the same thing happened, bunches of guys who seemed to be of that kind would suddenly lower their head with gazes that were filled with terror and respect when they crossed over Hajime’s path.



And the clincher of all that was when a black foreign car stopped near Hajime and group who were having a pleasant chat at an open terrace café. From that car, a bunch of men wearing suits and clad in a dangerous atmosphere that would blow away the likes of the delinquents until now were getting out, and as expected, even these dangerous men were also greeting while bowing their heads to Hajime. Naturally, the atmosphere of the café froze due to this.



And then, the last man that got out of the car, an old man around sixty years old wearing a hakama……no matter how anyone looked at him, that man couldn’t be seen as anything other than a yakuza boss. That man’s villainous face distorted even more villainous when he talked to Hajime.



「As always, you are in a nice position eh. Having women serving you in this kind of open place in the middle of the day, even though you are just a brat. I want to see the face of the parent of someone like you.」



「If it’s the face of my parents than you know them already, right? After all, when you tried to take revenge on me who crushed your idiotic dealings, you thoroughly investigated my surroundings. Rather, just what business do you have with me here, huh? Just as you can see, I’m in the middle of a date now. If you intentionally stopped your car just for saying sarcasm to me, then I’m going to crush you underfoot again you know?」



「Ka ka-, don’t say something scary like that. As the side that actually got done in, I cannot take that as a joke here.」



“Don’t run off your mouth like that against a yakuza you!” The guests and café employees around, and also the trio were screaming like that inside their hearts, but when they heard the continuing words of the yakuza boss, this time they froze from a different significance. They thought 「Just now, what did the boss say?」



「It’s great that this is Japan, and I’m a virtuous Japanese huh. If that wasn’t the case, by this time you guys would have already all become dust that dances in the world’s sky.」



「……Do you have the self-awareness that your speech is more yakuza than the actual yakuza? Haa, well that’s fine. About why I called out to you like this……」



It seemed that the reason for the yakuza boss calling out to Hajime was, once in the past various things happened and one group of this boss’s yakuza got annihilated by Hajime (all members of the group were sent to the hospital half-dead while its young leader had no hope of recovery), now this group was revived back, and the replacement of the former young leader of this group had been formally decided, so this boss came to Hajime in order to make the new young leader give his greetings. (TN: In Japan, the big boss of the yakuza (called oyabun) stands at the top of the organization. The yakuza organization itself is divided into several groups where each group is led by a young leader (wakagashira) that answer directly to the oyabun.)



It seemed that it had become a new common sense, that if you wanted to survive in the area around the city where Hajime was living, then you must not forget about Hajime’s existence. Due to that, the new young leader who knew about the hellish scenery of that time now carried out the inauguration greeting to Hajime expressionlessly while being unable to hide the cold sweat that was dripping from his face.



There was no way Hajime would come if he was called to attend the inauguration event, and it was unknown what kind of punishment they would receive if they intruded on Hajime’s house or school. However, if the new young leader didn’t show his face to Hajime, then they wouldn’t be able to calm down no matter what when thinking about the future. While the yakuza boss was at his wits end about what to do while traveling by car he caught sight of Hajime’s group by accident. Thinking 「This is a chance-! Let’s take care of the unpleasant matter all at once! There is no way we are going to get assaulted in a public place, that’s unthinkable!」, he called out to Hajime like this to give his greeting.



……It was really unclear which side was the yakuza.



「I see. Well, as long as you guys don’t do anything that involves the people in my surroundings, you can do whatever you want. However, previously there was still some extenuating circumstances that I took into consideration, so your guys got off with only being half-dead, but there is no next time. If in the future, even if only indirectly, something happens……I’ll present you guys with a really lovely second life. Forcefully. Got that?」



Saying that Hajime’s mouth split into a crescent moon shape.



「……As expected, you are more yakuza than the yakuza.」



The people at the surroundings heavily sympathized 「It’s exactly as you said, Oyabin-san!」inside their hearts. And then, the yakuza boss was attacked with the impulse of wanting to ask “Just what kind of experience it was that produced a brat like you”, based on his knowledge that Hajime was one of those “returnees”, but his instinct from his long life experience was raising a piercing alarm, so with effort he swallowed back his words.



Before long, the yakuza bunch bowed their heads simultaneously at Hajime before also speaking in chorus to Yue and the others 「All of you Nee-san, pardon us for bothering you in the middle of your enjoyment」, leaving behind that bizarre scene they finally drew back and left.



「Now then, it will be time soon, let’s go.」



Yue and the others stood from their chairs hearing Hajime’s words. When Hajime asked for the bill, the girl clerk around the same age as Hajime who had watched the exchange just now faced the register while saying 「Hyess! The bhill ishn’t hit! Thank you very mhucch!」 in a state that was really like the template that made him wonder if she was actually aiming for it.



However, the fact that this act wasn’t something intentional was made clear by the clerk’s finger barrage at the register buttons which looked like a certain kenpou master going「Aa~tatatatatatata-」 striking the secret points of the human body. It was like a clichéd template so much so that she looked pitiful. (TN: I guess this is a reference to Hokuto no Ken)



The girl clerk was looking for help from her coworkers and manager with a face that almost burst out crying, but they only clenched their fist to convey 「Do your best!」 without any sign of lending a hand. The other guests and the trio were, as expected, only giving support of 「Fight on!」 inside their hearts without any indication of giving assistance.



「……Haah」



「-!?」



Seeing the state of the clerk, Hajime sighed thinking whether this was his fault. Hearing that the clerk twitched and her body trembled, the girl clerk’s secret point strike (register machine only) was increasingly reaching further height.



Thereupon, on the hand of the girl clerk that was striking the secret point(register button) a lot, a small hand was piled up there. The clerk spontaneously screamed 「hih」, but when she understood that the hand came from the little girl Hajime was carrying she stared blankly in puzzlement.



Myuu smiled widely at that clerk.



「Clerk-san, it’s fine nano~」



「A, yes, my, my apologies.」



As expected from Myuu. It was with just one hit. The girl clerk who recovered her calm safely finished her divine fist training and typed on the register correctly.



Hajime who in a sense got his ass wiped for him patted on Myuu’s head with gratitude, admiration, and praise. Myuu was smiling “ehehe~” while embracing Hajime.



Settling the bill, the clerk prepared the change from the register and watched Myuu and Hajime who were like that, her gaze was attracted at Hajime’s unexpectedly gentle expression and gaze. And then, when Hajime whispered 「My bad for scaring you」 with a slightly troubled face while receiving the receipt, the clerk swung her head left and right energetically in denial.



Hajime exited the café while feeling the reproachful glare of the female camp on his back for some reason. The energetic voice of the clerk 「W, we are waiting, fo, for your next coming――!」 and the voice of the café manager that was trying to stop her from saying that echoed behind him.



「Hey, let’s go home already……I’m already, really at my limit in various meanings.」



「Yeah, me too. I want to go home.」



「The rumors were all true. I am convinced now. “That person” really had become a harem king to the greatest degree……」



A while after Hajime and group exited the café, the trio exited the café with a somewhat exhausted state. Their observation of Hajime’s group forced them to exhaustion in various meanings. At the same time, they also wordlessly convinced that it would be really bad if they stalked Hajime’s group any more than this.



And then, they turned the opposite direction from where Hajime and group were walking…… at that moment,



「Wapuh」



The face of one of the male student got covered by a paper that was carried by the wind with a plop. That male student cursed 「What the hell」 while taking that paper into his hand, he then dropped his gaze to that paper inadvertently……



――That young man stiffened as though he was frozen solid.



「Oi, what’s wrong?」



「What are you stiffening for……」



The other two felt dubious while they were peeking from both sides at the flying paper the stiffened young man kept holding, and there on the paper,



――Not a bad moment that you choose to quit. From now on too, be moderate with your inquisitiveness, okay? From senpai.



Naturally, the other two also stiffened. Since when were they noticed? When was this written? Rather, how did it arrive here? Eh, in the first place, just now, the wind was blowing right……



Various questions circulated in their brain instantly, then the three moved their heads *gigigi* with crude movements like machines that were forgotten to be oiled and faced each other. And then, a beat later,



「「「NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-!!!!」」」



Screaming like a girl, the trio dashed on the path towards their homes like a startled rabbit.



In the following week, it went without saying that additional anecdotes were added into the urban legend of that “you-know-who”.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Next, I’m thinking of giving a spot to another two people while touching the commotion regarding post-returning home.





Chapter 184




Arifureta After – The Happy Road of a Certain Muscle Brain



AN: I’m sorry to those who are hoping for Aiko and Liliana, or the person with a faint shadow and the rabbit-eared onee-san, or perhaps the rabbit-eared ‘hyahha’ clan chief and the ‘Shia-tan haa haa’ perverted princess of the elves



Those are still in the middle of being written……



That place where tranquility was drifting as though separated from the outside world, was a graveyard at a certain outskirt of town. The main building of a temple could be seen a slight distance away, and several gravestones lining up regularly were in the surroundings.



In such a graveyard that was characteristically quiet, in addition to it being a holiday, unusually there was a figure of a young girl there. She was standing alone by herself. Her hair that was reaching her back was fluttering from the breeze. She wasn’t stirring even for a bit as though her thoughts were running around in her head while staring fixedly at the family name engraved on the gravestone.



But, at that timing, a rough voice resounded along with heavy footsteps that broke the tranquility.



「Ou, Suzu. What a coincidence. So you also came here huh.」



「Ryutaro-kun!」



The girl――Suzu turned back in surprise. Ryutaro who had just arrived stamped his feet loudly on the gravel path of the graveyard while raising his hand and greeted 「Yo」 really nonchalantly.



「Ryutaro-kun. Why are you here……wait, there is only one thing to do here huh.」



「Yeah, today is the day everyone is gathering. ……So, for some reason, yeah. If we did not come here, then no one would come here.」



「That’s not true you know? At least, there was already an offering when I came here.」



「Hm? Aa, by any chance, Kaori and Shizuku perhaps?」



「Maybe.」



In front of the gravestone, there were indeed some flowers decorating it there. There were also flowers decorating the spot other than the flowers that Suzu brought. Suzu was giving her agreement to Ryutaro’s guess while opening her mouth with a wry smile.



「……Although, there is not really anything of Eri inside here.」



Saying that Suzu returned her gaze to the gravestone. There, the name of “Nakamura Eri” was engraved. Yes, the friend of Suzu that met her end in another world――Nakamura Eri’s family tomb was located here. Of course, Eri had self-exploded in the [Holy Precincts], so, let alone her remains, there wasn’t anything of her in this grave. There was nothing to prove that Eri was sleeping in here.



Even so, when she wished to lament over her best friend who devoted herself to evil due to her unstoppable madness and feelings, Suzu’s feet would naturally bring herself to this place. After they returned from the other world, she had only visited this place once. On this day after a year passed, when the members who had gone through a unique experience would gather, before the promised time Suzu and also Ryutaro without even any planning beforehand……including Kaori and Shizuku who came here beforehand, their feelings were as one.



For a while, the two stayed silent, they only continued to stare at the gravestone without any word, while recalling the Eri of before they were sent to the other side.



It was unknown how much time passed, but before long Suzu stretched her body with a groan ‘uu~n’, she floated a soft smile as though she had sorted out her feelings while asking Ryutaro.



「Come to think of it, as expected, Kouki won’t come to the gathering today, will he?」



「Yeah. Especially because I didn’t hear anything from Nagumo about opening the gate. Guess he won’t participate. Well, even though we finally got a special class prepared for our sake after much effort, he went as far as leaving high school, going to Tortus saying “I’m going to atone”. Something like the gathering for celebrating the one year of our return, even if that guy was on this side he absolutely wouldn’t attend it, yeah.」



「I guess. Kouki-kun would say something like, 『I don’t have any qualification for that』, right?」



Ryutaro and Suzu smiled wryly at each other.



Exactly as they said, currently Kouki was on Tortus. Kouki had returned home to earth once together with Hajime and the others, but he was unable to make himself to go through normal high school life. It wasn’t like anyone was saying anything harsh to him, but it was his own heart, his guilty feelings, his will that wished for atonement, that rejected to spend his time with carefree feelings in school life even if it was just for one or two years.



Even with the disappearance of Ehitorujue who was toying around with people with his war game, it didn’t mean that the threat of monsters had decreased. Among the monsters that came out from 【Holy Precincts】, there should be some of them that succeeded in escaping. It seemed that removing those threats even for a bit was one kind of atonement for Kouki.



Naturally, it was widely known that Kouki, who should have been summoned as a hero, didn’t participate in the decisive battle. There was also Kouki’s personal declaration which made it highly known throughout Tortus how Kouki was on the enemy’s side. Therefore, that equally meant that there was no place for Kouki in that world.



But, even so, as a single adventurer, Kouki silently moved busily to be of assistance to someone.



「So there is still a little bit of time until the time, but what will Suzu do?」



「Hmm~. I don’t really have any plans though. Maybe just strolling around aimlessly, or meeting up with Kaorin and the others……no, I won’t meet up with them I guess. It’s impossible to spend my time normally inside that pink atmosphere. It would be absolutely tiresome.」



「Aa~, yeah. I guess so. Then, how about you kill time aimlessly. Together with me.」



「Yep. Let’s talk about various things, mixed with flashback scenes too for the readers.」



「……」



Suzu was receiving a bit of a wave signal while the two of them stared at the gravestone one more time, and then they left that place. (TN: What it means by the signal here is how Suzu is breaking the fourth wall a bit.)



The pair who were walking around aimlessly while making small talk, before long reached a cozy park. Without any particular confirmation about each other’s thoughts or any previous agreement, the pair naturally sat down on a bench. There they stared at the figures of children who were playing in the public park.



「Aa~, it’s so peacefuul~」



「Oi oi, what are you doing speaking like that. Are you a grandma?」



「That’s cruel. You really are a muscle brain without delicacy like usual, good grief. Even Ryutaro-kun, you would also impulsively think like that sometimes since we returned here, right? About how peaceful it is here. To think that until a year ago we were fighting a battle where it wouldn’t be strange to die anytime, this is a bit unbelievable even for myself.」



「……Yeah. When we first returned here we were busy with things, so I didn’t feel anything like that though. But indeed, recently, now that I have calmed down I often get thoughts like that.」



「……Isn’t that right.」



A year ago Hajime created a gate that connected the other world, Tortus, and earth, and the surviving classmates once more stepped their feet on this birthplace of theirs.



They landed on the rooftop of the school, then they looked around and raised a loud joyful voice at the moonlight night. Among them there were people who were overcome with emotions and broke out crying, there were also those who were consoling those people while crying in sympathy. At that time it was quite a hectic situation.



At that time, Hajime and the others also investigated the possibility, whether in the end, it would be possible to once again open the gate to Tortus, the other world, from here or not. Hajime had consumed an immense amount of magic power, but he used the magic crystals, where he stocked reserve magic power, and whipped up his tired body to immediately attempt it. The result was that they confirmed that, at the very least, even on earth they were able to use magic and artifacts.



Hearing that, the happiness of the classmates who realized that it was possible to once again meet with the people that they had created close ties with in the other world rose to a great extent. All of the classmates swooped down on Hajime and they even did the customary practice of tossing him into the air even though it was in the middle of the night.



After that, the calming down classmates rejoiced in each other’s survival and return before setting out to return to their homes. In the end, what happened with their houses and families……such anxiety was by no means nonexistence in their hearts, but even so, all of them were dashing through their school route with light footsteps and nostalgia,……with a super speed that would make an Olympic athlete go pale. 「You guys-, stop jumping over the rooftops!」 it went without saying that the angry voice of a certain worrier ponytail-san echoed in the middle of the night.



By the way, regarding how they should explain to their families and other people regarding the events during their disappearance, during the month after the decisive battle they all discussed it, and the conclusion they reached was to “tell it honestly”.



Even if they made lies that sounded realistic, surely if it got investigated by the police and so forth, the contradiction and the suspiciousness of their lies would be exposed. It was easily imaginable how popular the topic of a group disappearance at midday would become and how earnest the police would investigate it. There was no way that those police that were investigating it wouldn’t be able to see through their half-baked lies. To say nothing of how there were students who couldn’t come back. They couldn’t do this half-baked.



Having said that, if they tried to pretend to have amnesia, it would look like they really had something to hide and the police and mass media would surely not leave them alone. A blank period that the disappeared students were obstinately refusing to speak about……something like that was just the favorite of the mass media. Combined with the students who did not return, there would be many sides that would make a great fuss with the mixture of facts and truths.



If the situation would be like that, then wouldn’t it be better if they offered by themselves that kind of information instead, something that would make the surrounding spontaneously draw away in revulsion, or possibly make other people look at them with pitying gazes while secretly distancing themselves.



The information they offered would be,



――We fought monsters and an evil god, in a fantasy world of swords and magic!



Like that.



Of course, this was an idea from Hajime. There was not a single lie in that statement, that was why they could just act boldly saying that no matter how much they were pressed for information. In this way, even the classmates who weren’t as shameless as Hajime could weather the storm without amassing too much anxiety. And no matter what other people said to them, they could just speak back with “It depends on you whether you believe it or not”.



And then, regarding the people who would still pursue the matter deeply even then, or when some kind of problem occurred, Yue-san’s magic would be liberally used to get those problematic people to be “Dear me, what was I doing again just now?”



Also, the people who were applied with “Dear me, what was I doing again just now?” weren’t just the mass media whose tenacity status was at MAX count and the excessively sharp government officials or police. There were also suspicious organizations that seemed to be related with religion, or ree-ally suspicious people that seemed to be related with the government, or the absurdly suspicious sorcery――occultist group.



While the majority of their classmates were enjoying television or internet while nibbling at potato chips after so long, behind the scenes Hajime and the others (+ a person with a thin shadow) were doing this and that against the bunch who seemed to be living behind the scenes of the Earth but……that was another story.



「In the beginning, it was really hectic wasn’t it. Especially the mass media people, they were really persistent huh.」



「Yeah, many calls were coming asking me to come out in a special program on television, or something like that. The times when I was asked about Eri or Hiyama, “Why is it only you all who came home?”, or “Don’t you feel any responsibility?”, I seriously wanted to send them flying y’know.」



「About that huh. When Nakano-kun and Saitou-kun normally punched the reporter, they got an article 『As expected, is there any disorder in their minds!?』 in the news without any reservation at all you remember?」



「The delicacy of the reporter is also questionable though.」



Recalling the large wave in society at that time, Suzu and Ryutaro smiled wryly at each other. At that time, not only the mass media and police, even some of their acquaintances visited them to pry about just what really happened.



Especially the families of Hiyama, Kondo, and Shimizu. They were doggedly hounding the matter until the end.



The truth was also conveyed without anything hidden toward the families of the students who couldn’t return. The ones who were doing the explanation were Aiko and Hajime. Actually Aiko tried to go to talk to those families by herself, but the topic about Hajime would be unavoidable anyway if the truth was going to be spoken, and above all, Hajime didn’t have the least bit of intention to bother Aiko or make Aiko bear the full brunt regarding the matter of Hiyama and the others, so Hajime forcefully accompanied Aiko in the end.



Naturally, after those families were made to believe the story of another world by showing them magic, the families of Hiyama and the others cursed and insulted Hajime and Aiko in unconcealed rage and hatred, some were even trying to act violent, but……



Giving a glance at Aiko who resigned herself to accept that anger and hatred from her feeling of responsibility of being unable to bring those students back home or reforming their conduct, Hajime who was the perpetrator that put the bullet on those students kept a cold expression and repelled all of that anger and hatred straight from the front.



Even if the families of those killed students were virtuous, no matter how much those families were looking forward to the return of their children, those things weren’t something that could erase the fact that they had bared their fang towards Hajime and Hajime’s important people. For the feeling of a parent, something like what their child did and Hajime’s circumstance were irrelevant. But similar to that, for Hajime, something like the feeling of his enemy’s parent was also something that had nothing to do with him.



――I don’t have any regret for what I did. I don’t even think that what I did was wrong. Therefore, I won’t even apologize. You can think of me however you like, but if you turn your hand at my relatives because of this case then you better prepare yourself.



Those were the words that Hajime spoke to those families. For Hajime who was skilled in subtle deception and speech, to the degree that he was said to possess talent as an agitator, those were really straight-forward words that could even be said to be tactless. To put it bluntly, those words could only be thought of as something that rubbed the nerves of the other party the wrong way.



But, Aiko who was beside him was able to understand that for Hajime those words were his greatest sincerity, those were his resolve. He didn’t deceive the other party, and he was resolved that if the hatred that he caused would try to lay their wicked hands on his relatives, then he would face it anywhere, anytime, and eliminate them.



As the result, Hiyama’s family acted rashly trying to get revenge on Hajime and the others. Hajime personally broke their hearts. The other families who knew of the state of Hiyama’s family then protected their silence. Seen from the side, it was really a result that left a bad aftertaste in their mouth, but Hajime didn’t care for it at all.



Now then, including those commotions too, there were also things like the raging journalism battle and whatever that was perpetrated regarding the ‘returnees’ but……one day, all of those suddenly died down like a drawing back sea wave. And it didn’t stop there, all of the news was quietly dying down so unnaturally until it was like nothing had happened at all.



「About that, there is no doubt that was something Nagumo-kun and the others did, isn’t it?」



「For sure. Problems like the family register of Yue-san and the others, or the recognition of the surroundings, those kinds of problems were also all easily cleared. It wasn’t something strange at all if they actually did something somehow regarding the awareness of the society while they were at it, yeah. Not to mention how Ai-chan-sensei was made to bear the full brunt of the critic because she was the only adult involved. Ain’t no way that Nagumo was gonna just leave that going on.」



Actually what happened was exactly like that. 「When magic is mixed with information society……something like the world becomes simple, huh」, if it was asked who was the one that was saying such extremely terrifying things……it should be rather left unsaid.



「Well, there were a lot of troubles, but if there is a small mercy from all that, is that no one got rejected by their families I think. My Otou-san and Okaa-san, also Taeko-san(the caretaker) too, right after I finished giving them the explanation, their faces turned grim and they tried to bring me to a hospital, but after I actually showed them magic and explained several times they somehow could accept it.」



「Yeah, me too. But, in my case, I showed them my Mode Werewolf so……they became really panicked at that time. My mother fainted, while my old man took out a bat that he swung around wildly, big sis wet herself, and Karashio(pet dog) howled like crazy, and my neighbor old man Fujii said things like 『It’s waaar~』 while shooting out the fire extinguisher……」



「I don’t know about that old man you mentioned last, but most of it was Ryutaro-kun’s own fault, wasn’t it? Rather, your father who tried to face his son that suddenly transformed into a werewolf using a bat, I really respect him from my heart now.」



Receiving Suzu’s exasperated gaze that came from the bottom of her heart, Ryutaro said「That was an accident, an accident」 while averting his gaze in embarrassment. By the way, Ryutaro who thought that he wouldn’t be able to calm the situation by himself at that time made his family and the neighbor old man Fujii to faint for the time being, and then by going all out with the instant movement of a werewolf, he intruded into the house of Kouki who was similarly in the middle of explaining the circumstances.



When a brutal werewolf of a fantasy world suddenly leaped into their house, Kouki’s father fainted, while the mother took out a kitchen knife and went into a rampage, and Kouki’s little sister peed herself. Kouki who immediately guessed the true identity of the werewolf and that his objective was to ask for help, at that time he suppressed his mother for the time being and made his little sister to sleep.



And then he punched Ryutaro, after that even while sighing deeply, thinking that it was just the right timing with all the chaos that had happened, he held a double family meeting along with Ryutaro’s family that had been wakened up and somehow obtained the understanding from both families.



By the way, at Shizuku’s home, there was also an emergency call that came from the Shirasaki family. At that time, the first voice that came from Kaori’s parent that was filled with confusion was 『Shizuku-chan! As I thought, you have come home too then, I’m glad! By the way, my daughter is an angel now, do you know anything about it!?』, like that. It seemed that Kaori showed her parents her angel mode but……listening to it normally, that call could only be heard as a doting parent suddenly calling in the middle of the night boasting about his daughter.



On the other side of the phone, the voice of Kaori saying 「Geez-, Otou-san! Don’t make embarrassing calls like that!」 could be heard, then next came the voice 「But, but Kaoriii. Tha, that angel look……that’s just too lovely!」, such hectic conversation of parent and child could be heard noisily……Shizuku silently put down the phone. While inside her heart, 「I’m also busy explaining over here, idiooot!」 she was cursing.



Like that, the classmates who accomplished returning home each went through different twists and turns to persuade their families, however, in the end, they were able to make their families believe their story about the other world, and together with their families, they dealt with the mass media as planned.



Although, it wasn’t like everything went as planned, or everything was still the same like before……



「Eh? Suzu-chan? Also Sakagami? What are you two doing in this kind of place?」



「Oh, it’s true. Suzu-chan, long time no see~! Wait, don’t tell me, this is a date!?」



「Eh? Lies!? With Sakagami!? Suzu-chan, are you being threatened!?」



Suddenly noisy voices called out to Ryutaro and Suzu who were talking on a park bench. When they looked, there were their former classmates standing there. There were three girls who on that day when they were summoned went to a different place during the lunch break. Because of that, they didn’t get dragged into the summoning. They were friends of Suzu who were relatively close to her.



The three of them saw Suzu spending time with only Ryutaro. It stirred up a bit of curiosity about the relationship between the two and great wariness towards Ryutaro inside their mind, but when Suzu replied that they had planned to join up with everyone else after this and currently they were killing time until the planned time, the expression of the three girls loosened in disappointment and relieve.



They talked noncommittally a bit about their recent condition, and then after exchanging the speech of let’s contact each other again next time~, they parted ways.



「As usual, your communication prowess is high, eh.」



「I guess.」



Ryutaro’s words that were mixed with praise was accepted by Suzu with a shrug, not looking like she was being humble or joking. As expected, it seemed that the decisive battle against Eri that Suzu went through caused a great change, or perhaps a great growth in Suzu’s mind.



Group disappearance――that fact also had a not so little, no, rather it had a big impact on the other students of the same school. The students’ attitudes and atmosphere towards the ‘returnee’ group were as though they were tumors that must not be touched and a group that they didn’t really want to have anything to do with, but in reverse, they were also lacking in delicacy with their curiosity.



Also, when the ‘returnees’ were attending school once more, there were a lot of families that contacted the school and voiced their anxiety about them.



During that one year of disappearance, there was no contact at all from the disappearing group. Other people didn’t understand where they were and what they were doing or what was done to them. The ‘returnees’ themselves only gave a story that didn’t sound realistic at all. Furthermore, there were also students who didn’t come back with them……sure enough, the families were concerned whether their child would be okay going to the same school together with such a mysterious group.



As a result, regardless of the return of the directly related people, the truth of the case was still not clear. There was also the matter of the students whose whereabouts were still unknown, so finally, the school administration moved.



In order to reduce situations where Hajime and the others got exposed to the inquisitive eyes of society, an exclusive curriculum was prepared in order for the ‘returnees’ to recover their falling behind in their studies, at the same time psychologist were stationed inside the school for supporting the smooth school life of the ‘returnees’……with that official stance, a special class that was separated from other students in order to avoid troublesome problems was prepared.



Because of that, currently, the ‘returnees’ weren’t studying in their original classroom but were now put in a fixed class until their graduation that was located on the top floor of the school. Furthermore, it was at the corner in an unused room.



Actually, a talk of changing the school of the ‘returnees’ itself was strongly raised but……with the opinion of someone that said 「It’s troublesome to change schools」 along with profoundly mysterious phenomena, the creation of this special class was pushed through. The class was formed unnoticed but very naturally. To the degree that it was unnatural……



Anyway, a physical sense of distance between the ‘returnees’ and the other students was created. Naturally, a sense of distance was also spreading between the ‘returnees’ and the students of different classes who they were friends with before the summoning, however, there were also a lot among them who managed to remake their friendly relationships but……even amidst those people, Suzu was the one who was the most adept in building back a relationship with the friends she already had before the summoning into a relationship that was the same like before, no, rather that relationship became even more intimate than before.



That relationship was to the degree that when Suzu met those friends accidentally on a holiday like this, those friends would call to her proactively. It was to the degree that they even glared at Ryutaro with gleaming eyes that were unbecoming for a girl, as though to say ‘If you do something strange to Suzu, don’t expect it to end well for you’.



「Haah, good grief, someone like you really is…… If Nagumo is excluded, surely the one who changed the most by going to the other world is Suzu. It’s an honor to be seen as a boyfriend even though it was only for a moment yeah.」



「Fu-fu-fu. Isn’t that right, isn’t that right. For Ryutaro-kun to be suspected of having a relationship with a beautiful woman like this, you happy man you~」



「……」



「……Oi, try to say the reason why you averted your eyes when I said the words beautiful woman. If you have an objection to my words then how about saying it loudly. Hmm?」



Taniguchi Suzu. Looking from her braided hair that stretched long and the atmosphere she was clad in, she was a girl that looked really adult like. However, the sad thing was……that her height didn’t stretch up for even a millimeter. And then, her breasts were also……. No matter how one looked at her, it was hard to call her a beautiful woman. However, surely she was a beautiful girl. Perhaps, undoubtedly.



Seeing Suzu who was indignant at his attitude, Ryutaro lifted up both his hands and showed a pose of surrendering. And then, seeing Suzu who expressed her displeasure with a huff, Ryutaro was thinking of what to do, what should he do in hesitation, wherein the end he showed an embarrassed gesture and averted his gaze quickly while opening his mouth.



「No, well, that’s……you are, charming enough y’know? No, really, I’m serious.」



「Thank you very much, for the faked follow up. Hmph, I’m not a super beauty like Yue-san and the others anyway.」



Suzu went 「keh」 with her lips pouted looking somewhat timid in an inferiority complex. But, Ryutaro’s words after that which were said with a shockingly serious voice to her, caused her to leak out a dumbfounded voice unintentionally.



「……That ain’t a mere follow up. Suzu is a good woman, who won’t lose to anyone.」



「Eh?」



When Suzu reflexively turned her gaze at Ryutaro, Ryutaro who was supposedly looking away until just now was staring straight at Suzu. The small sound of her heart jumping inside her chest resounded. Suzu understood how her neck and her face was turning feverish.



This time, it was Suzu who was looking aside. For some reason, she couldn’t let out any words. She could only barely let out the sound 「H, hm~m」 that sounded ambiguous even for herself.



A strangely stained atmosphere that Suzu had never really experienced before was flowing, she couldn’t say anything. Both of them were wordless, only the sounds of leaves rustling from the wind were entering their ears excessively clearly.



Stealing a glance, Suzu tried to peep at Ryutaro’s state. There he was looking really nervous, and yet his face was really serious and seemed to be troubled by something. That also caused Suzu’s nervous meter to climb up without stopping.



Before long, with a calm voice as though he had resolved himself, Ryutaro opened his mouth.



「About the matter after we graduate high school……」



「Eh!? Ah, um……」



「I, am thinking of going to Tortus again.」



「That’s……you mean not in the capacity of going there to play together with Nagumo-kun and the others?」



「Yeah. I’m thinking, of living in the world there.」



「……」



Suzu felt like she understood the reason for Ryutaro deciding that. In this one year, they had spent much time together. During that time they talked about various things that made her think about whether he would do something like that.



「I want to help Kouki there, I also want to be able to help guys in need. I have the power for that. Ain’t no way after this late I can become a salaryman or something with all this.」



「Didn’t you, also think about being a police officer before this?」



「Yeah. But see, as I thought, my nature suits the world over there more.」



「I see.」



It appeared that Ryutaro had genuinely decided his future path. Suzu felt like she was going to get left behind somehow, that her feelings turned a bit lonely.



Towards such Suzu, Ryutaro suddenly stood up, he then moved in front of Suzu and got down on his one knee. With his stance now, the large built Ryutaro was looking up at her. This was as though……



Suzu’s body temperature was rising. Her heart jumped from Ryutaro’s serious expression.



「Ryu, Ryutaro-kun……」



‘What are you doing?’ Suzu was about to voice that but, Ryutaro conferred all his feelings with his words faster than Suzu.



「Suzu. Won’t you, come together with me?」



「Tha, that is, are you asking me to form a party with you sometimes――」



「That ain’t it. You got what I meant, right? What I am saying is, for “the whole life”.」



「ts……」



Suzu gulped. That was exactly, a love confession. For the first time in her life, a confession with seriousness to the highest degree was right now said to her. The winding of great emotions that were welling up inside her made her voice get caught in her throat that she couldn’t say anything. Ryutaro spoke his words further to such Suzu.



「I love Suzu. Rather than a future in this world, pick a future that is together with me. It won’t be a calm future but I will treasure you with all my power. Let’s go, together. Forever.」



Inside Suzu’s heart, something like 「That’s too straight!」, or 「Even though you had come to a clean break but even temporarily you once fell in love with Yue-san, do you have a preference for small girls!? You lolicon!」, or 「While saying you love me, you are asking me to fight together in another world, just what are you saying you muscle brain!」, those abusive languages were lining up inside Suzu’s stormy heart but……



When she noticed, a reply of――



「……Mm. That’s fine.」



That sentence came out naturally. The words came out so smoothly that it surprised even herself. Like that, she became aware.



「Even myself am surprised, but I too, seem to really like Ryutaro-kun.」



Suzu’s face was already looking like a ripe apple. The time they ran around in another world, this one year since they came home, the things that she had piled up between her and Ryutaro seemed to have grown bigger than what Suzu was aware of.



Like that, Ryutaro who received a confession acceptance for the first time in his life, and obtained the word “like” from a girl was……



――UosSHAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-



He howled grandly like that. The children who played in some distance jumped from shock and they looked at Ryutaro while shaking.



「Wai-, you are noisy, Ryutaro-kun! The small kids are making faces like a villager that is encountering an ogre there!」



「A-ha-ha-ha, then how about I use Mode Ogre then! If it’s now then I’ll give special service yeah!」



「Don’t do that! A Monster Appeared at a Park in Broad Daylight! The front page of the evening paper today will be like that! Or rather, how happy are you? Your tension is too high!」



「Obviously I’m happy! It’s about my first girlfriend in my life! Furthermore, it’s Suzu! This is the best!」



「-, uu, idiottt~~」



After that, a muscle brain’s greatest happiness cheer was booming in the small public park for a while, together with the remonstrating voice of Suzu who even then couldn’t hide the happiness inside herself.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Even though I can imagine a ton of realistic problems waiting after returning home from another world, I cannot think of any stylish solution, and relied on magic in the end. Please forgive this poor brain of Shirakome.



However……something like the transmission of brainwashing magic through the internet using age of god magic, or transmission of subliminal effects using television……I think those are just plain terrifying.



Perhaps Shirakome is unable to leave the PC today too is because……





Chapter 185




Arifureta After – The Gathering of the Returnees



Inside the restaurant that was illuminated by a warm orange light, although the atmosphere wasn’t that of a high-class restaurant, it was filled by a chic and calming atmosphere.



That famous restaurant that would be almost fully occupied on the holiday when the evening came had not even a single guest today, it was completely empty.



「Yuuka, it will be time soon, right? Nana-chan and Taeko-chan too, it’s fine to stop already.」



「Is that so? Then let’s stop around here.」



One of the returnees, Sonobe Yuuka said that and took off her apron. Following her, Miyasaki Nana and Sugawara Taeko also took a breath ‘sigh’ while taking off their aprons.



The one who spoke to Yuuka was the owner of this restaurant, at the same time he was also the father of Yuuka, Sonobe Hiroshi. The mother, Sonobe Yuuri, was also standing at his side. Yes, this restaurant was the western style restaurant that the Sonobe family was managing.



Hiroshi was making her daughter and her two friends that were helping out to stop at this period of time around five o’clock in the evening that originally would be busy for the restaurant because this restaurant would be the gathering place for the one year anniversary of Hajime and the others’ return. Yuuka and her two friends were only helping until the appointed time.



There was around fifteen more minutes until the arranged time. ‘Somebody should be coming soon’, it was at that time when Yuuka was beginning to think that that the door of the restaurant opened with a good timing.



「Yo. By any chance, I’m the first one here?」



The one who was saying that while entering inside was Tamai Atsushi. Behind him, Aikawa Noboru and Nimura Akiro were also entering while giving a similar greeting.



「That’s right. For you three to arrive fifteen minutes early, how admirable.」



「Haha, my stomach is empty here from playing since the afternoon. Can you give me something like a snack or anything for the time being?」



「Look here, the party will start soon enough, so please be patient.」



It appeared that Atsushi and others were starving. It seemed they were playing through the afternoon until this time. Hearing what Yuuka said, they grumbled「Eee~」while going to sit at the reserved seat.



Thereupon,



「Excuse me……I think it’s me who came first though.」



「Uoo!? What the!?」



「E, Endo! So you are here!?」



「Eh, lies. Since when were you here!?」



「Even though I didn’t hear the bell clinking!」



In fact, it seemed the one who arrived first was the man with a shadow so thin even an apostle of god overlooked him――Endo Kousuke. Kousuke was responding「I came in normally, gave a normal greeting, and normally took a seat, that’s all you know?」with a faraway look, hearing that Yuuka and the others spoke words of apology and consolation with an awkward look.



Atsushi and the others took their seats while speaking to Kousuke.



「Nevertheless you are really early huh. You aren’t with Nagayama and the others today?」



「Recently I am not really together with them after all. It seems that Juugo and Kentaro are going out playing with Tsuji-san’s group but……as for me, I was studying.」



Yuuka nodded in understanding after hearing Kousuke’s answer.



「Now that you mentioned it, Endo-kun, you are aiming to become a doctor, isn’t it? And then when you graduate you are going to migrate to the other side, aren’t you?」



「The beastmen like Rana-san and the others of the Hauria clan cannot use healing magic, so it is for their sake you are learning modern medical techniques, aren’t you? Even though it’s not actually a long distance relationship, but you are really going that far huh.」



Exactly as Nana said, Kousuke who publicly got a rabbit ear onee-san lover in Tortus was studying hard aiming for a medical university, in order to learn the modern medical technique――that was to say, a healing technique that didn’t use magic medicine or healing magic, so that he could become a strength for the Hauria clan even for a bit in the future. Other than that, he was also learning various things extensively to polish his own assassination skills, like army hand-to-hand fighting technique or survival skills, and then also other knowledge like agriculture techniques to negotiating techniques, which made him greatly busy. He was doing all of that, for the sake of his beloved lover.



Although during this one year it felt like his character as a man with a thin shadow was crumbling, he got dragged into this and that behind the scenes of the world, chased after by troublesome people (several people among them were girls)……in a sense, he was the one who got totally immersed at the world behind the scene more than anyone of the returnee group, which made the person himself to be at his wits end.



Looking at Kousuke who was having a faraway look, with a lukewarm gaze Yuuka and the others sent a yell to their classmate who was doing his best day and night. While calling the name that was the proof of Kousuke being welcomed into the Hauria clan as a new family.



「「「「「「Kousuke E Abyssgate-kun, do your best.」」」」」」



「Stop it! I told you guys already to not use that name when there is no Hauria clan beside me, right!?」



The great shame caused Kousuke to suddenly cover his face with both hands and he fell prostrated on the table. It was a name that was given by a beautiful onee-san, so it was a wonder just where was the need of feeling shame from that. Even though he was the great man who was introducing himself with that name while earning the most kill points at the legendary great war with the apostles as the opponent.



「Oi oi, what’s the matter, Abyssgate-san. Is your body feeling unwell, Abyssgate-san.」



「Doesn’t Abyssgate sound cool, Abyssgate. Didn’t the people of the Hauria clan welcome you greatly, Abyssgate.」



Atsushi and Yuuka were grinning widely while poking at Kousuke from both sides. Kousuke was holding his head while pleading「Stooop, stop it already!」, but



「Kousuke E Abyssgate, has arrived!」



「Fuh, so you cannot see me? Obviously. I who am lurking in darkness cannot be caught by anyone……」



「The name of Shippuu Kagetsume, engrave it in that body!」(TN: Gale Shadow Claw)



When Noboru said that in high spirits, Nana continued after him in the same spirit, then next even Akito took a pose while reproducing how Kousuke once was. The health point of Kousuke’s heart was plunging into the red zone. Taeko was earnestly shaking *puru puru* at the shoulders while averting his gaze.



But, at that timing, a voice that sounded as though it was shaking from Kousuke’s disastrous condition, filled with sympathy from the bottom of the speaker’s heart, such voice was resounding.



「You guys……doing something like that. There is a limit even in being nasty. Just what are you doing to Endo huh.」



「Na, Nagumooo! My kindred spirit! So you finally came!」



Looking at the direction of the voice, having entered the restaurant unnoticed, the group of Hajime’s had approached until they were right beside Kousuke and the others. Kousuke energetically dashed at Hajime while half-crying. And then, he hid behind Hajime while raising a voice of counterattack at Atsushi and the others.



「You lot-, saying anything you like wretchedly like that! Just look, at this real harem man! And then recall it, the Nagumo of before! Just what do you think the Hauria clan is calling this guy! Don’t you know that it overshadowed someone like!? No, I am not speaking about my naturally thin shadow here you know? Nagumo’s chuunib――」



*bechikon-* A crack resounded, then Endo went through a triple mid-air spin until he crumbled down from both legs.



「……Just now, why did you hit me?」



「……Sorry. I wanted to do that for some reason.」



When Endo calmly asked with teary eyes, Hajime answered awkwardly while averting his eyes. Both of them had mutually received nicknames from the Hauria with gratitude(?), being equally a victim when those nicknames were spread grandly throughout the world, together with their activity at the world behind the scene in this one year, the two of them were actually in quite a good relationship. Feeling sympathy at each other’s pain of heart and also their close affinity from both having lovers of a female of the Hauria clan was also the reason for that good relationship.



「Yuuka-san, thank you for lending your restaurant for today. Is there something that I can help with, like cooking or something?」



「It’s fine Shia-san. Most of it is finished already with me and Nana and Tae, Otou-san and Okaa-san are also in high spirit.」



Yuuka shook her head at Shia’s offer with a smile. And exactly as Yuuka said, Hiroshi who caught sight of Hajime’s figure rested his hands and approached Hajime.



「Yaa, Hajime-kun. Welcome to my restaurant. I was thinking of inviting you all someday to here you know.」



「Much obliged for today. Letting us reserve the whole restaurant……that saved us some trouble. Even if we have the gathering at another place, if there are other people then we are going to become a target of curiosity.」



「No no, something like this is nothing much. ……You are the person who brought our daughter back home. Just something like this won’t even be enough for thanks. The most that I can do is only to let you all enjoy our family’s prided cooking to your fill, but I have put all my skill into this just so you know. Have fun to your heart’s content.」



「Yes, I had also heard from Endo and Tamai how delicious the food here is, so I’ll look forward to it.」



Seeing Hajime who was exchanging words really politely with Yuuka’s father, Atsushi and the others whispered to each other things like「As I thought, hearing Nagumo use polite language really feels wrong ain’t it」, or「Demon king-sama has also mellowed out huh」, or「Well, as expected, suddenly pulling out a gun in Japan is just impossible. Naturally, he is going to mellow out like that」, or「No no, Sugawara. We still don’t know that. If it’s Nagumo, something like hiding the evidence is as easy as turning his palm you know? The possibility that he has already killed several people is……」.



The “Treasure Warehouse” that was fixed on Hajime’s left ring finger faintly shined. Sensing that Hajime was feeling like taking out something from the infinite armory, Atsushi and others instantly sat back in their chairs and drank their drinks with an atmosphere that was shamelessly relaxed. It seemed that they had been trained in the way of dealing with Hajime.



「Nevertheless, the wives of Hajime-kun are really all beautiful isn’t it.」



From behind Hiroshi, Yuuri approached while wiping her hand on her apron, she was saying such a thing and continued with a greeting「Welcome for today. Feel free to relax here」. Then Yue and others each gave her the greeting while expressing their thanks for lending the restaurant.



Yuuri floated a friendly smile at Yue and others, and then she nodded as though she had comprehended something before turning back her gaze at Hajime, and said a sentence,



「So, I wonder, when will Hajime-kun take Yuuka as your wife too?」



「Wai-, Okaa-san!? What are you saying!?」



The words of her mother that were suddenly let out caused Yuuka to spit out her drink *bufu-* while she raised her voice. Looking at that direction, Atsushi and co, Kaori, and also Shizuku were looking taken aback and they turned their gaze at Yuuri, and then their awareness turned toward Yuuka.



On the other hand, Yuuri who suddenly dropped that bomb was chuckling while saying thing like「Is that no good I wonder? Okaa-san is just thinking, that if it’s Hajime-kun then there won’t be any problem at all though~」.



The mother of Yuuka looked relatively gentle and calm, but it seemed that she was a type of person who would drop a bomb unconsciously. Yuuka ignored her mother that was like that and then she turned to Hajime in order to make an excuse……but her expression grandly cramped after seeing the widely smiling face of Kaori who was right before her eyes.



「E, err, Kaori-chan? You see, I――」



「It’s fine, it’s fine you know, Yuuka-chan. I pro~perly understand after all. Anyway, how about going to the seat at the back for the time being? Because if you want to be at Hajime-kun’s side, then there will be various things that I want you to know beforehand, so I’m going to teach you slowly.」



「No no no no, I’ll hold back from that! It’s not like I really need to know that!」



「Muu, by that, are you saying that something like the matter of Hajime-kun is trivial I wonder? I wonder?」



「Troublesome-. I have thought this since before, but when it is related to Nagumo-kun, Kaori-chan is troublesome-」



「I won’t get tricked even with you saying that! Now, Yuuka-chan, let’s talk?」



Saying that Kaori dragged the resisting Yuuka with her hands gripping Yuuka’s shoulders and she took her to the seat at the back. While being dragged, Yuuka sent a gaze that was asking for help at Atsushi and others, but with splendid synchronization, everyone averted their eyes. Yuuka was in despair!



「Haa, Hajime. I’m worried about Yuuka, that’s why I too will be at the seat in the back for a while.」



「Yeah, I’ll leave Kaori to you. Help Sonobe before her soul is slipping out from her mouth.」



「Roger.」



Even after a year passed since their return, Shizuku’s worrying habit didn’t change. Although, currently she had the lover who would give her the reward after her worrying, so it seemed that it wasn’t a hardship for her at all. (TN: In the raw, the worrying habit implied that Shizuku was worrying for others, not herself, and she would go to great length to help the other party from their trouble even without them asking her. Anyone know a good word to express someone like this?)



Like that, while complicated noisiness could be heard from the back, the classmates of the returnee group were arriving one after another.



Nagayama Juugo and Nomura Kentarou, Tsuji Ayako, Yoshino Mao, the former Nagayama party. After that, with Nakano Shinji and Saitou Yoshiki as first on the list, almost all of the returnee students had gathered.



The ones who still hadn’t arrived in the invitation today were Ryutaro and Suzu, and Aiko. Everyone knew about Kouki being in Tortus, so there was no need to wait for him. Also, Aiko would be late because of her work and she had let them knew beforehand, so in actuality, there were only Ryutaro and Suzu left.



「It’s already past the agreed time……」



Hajime looked at the clock and whispered that. The clock had certainly turned to five o’clock in the afternoon. On the table, there wasn’t only the standard western food, there were also small snacks like fried potato, karaage, mini pizza, and non-alcoholic drinks flooding the table.



Kaori was looking worried wondering whether something happened and took out her smartphone. She was thinking of trying to contact them. But, there was no need for Kaori to contact them.



「Whoops, my bad! We are late!」



「Sorry! Ryu-kun got high tensioned like an idiot, it took time until he calmed down!」



Like that, Suzu and Ryutaro rushed in while apologizing. Hajime and others were about to say「Don’t mind it」, but they reflexively swallowed back their words. And then, their gaze focused at one place.



……Their fingers were entangled with each other’s, that was to say, the hands of the two were holding each other’s hand in a lover holding.



The two noticed everyone’s gaze. Suzu raised her voice「ah」and tried to separate their hand in panic. However, due to it being a lover holding with their fingers interlocked, Ryutaro’s large hand was completely wrapping Suzu’s small hand, so if Ryutaro’s hand didn’t let go then their hand wouldn’t separate that easily.



「Come to think of it, Suzu-chi, just now, didn’t you called Sakagami with “Ryu-kun”?」



「……Seriously? No, or maybe I should say, finally. If it’s Sakagami and Taniguchi then…」



Nana sharply didn’t miss what Suzu said, how the way Suzu called Ryutaro changed (After receiving the confession, Suzu called Ryutaro as Ryu-kun because she wanted to show her affection even more compared to before the confession). Hearing what Nana mentioned, Atsushi leaked out his frustration of having been beaten to the punch, but then he showed an expression that was half purely shocked and half understanding.



「Hee, you two, since when did your relationship become like that?」



Hajime’s mouth burst open in amusement while he was asking the two of them. Thereupon, Ryutaro, looking at the situation where it seemed that his relationship with Suzu had been immediately exposed by the classmates, he was growing embarrassed from that, but even so,



「An hour before!」



Saying that, he made a thumb up along with a lively laugh while informing the classmates. Immediately, Suzu’s face became red, while the classmates raised an admiring voice of「Oo~~!!」. Right after that, the congratulating voice of「Congratulations!」from the girls and「Sakagamiii, for a muscle brain like you to get a girlfriend……die!」「Just explode!」「I also want a lover! Someone, go out with me!」the envious voices from the boys were sent to Ryutaro and Suzu.



By the way, the voice that was soliciting for a lover was smoothly ignored. Shinji was secretly crying after that.



The relationship of Suzu and Ryutaro that changed anew was grandly celebrated by the classmates with Shizuku and Kaori as the first in the list. After everyone had arrived, Hajime stood up and took a glass into his hand. The classmates, Yue and others too, they all took a glass into their hand.



「Now then, we have experienced something idiotic like having a trip to another world, but now, we are able to celebrate a year of our return to the land of our birthplace like this. That one year we spent in another world, and this one year after we returned home, those days were absurdly noisy and full of trouble……but, those days weren’t bad. I think so from the bottom of my heart.」



Hajime’s gentle gaze and expression that looked deep, calmly meshed into the feeling of all the classmates, including Yue and others, all of them then simultaneously nodded deeply.



There were also people who couldn’t come home. But, even with that fact included, everyone certainly felt that “it wasn’t bad”.



「In the future from here on, it is unclear what kind of path any of us will walk, but, if it is us who know about the meaning of “fighting”, then there won’t be any problem or anything. Isn’t that right?」



Everyone returned back a strong nod. To that, Hajime also nodded deeply.



「That’s why, these words are going to be enough for our toast. ……To the two years that we have overcome, and to the hardships from here on! Cheers-!」



「「「「「Chee~~~~rs-!!!」」」」」



Like that the party started.



They talked to each other about their memories in the other world Tortus, they expressed their feelings of this one year since their return home, they jeered loudly at the couples of old and new, they bullied Kousuke, they made an uproar without any meaning, they ate and drank a lot, they lost sight of Kousuke, and they got really noisy.



In the middle, Aiko who finished her work joined them and unfolded a lovey-dovey flirting with Hajime quietly. There Yue nonchalantly cut in with her adult mode, then Shia and the others also crowded Hajime undauntedly and formed their usual pink space. Seeing that, the classmates went into an uproar once again, they felt for real the joy of living right now from their heart, and displayed great excitement in this first year return anniversary.



Before long, when the party was in full swing, without any particular feeling there were voices that began to state their wish of wanting to go to Tortus. Of course, the meaning of that wish wasn’t for living in the other side, those were only frivolous words of wanting to meet with their friends and acquaintances in Tortus.



While they were talking about their memories to each other, the want to meet Liliana and the maids at the palace, the war comrades they fought together with at the decisive battle, and the people they were cooperating with at the time of restoration steadily grew.



Hajime grinned widely to those classmates,



「Then, how about we go meet them for a bit right now?」



That sentence actually also sounded lighthearted.



To open a gate that crossed over the worlds, a vast amount of magic power was needed. When they returned to earth from Tortus, they had to do all kind of processes to capture the magic factor of mother nature into a pseudo-god crystal, then poured the magic power of the cheat group in full into it, and even so it took a month until the gate could be opened.



In the earth where there was almost no magic factor, to open a gate that crossed over the worlds, it should take at least five months at the fastest even with Hajime and others stocking all the magic power in their body.



Five months after they first returned to earth, they opened the gate once, and then after a further five months, they opened the gate again. And so, thinking normally it should take three more months before the gate could be opened.



「Oi, Nagumo. We ain’t going to get surprised by what you are doing after this late, we ain’t gonna start doubting you either. That’s why just spit it out right away. What are you gonna do?」



Ryutaro asked with an expression that was a mix of exasperation and admiration. The classmates were also focusing on Hajime, in the middle of that Hajime suddenly lifted his right hand and activated “Lightning Clad”, causing crimson sparks to crackle through him.



「This lightning clad is a characteristic magic that converts magic power into lightning strikes. Magic power can be converted into electricity……then, don’t you think that the reverse is also possible?」



「Please wait a second, Hajime-kun. I have a really bad premonition of this.」



Aiko’s cheeks convulsed from Hajime’s words. And then, with a small voice, she said something like「A month ago, there was a city that blacked out completely. The electricity was immediately restored but……if I remember correctly, it seemed that there was a nuclear power plant nearby that city」, hearing that the classmates also realized what Hajime had done and their cheeks convulsed greatly.



「Exactly as you imagined. I converted the electricity of a nuclear power plant into magic power, just for a bit. It took a bit of labor to create the exclusive artifact for establishing this conversion method, but finally, I succeeded in realizing it.」



「”Success”, that’s not it! Aa, what have you done when I took off my eyes of you for just a bit……」



Looking at the triumphant look of Hajime who sto――received the electricity of a nuclear power plant, Aiko held her head as though enduring a headache, while the other people were getting a faraway look.



By the way, the city getting blacked out was also something unexpected for Hajime, so he had fixed it so that right now he was able to do magic power conversion without affecting the power supply of the city.



Giving a glance to them who were being absentminded, Hajime took out “Crystal Key” and “Compass” from “Treasure Warehouse II”, he then stabbed the key without any hesitation whatsoever into an empty air and easily opened a gate to another world.



「What, you guys aren’t going?」



Even though he was guilty of something preposterous, as expected, Hajime was acting like there was nothing wrong. The classmates thinking “ah, screw it” slipped through the gate while shouting.



The destination was a reception hall that was located at a corner of the new palace of Hairihi Kingdom.



Liliana and some other people were carrying artifacts that would inform them of Hajime and the others opening a gate, so surely their arrival had been noticed.



As expected, the footsteps of several people immediately became audible.



And then, at the other side of the door that was opened loudly, there was the figure of Liliana breathing hard. The moment Liliana caught sight of Hajime, *daa――――* she dashed.



Like that, everyone was thinking that she would embrace Hajime with a deeply moving expression just like usual but……



There, an unexpected sentence flew out from Liliana’s mouth.



「Big trouble-! It’s a really big trouble! ――Kouki-san, he seems to have been summoned to another world somewhere!」



「Ha?」



The classmates also went「Ha?」as though empathizing with Hajime’s idiotic sounding voice. That was only natural. Even with Liliana speaking about summoning, this was the world that summoned Kouki. It couldn’t be helped even if they tilted their head wondering what Liliana was speaking about.



To them who were like that,



「It’s true! Suddenly there was a voice that came from the sky saying『I found you, hero-sama. I beg you, please save my beloved world』, then a magic circle that I had never seen before spread below Kouki-san――then he vanished! It happened about a week ago!」



Hearing that, the situation finally penetrated the classmates’ head.



In other words, it seemed that in this world where Kouki was summoned as the hero, Kouki was further summoned as the hero into another world somewhere……



「WHAT THE HEEEEEEEEELLLLLLLLL-」



Ryutaro who looked forward to meeting Kouki was the very first person that yelled up the tsukkomi that represented the voices of the heart of everyone here.



It appeared, that the world was still not intending to leave alone Hajime and the others.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Currently, the story of Kouki’s second summoning hasn’t been planned currently.



If I have to say, I’m thinking that ‘I want to write the story of Abyssgate-kun running around busily with teary eyes at the underworld sooon’.



From next time the chronological order will be all over the place too, I’m thinking of posting the after story and an extra story that I want to write little-by-little.



First of all, something like the story of Myuu that had grown to about ten years old.





Chapter 186




Arifureta After – As the Daughter of Demon King Part 1



In the middle of the night, in a room inside the Nagumo household, *tap tap* the small sound of a keyboard being tapped and the light of the display that faintly illuminated the room were spreading.



With a notebook PC being placed beside the pillow, and a posture of lying down with both elbows supporting the upper body, the one who was moving her small legs backward and forward in the air while staying up late was, the princess of the Nagumo family――Myuu. It has already been five years since she arrived in this world. Currently, the ten-year-old Myuu was still small statured as usual, but it appeared that the factor of “beautiful” had slightly entered into her “cuteness”.



At the end of the sentences that she spoke there was still “~nano” attached, the person herself was aware of it and wanted to fix that habit, but even with that she had become a person of firm character that was like a big sister as could be seen from how she had been given an individual room like this.



Although her mother and big sisters seemed to still worry about her because of her similarity with her father that often stayed up late and forgot the time completely due to the subculture. (TN: The subculture here might be talking about the otaku culture, maybe.)



『Nn~. So, Na-chan will also participate in that ceremony nano?』



『That’s right. I will sing a hymn as a member of the choir.』



When Myuu wrote a question by operating the keyboard *tap tap*, the chat partner Na-chan (real name, Natalia) replied back like that. This girl seemed to be a girl of the same age as Myuu, a ten-year-old that claimed she was living in America. The two of them got to know each other by chance through the heartwarming net game they played, and sometimes they even contacted each other like this outside the game. This girl was a friend of Myuu’s.



By the way, Myuu’s language capability was helped by Hajime’s handmade artifact that was inserted with “Language Comprehension” (exclusive for Myuu, provided with voice recognition and letter projection), with this Myuu could not only comprehend languages all over the world, but she could even comprehend ancient languages. Even now she was actually chatting using English.



『Choir huuuh~. That’s amazing nano.』



『Is that so? I think in my country there are a lot of children that enter the choir though.』



『Then, Na-chan’s country will be fine even if the apostles attack anytime then nano. If the country people mobilize altogether and hit hard with the sacred song, you will be able to shave off the apostle’s status by ninety percent. They will become just a mere wooden doll nano.』



『I’m sorry, Myuu. I don’t understand what Myuu saying here……』



Of course, it was natural that she didn’t understand.



Now then, according to their talk today, it appeared that on Sunday Natalia would accompany her parents (who seemed to be fairly high officials) to a large ceremony where government officials would be gathering. There, it seemed that a chorus of hymn would be done by a choir that was comprised of the ceremony participants’ children, so Natalia would also participate in the choir.



However, from Natalia’s viewpoint, there would be nothing that she could really do there other than sing the hymn. At the buffet party after the end of the ceremony, the children had to wait while their parents were having “adult talk (long time)”. Natalia didn’t have any friends there that she was particularly close to, and there was also her parents’ instruction to get along with the children of such-and-such families. It seemed it made her feel constrained and gloomy.



『A~a~, if only Myuu will also attend this party.』



『You can use this chance to become friends with the other children, right?』



『I don’t wanna. Even if I get along with them, if the person is actually a child of a family that is in opposition against father, it will be awkward……there is also some children among the older ones that will come to talk to me because of the instruction of their family, you know? I don’t want to become friends with those kinds of children.』



『Muu, you sound like a noble.』



『Ahaha, what are you saying? Myuu saying that makes it sound like you know some noble. By any chance, is Myuu from Britain?』



『No, Myuu is a sea dweller race.』



『Ahahaha, I always heard you say that, but, what kind of people are this sea dweller race~~』



『We are the women of the sea.』



『Ahahaha~』



Perhaps feeling that the way Myuu talked was amusing, words that expressed laughter were listed on the display screen. Natalia who seemed to calm down after a while wrote a sentence that seemed to be pleading with her unique friend who obviously had a different atmosphere and rhythm compared to her normal school friends.



『Hey, Myuu. I wonder, can you talk with me like this during the party?』



It seemed that the ceremony would be in the afternoon, so even thinking about the time zone difference Myuu would be able to become her talking partner. However, if seeing the figure of a young girl who didn’t properly participate in the party while earnestly playing with her smartphone in the corner, in the end just what would the family and also the surrounding think about Natalia……



However, even if only slightly, Natalia’s atmosphere that was really quite gloomy was conveyed through her sentence.



Seeing that, inside Myuu, the big sister soul was welling up!



『Muu, can’t be helped then.』



『Eh, is it fine? You said that recently you were scolded because you played on the internet too much though……it would be, really late, you know?』



『It’s fine. There is no problem. If it’s for the sake of a friend, then surely I will be allowed. That’s why, Na-chan, I won’t let you get bored and enjoy the party instead nano!』



『Ye, yes. What’s this, I’m happy but, for some reason, I have a bad premonition.』



That premonition of Natalia would splendidly come true during the weekend.



At a certain place in America, on that day, a certain ceremony was being held. At the ceremony that Natalia mentioned, where a lot of government officials were attending, mass media people were also going in and the situation of the ceremony was even broadcasted on the evening news in Japan.



Naturally, the hymn that was sung by the participating children, including Natalia, was also performed as one of the ceremony’s decoration, the figure of the children singing with their all was also broadcasted in the news.



After the ceremony program ended it was time for the standing buffet party. The ceremony was using a floor of a certain high-class hotel that was reserved, so the served cooking was also first class.



The adults were immediately involved in slightly difficult talks of this and that, and then Natalia, who was left alone just as expected, was now trying to become a wallflower and the heaven-sent child of the smartphone.



「Eh, I wonder if Myuu is still not online? By any chance, is it just as I thought, that she was stopped by her mother or her big sisters or someone?」



Natalia confirmed that Myuu wasn’t logging in on the chat room that the two of them usually used. Looking disappointed, Natalia sighed due to the gloomy time she had to spend until the end of the party.



But, it was at that time,



「Young lady. If you sigh like that, then happiness will run away, you know?」



「Eh?」



Natalia was startled and turned her gaze toward the direction of the voice that suddenly came to her. There, the one who spoke a line like a certain skirt chaser was unexpectedly a cute girl about the same age as her.



No, it was a beautiful girl to the degree that the word of cute felt a little lacking for her.



Emerald blond hair that looked fluffy and smooth, and clear jade eyes that looked mystical. Faint pink lips and dreamy rose colored cheeks. That figure which was wearing a dress with a gentle green tone was like a fairy that came out of a fairytale. That faint mischievous smile which had a close resemblance with a Cheshire cat somewhere despite her gentle look also spurred on that imagination.



After a while being in a daze, or possibly being enraptured, Natalia who was staring at that emerald fairy girl saw how that girl was peering into her wonderingly「Nn~?」which caused her to return to her senses with a ‘hah’.



「E, err, you are, who?」



「Muu, that’s mean. Even though I came here because Na-chan said that you are lonely.」



「E, e? Na-chan? E?」



Although this was a wide world, the only one who called her with that pet name was only that amusing friend which was living in Japan.



However, yes, however, Natalia who was relatively clever for her age and parentage immediately rejected that possibility.



Well, of course she was. What was the chance of a friend in Japan to rush here to America just because she was saying that she was lonely? Furthermore, the two of them had the talk about this at three days ago before the ceremony. Myuu wouldn’t be able to make it in time if she didn’t depart immediately, thinking normally this was something impossible.



Even if, just for argument’s sake, Myuu was really coming here for her sake, just how did she enter this place? This was a place where several big shot officials were gathering. Naturally, anyone other than related people would be checked strictly before entering here. There was no way for people other than the invitee that had been registered beforehand could enter.



In that case, there could only be one possibility, that Myuu was actually a child of a family that was invited into the ceremony today just like her family, which meant she had been lying to her all this time. But fundamentally, the two of them had only been talking with internet chatting, or using their net game avatar, they didn’t know each other’s face. Then, as expected this girl in front of her eye was…



「That’s not it nano. Myuu is Myuu herself, the genuine one that is living in Japan you know?」



「-, y, you, as I thought you are Myuu? But how are……」



Myuu who seemed to guess Natalia’s thought talked looking like someone who succeeded in her prank. Myuu then approached Natalia who twitched in surprise and took her hand without hesitation. And then, Myuu brought her lips close to Natalia’s ear, and she whispered softly, as though she was blowing her breath on the ear, just as if she was exposing a secret.



「Myuu is the daughter of the demon king-sama, and also the top disciple of his wives so……」



「……」



「If it’s for a friend, then something like this is no problem nano.」



Myuu stared from really close at Natalia whose face was glowing red for some reason, and then, while smiling and looking slightly troubled,



「Or else, is it a bother for Myuu to come here?」



Myuu asked that.



Natalia’s head was swung left and right at high speed, to the degree that it felt like an afterimage could be seen from that movement. Her expression expressed her feelings more eloquently than anything.



Natalia, who was made to toss away the worthless minor details and felt like Myuu was somewhat forcefully having her way with her, became able to spend her time in this boring and gloomy party with her friend.



By the way, Myuu was here in this place because of Hajime who she asked to send her using the compass and crystal key.



Right now in Japan, the time was already night, so beforehand Myuu had explained about the circumstance and her destination to Hajime and the others. Papa Hajime couldn’t say anything toward his daughter’s global acquaintance and the lightness of her movement, but Yue and the others were feeling warm and fluffy seeing a Myuu that had grown to become completely tough and they sent her here gladly. The one who prepared Myuu’s dress was also Yue and the others.



Although, if they knew that Myuu was making her friend red-faced by her actions and speech that was similar to a handsome man from an otome game performing a wall sandwich to the female character then……there was no doubt that the Nagumo family emergency meeting would be held right away. (TN: Otome game, a game like your usual visual novel, but here the MC is a girl while the targets to be conquered were handsome men instead of beautiful girls. While wall sandwich is slamming one’s hand into the wall in front of somebody (e.g. to stop them from leaving; often viewed as romantic))



「Geez, I was really surprised there!」



「I won’t let you get bored――that was what Myuu said, Myuu is keeping Myuu’s own words.」



「Aah, this rhythm, you are unmistakably Myuu.」



Natalia dropped her shoulders while intensely accepting the situation after seeing Myuu, who was saying such a thing, with a stiff and crisp expression. She accepted that the beautiful girl in front of her eyes that could be mistaken for a fairy was exactly her friend Myuu.



「I won’t ask about the details, but you really came here huh.」



「Nn. If Natalia is lonely, Myuu will rush to your side even if you are in another world.」



「-, thank you Myuu. ……For some reason, I got the hunch that in the future Myuu will be someone that is really no good you know.」



「Strange……recently Myuu is often told of something like that. Even though Myuu is just imitating all the onee-chans and papa.」



「Those onee-chans and papa-san, aren’t they also getting called as no good people?」



「Hah!?」



Even while having idiotic talk like that, Natalia’s heart was beating livelily inside. Her heart was beating fast because if the existence of Myuu, that shouldn’t be listed on the invitation list, got found out, it would become a really great uproar. But even more than that nervousness, she was feeling really happy that she could unexpectedly meet her friend, which she had wanted to meet, like this.



Furthermore, her friend was cuter than what she imagined. Myuu was humorous and for some reason, Myuu also looked adult-like. Myuu was exactly a friend that made her want to boast about her to other people.



Their talk was naturally turning lively, both of them were turning into wallflowers, yet they were looking more animated and purely having more fun than anyone there.



But that enjoyable time was suddenly broken.



Along with a sound *gashan*, one middle-aged male knocked over his glass while collapsing down. The surrounding people rushed to that person in a panic to check the situation, and they found out that the person appeared to be sleeping. The people got exasperated and explained to the surrounding that this person surely drank too much alcohol, but in the middle of that, suddenly another person at a different spot also collapsed similarly like that.



With that as the beginning, the people at the party venue were crumbling down one after another and fainted at different intervals.



「Wha, what? What is going……a, u?」



「Natalia?」



Natalia was bewildered, but in the middle of speaking her words suddenly cut off. When Myuu turned her gaze to her, she found the figure of Natalia falling to her knee with her eyelids looking like they would close anytime. She was obviously being assaulted by unnatural sudden sleepiness.



Myuu immediately caught Natalia who looked like she was going to fall, and then she became aware that she was also getting sleepy.



「This is……by any chance the cooking is? Uu, even though this should be a normal party……is this also because Myuu is papa’s daughter nano?」



While murmuring something that might damage Hajime relatively if he heard it, Myuu said「It’s fine」to Natalia who looked like she would faint anytime. She then took out a magic medicine from her “Treasure Warehouse” and drank it. With that, the sleepiness was blown off immediately.



Myuu thought of giving Natalia the medicine too, but because she felt a doubt whether Natalia would be able to get a hold of herself in the event of what would occur from here on. In the end, Myuu didn’t do that.



She then decided to send a mail to Hajime but noticed that the transmission was being jammed. At that point in time, she caught the sound of the footsteps of a group approaching.



Myuu groaned「Muu」while looking around. Most of the people seemed to have consumed the cooking that was laced with a sleeping drug, and they were all sound asleep or almost falling asleep. No, when Myuu saw that the security and the waiters were also falling asleep, it seemed that another method other than dosing the cooking was also used.



To do something like making all people in a strictly guarded party of politicians to faint without killing or wounding anyone was impossible with just average planning and organizational capability.



「Can’t be helped nano.」



Myuu looked at Natalia with a troubled expression, and then she laid down in that spot snuggling close to Natalia. Then she pretended to sleep while opening her eyes only slightly so that no one would notice.



「Wake up, Na-chan. Come on, wake up.」



「Mmm-」



The squishy sensation that was gently touching her cheek, the sensation of her head getting patted slowly caused Natalia’s consciousness to become half awake. On the other side of her faintly opened eyelids, there was the upside down figure of Myuu peering into her face.



「Myuu?」



「Yes, it’s Myuu. Good morning, Na-chan.」



「Un, good morning. But, why is Myuu in my room?」



「Na-chan. If you are seriously mistaking this room that is surrounded by concrete and an iron door as your own room, then Myuu has to have a talk with Na-chan’s family at once, you know?」



「E? …………………-!?」



Natalia, who finally recovered from her sleepiness, rose her body suddenly and ran her gaze over the surroundings. She confirmed that the place she was in was exactly just as Myuu said, a room of dreary concrete and an iron door.



At the same time, she caught sight of children other than her and Myuu. Nearly ten children about the same age were huddling in the corner of the room where they were already awake. Looking at how everyone was wearing party outfits, it seemed that they were children that were also in that party venue. Several of the children had faces that she knew as members of the same choir with her.



Every one of them was sitting down looking scared. Natalia’s gaze then turned back at Myuu who seemed to be giving her a lap pillow.



「Myu, Myuu. Just what in the world, how did this……where is here!? What happened to us!? Where is father!?」



Natalia was on the verge of panic. To that, Myuu closed their distance smoothly and embraced Natalia’s head closely. And then, Myuu gently clapped Natalia’s back several times while saying「It’s fine, it’s fine nano. Myuu is together with Na-chan here nano.」, this sentence was whispered to Natalia with an extraordinarily gentle tone.



Having those done to her, Natalia gradually relaxed ‘funya’ with her composure returning back.



Judging that Natalia had calmed down, Myuu separated their body, and then she also turned her gaze at the other children and opened her mouth.



「First, all of us were made to sleep by the drug that was laced on the cooking, and then we got kidnapped nano. After that, we were taken to this place by car after traveling for about forty minutes. The ones who are kidnapped are only the children that were in the venue, the adults were left alone in the venue.」



The word ‘kidnapped’ made the children almost cried, but before that happened Myuu continued her words.



「Not everyone is in this room but at the very least all the children that were taken away from that venue seem to be inside this building. According to the perpetrators’ conversation, it seems that they are making various demands just as expected. All of us are the hostages for that. The perpetrators are a really large organization, all their members are equipped with firearms. It looks like it will be some time before help will come for us nano. Anyway, the current situation is something like that. Are there any questions?」



「First, I want to ask just how can Myuu understand that much!」



Myuu’s well-reasoned explanation made everyone’s face turn into something like「Ah, yes」, but from among them, Natalia howled. In response to that, Myuu answered frankly.



「Because Myuu has been awake all along!」



「The sleeping drug!?」



「Detoxified!」



Natalia didn’t even ask about ‘how?’ or anything anymore. While her words got caught in her throat, Natalia exclaimed,



「Wh, why, are you this calm?」



She threw that natural question at Myuu. To that,



「Because Myuu has an abundance of experience of getting kidnapped nano.」



「Just what kind of life have you had!?」



「Getting made to cross a desert, getting locked in an underground prison, getting washed away in a sewer, getting displayed in an auction, getting kidnapped by a monstrous sister……」



「Stoooop, I don’t want, to hear more than thaaat!」



When Myuu explained this and that of the kidnapping cases she experienced while counting with her fingers, for some reason Natalia then hugged her while crying. Surely Natalia was getting the impression that Myuu was an unfortunate girl that had went through a gruesome life.



「Uu, but, then, why is Myuu here? If it’s Myuu, then shouldn’t you be able to escape?」



「Myu?」



While wiping her eyes roughly with her sleeve, Natalia asked a question that if it was Myuu she should be able to escape. Despite being the center of attention for the other children, due to the conversation of these two, Myuu was tilting her head as though to say「Just what are you talking about I wonder?」while answering.



「Even though Na-chan is getting taken away, just why would Myuu run away nano?」



「u」



Hearing Myuu’s answer that sounded like she was saying, ‘even though 1+1=2, why would you answer with 3?’, Natalia couldn’t say anything anymore. Myuu was just too much of a handsome guy, the young maiden Natalia-chan couldn’t say anything! Her face was that of a ripe apple!



In order to avert her mind, Natalia asked what they were going to do from here on.



「For the time being, Myuu will contact papa nano.」



Saying that Myuu took out her smartphone from under her dress’s skirt. The boy hostages were whispering, 「Eh, weren’t all the smartphones confiscated……」but……under the skirt of a girl was a grand mystery. Surely that was how it was.



The boys’ face delicately blushed at the thighs of Myuu that they caught sight of from the flipped skirt, and they averted their gaze (it seemed that their tension and terror were softened from watching the exchange between Myuu and Natalia) while Myuu was trying to contact Hajime……



「!? Now I’ve done it, nano……」



Suddenly Myuu hung her head down while on all fours. On Myuu’s hand, was a smartphone that displayed a lightless pitch black screen.



Actually, this smartphone was different from the normal smartphone that Myuu took out previously, it was a communication artifact that Hajime created. So that Myuu could use it, it was a type with a magic power storage loaded inside just like Myuu’s other exclusive artifacts; but if it was asked what was its difference with a normal smartphone, then it was at how it was able to communicate with another world.



If one possessed this smartphone, at the very least it would be impossible for the owner to be unable to contact Hajime and others who possessed the same device no matter where they were on earth, so even if the normal smartphone was taken away then there would be no problem, was what Myuu was thinking but……



「I forgot, to recharge it nano……」



It would cost much energy if it was used to contact another world. Before this, Myuu, who was in that age, against her better judgment got too engrossed in talking with her friend, and she used up too much of the stored magic power and got scolded by papa Hajime. This time too she recently unconsciously used the phone too much. Fearing the scolding she avoided asking to recharge the phone, which caused the phone to be completely empty currently.



「E, err, Myuu?」



Natalia who somehow guessed the situation after seeing Myuu who kept feeling down on all fours, sent Myuu a faint smile. Myuu who noticed that raised her face all of a sudden, and opened her mouth while averting her gaze.



「For humans, it’s no good to pay attention only to the past nano. Looking to the future is exactly what is right nano. Isn’t that correct, Nataliaaa!!」



「Ee!? E, err……」



「This is not a failure nano. This is a discovery that this method is not working nano!」



「Ye, yes?」



「And so, let’s give up contacting papa.」



「……」



Myuu cheerfully stored the smartphone inside the skirt (was how it looked like, but it was actually stored inside her “Treasure Warehouse”). While Natalia and the others were staring at Myuu with an expression that couldn’t say anything, Myuu crossed her arms and begin to think while nodding ‘yup yup’ to herself.



(Eerr, promise number 1 to papa, don’t expose your true identity, and don’t show the artifact. Promise number 2 to papa, at the time it’s necessary, always discuss it first with someone, whether it’s papa or one of the onee-chan. Promise number 3, when there is no time to protect promise number 1 and 2, at the time that Myuu thinks that it’s necessary……)



「――”Do as you like. As for the clearing up afterwards, I’ll do it”, papa said nano. Yup, right now is that time nano.」



Myuu, who had reconfirmed her important promises with papa, was whispering「Papa is just too cool nano. When Myuu recalled it Myuu got to fall in love all over again nano」inside her head while deciding on her plan from here on precisely.



Anyway, she had told Hajime the time the party would end, so even without her contacting him, no, exactly because she wasn’t contacting him, Hajime should get suspicious and he would open a gate to the party venue to pick up Myuu. Combining the time that they were being kidnapped and the time she spent at the party, Hajime should notice the abnormality in less than an hour.



When that happened, Hajime possessed the “Compass of Guidance”, so he would be able to instantly search for Myuu’s whereabouts. With that, this kidnapping incident would be resolved.



In the case that, for example, the situation changed before Hajime noticed, Myuu would use all the power she was gifted with and settle the problem without holding back. She planned to fight for the sake of her life and her friend’s life while entrusting the information concealment after that to her papa who was the most reliable person in the world.



In the case that she was fighting she would recover her smartphone, that should be somewhere in this building, and contact Hajime. With that, all the problems would be resolved.



With that being the plan that she decided on, Myuu fired herself up with「Yosh-, nano!」while her speaking habit that she was usually being careful so that it wouldn’t come out was going out in full throttle. Natalia and the other children, who were staring fixedly at such a Myuu, saw Myuu turn around to them, and they spontaneously gulped at Myuu’s wide smile toward them.



「It’s okay to not be that worried. Because everything is fine nano.」



That sentence wasn’t a mere consolation, or a wishful thinking, or even a bluff. A strength that made anyone who listened to be convinced, existed in her words. The tension in the children’s bodies naturally lessened and their expressions slightly recovered their natural color.



Myuu nodded once at those children, and then while whispering「Just in case, Myuu will make preparation nano.」, Myuu gathered the children to the corner of the room, then she began to set up small crosses in their surrounding.



Perhaps there was no meaning to wonder about it anymore but for the time being, the children watched Myuu putting her hand under her skirt once more. Although she had shown for real how she was taking out crosses from there, the size and number of the crosses were obviously surpassing the range that was possible to be stored inside a children’s skirt. That profoundly mysterious phenomenon caused Natalia to have a faraway look while the other children’s eyes were sparkling brightly from watching Myuu’s every single move.



「You……who are you?」



One blond-haired young boy, who blushed from Myuu’s smile, leaked out that question in a small voice.



In response to that, Myuu, who was nodding in satisfaction after finishing setting up the crosses, then proclaimed with brimming confidence and a grandly triumphant look, as though it was exactly her pride.



「Myuu’s name is Myuu. The beloved daughter――of the god-slaying demon king-sama nano!」



It went without saying that the faces of the children went blank hearing that.



A little bit after that.



In just a few minutes Myuu was becoming the center of this imprisonment room. It was obvious that the children would gather under Myuu, who even in this situation was still smiling without even a single agitation. Everyone huddled together wanting to be at Myuu’s side.



Seeing that, for some reason, Natalia wasn’t feeling amused. Myuu had asked for all the children to introduce themselves, and after everyone finished their introductions Myuu stated that Natalia was “a close friend nano!”. If Myuu didn’t do that, then perhaps right now Natalia would be acting sullen regardless of the current situation.



(Besides, that guy, isn’t he being too close?)



Natalia was occupying one of Myuu’s sides while at the opposite side there was a blond young boy talking passionately to Myuu. The sharpness of Natalia’s gaze toward that boy was growing without end.



It was unclear whether the blond-haired boy noticed it, but the boy was continuing to talk to Myuu while sometimes feeling concerned of Natalia’s gaze.



「Err, I don’t really understand but……anyway, Myuu-chan’s papa is absurdly strong, and he will immediately locate us and then beat up those guys, is that true?」



The blond-haired young boy――he who had the name Emile asked Myuu. The children had sparkling eyes from hearing Myuu’s story about how strong her papa was, but Emile, who was comparatively calm, was thinking realistically during Myuu’s story and had noticed some things that should be impossible without using magic mixed in the story, so his impression became like that.



By the way, the total number of the children inside the room was nine. Every one of them were all children of the government officials that attended that party.



「Yup. If it’s papa, then against that kind of guys it would be instant kill nano. And if it is the onee-chans, then even if it’s just one of them then the bad guys will go splat or go boom, or go zap, or go pew.」



「I, I see. Yep, I see……」



For some reason, Emile felt like he was hearing excessively graphic sound effects, but he did his best in ignoring it.



「But, in that case then it seems that it will be all the better to not do anything uncalled for then. If within thirty more minutes our whereabouts will get find out, then let’s not do anything dangerous. Myuu-chan too, it seemed that you did something like pretending to sleep but it’s no good to do risky things, you know?」



「It will be fine. Nn~, Emile is kind nano.」



「-, no, no such thing, though……」



Myuu smiled sweetly at Emile who was worrying for her even in this kind of situation. The youth Emile noticed that something was shot through inside him. 「Aa~, Emile is getting red!」or「Emile, you actually like Myuu don’t you!」and so on, jeering characteristic of children was breaking out from the others seeing Emile’s face.



Natalia’s gaze was rapidly growing sharper. It was to the level that made one doubt whether this girl was really a ten-year-old!



Emile’s face went bright red while he made his objection inside that atmosphere, but the more he got worked up and denied the jeering, the deeper he was digging the hole for himself. Natalia’s face was growing to resemble Hannya. The tragic feeling that enveloped the children at the beginning couldn’t be found anywhere anymore.



In exchange, the youth Emile had to taste the tragic feeling instead.



「I’m sorry nano. Myuu, cannot answer Emile’s feeling!」



「I got strongly rejected! Wh, why? No, it, it’s not like, I like Myuu-chan or anything though. I’m asking here, because I’m just, feeling curious, or something……」



「Emile is not my type nano!」



「I got struck with a straight ball! The, then, what is your type……no, this is too, just because I’m curious, or something, it’s not like I really want to he, he, hear though……」



「Myuu like papa!」



「That’s an overly sharp curve ball! No, see here, Myuu-chan. It’s fine that you like your papa but, you cannot actually marry him……also, that, that’s different from liking a lover or something……」



「aAA?」



「Hii, I got threatened by a cute face that looked like a gangster! No, because, your papa, he is your father, you know?」



「We are not related by blood so there is no problem.」



「Unthinkable development! Lo, look here, Myuu-chan. Even though you two are not related by blood, he is your mother’s beloved person, isn’t he? Then, if Myuu-chan is feeling like that to your father, won’t your mother feeling troubled?」



「Mama said, ‘if there is an opening then take it!’ to Myuu nano!」



「Unthinkable backup! Such a thing……just what kind of family is Myuu-chan’s family……」



「There are mama and papa, then Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan, then in addition to papa’s wife there are also seven more wives, it’s a normal family.」



「There is something wrong with Myuu-chan’s father, you know!?」



「aAA!?」



「Hii, I’m sorry! I beg you here, don’t make a face like a mafia boss with that cute face!」



Emile-kun’s first love was showered with blows.



The surrounding children cackled. Natalia was hugging Myuu’s arm while making an expression of「Serves you right!!」. Natalia’s character was in danger of crumbling.



Amidst that, a blond girl looking slightly older than Myuu was asking with sparkling bright eyes, as expected it seemed that love stories being the favorite food of any girl were a common point that was shared by all worlds.



「Hey hey, Myuu-chan. Then, when will you confess to your papa?」



「Nn~, confess? Nn~」



Myuu tilted her head a little, then after showing a thinking gesture「Nn~」, her eyes slowly narrowed.



「If it’s confession then Myuu does it every day. Every day, Myuu says Myuu love papa nano.」



「Ee~, your papa won’t get it like that you know, absolutely~」



「Nope. Papa is sharp so he understands. But, Myuu is still little, so papa is not thinking of Myuu like that nano……that’s why……」



「That’s why?」



The girls’ eyes were sparkling with their heart beating fast, Emile was being crushed under a tragic feeling, Natalia was staring at Myuu with a complicated expression, and the boys were directing their grin at such an Emile. Amidst all those, Myuu……



「That’s why……eventually, Myuu will eat up Papa nano.」



Saying that Myuu licked her lips. She chuckled「Fufu」with faintly blushing cheeks and eyes that were moist from passion. It was a bewitching figure that closely resembled a certain vampire princess, to the degree that it made one want to retort「Eh, she is ten-years-old right?」.



Spontaneously, the girls were shaken「Hawawa-」, the boys were overcome with a surprise to the point that their souls almost flew away while Emile and Natalia pressed their hands on their heart as though they were shot through.



As expected, it seemed that Myuu had inherited properly even the things that didn’t need to be inherited from her uncommon older sisters.



But, it was at that time, that the symbol of terror that was blown away thanks to Myuu became a footstep that resounded from the other side of the door. The children suddenly realized and they huddled close to the wall.



「Myu, Myuu……」



「Nn, it’s fine. I won’t let them touch even a single hair of Na-chan.」



「Un, I, believe in Myuu.」



The door opened with a creaking sound, and from the other side two men with their faces hidden by masks and something that seemed to be assault rifles hanging on their shoulders entered the room.



「Oi, which one we are going to take?」



「They are all the same, right? Anyway, other than that brat, these brats are all the kids of government or army officials. The effect will be the same no matter which one we kill. We also kidnapped a lot at other bases too anyway. It will be fine even if we used up all the brats here.」



「I see. It’s us two first for the time being huh. One will be killed right away as an example, right?」



The two who were exchanging in conversation, which could only be associated with a dark future no matter how you looked at it, were acting as though the lives of children were worth nothing. It caused the children’s bodies to shrink and shiver. And then, one of the men reached out his hand to a girl that he just happened to catch sight of――at Natalia who Myuu covered behind her. But, that hand was stopped by the surprisingly strong grip of a small hand.



「……in the end, the time limit came first nano.」



「You are in the way, brat.」



A cold gaze that robbed all warmth pierced Myuu from behind the mask. Myuu talked to that man without even hiding her atmosphere of ‘it’s impossible huh’.



「This is a warning. It’s better for you all to immediately release all of us without doing anything at all to us. Ojii-san, you all have no chance of winning nano.」(TN: Ojii-san=uncle)



「………………fuh」



That unthinkable speech which came from a ten-year-old girl in this situation made the masked man to be lost for words spontaneously, but the moment his mind caught up, a snort came out from his nose. Thinking that the little existence before his eyes really didn’t know anything of what was called reality, caused ridicule to well up inside him.



At the same time, a color of sadism came into being inside his eyes. When he looked closer, it was a little girl with a very pretty look. This pretty little girl who didn’t know anything about reality, if he made her taste overwhelming violence, just what kind of voice would she be chirping with then, the man wondered.



Myuu who knew about the unreasonableness of reality understood what was in the mind of this kind of man like the back of her own hand. Therefore, while she was sighing in her heart that as expected, words wouldn’t do anything anymore now, at the moment when the masked man was about to strike Myuu, her lips curved up fearlessly.



「Enemy is to be killed nano!」



「-, wha!?」



Before he knew it, a small pistol for Myuu’s use was gripped in her hand and was pushed against the man’s stomach forcefully.



Just why a kidnapped child was holding a gun――even while feeling chaotic confusion from the incomprehensible situation, the man immediately twisted his body but,



*pan-*



A dry sound rang out, at the same time, the man received a fierce impact on his stomach, without even being able to scream the man turned in a somersault.



「Shit-, this brat-」



「……」



The other man aimed his assault rifle at Myuu――but, faster than the man, Myuu summoned a similar pistol in her other hand without even changing her posture or turning her sight. A bullet flew below Myuu’s armpit and impacted the stomach of the man who was at the left behind Myuu.



Once more, a dry sound *pan-* resounded along with the man groaning with a small voice while crumbling down. And then, even with an unbelieving expression, the man was trying to pull the trigger of his assault rifle.



「Fly away you asshole nano!」



Before anyone realized, Myuu stepped in and in her hands was a comical hammer that was gripped――at the head of the hammer there was a rabbit character that looked like Mif○y attached colored in red and yellow――the pico pico hammer’s full swing pummeled the head of the man mercilessly and sent him flying. (TN: Search in google using this word ピコピコハンマー to find the illustration of pico pico hammer)



The man crashed on the wall *bekyo!* before crumbling down powerlessly. Giving that man only a glance, Myuu shouldered the pico pico hammer while turning around, and then toward the first man who was trying to stand up somehow.



「Hey-, wai――」



「No waiting nano!」



The pico pico hammer struck violently in full power. The hammer that flew with a force that was unthinkable when coming from the strike of a ten-year-old girl hit directly at the man’s face. *pikon-!* Such comical sounds and star images were scattered while the man was sinking down.



「Myuu……」



「A, amazing……」



Natalia’s eyes opened wide while Emile was letting out a murmur of admiration. That expression and murmur represented the heart of everyone there. After all, two adult men armed with guns were instantly killed by a girl whose age was not that different from them. In addition, there was also the weapons that appeared one after another like a magic trick.



However, Myuu’s expression didn’t show any sense of accomplishment. Rather, with a grim expression from her wariness that was raising up further, she was staring at the other side of the door and gave an instruction to the dumbfounded children.



「Na-chan, everyone. Until I say that it’s fine, you all absolutely must not get out from behind those crosses. Understand?」



「Eh, Myuu, we are not going to escape even though those men have been defeated?」



「Yup, several people are heading here after hearing the commotion just now nano. Even if we want to escape, right now it’s dangerous to go outside.」



「Go, got it.」



Natalia led the other children and they huddled against each other behind the crosses that Myuu had lined up. During that time, Myuu took out a new weapon. This time she chose something that would make as little sound as possible.



Right after that, three men stepped into the room. They were taken aback after seeing that two of their comrades were defeated before they aimed their rifle muzzle at the children. They were going to question the children what happened when,



*hyun hyun-*



The sound of something cutting through wind entered their ears. At the same time, one of the men received a fierce impact on his head that blew his consciousness to the beyond.



「Wha-」



「This brat-」



Voices of shock and curses resounded. Right after that, Myuu, whose dress waved from her elegant twirling motion, directed the weapon in her hand to the enemies and launched it with that twirling motion and her wrist snap.



*hyun* the sound of something cutting apart the air resounded and pulverized the ankle of one of the men while wrapping around it at the same time.



――Myuu’s exclusive use Black Whip “This is Weapon Desu”



The emphasis in the naming was surely the consideration of the papa so that the perverted character of the whip art teacher wouldn’t be transferred to his beloved daughter even in the worst case. It was a caution toward the daughter so that the whip would never, ever be used for any other purpose other than as a weapon.



“This is Weapon Desu” crashed the man whose ankle was pulverized into the man at his side before letting go, and then it struck the wrist of the man whose balance was broken. Just with that the bone of the wrist was smashed and the man screamed while dropping his gun. The collapsed man tried to ready his rifle while the man whose wrist was broken tried to take out his pistol from his waist, but the tip of the whip bent and hit the head of the two men hard almost at the same time and robbed them of their consciousness.



「Mu-, there is still one more nano!」



「-, what the, you-」



The last man who was standing by outside the room showed his figure while pulling his rifle’s trigger toward the girl who instantly made the three men entering the room faint. *da da da da da-* Amidst the fiercely reverberating sound of a gun shooting Myuu threw away her black whip and took out the “Pikko Piko Hammeeer” once again and threw it forward.



Myuu, who was in the line of fire, was hiding in the shadow of the “Pikko Piko Hammeeer” so that the bullets didn’t hit her. The stray bullets that missed Myuu passed through to the back――toward the group of children behind.



「Kyaaah, wait, eee!?」



「Li, liees……」



Before the eyes of Natalia, Emile, and the others who spontaneously screamed, the bullets were stopping with ripples spreading throughout midair.



――Myuu’s exclusive use Barrier Artifact “Don’t Touch, You Pervert!”



The lined up crosses were artifacts where a barrier would be deployed with those crosses as the base. So that bullets wouldn’t hit the children even in the worst case, Myuu made a simple safe zone inside the room beforehand. The naming made apparent just what kind of situation that the creator imagined this artifact would be used for.



And then, Myuu herself who had completely protected the children from the wicked bullets was……



「Sleep nano.」



「aAA!?」



The thrown “Pikko Piko Hammeeer” instantly blocked the sight of the enemy and within an instant Myuu circled to the back of the opponent with low steps as though she was crawling on the ground, and with two kodachi in her hands, she rotated while severing the tendons of the enemy’s two legs. At the same time, the head of the man who became unable to keep standing and crumbled down was hit and hit by two consecutive pommel strikes, causing the man to faint with the white of his eyes exposed.



――Myuu’s exclusive use Twin Katana “Muuramasa-Kotetsuu”



This artifact would react to Myuu’s image and could activate high-speed vibration-slash wave-impact generation, on top of that, just by holding it would cause Myuu’s perception and physical ability to rise. These two kodachi were truly worthy to be called as “demon sword”.



By the way, the twin sword art that Myuu learned was based from Kaori’s twin large sword art combined with Shizuku’s Yaegashi-style. Especially the combo of the rotating slash continued with a pommel strike just now was a technique that was just one step short of being the secret technique of the Yaegashi-style.



「For now we managed to endure through emergency, but reinforcements will surely come soon, so everyone, prepare to escape.」



Myuu twirled the two kodachi before like a magic trick, and the two swords disappeared somewhere. Looking at Myuu, the children finally raised their joyful voices and rushed out from behind the crosses. Their mouths sent Myuu words of praise like「Myuu-chan is amazing!」「So cool!」「Stro―ng!」.



「Myuu! Are you okay? You are not injured?」



「Myuu-chan! You are okay!?」



「Na-chan, Emile. Myuu is fine nano. Rather than that, the next enemy will come soon, so we are going to move to a place where it’s easier to fight while we have time. It will be dangerous if they throw a grenade in a dead end closed room like this.」



Even though Myuu had cut a swath through grown-up men like butter, she didn’t look particularly proud and instead calmly gave the children the next instruction. Witnessing this, Natalia and Emile raised an enraptured voice「Fuai」sounding extremely stupid.



Myuu gave a glance at the two of them who were like that, and then she took an action that made Natalia want to scream while making the boys feel both really happy and embarrassed. After all, Myuu’s dress suddenly vanished.



「Fuwah」



「Wai-, hey-, you guys, don’t look-」



The dress was only stored inside the “Treasure Warehouse”, but from the point of view of the children who didn’t know about such a thing, it looked like Myuu was suddenly only wearing underwear. Furthermore, the undressed Myuu was wearing a green baby doll that wafted off an adult air which made one want to say ‘isn’t that a bit inappropriate for a ten-year-old?’



Myuu’s white skin that looked transparent was exposed generously, but there was no color of shame at Myuu’s serious expression. For Myuu who once went through an adventure in a world of sword and magic, something of this degree wasn’t worth feeling bothered about at all, to say nothing of how it was in the middle of a battle right now.



And then, in this battlefield, there was one reason why Myuu took off her dress.



Right after that, Myuu’s body was enveloped with a faint light, and then in the next moment, Myuu transformed into a new outfit.



A dress shirt that really resembled what Yue was wearing, and white-hot pants that resembled the one that Shia was wearing. White knee high socks that exposed the absolute territory of her legs, and cute frilly short boots. Her waist was wrapped with two gun belts like what Shizuku wore crossing each other.



A miniaturized “Picco Pico Hammeeer” was attached to the back of the gun belt on that waist while colorful gems were fitted on the countless slots that were usually for storing bullets. On Myuu’s two thighs at opposing sides were two gun holsters fitted with “Donneerr-Schlaaag” while on her back were “Muuramasa-Kotetsuu” attached crossing each other.



This was exactly the complete battle readiness of Myuu! She transformed instantly. That figure with an outfit change and weapon change was just like a magical girl somewhere!



In fact, all of the children that were directing yearning looks at Myuu said「Myuu-chan is a magical girl……」.



But, at that time, sounds of angry voices and many footsteps running to here entered Myuu’s ears. It appeared that she couldn’t expect the enemy to only send a small number of their forces anymore, and she also couldn’t hope to just wait-and-see. The enemy had clearly understood that they weren’t attacking but were receiving a counterattack, so they were sending their “battle force” to here.



Most likely, it would be thirty or forty more minutes before the time limit where Hajime would notice the strangeness. If Myuu was asked whether she could buy time until then by holing up, then as expected, no matter how many times she was reassessing the situation the answer that she came up with was doubtful.



Above all else, teachings like a nonaggressive defense of constantly being in defensive while kept being getting done in――was something that Myuu didn’t get taught with!



「You all are enemy nano. Enemy is to be pow-wowed nano!」



With her two beloved guns that were gifted to her by her beloved papa in two hands, *click* Myuu made a wide fearless grin.



Right now, the daughter of the demon king was starting to move.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



It feels like, I’m just doing whatever I like……



But, I’m not reflecting or regretting. Aa, I’m having fun writing.



About the trivial detail, I will be happy if everyone turns a blind eye with your usual tolerance of [Well, this is Shirakome after all].





Chapter 187




To all the riajuu, and to the villagers of loneliness village too, to everyone.



People dressed in colorful costumes, mysterious creatures(mascots), shrieks that contained joy and excitement, sound effects and music that were resounding here and there.



That place, which looked unreal and extraordinary, was a certain famous theme park.



The season was winter. Furthermore, today was the day when the end of the year would soon arrive――it was Christmas.



It was natural that there were more lovers than usual, but there were also people who came with their family or fellow friends. They all came in droves to enjoy, to their heart’s content, this theme park that had been remodeled for only a limited time, dyed in the color of Christmas.



The theme park, which had amassed such a number of visitors that it made the face of the management to burst out in a chuckle, was visited by a group that was a little special. It was a group that consisted of one man and eight beautiful girls and women. On the shoulder of that man was a little girl with sparkling bright eyes. It went without saying that this group was Hajime and the wives (Yue, Shia, Tio, Kaori, Shizuku, Remia, Aiko, and Liliana). Shuu and Sumire had work. It also went without saying that the two of them were shedding tears because they couldn’t come.



By the way, in the current time, Liliana was still unable to separate herself from the kingdom, so normally she was staying in the kingdom. However, in this long-awaited holy night, it would be too cruel to leave Liliana alone, so Hajime opened a gate and kidnapped Liliana who was in the middle of work.



For the moment, by using the system to convert electricity into magic power (Hajime had built a personal geothermal electric power generator deep underground so he could convert magic power as he pleased), the number of times they could freely come and go between Tortus and earth had increased, so there was no particular problem with doing this.



「Papa, papa! There, let’s go there nano! That one with shark-san going haup!」(TN: Seems Myuu is referring to a shark opening its jaw and then swallowing in a flash.)



「Yes yes. Even though it’s cold here, but you intentionally chose water attraction huh. Is this because of Myuu’s race trait?」



Myuu was given a ride on Hajime’s shoulder, her legs were swinging back and forth while she was squealing merrily. Her head was covered with a fluffy Santa hat, and her appearance was that of a mini skirt Santa costume. Her legs were wrapped with white stockings, and her boots were white with a pompon attached, each time her legs moved they would flutter around.



With emerald blonde hair that flowed down from the Santa hat, her well ordered gentle features that were inherited from her mother, her innocent merriness, and her fawning over her papa with all her might made this little girl stand out despite all the onee-chan surrounding the papa. The gazes of the people in the surrounding were unconsciously pulled toward her, and when they caught sight of her they wouldn’t be able to help themselves from loosening up their expression warmly.



Just as Santa Myuu wished for, papa Hajime was heading toward the aquatic attraction where they would have an adventure on a river, where a giant shark was lurking.



While waiting, the other visitors kept stealing glances toward the beautiful appearance of Yue and the others……however, there was no such thing happening. Due to an artifact that obstructed people’s recognizance, the surrounding wasn’t paying any attention to Yue and the others.



In exchange, it was Yue and the others whose gazes were wandering around restlessly. Especially Liliana whose familiarity with this world was still faint. She seemed to be receiving culture shocks from various things, and from behind the eyeglass of the recognizance obstruction, her gaze, that was possibly sparkling even brighter than Myuu’s, was running through the area.



They had entered the theme park in the morning, and by now the sun had gone down considerably, but Liliana’s excitement hadn’t settled down yet.



「……Really, Hajime-san’s world is just like a jack-in-the-box. They are building a facility like this only for the sake of amusement. The scale of this is just like a small city, you know? The sightseeing ward at Furen is also something, but this place is on a different level. No, should I perhaps call this as the difference in passion and seriousness toward amusement? Even though this is a large scale facility, I can see their fixation even on the minor details. It has surpassed the rationality as a mere business, and I can feel the zeal of the people affecting the construction. I wonder about how much they spent in building this. And the profit? The number of visitors per year? The development in the future? The owner of this facility is a common merchant……no, the owner is a corporation, isn’t it? If this can be managed by the country instead……. No, if the substantial aspect is left to Furen while the country becomes the contract partner……」



It seemed that Liliana was getting excited at a point that was slightly off. Even though she had arrived here in this rare chance to the world of dreams, furthermore, it was on the holy night, this princess of another world seemed to be curious about the selling point of the theme park instead. And what was mysterious from this was that the sparkling eyes of a dreaming maiden now strangely looked like the fiercely glaring eyes of someone aiming for money.



After Hajime returned to earth, it could be imagined just how hard Liliana. who was left behind, was working, so if it was asked if this couldn’t be helped then perhaps it really couldn’t be helped……but perhaps she had been neglected a bit too much. Hajime, Yue, and the others were sending lukewarm gazes mixed with pity toward Liliana.



While that happened, the turn for Hajime and the others had arrived. They boarded the boat that had drifted in in front of their eyes. The boat had a roof attached and could be boarded by around twenty people, with a vertical bench set up at the center so that the occupants could sit while facing the outside.



Myuu sat down on Hajime’s lap like it was only natural and was staring at the route looking thrilled.



Before long the boat slowly advanced. At the same time, an onee-san, looking like an adventurer with a rifle in one hand, was talking with a lot of realism about just how dangerous this adventure would be and how brutal the existence that was lurking at the bottom of the water was.



Just as could be expected from a worker at a large-scale theme park, her talking skill was first class. The adults were enjoying the atmosphere like an adult, and the children were looking at the water looking scared while their hand grasped their parents’ hand tightly.



「Papa.」



「Hm? What is it Myuu?」



Hajime tilted his head at the call of Myuu above his lap who was looking up over her shoulder at Hajime while he was fixing the position of her Santa hat that had shifted. Myuu was asking her papa cheerfully.



「If the shark-san attacks, that onee-san will be the one who defeats it nano?」



「Yeah, I guess. She will shot it with that rifle to protect us.」



「Hm~mm」



When Myuu heard what Hajime said, she began to stare fixedly at the onee-san. The onee-san smiled pleasantly toward the gaze of the cute Santa-san, and she waved her hand a bit. As expected from an onee-san of a theme park. Her zero yen smile was also super first class.



But, if it was a normal child they would be a bit embarrassed before hiding in the shadow of their parent, or they would smile back normally, but in this scene Myuu’s reaction was……



「Fuh」



For some reason, Myuu sighed a little while she shrugged as though to say「Yare yare daze」. A crack entered the onee-san’s super smile! A cramp entered papa Hajime’s expression! (TN: Yare yare daze, I think in English it’s something like ‘oh dear, good grief’)



Using the indispensable technique for a theme park worker, the “Instant Switch”, the Onee-san immediately fixed her smiling face, but Hajime’s expression was still cramped while tapping Myuu’s head. And then, when he asked the reason of Myuu’s attitude just now, she answered「Because, that onee-san looks weak」. It appeared that just now was Myuu’s way of wanting to say「Don’t force yourself okay」.



While that was happening, an event began in the attraction. On the water’s surface, there was a fin that was beginning to appear. The onee-san then shot a warning shot with her rifle. It was a fake rifle without any bullets, but a water splash occurred with matching timing. From the viewpoint of the children, it looked like the onee-san was shooting her rifle and drove away something. In fact, the little kids were raising voices of joy.



However, the boat suddenly shook as though something had pushed it up from below, and wreckages of seriously damaged ships from shark attacks were beginning to appear. The expression of the children began to show nervousness and fear once more. And those feelings reached the peak when a giant shark with its giant jaw opened wide leaped out from the water’s surface.



‘waa―’ ‘kyaa―’ Amidst those resounding excited voices, the onee-san drove away the giant shark with her rifle. However, the shaking boat caused her to slip and fall down. It appeared that her ankle got twisted (of course it was the setting), then saying that she couldn’t shoot the rifle like this, she called to the crowd ‘someone work with me!’. Naturally, the one who would cooperate would be the little kids.



「Go on, Myuu. You too go there.」



「Yes nano.」



A group of little kids fired the rifle given to them by the onee-san looking nervous, or possibly excited. Myuu also joined into that group.



「……Uu~n, how unexpected desu. If it’s Myuu-chan, she should know already about more thanthe real thing, doesn’t she?」



Shia tilted her head even while pleasantly watching Myuu who was making merry at the imitation shark. Myuu was different from normal children because she knew about real monsters of the sea and also about the struggle for life. Yet Myuu’s figure, which was seriously looking excited with this regardless of all that, was a bit strange.



「Fufu. Of course Myuu understands what is going on. But, the strange amusement of a dangerous experience with guaranteed safety caused Myuu to feel that it’s something unusual and interesting instead.」



「……Nn. Recently she’s been getting engrossed in battle games, this is a little bit troubling.」



「There is also our training, and there art also her staying up late at night.」



「Lack of sleep for young children will cause a bad influence on their growth. Hajime-kun, it’s not good unless you firmly warn her, you know?」



Papa Hajime was smiling wryly toward Aiko’s warning while he nodded. That was also something that Hajime was worrying about recently.



「Ah, it’s Myuu-chan’s turn now.」



「Leave the camera to me. Myuu-chan fighting a giant shark, I’ll catch it in the picture perfectly.」



Hearing what Kaori pointed out, Shizuku readied a single-lens reflex camera. The target of that lens was the figure of Myuu who was having a rifle handed to her right now.



Normally the onee-san would gently teach the kid the way of holding the rifle and also help prop up the kid. Then by aiming at the timing when the shark jumped out, she would say「It’s now! Fire!」where sparks would scatter from the shark’s body and mouth, giving a show as though the shark had been shot.



But, the small Santa who received the rifle was a super little girl that had become thoroughly familiar with gunpowder smoke, sparks, and firearms in another world. Furthermore, right now she was a trained little girl that had been forged by her all cheat onee-san and her demon king papa.



Therefore, the moment Myuu received the rifle, she twirled it with a familiar motion and shouldered it on her shoulder before turning her gaze to the water surface. The hands of the onee-san that were going to support the little child were wandering about in the air. That figure which was shouldering a long rifle was strangely looking appropriate on the miniskirt Santa little girl, which caused the eyes of the visitors to blink. Shizuku released the camera shutter. Consecutively.



「Err, I wonder, what is your name young miss~?」



With a professional spirit, the onee-san asked her name.



「It’s Myuu. I am six years old. A woman of the sea.」



「……S, so it’s Myuu-chan! Yoosh, Myuu-chan, if we advance just a little bit more we should be able to escape, so let’s do our best and drive away the scary shark, okay?」



Onee-san is a pro! No matter what kind of tricky customer she faced she wouldn’t waver!



She wouldn’t waver, but Myuu, who heard onee-san’s words of「drive away」, sent a glance at the onee-san as a fearless smile floated on her lips……



「Drive it away nano? That’s also not bad but……no one will mind even if I do the shark in right?」



「No, that will be troubling.」



Onee-san plainly replied!



But, in the next moment, the giant shark jumped out all of a sudden while raising water with it. Myuu instantly readied her rifle. She placed the stock part on her shoulder, her left hand supported the barrel, and her sight lined up with the rear sight. She really looked the part.



The eyes of the onee-san were starting to get far away. The children were going ‘waa’ raising voices of admiration. The adults were directing complicated gazes at Hajime and the others who were Myuu’s guardian.



On that boat which was gradually turning chaotic, the small Santa’s lovely speech resounded.



「I’ll blow off your head nano!」



The sound effect of *dopan* resounded and sparks scattered inside the mouth of the giant shark. The giant shark vanished into the water. Light was also vanishing from the onee-san’s eyes. The voice of the adults cheering the children was already disappearing.



Amidst all that, Myuu, who twirled the rifle with an experienced gesture as expected before resting it on her shoulder, a beat later made a resolute thumbs up with「Myu!」. (TN: Here she is not saying her own name, it was more like a peculiar voice that Myuu sometimes makes.)



「Oh, it’s starting nano!」



The sun had already completely sunk, however, the dazzling light of the theme park that was spreading, as though to exterminate the darkness of night, was illuminating Myuu who was in a good mood. On Hajime’s shoulder, Myuu was pointing at the lead group of the parade.



A night parade was starting in the theme park. Tonight was also Christmas, so the parade was showier and more extravagant than usual. The people who were gathering on the streets were also crowding around until the place was jam-packed.



Hajime’s group were watching the parade that earned a full score in its entertainment, but after a while, suddenly Hajime lowered Myuu down from his shoulder. And then, Hajime put the puzzled Myuu on Tio’s shoulder. If it was Tio, whose height was only a bit shorter than Hajime, then Myuu would still be able to watch the parade.



Hajime exchanged a look with Yue and the others. For the sake of this day, he had prepared this and that and made arrangements with the others beforehand. Due to that, Hajime intended to go away from this spot.



「Myuu. Papa will go away for a bit to do some errands. I’ll come back soon, so wait for a bit here.」



「……Yes nano.」



Hajime felt like something was pulling him back looking at Myuu who made a bit of a lonely expression, but he somehow shook it off. Today was the first grand Christmas event for Myuu. They didn’t make it in time for the previous Christmas because they had only made it back to earth and there was no time, so they only did something like a small party for the family. That was why, no matter what papa Hajime wanted to do that for the sake of his beloved daughter.



Hajime slipped into the crowd of people and vanished. Myuu stared at his figure as he left but was urged by Yue and the others until her gaze returned to the parade. A joyful smile immediately returned to her face, but as expected, when her beloved papa wasn’t with her she seemed unable to go all out enjoying the event.



But, that gloominess too was immediately cleared up.



*shan shan shan shan* Clear bell sounds could be heard. Everyone seemed to think that it was a sound from the parade, but that sound was getting larger which caused the people to go「Hmm?」while tilting their head. Yes, the sound of the bells that were growing increasingly audible was coming from up above.



As though they were guided by an unknown source the people began to look above, and over there was,



「Ah, that’s Santa-san-」



A boy somewhere pointed while raising his voice. Following where the boy pointed the people looked up, and they raised their voices with「Eh, lies, it’s flying!?」, or「Re, reindeer? The real thing!?」「Ama~zing!!」and so on.



Yes, at where the boy was pointing, there was the appearance of reindeer pulling a sleigh that Santa Claus was riding, gliding through the sky.



The normally impossible supernatural phenomenon was something that should make anyone scream, but this place was a country of dreamers. A fantasy world decorated with the unreal and extraordinary. Therefore, everyone was thinking that it was the theme park’s production, their shock was gradually turning into cheers. The staff, whom were doing the parade, were looking up open-mouthed, but the people who were looking up were to busy to notice that.



Before long, Santa Claus, who was riding through the starry sky of the holy night, was swiveling down as though going down through a spiraling staircase that was drawn midair. And then, the sleigh slowly approached the crowd.



The approaching sleigh made the crowd part naturally. The destination of that sleigh was a small Santa-san.



「Merry Christmas, my small compatriot young lady.」



The Santa Claus who got down from the sleigh had a face that was difficult to understand with his white beard and round glasses. He then kneeled in front of Myuu who was put down from Tio’s shoulder.



In response, Myuu blinked her eyes and responded.



「Papa, what are you doing nano?」



「…………………It’s not papa. It’s Santa.」



「Eh, but……」



「It’s Santa.」



「Pa――」



「It’s Saaan, taaa-」



「Ah, yes.」



Myuu nodded repeatedly at the Santa that felt a little desperate. She was an obedient and good child.



Santa nodded in satisfaction at Myuu while ignoring to the utmost Yue and the others whose shoulders were shaking. He then put the large white bag that was piled on the sleigh in front of Myuu.



「Now then, for you who have been a really good kid through this year, here is this present from Santa.」



「Present?」



To Myuu who tilted her head, Santa took out a box that was inlaid with sparkling stones that looked like lovely pink colored gems from his bag. That box was a feminine box that could be presented as a treasure box by itself.



The people who were surrounding them and watching over the development began thinking that this must be an event of the theme park were also going「Ooo」with warm expressions. A voice of a girl somewhere begging to her father「I want that」could be heard.



Amidst all that, Myuu who was receiving the lovely box asked pa――Santa if it was okay to open it with her gaze. Santa nodded.



When the lid was opened……



「Ah」



Myuu unintentionally raised her voice, but that expression which looked perplexed became colored with joy right away. That smile was like a flower bud that bloomed all at once, it was such a full and beautiful smile like a blooming flower.



The present that was inserted into that box was surely a girly present, something like a children’s accessory or a good of some cartoon character. Everyone was thinking along those lines.



But, what was taken out by Myuu was……



「It’s Donner and Schlag nanooo-!!!!」



A pair of handguns…….



People falling down were heard here and there, one after another. There was no doubt that they were people from Osaka (TN: Seems like the custom of falling on their butt from shock came from Osaka). Other people also made tsukkomis from their mouth. However, Myuu herself was swinging around the two handguns going「Finally, Myuu could have this nano!」while expressing great happiness.



The figure of a little girl Santa dancing boisterously from receiving as present during the holy night, a pair of handguns that she seemed to have been begging for previously, could be seen there.



「Young lady, those aren’t Donner-Schlag. They are “Donneer-Schlaag”.」



「Donneer-Schlaag?」



「Yes, Donneer-Schlaag.」



After Santa corrected Myuu like that, he further fished into his white present bag with rummaging sounds.



「Also this, “Pikko Piko Hammeeer”」



「Pikko Piko Hammeeer!!!」



「”This is Weapon Desu”.」



「This is Weapon De~su!」



「We also cannot forget this one, “Muuramasa” and――」



「Muuramasa!!」



「”Kotetsuu”.」



「Kotetsuuuuu!!」



Myuu’s tension was breaking through the heavens (TN: Reference to Gurren Lagann)! She hopped up and down and swung around the weapons she received heartily!



From there Myuu received even more presents. One was a gun belt and another was a present that was named as Yue-oneechan’s love. Myuu then said「Pa――Santa-san! Thank you nano! I, I, I love you nano!!」and leaped into Santa’s chest.



After that, at the other side of the crowd of the dumbfounded people, figures that seemed to be the security staff appeared. Santa, who confirmed the appearance of those staff, immediately boarded his sleigh, and then he snapped the reins and returned to the sky once more. In the middle this everyone was having a question of「Just how in the world it is flying?」while Santa then made his next move so that Myuu and others wouldn’t be bothered by the security.



「Merry Christmas.」



Saying such thing, a lot of parachutes were dropped from the sleigh. The absurd amount of parachutes that were raining down from the sky were all attached with Christmas presents. Obviously, there were presents consisting of toys or stuffed animals, and even some accessories or game systems. Every kind of present was raining down from the sky.



When the bewildered people heard an awfully clear voice that said「They are meager presents from the park. Please help yourself to it.」, they raised a joyful voice of「Waa!!」and rushed toward the parachutes. Because the people were pushing and jostling against each other, Yue nonchalantly supported them with magic so that no accident would happen.



By the way, the number of presents was obviously too many to be loaded on the sleigh, but everyone ignored that in their excitement. They were presents from Santa who was riding on a sleigh driven by lovely reindeer. The atmosphere of the place might’ve caused their mind to feel ‘who cares about the trivial things’.



Although, if they knew that those reindeer were actually mechanical Grim Reapers that were fully loaded with weaponry inside……surely they would panic without a doubt. In this world, there were some things that were better to not know.



The next day, it went without saying that the unprecedented theme park was grandly reported in the news. It also went without saying that the sophisticated production and the generous treat of presents raised the selling point of the park while the higher-ups were searching ‘just who was that Santa!’ with bloodshot eyes.



The really happy expression of the small princess of the Nagumo family also naturally made everyone in the family to writhe from her cuteness. However, her figure that was sleeping together with handguns and a war hammer, whip, and kodachi, while rubbing her cheek on them was……



He was the one who gave her those presents, but now papa Hajime was having a complicated worry of「Is this really fine, for my daughter?」.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Even though today is Christmas, Shirakome that is a villager of loneliness village suddenly got an idea and wrote this.



If you like, please read it together with a Christmas cake by yourself.



Shirakome had chocolate cake.





Chapter 188




AN: I posted a Christmas commemoration chapter a page back.



A group carrying assault rifles and wearing masks were rushing through an underground corridor in a dark building. The place they were heading toward was the place where the children who were taken as hostage were imprisoned. Their comrades who were going there went out of contact one after another, so understanding that something strange had happened to them, this group rushed to that place in a panic.



In total there were nearly twenty people in this armed group. One of them, who was running at the very back, heard a sound like something jumping in a room the group was passing by so he came to a stop reflexively. His other comrades were gradually rushing ahead, but the comrades nearby him also stopped running and looked at him questioningly.



He made a gesture that conveyed to his comrades how he had heard a sound come from inside the room, and just in case, he proposed to investigate inside. The men who came to a stop were six in total, they nodded to each other and left behind two people in the corridor as they passed through the opened steel door and stepped inside the room.



Immediately after, *kii* the door was making a sound while it automatically, no, a small hand that wasn’t noticed by anyone was quietly reaching down from the ceiling and closing the door.



One of the men who was left in the corridor spontaneously charged at the door while the other man tried to let out a warning voice, but just before that, gunshots echoed inside the room.



「Gah!?」「Guah」Pained voices could be heard as bullets that flew from the ceiling granted a severe impact to the two men who exposed the back of their head defenselessly. Their consciouses were instantly blown away. The remaining two men turned around and sprayed bullets at the door from where they entered, but there was no scream from the enemy that resounded inside the room.



In exchange,



*click*



A sinister sound resounded from behind them. The two men moved only their eyes to look at each other. Then matching their breathing they turned around all at once. There――



「Slow nano.」



Dangling upside down from the ceiling, with a pair of handguns――”Donneer-Schlaag” aimed at the forehead of the two men, was a figure of a little girl. The two men were about to spit out some swear words, but before they could do that, the girl――Myuu―― pulled the trigger. The heads of the two snapped backward grandly.



*gon* Their heads crashed on the door and interrupted the intrusion of the two remaining men that tried to enter inside for an instant. That instant was a fatal opening against the beloved daughter who had received the teaching of a monster gunner.



The moment the door opened with a force that knocked back the bodies of their comrades, the dry sound of *pan pan* resounded, and at the same time, the two men crumbled down.



……The figure that was dangling from the ceiling, who had lured the enemy into the room before shooting them down, while still in an upside down posture――was truly like the hit man Le○n! (TN: A character from a French movie, ‘Leon’.)



「Now, everyone, before those guys come back, we are going out nano.」



When Myuu called out to the corner of the room, right after that, the corner of the room where there should be nothing suddenly distorted and the figures of the children appeared. Every single one of them was holding a large cross in their palm. Those crosses were the artifact “Don’t Touch, You Pervert”, but as a supplementary function, they also had the concealment ability that made use of light reflection.



「He, hey, Myuu. Just now, how did you stand up on the ceiling?」



While moving, Natalia became unable to endure and asked that. To that Myuu answered with one word「Guts」. Natalia’s shoulders dropped while saying「At least I want you to say that it’s magic……」. Of course, the cause that Myuu could be like Leo○ wasn’t because of guts, but because of the “gravity stone” and “Air Force” inserted into her boots.



But, at that time, the sound of an explosion came from quite a distance away.



「Myuu-chan, just now……I think that came from around the place where we were at earlier.」



「Myu. Perhaps they got caught up in the trap that Myuu set up there and went pyuu nano. Their weapons are excellent, but those criminal-san’s movements are relatively rough.」



「Is, is that so……」



Emile’s cheeks cramped from knowing that it appeared that Myuu had even done something like that by taking into account the movement of the enemy while they hadn’t notice. Or rather, to listen to a ten-year-old girl finding fault in an armed group……it caused him to become bothered about Myuu’s true identity all the more.



Myuu beautifully used gun kata with twin gun art, war hammer art, whip art, and two sword art to thoroughly take care of the enemies she encountered while moving. The children were sending sparkling eyes at Myuu as though they were looking at a hero while following behind her. Finally, they discovered a door that had the word “EXIT” written on it.



It was a door that connected to the outside.



While the expression of Natalia and the others burst bright in joy, Myuu’s expression turned complicated instead. But, at the same time, she could hear the sound of a lot of footsteps from deep within the path they had just passed through, so while sighing deeply, she opened the door while telling Natalia and the others to hold onto the cross firmly.



There,



「So, you are the devil that slipped in among the children, huh.」



A masked group of nearly thirty people that was fully armed was lying in wait while aiming their rifle muzzles at the door. Natalia and the others screamed「Hii」when witnessing that.



Myuu didn’t answer the question of the man who seemed to be the leader of the armed group, instead, she ran her gaze around the surroundings. The place they came out to appeared to be a huge warehouse. If it was normal, there should be a lot of material put in each container that was placed in here.



The nose of Myuu who was a sea dweller race sensed the smell of salt, from there she understood that this place was adjacent with a harbor (she understood that from the beginning already though). Yes, this place was a warehouse district to deposit the luggage of cargo ships.



Right now they were in a warehouse that was jointly established with the management building at the corner of that district. However, inside that warehouse was quite a good amount of strict security. Not to mention the dozens of armed people, there were also a lot of heavy weapons and a lot of computers for the command room lined up. In addition to that, there were also things like an armored vehicle that was in the middle of being camouflaged and a vehicle that looked like an ice cream truck on the outside but it had a gatling gun and so on attached on the inside.



「Uu~n, from the weaponry and the hostage-taking, I have imagined that by some chance it might be like this but……as expected, you all are not mere kidnappers, but a terrorist group nano.」



「Just what the hell are you? A bodyguard prepared by the government?」



The terrorist leader was recalling a kid soldier of his own country in the back of his mind while speaking out his conjecture. Be that as it may, it was hard to believe the fact that a single girl like this was able to beat up his organization’s soldiers, and he was also concerned from where this girl got her weapon.



By all rights, this girl was an irregular existence, someone like Myuu whose identity they couldn’t confirm should be quickly killed, but her abnormality made this leader question her.



「Myuu’s smartphone, where is it nano?」



「……Answer my question.」



Even though it should be a checkmate with nearly thirty guns aimed at them, Myuu’s composed attitude didn’t break and she instead questioned back. This caused the leader’s voice to go lower.



「I want you to answer first nano. If you do that, then I’ll answer.」



「Do you think you are in the position where you can negotiate?」



Myuu’s way of speaking was retorted by the leader with the rise of one of his hands. Immediately, a gunshot resounded. One of his underlings had aimed at Natalia and fired. But, naturally, because Natalia’s hand was clutching “Don’t Touch, You Pervert”, the bullet was blocked by an invisible wall and stopped midair.



The terrorists became agitated and went noisy. Amidst all that, the leader was also looking in wonderment, but he then opened his mouth without losing his calm.



「……What is that? So America has even developed something like that.」



「Rather than that, where is the smartphone nano?」



The leader guessed that the cause of Myuu’s composure was because of that invinsible shield, however, in the back his mind a solution appeared immediately, that they could just directly take away the shield if a gun didn’t work. If they could steal that shield, it would be advantageous for their terrorist activities from here on. Thinking that he snickered in his heart.



Perhaps the leader felt whimsical from the composure that he had just obtained because he answered Myuu’s question by moving his gaze. The place where his gaze pointed was a corner of the simple command room where there were a lot of computers gathered. Most likely the smartphones of the other children were also there.



「So, who are you?」



This time the leader questioned her. Because he had taught Myuu the smartphone’s location, he felt that this time it was Myuu’s turn to answer. In response to that, Myuu was making an exasperated expression.



「There is no way I will answer nano. You must have something wrong in your head if you are accepting what your enemy said seriously like that nano.」



The leader was wearing a mask, but surely right now a vein was throbbing visibly on his forehead. Really, he wanted to see the face of the parent that was raising this girl.



「Are you thinking that because you have that shield that all of you are absolutely safe? Something like that can just be wrestled off directly and taken away, and that’s it. I thought that you were someone that had received special training, but you cannot even make a proper situation assessment. Did I overestimate you? Or else, are you thinking that you can do something against this number of people with those tiny guns or those primitive weapons?」



「……」



The hand of the leader rose quietly. A man at his side guessed what the leader wanted and whispered something into a wireless earpiece, and then another group of armed men with more than ten people appeared from the door behind them. In addition to that, a group of thirty men flooded in from outside the warehouse and surrounded Myuu and the children.



「Don’t take up our time too much. We are going to be busy with our operation after this. There are still more than fifty men outside. There is no place for you all to escape. Go back to your prison obediently. Perhaps you kids will be able to return home alive depending on your parents’ attitude, you know?」



The leader slapped the children with despair. He showed them the overwhelming difference in battle strength and also dangled a slight hope in front of their eyes. Natalia clutched tightly to the sleeve of Myuu’s clothes. The other children were also snuggling Myuu with scared expressions.



Myuu looked over her shoulder to them while showing a smile that had not even a speck of despair. It was a fearless smile that would make anyone gulp. Her canine was exposed, her eyes were glaring with fierce atrocity, and her back was straight and imposing.



Myuu turned to the leader again, then stored “Donneer-Schlaag” in their holsters.



「That’s right, that’s how you――」



「Difference of strength? That’s too much even for a misunderstanding.」



The leader took a step forward thinking that Myuu had resigned herself, but his step reflexively stopped from Myuu’s words that interrupted his own words. At the same time, he saw the figure of Myuu quietly rising her hand straight up.



And then, the crimson jewel that was fixed on the ring finger of that left hand was beginning to shine for some reason. Noticing that, the leader gazed in astonishment.



Myuu fearlessly grinned while resounding her words boldly.



「Since when were you under the delusion that Myuu is alone?」



「Wh, at?」



Right after that, a crimson light burst out. The terrorists who pulled their triggers spontaneously witnessed it. The bullets they fired were blocked, not by an invisible shield, but by a physical obstruction.



Six metallic arms. Multiple legs like a spider. On the back, and on the front, were multiple weapons that looked brutal even from just a glance. Stylish heads, and eyes that suddenly flashed! Strange looking warriors with a metallic composition――there were seven of them.



Walling in Myuu and the children, those bodies that boasted the greatest hardness blocked all the bullets, yes, they were……



――Grave Sin Squadron Demon Rangeeeerrr!!!!



*DOPAAN!* Out of nowhere smoke screens of seven colors exploded, and the seven living golems took cool poses as they pleased.



Dumbfounded amazement.



Without distinction of enemy or ally, all the humans stiffened.



‘Because, this is impossible mon!’ It felt like such a tsukkomi of someone that had retrogressed into an infant could be heard from somewhere.



「If you want to stop Myuu, then at least prepare apostles of god in double digit numbers before speaking, nano.」



「Wwha-, wha-」



Myuu smiled fearlessly at the agitated leader while giving her order.



「Everyoneee~, kill them nano!」



“Aye aye, Ma’am–!!” As though saying something like that, the demon rangers saluted smartly with adoration, then in the next moment, *gashun* their weapons deployed with mechanical sounds.



The curbstomp began on the terrorist who was threatening their princess.



The two gatling guns that were attached to one body turned everything inside the warehouse into mere trash while the small missile pods attached on the shoulders rained down missiles like a meteor shower and turned the area into a sea of crimson all the way until it reached the outside of the warehouse.



Rushing around freely with high-speed movements as though they were gliding using the rollerblades attached on their multiple legs, the portable Acht Acht as their back weapon and the super electromagnetic cannon fired. The opponents who carried explosives launched suicide attacks with the resolve to explode themselves were instantly cut into pieces using the laser blade attached on their two arms and many legs. The person who tried to use the heavy weapon loaded on the camouflaged truck was pulverized and sent flying together with the truck body by the giant stake “Pile Bunker” fired by a Demon Ranger who showed a jump that didn’t suit its large body.



「Impossible, America has created even this kind of weapon-」



(I think, that’s absolutely not it……)



When the terrorist leader yelled that loudly while desperately commanding his comrades to fight back, Emile-kun whose father was actually a US army lieutenant general showed a dry smile while making such a retort inside his heart.



「It’s that brat-, kill that brat! They should stop if she is dead!」



“Lucifeeer” and “Mamon” and “Leviatan” were already rampaging outside the warehouse, screams and explosions echoed from outside. The leader who survived obstinately amidst all that glared at Myuu like a demon while shouldering a rocket launcher.



In response to that, Myuu took one of the jewels that were fitted on the gun belt on her waist. It was a jewel that shined yellow like a topaz. But, inside that bullet sized jewel, some kind of geometrical pattern――a magic circle was carved in.



Myuu held that jewel using her index and middle fingers, and thrust it toward the terrorist leader, as though to oppose the rocket launcher.



She then spun toward the leader while using the power of words to cause a supernatural phenomenon.



「Order(Myuu commands)! Syvil Aul Tonitors(Get shocked by the golden lizard)!!」



In the next moment, the topaz emitted a golden radiance, and then in a flash that light emitted an enormous spark while taking the shape of a huge dragon.



「Ah? Ha? Eh?」



While coiling above the head of the princess who had summoned itself, the dragon that was clad in golden lightning――the “Thunder Dragon”―― glared fiercely at the leader who was leaking out idiotic sounds. Right after that, the dragon raised an intense lightning roar.



「NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-」



The leader raised a scream like a girl and tried to escape, but there was no way someone could escape the thunder dragon using human legs. The surrounding underlings were also dragged into the roar and the dragon’s mouth snapped them up.



――Myuu’s exclusive use jewel type magic invocation artifact “Yue-oneechan’s Love”



This artifact would react to Myuu’s soul and power of words. Where she would then be able to use the magic that Yue sealed into the specific jewel (one time use). The colorful jewels fitted into the gun belt in place of bullets were each charged by Yue’s handmade magic, and only Myuu could invoke them.



It was just like the magecraft that was used by a certain careless family some…… something like that surely couldn’t be said. Before, when Myuu was watching a certain anime, she was saying「Jewel magecraft is really cool nano. But, Yue-oneechan’s magic is more amazing nano」. Even though this artifact was the result of Yue’s affection that gushed out when she heard what Myuu said, if it was said that there was no connection with that then there was no connection!



「Myu-myu-myu-myu, Myuu! Just now! Just noww! Ma, magic, magiicc!」



Natalia was getting all flustered while asking for confirmation that ‘as expected, Myuu is a magician!’ with inarticulate words.



「Uh huh, that’s “Yue-oneechan’s Love” nano.」



「Eh? No, that was magic, wasn’t it?」



「Uh huh, that’s “Yue-oneechan’s Love” nano.」



「Eh? Huh? Love? No, but magic……」



「As expected, that’s “Yue-oneechan’s Love” nano.」



「……」



Natalia’s mind was in chaos! It seemed, that after guts, next Myuu was causing a supernatural phenomenon with love! ‘Geez, isn’t it fine already even if you confess that it’s magic!’ Natalia shouted in her heart.



A hand was put gently on the shoulder of Natalia. When Natalia looked back, there was the youth Emile beside her who spoke「Isn’t it fine, love」with an enlightened expression. The capacity of the youth Emile seemed to have met its permitted limit since long ago. It felt like he could accept whatever was spoken or did as it was if it was by Myuu. For the time being, Natalia shut up Emile with her fist.



The screams of the terrorists stopped less than five minutes after that.



Myuu left the liberation of the children who were imprisoned at another room to the Demon Rangers and she headed to the command room. There, she discovered her normal smartphone and sighed in relieve.



「Hey, Myuu-chan. This is……」



「Nmyu?」



The youth Emile was taking back his own smartphone while looking at the PC’s display which he pointed at Myuu. The PC was mostly broken, so what was projected in that display was only an image that stayed frozen but, what was reflected there, was the scene of a destroyed airport somewhere and a smoking stadium.



It appeared the terrorists not only did the kidnapping this time, but they also performed terrorist activities at other places somewhere.



Myuu nodded with「Fumu」and walked away *tote tote* briskly, and then she stood still beside the leader who was charred black while smoking up, though it seemed that the man was still barely breathing.



While Natalia and the others were watching over Myuu wondering what she was going to do, toward the leader who was lying upside down unmoving, Myuu……kicked his crotch.



「Ohooo!?」



「Quickly wake up nano.」



Leader-san opened his eyes while raising a queer shriek. He was writhing and rolling on the ground while pressing on his crotch. Myuu called “Satan” to pinion the arms of the leader to stop him from moving around. That figure who was limply restrained with his arms spread wide, looked as though he was being crucified.



「Yo, you, bast――」



「Don’t talk as you please, nano.」



Saying that, Myuu once more launched a splendid yakuza kick at the crotch of leader-san.「Hahiiiiii」leader-san raised a queer shriek once more from that. With the young Emile as the first, the other boys were also turning pale with their hands pressing on their own crotch while standing pigeon-toed.



「The thing that is happening right now. Your plan, your objective this time, spit out everything nano.」



「Who, who will――」



Myuu suddenly took some distance with brisk steps, then she took out the black whip “This is Weapon Desu” into her hand. And then, *hyun hyun* she made the whip move in a spiral around her that caused the sound of cutting air.



「I want you to talk nano.」



「Su, such, th, threat won――aa―――!!?」



As expected, the crotch of leader-san who was refusing Myuu’s demand while turning pale was whipped hard by the tip of the whip that was swung fiercely along with *hyun* the sound of cutting air. Leader-san who was shrieking, and the paling boys, and the girls who were staring fixedly *jii* at the event’s development from between the gaps of their fingers that were covering their face.



「Now now, quickly speak nano! If you won’t, then your son’s life will be gone nano!」



「Thi, this, DEMON girl-――Aa――――!!!」



「Riight, leeft, riight, leeft, nanoo!」



「Stoopp-, don’t lay your hand on my son anymoreee-」



「Until, you talk-, the whip-, won’t stop nanoo-」



「NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-」



「Ora ora ora ora ora ora ora ora ora ora ora-, nano-」



*pan- pan- bishiiii, bashi bashi supaaaaa-*, the whip became a black storm, however, with a superb strength management, “This is Weapon Desu” was torturing leader-san’s son. To left and then to the right, the son was tormented with hellish torture as though it was receiving Dempsey Roll!



The figure of a male terrorist shrieking from getting his crotch whipped hard by a ten-year-old beautiful girl was right there.



Before long, everything of the large-scale terror plan this time was spoken by the leader who was weeping his eyes out *hics hics* while pressing on his crotch with his body rounding up like a turtle. Myuu, who listened to him, then stored away “This is Weapon Desu” and walked toward the leader.



「I, I beg you. I’ve, talk already……that’s why, please――」



Leader-san was earnestly entreating. The brutal haki that he displayed at first couldn’t be felt in the slightest anymore. Toward such a frail leader-san, Myuu smiled sweetly like a fairy. Leader-san, and also Emile and the others, were forming a smile that was colored with relief thinking that Myuu’s forgiveness would be given……



「You can become a manly woman nano.」



「Wai-, do-, AAa――――――!!」



A single gunshot roared. On this day, leader-san’s son was called to heaven.



Blowing ‘fuh’ at the smoking gun muzzle, Myuu then turned on her heels while leaving a backward glance at the leader who didn’t even twitch anymore. It caused the boys to curl themselves thinking「That’s just too merciless」 while Natalia and the other girls were sending Myuu heated gazes with red cheeks thinking「Myuu, how lovely……」.



Myuu who returned back to those children then took out her smartphone.



「Myuu, what are we going to do?」



「Tha, that’s right. Terrorism is happening here and there, isn’t it? Quickly, we have to inform this.」



Natalia and Emile talked to Myuu, telling her that they had to inform their fathers what was happening right now to the government.



「Nn. That’s also good, but I think that surely they won’t be able to do anything about the places that have been blown up already, or the plane that is being hijacked right now, or all those besieged soldier-sans that are stationed at that foreign country nano. If it’s normal.」



Indeed, it was just as Myuu said, the current situation was grave. There were already several airports and stadiums that were blown up, there were also several planes that were being hijacked. Near the coast, there was a ship loaded with missiles anchored where it would soon fire toward the city while the army that was being stationed at the country of the terrorists were currently even now being besieged and annihilated in an isolated situation.



In addition, the terrorists had another base other than this base. There were a lot of hostages that were being imprisoned there too, and it appeared that even an attack targeting the president was being carried out right now. It seemed that the president was attacked when he was in the middle of returning to the White House from his outdoor official business in order to deal with these terrorism cases.



Like this, it would surely be impossible to resolve everything without any problems. It was easily imaginable that from here on too, within a few hours, there would be a tremendous amount of damage that occurred.



Yes, it was just like Myuu said, that was if it was normally.



Natalia and the other children were showing anxious expressions, however, Myuu was ahem-ing proudly while puffing out her chest before making a declaration with a voice that was filled with absolute confidence and trust.



*jiririririri*, A ringtone of a black rotary-dial telephone ringing was reverberating in the living room of the Nagumo household.



「Hm? Is that from Myuu? I guess right now is about time that the party is over huh.」



The receiving phone was Hajime’s smartphone. Hajime was smiling warmly by recalling his beloved daughter going out in high spirits all dressed up while taking his smartphone into his hand.



「Ou, Myuu. Is it the time to pick you――」



『Papaa! Right now, it seems that the world is in a pinch, so I want help nano!』



「……Yes?」



The first sentence of his daughter’s that came out from the smartphone caused Hajime to spontaneously leak out an idiotic sounding voice. Yue, Shia, Tio, Remia, Kaori, Shizuku, Aiko, Liliana, Shuu, and then Sumire who were relaxing in the living room went「Oh?」and directed their attention to the conversation. Hajime turned the voice to speaker mode and then he asked just what she meant.



『Uu~n, see, when Myuu arrived at the party I was then kidnapped by terrorists. At the place where Myuu was kidnapped, Myuu acted rashly. As the result of Myuu having a talk with terrorist-san’s son, it turned out that the world is in a pinch. Right now that’s how it is nano.』



「I see, I can understand……not-! Just what were you doing that it became something like that……」



『Because Myuu is papa’s daughter nano.』



「「「「「「「「「「I see, I get it.」」」」」」」」」」」



Yue and others nodded deeply at Myuu’s words. While staring at them all with reproachful eyes, Hajime changed his expression quietly.



「So? What do you want papa to do? I don’t really get it, but Myuu had annihilated the kidnappers. right? Of course, I’ll cover it up, but where do you want papa, papa and everyone else to go and what do you want us to do?」



『Ehehe~, as expected from Myuu’s papa nano. Myuu loves papa nano.』



Myuu hadn’t given any satisfactory explanation, but Hajime comprehended only the important points and left behind the trivial circumstances while asking for Myuu’s wish. Hearing that Myuu replied in a joyful voice. Since Myuu was an infant she had been straight with her expressions of love like this, but recently, perhaps it was just Hajime’s feeling, it felt like there was a charm that was excessively filled into her voice.



When Hajime took a glance at “all the onee-san”, for some reason, all of them gave him a thumbs up at once. Hajime could only smile faintly.



After that, Hajime used the compass and determined the locations of terrorism that were currently happening. He left the house sitting to Sumire and the others before using the crystal key to teleport to the locations all over the world.



Although it was unintentional, the terrorists had kidnapped Myuu and intended to publicly execute her important friend. The wish of his beloved daughter was to help with that……



For Hajime, the ideal or the sense of value or the objective of the terrorist organization was already something of no concern to him.



The one who indiscriminately scattered tragedy was them the terrorists. For the daughter of a monster to be included amongst those tragedies, it caused them to be exposed to irrationality because it was nothing more than reaping what they sowed.



And that would be proved to them within a few hours after this.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



This became the last update by the end of the year.



Throughout this year, there were various things, like the publication or the completion of the main story.



The real life is always like real lifee, and the work is always seriously like workk, but thanks to Narou, and thanks of being able to have fun with all of your readers too, there is no doubt that it has been a fun year.



Narou-san, thank you very much!



Thank you very much to everyone who comes here to read too!



Have a good new year!



And then, please take care of me next year too!





Chapter 189




AN: Happy New Year.



I somehow wrote this chapter in the middle of the leisurely atmosphere of New Year’s morning while being buried inside a kotatsu.



Recently, Yue’s component was few so……



If you like, please read it leisurely.



*hou hou* White puffs of breath dissolved into air. The cold air of mid-winter pierced the skin keenly, dyeing the nose tip and ears of the people, who come and go, red. The fallen snow making the sounds *shak shak* when being stepped on and the icicles hanging down from the eaves of the buildings caused the people to feel the cold atmosphere of the few hours before the end of the year.



Although, if it was asked whether that coldness was also freezing the heart of the people who were coming and going through this place, then the answer would be no.



This place was a famous hot spring district. It was a tourist attraction that was colored with orange lighting and the white vapor of natural hot springs. Therefore, the people who were coming and going through the streets that were lined with street stalls and souvenir shops were mostly families or lovers who wished to welcome the end of the year in relaxation at this hot spring district.



No matter how low the temperature became, these people who were snuggling close to each other wouldn’t feel any coldness in their heart. When they came back to their inn, they could even warm their body in the hot spring.



Among those tourists, there were the figures of a pair, a male and a female.



「Yue, you don’t feel cold? If it’s necessary I’ll take out an artifact, you know?」



「……Nn. I’m fine. Winter is a time of cold. It’s fine too to feel this cold air.」



「I see. Yeah, I guess so.」



A pair of lovers closely snuggling with each other――it was Hajime and Yue.



Hajime was wearing a moss coat with fluffy fur attached to the collar while Yue was wearing a cute duffle coat that was cream colored. Hajime and Yue were putting their hands inside their pockets and walking through the main street of the hot spring district at their leisure. By the way, the pocket that one of Yue’s hands was entering was Hajime’s pocket, naturally, their fingers were entangled closely inside that pocket.



「……Is this fine with Shia and the others?」



「It’s fine to be only the two of us like this occasionally. Or else, is it better if it’s with everyone?」



Hajime shrugged his shoulders and answered like that toward Yue who was looking upward at him with her head tilted slightly. He strongly gripped the hand of Yue inside his pocket. He saw from the side that Yue’s cheek, which was facing down, was faintly colored scarlet.



There was no need for an answer. That gesture of Yue’s displayed her answer more eloquently than words. There was no way Hajime wouldn’t be able to comprehend Yue’s wordless answer, so their hands inside the pocket were tightly closing on each other’s.



By the way, all members of the Nagumo family came to this hot spring district. Unfortunately, Shizuku had a gathering with her family with all the disciples of the Yaegashi dojo that was a custom every year. Kaori’s father was crying『Don’t go, my angel!』while clinging to Kaori, so she could only see off Hajime and the others tearfully without being able to participate this time.



In the afternoon the Nagumo family finished their sightseeing and entered the inn, then Sumire commanded ‘charge the hot spriiing!’ every one of the Nagumo family. Hajime used that chance to activate presence isolation at full power and secretly abducted Yue, and like this, the two of them were enjoying their only time alone after so long.



Currently, Shia and the others who had noticed the fade out of Hajime and Yue were thinking「Well, perhaps it’s fine occasionally~」while they were turning boneless from the magic of hot springs. Of course, they intended to ask for compensation from Hajime later on.



「Oh, hot spring egg. You want to eat that?」



「……Nn? Soft boiled egg?」



「No, it’s a bit different from soft boiled eggs. Its white egg part is also soft boiled. Well, it doesn’t really sound like a big deal, but it’s a standard good of a hot spring district.」



「I’ll eat♪」



Yue instantly answered. Yue was sensitive and also weak to things that were “standard” on earth. Her feelings of wanting to know about Hajime’s world even, just for a bit more, was making her to naturally lean toward that direction.



「……Hot spring egg, two of them. Please.」



The male worker of the stall petrified from seeing the soft smile of Yue who was humming cheerfully at the purchase of the hot spring eggs. There was no need to even mention the reason why he petrified. Currently, the two of them were more or less using magic to obstruct the recognition of other people, so the usual mass production of petrified people and people picking a fight that normally happened when they were walking didn’t happen anymore. But, as expected, when they were the one who was starting the conversation like this, that magic effect would get fainter, in addition to seeing that smile of Yue from really close range.



While smiling wryly, Hajime lightly emitted “Pressure” that he had fine-tuned. The male worker returned to his senses with a ‘hah’, and then with a bright red face, which looked like a boiled shrimp, he handed over two small cups and two hot spring eggs in a hurry. It seemed they could choose whether to crack the egg themselves or made the worker crack the egg for them, but Yue chose the option of doing it herself.



They moved near the trash box where they could throw away the eggshell, and there Yue tried to crack the hot spring egg on the cup that Hajime was holding with her fingertips trembling. Her expression was absurdly serious. Her spirit conveyed that she wouldn’t let even a single fragment of the shell fall off. The expression of Hajime, which was watching Yue, was actually looking warm.



「……Nn-. ……Jiggle jiggle.」



Yue stared fixedly at the hot spring egg that jiggled when it fell in the cup with a splat. Then Yue guided Hajime’s hand and made him present in front of her eyes the cup that he was holding on his other hand. It appeared that Yue would also crack the egg that was Hajime’s share for him.



Yue was staring at the hot spring egg challengingly with a seriousness that was even greater than previously. Hajime’s expression was increasingly slackening watching that.



「Nn-. The egg is splendidly cracked.」



「Thank you for the delicious material.」(TN: I don’t know what joke material Hajime is referring to here.)



Both of them cracked jokes at each other and then chuckled, then they ate the hot spring eggs with small spoons.



「……It’s syrupy. Also it’s really, thick.」



「Isn’t it. Looks like they are using an egg that is relatively good compared to its prices. If salt is sprinkled on this, then perhaps the taste will be locked and become tastier.」



Hajime immediately took out salt made from another world from “Treasure Warehouse” and sprinkled it on the egg. As the result, the expression of Hajime and Yue clearly turned into broad smiles.



The two of them looked satisfied after finishing eating, but when Hajime saw Yue, he slipped out a chuckle. Yue tilted her head slightly.



「At the corner of your mouth, there is egg yolk left.」



「……Embarrassing.」



Yue tried to wipe off the egg yolk with reddened cheeks, but Hajime’s fingertip stretched faster than her. His index fingertip softly crept on Yue’s lips. 「Nnu」For some reason Yue leaked out a captivating voice and before Hajime’s finger could deal with the leftover egg yolk, that fingertip got nibbled with a snap.



The soft and warm sensation of a licking tongue on his fingertip caused Hajime to look troubled. Graphic sounds *chupa chupa* even began to be audible, so Hajime forcefully pulled out his finger.



「Muu, even though it was delicious……」



「Bear in mind about the TPO(time, place, occasion). We are smack dab in the middle of the hot spring district, on New Year’s Eve. I don’t want my lover to become an erotic terrorist in that kind of place. There are already victims over there, you know?」



When Hajime turned his gaze, there the worker-san of the hot spring egg stall before this, and the couples who were similarly enjoying hot spring eggs like Hajime and Yue nearby, were all simultaneously averting their eyes. While the male camp was strangely crouching a bit forward.



「……I’m sorry. Looks like I got too high spirited in this date with just the two of us after so long. 」



「Those were really joyful words. Anyway, let’s move on. Let’s look around leisurely while eating. It’s New Year’s Eve after all, so there are a lot of stalls. Also, it looks like there will be fireworks matching with the countdown at the riverside ahead, surely we will be able to have fun there.」



「Nn-. ……Ah, but, the end of the year is――」



「Together with everyone, right? I got it. I will take Yue around only until before the countdown. As expected, if we neglected them alone until the change of the year, then Shia and the others would snap.」



Hajime shrugged, but he had already resolved himself to give compensation to Shia and the others. This was also the so-called duty of a real harem man. ……Though if other people were asked of their opinion about this kind of resolve that would make anyone speechless, then it felt like they would say things like『Get stabbed a hundred times over』or『How about you try dying for once?』.



The two of them began to walk around the hot spring district leisurely once more.



For a bit they fed each other ‘aa~n’ with the foods of the stalls, relaxing in a footbath while snuggling closely to each other, taking commemoration pictures at places they got attracted to……Each time they were mass producing merlion that was spitting out sugar even while not particularly doing anything special, they were really passing their time leisurely.



And then, when it was about one hour before the changing of the year, both of them finally arrived at a bridge where they could have a good view of the fireworks. It was an arching wooden bridge with a romantic appearance. Its handrail was colored scarlet and it was maintained really well.



Yue was settled in Hajime’s bosom snugly with her back leaning on Hajime’s chest. Hajime’s hands were reversely put into Yue’s pockets this time, and then like it was only natural, their fingers entwined with each other inside.



「This is our first New Year’s Eve since coming to this world huh, Yue. So what do you think, not even a year has passed but this is more or less a turning point. Do you think you can get used to it in this world?」



「……? Getting used to or whatever, any place where Hajime is is the place where I belong. That is the best place for me. I have no feeling other than happiness here.」



「Aa~, that’s not what I mean.」



Hajime’s expression turned itchy from Yue’s words, then he placed his chin on Yue’s head and rubbed his chin there. While listening to Yue chuckling from feeling ticklish he asked again his question with the intention of asking whether she was simply forcing herself or not from the changed environment or if she felt any inconvenience.



「……Nn~. Not particularly. Regarding the returnees, the society is still in an uproar. It feels inconvenient in that kind of meaning, but everyone is also feeling it similarly. The prospect of resolving it can be seen, so it doesn’t feel like a problem. Rather than that, there are a lot of things here that don’t exist in the world over there, so there are a lot of times where I have fun.」



「I see. I’m glad hearing that. After all, I don’t want Yue to feel stressed or anything. It is the world that is bad if it causes you any stress. If you feel any inconvenience then I’ll reform it no matter what method I have to use, so just tell me anything without holding back, okay?」



「……Fufu. I won’t hold back at all toward Hajime. The time you are changing the world, let’s do it together?」



Maou and vampire princess was making terrifying talk nonchalantly. At this moment, surely world-san was feeling a chill and twitched without a doubt.



Time was flowing away gently for a while without any words. The stream of the small river, the snow that beautifully colored the blackness of the night sky, and the clear air were felt by the two of them. There were also other people in the surrounding, but it was like only the area around the two of them was a separate world that was cut off from everything else. Solemn and silent, sweet and warm, it was such a world.



But, at that time, from afar「Yue-san yaa~I, Hajime-san yaa~i」「Papa-san yaa~I, onee-chan-san yaa~i」, familiar voices that sounded a bit theatrical could be heard. Hajime shrugged「Looks like time’s up」toward Yue who was looking up at him from his chest.



While the two were like that, *pata pata* sounds of footsteps resounded. Shia, who was giving a ride to Myuu on her shoulders, was rushing toward the two of them while she was waving her hands around together with Myuu. From behind those two, Hajime and Yue could see Shuu, Sumire, Tio, and Remia walking toward here.



「I found you nano, phantom thief papa. Obediently get handcuffed nano!」



The moment Shia arrived at Hajime’s side, above Shia, Myuu pointed sharply while saying such a thing. That dramatic gesture of his beloved daughter caused Hajime to chuckle while tilting his head.



「Phantom thief papa? Just what are you accusing me of stealing?」



This time it was Shia who answered. Her finger pointed sharply just like Myuu.



「Phantom thief maou. You have stolen something really enormous. Yes, that is my Yue-san desu!」



「Yue, you, since when did you belong to Shia?」



「Since around a hundred million and two thousand years ago?」



「Thank you for the lovely material.」



As expected the whole Nagumo family was smeared with material. Shia and Myuu were bulging their cheeks while pleading that this time they wanted to be the one kidnapped.



「Oi oi, calling me kidnapper and so on, that sounds bad in people’s ear, you know. You don’t think that Yue was slipping out voluntarily with me?」



Hajime seriously in all seriousness used his presence isolation in full throttle and full power, he instantly carried Yue and escaped. Shia and the others should be unable to reject the possibility that Hajime and Yue were slipping away as accomplices. Hajime was thinking like that and asked with a mischievous expression, but Shia was looking blankly at Hajime.



「He? Because Hajime-san, didn’t you erase your presence, then carry Yue-san under your arm and jump out the window?」



「You, don’t you notice the contradiction in your own words? Even though you understand that I vanished, just how were you able to grasp the detail until that much?」



「About that, like this, it just suddenly came into my rabbit ears. The rest was by me confirming it myself with a sidelong glance, I think. Even though Hajime-san was fast but it wasn’t as fast as a railgun anyway, so it’s possible to confirm your escape using eyesight.」



「……Is that so. You are a bug character……」



Hajime was plainly feeling down from his super high-speed secret action that he performed with his all getting detected normally like that. And then, he recalled how at their recent training so that their skills wouldn’t dull, Shia was casually evading electromagnetically accelerated bullets with normal eyesight. Hajime once more sent Shia an exasperated gaze due to that bug character behavior.



Without change Hajime didn’t let go of Yue from his bosom, Myuu was clambering up on Hajime’s back and secured her designated place on Hajime’s shoulder, then Tio and the others who caught up snuggled close to Hajime. Shuu, who was looking forward to the naked socializing with his son after so long, sent a sulky gaze at Hajime who was feigning ignorance while Sumire was cackling from witnessing that. During all that the countdown to the New Year was finally beginning.



Facing the beginning of a new year, the vapor of the hot spring district was rising high.



Hajime and the others also let out their voices for counting down the seconds. This was the first New Year for the group members that originated from another world. Each second Myuu’s feet went taut, her toes were tensing straight while she was showing a wide smile, Shia was equipping the artifact of recognition disturbance while the illusion hiding her rabbit ears went off, showing her rabbit ears jumping around *myon myon*. Tio was looking up to the sky with a deeply moved expression and Remia was smiling from watching over her beloved daughter’s high spirit. Shuu and Sumire quietly linked their hands together and snuggled on each other watching over their son and daughters-in-law that were like that.



A beat later, the countdown reached zero.



「「「「「Happy Neeeeww Year!!!」」」」」



At the hot spring district, the yell of the people celebrating the new year reverberated. In the next moment, in the night sky of the hot spring district, *dodon* flowers of light bloomed along with reverberations that shook the bottom of one’s stomach.



「Papa, happy New Year! Nano!」



「Ou, happy New Year Myuu.」



Myuu tightly hugged Hajime’s head while saying that, and hearing that Hajime ruffled Myuu’s head with one hand while returning the congratulations.



「Very happy New Year, dear. From here on too, please take care of me along with my daughter, okay?」



「Yeah. Happy New Year Remia. Take care of me this year too.」



Remia gently touched her hand on Hajime’s back while sending those words to Hajime along with a calm smile, then Hajime also looked across his shoulder and replied to her calmly.



「Goshujin-sama. This year too I beg thou for a lot of puni――ehem, a lot of rewards.」



「Don’t try to varnish it over, you pervert. Later I’ll promptly give you the first punishment of this year, so prepare yourself.」



The pervert was shuddering all over.



「Happpy~ Nee~w Yeea~ar desu. Hajime-san. Let’s enjoy this year too, a lot, okay!」



「Looking at the result, you who in a sense is the one with the straightest common sense has helped with a lot since we returned to this world. Thanks. This year, I’ll take you to a lot of fun places more for sure.」



Hajime’s words caused Shia’s rabbit ears to happily flap up and down.



「Hajime, this year too you have perpetrated various things, but just spare me from you disappearing all of a sudden anymore, okay?」



「Right right. It’s fine for you to go anywhere, but at that time take us along too with you. Especially when you are going to Tortus okay! Okay! Over there is a treasure box of material! No need to even mention every one of the Hauria clan, but even Gahard-san is unexpectedly a material character isn’t he. Especially when he is in front of Hajime and Shizuku-chan. I want to meet him again~」



「Tou-san, I got it already. Also, Kaa-san. Stop toying with Gahart. Spare me from an aged middle-aged man clinging on me tearfully.」



Shuu was sending a gaze that was a mix of worry and anticipation, while at his side Sumire was speaking of something terrifying. The emperor of the empire seemed to be fated to getting thoroughly embarrassed by the whole Nagumo family. Already, once when Hajime went to Tortus while taking along Shuu and Sumire, it had become a famous story of how Gahart became a shut-in due to Sumire’s persistent and tricky interview with him.



「……Hajime.」



Yue who was at Hajime’s bosom looked up while calling on Hajime who was exchanging words with everyone. When Hajime turned his gaze to her, Yue’s eyes stared fixedly at him. It was as though she was ascertaining something. As though she was thinking of something. Her eyes were like a movie film, it was as though memories were streaming in succession inside.



Before long, Yue returned her gaze to the fireworks. Then with a calm and mysterious voice, with the sound of the fireworks smoothly fading, she formed her words.



「……It might be too late for saying this, but it’s somehow strange.」



「What is?」



「……Nn. At the bottom of the abyss, the journey with the resolve to turn the world into an enemy began. But, when I noticed, there were a lot of important people around me while I am celebrating a new year in a different world like this staring at the flowers of the night sky.」



「That’s right isn’t it.」



「……Seeing objectively, the bitter time in my life is overwhelmingly a lot. Getting saved by Hajime, meeting with everyone, knowing about the truth of Ojii-sama, and also spending time with my new family like this, looking at it from the entirety, all of those are equal to a blink of an eye. Like a dream.」



「……」



「……But, my feeling is the reverse. It feels like the long nightmare vanished instantly like a bubble, and like this, I am enveloped in happiness, as though this is how it has been all along.」



Hajime strongly embraced his lover inside his arms, who was mysteriously colored with the illumination of fireworks light.



Yue’s gaze, which was surely staring at somewhere different inside herself even while it was reflecting the fireworks, returned to Hajime once more.



「……The world is unreasonable, irrational, and absurdly malicious. But, surely at times, it will give a considerate arrangement to those who do their best. Meeting with Hajime, I came to think like that.」



「I see. ……I guess so. Surely, it’s just like you say. No matter what happens, if you struggle, then surely, anyone is able to reach this kind of place in due course.」



「Nn-」



Hajime softly dropped a kiss on the forehead of Yue who was looking up at him. Yue’s expression melted limply.



Even on earth, there was still a mountain of troubles. And surely in this new year, there would be a new unreasonable, irrational, and malicious fate lying in wait for them.



But, surely, the world would show its kindness to those who struggled. Yes, they believed in that, whether Hajime or Yue.



Yue was feeling the heat on her forehead while running her gaze toward Shia and the others too. And then, toward the family who responded to her gaze, toward her beloved people, Yue showed them her greatest smile and gifted them her words.



「……Thank you for everything. Please take care of me from here on too.」



AN: All of your honored readers, Narou-sama, and everyone else thank you very much for everything last year. Please take care of me this year too.





Chapter 190




AN: Update even at 6 P.M. on New Year’s Day……is nice isn’t ittt.



In a room of a certain building, the fierce sound of a gunshot reverberated. A man past his middle-ages with ruffled silver-gray hair was confirming his smartphone with an expression as though he had bitten something bitter.



「No good. As expected, there is interference. What about the others?」



「No, it’s no good. The transmission device is also not reacting.」



「Mine too……President.」



A black person clad in a black suit holding a hand gun shook his head while answering. It was as he said, the man with silver-gray hair was the President of America. He received a terrorist attack on the upper level of a skyscraper where he was undergoing some concealed official business, and he somehow managed to escape and survive thanks to the do-or-die spirit of the secret services.



However, they were unable to escape from the building itself, their communication was also being interfered with, and like this, they were hiding in one of the rooms. Although, their opponent was a few dozen terrorists that were fully armed. In this situation where they were unable to expect reinforcements, it was clear that it was only a matter of time until their fate ran its due course.



The President――Artold Schwarnenegger, could feel the sound of the god of death creeping up gradually from behind him.



「……The existence of the person who leaked out the information needs to be dealt with, but it looks like our lives will run out first before that, huh.」



「Something like that……」



「But, we ran out of bullets already, right? You all have done well. George, Chris, Bacchus, Keyes, Neil, Hank……you all have protected me well until now. It’s an honor for me that I can fight together with all of you at the end.」



「President……no, we are the ones who are honored.」



The President smiled calmly while holding out one of his hand. The male secret service which was called George, instead of a handshake, he handed over his spare gun. It was because the gaze of Artold was demanding that.



It was exactly as he said; he was planning to fight until the very end. He was a former commando even with his age that was nearing fifty-years-old but seeing his body that was still clad in muscles that looked like armor; he wouldn’t drag the others down. Not to mention this was the man who was once called the “End Bringer”, a man who had amassed numerous legends behind. It was impossible for him just to sit around waiting to be killed.



Artold and George nodded to each other. But, right after that, 「Gaah」a pained voice was raised, and Bacchus somersaulted from the other side of the door and returned inside the room. Just by looking at him you’d notice that his stomach and shoulder were fiercely bleeding. Furthermore, 「Shit-」along with such cursing, Neil, who was shouldering Keyes, also entered. It seemed that Keyes also had his stomach shot and his consciousness was already hazy.



The front line holding back the armed group from the corridor outside had crumbled. In the next moment, *kon-* with a light sound a black object was thrown into the room.



「President-, get down-」



「tsk」



George threw his body in order to cover for the President. Chris covered the two of them further to turn his body into a shield.



In the next instant, explosive light and sound trampled inside the room. All the people inside the room were feeling a sensation of weightlessness, perhaps from having their body getting blown away, at the same time their breathing got blocked due to the impact from below toward their body.



「Gehoh, gehoh?」



「Guu, aa? We are alive?」



「-, what? How?」



Even though a grenade should’ve just exploded from a really close range, they survived while only feeling a dull impact and hearing an explosive sound. That situation caused Artold and the others to make dubious faces while looking up. And then, their eyes opened wide in astonishment for sure this time.



「The, the room is different?」



Yes, exactly like those words implied, what the eyes of Artold and the others were witnessing wasn’t the scene of a room that was trampled by an explosion, far from that the scenery of the room was completely different from the room they were in just before.



Suddenly, a clear voice called out to those who were being dumbfounded.



「I’m glad, looks like I made it in time.」



「-, yo, you are……」



The surprised Artold turned around, and there he witnessed a further unrealistic sight.



At the window, with beautiful black hair in a ponytail that was swaying due to the wind from outside, and a black katana that was held in one hand, there was a dignified female of orient――it went without saying, that this was Yaegashi Shizuku. (However, this was the recognition obstruction glasses equipped version)



「I had you all fell to the lower floor by directly cutting the ceiling. It was a rough method, but because this is an emergency, please forgive me, okay?」



「Ye, yeah. Eh? No, cutting the ceiling?」



「O, oi oi, this is a lie, right?」



Artold’s mind was in chaos while George was at a loss for words when he looked up. Up above, there certainly was a ceiling that was cut up in a triangular shape. When he then turned his gaze under their feet in fluster, there was the fallen floor there, and when he further ran his gaze over the surroundings, there were also Neil and the others a bit of distance away who had also fallen into this lower floor with them.



「Just who in the world――」



「I’m sorry, but there is no time to explain. Go to the corner of the room, right now.」



The president was overpowered with that strong tone that didn’t tolerate any question. But, at the same time, the hunch that it would be bad to stay where he stood pushed his back, and he dragged off Neil and the others to the corner of the room along with George. The swiftness of that decision was just as expected from the person who stood at the top of a country and his bodyguard.



Right after that, multiple masked men peeked down from the hole in the ceiling. They then saw Shizuku who was grinning, and they gazed with puzzlement for a moment before aiming their guns at her. But, before the triggers of those guns were pulled,



「――Sword Draw – “Flash Cut”」(TN: Battou – “Zendan“)



The drawing hand couldn’t be seen. The blade also couldn’t be seen. There was just a small whisper as Shizuku’s left hand that was clutching the sword hilt turned hazy. However, the result was an obvious phenomenon――it was displayed by the collapse of the ceiling.



With a thunderous roar, the terrorists who stepped into the room upstairs fell down, along with the ceiling. There was no way they could land properly, so the terrorists tumbled down unsightly. At the next moment, *chin-* a clear sound entered their ears, and like that their consciousness fell into the darkness.



「President. I heavily acknowledge about how you must be brimming with questions and how suspicious I look, but if you want to survive, then please believe in me. I will protect you.」



「……」



The situation was too absurd. Was this reality? The beautiful woman who appeared before his eyes, was she actually the personification of the devil, and she would demand an enormous compensation in exchange for her help? Such questions were running around in his mind. But, he had no option. If he was only looking at the fact that was currently happening, putting aside the impossible phenomenon, they were certainly being helped.



Then,



「Got it. I’ll follow what you are saying.」



「How decisive. Then, give the people over there this――」



Shizuku’s words cut off in the middle. She could hear a lot of footsteps from the corridor coming here.



「President, please give this medicine to them.」



Shizuku took out some magical recovery medicine from her “Treasure Warehouse” and threw them to Artold. Artold opened his mouth about to say something, but before he could do that, the door was knocked down, and bullets assaulted the inside of the room.



What he could hear next was *gin gin gin gin-*, such a hard sound. The jaw of Artold and the others dropped down comically. It was understandable. After all, countless beautiful curves were drawn in the air, and at the same time, remnants of bullets were getting scattered in the surrounding.



Consecutive god speed sword draws. From a glance, they could only see Shizuku standing still holding a sheathed katana, but when they looked carefully, Shizuku’s right hand was blurring. That was exactly the proof that even right at this moment the small pebbles that were attacking her with speed surpassing sound were being slashed apart altogether.



There was no way the terrorists could comprehend the abnormal situation occurring inside the room, but even so, the terrorists who sensed that their target was still going strong inside the room kicked open the door and tried to charge inside.



But, within an instant, Shizuku drew out her katana with a large motion. She didn’t immediately sheath the katana just like before, so the blade of the black katana that was being swung could be properly seen.



After that, what could be heard from outside the door was the thudding sound of collapsing bodies.



――Yeagashi-style Katana Art – Black Katana Kata Secret Technique “Zenith Severing – Soul Demolition” (TN: Shizetsu – Hakuhou)



By ignoring all the obstructions in the path of the blade, this technique cut only the target that was aimed for regardless whether it was the flesh or the consciousness. Against the current sword art of Shizuku, the option of blocking couldn’t be taken. People who couldn’t evade would have everything of theirs that were aimed by Shizuku to be cut apart by that one attack without harming anything else.



Shizuku quietly closed her eyes and searched for any presence. She captured a total of seven presences on the same floor as her.



「――”Zenith Severing – Soul Demolition”」



The sound of the drawn sword, which was like the ring of a bell, rang out once more. In every direction, the invisible sword flash penetrated every obstruction and severed the consciousness of the lurking terrorists. Surely they felt it, the sensation of a cold blade caressing their insides, just before their consciousness was severed. And then, they surely hallucinated it, the scene of their body being bisected into two.



「President. All the attackers on this floor have been suppressed. They won’t wake up for a few days, so when you have time send someone to apprehend them. Wait, just what are you doing! If you don’t make them drink the medicine quickly, they will be dead for real, you know! Now, don’t just stay dazed like that and move, move!」



「Ah, yes.」



It was an unbecoming response for a President. Artord made Keyes and the others drink the recovery medicine with a mechanical movement and expression that was still dumbfounded. After the medicine was taken, Keyes and the others bleeding stopped, and their complexion was clearly becoming better. Witnessing that, Artold couldn’t do anything anymore other than laugh dryly.



「Well then, let’s go. I will guide you all to the first floor like this. Right now there are terrorisms being carried out toward this country everywhere, so please quickly return to the White House.」



「Ah, yes. Thank you, very much.」



The man who was once called as the “End Bringer”, a former commando, and the one who stood at the top of this country, seemed to have become a mere yes-man.



After that, the terrorists who had half-occupied the skyscraper and were moving to murder the President were annihilated by Shizuku using a slash that penetrated the wall, or by a charge after cutting apart the wall and hitting them with the back of her blade, or by flying kick or slap, or after making them lose their spirits when they saw their bullets get cut apart. Then Shizuku succeeded in escorting Artold and the others safely to the White House.



It went without saying, that due to Artold, George, and all others of the surviving secret services, the black haired samurai girl became a hot topic not only in the White House but also all over the world through mass media.



At the same time as Shizuku was slashing apart through the terrorists attacking the president, in a certain airport.



That airport became the target of terrorists just like several other airports and was destroyed, so currently, the site had been transformed into a picture of hell in pandemonium. Here and there the fire was bursting, crying and yelling voices were reverberating, and the rescue squad was trying to rescue the people who were buried alive under the debris in desperation.



In that place, there was nothing but despair. There was not even a single factor that could be considered as salvation. Inside the destroyed airport there was a spreading hellish scene that could only be expressed by using the word tragedy. Everyone understood that.



「Aa, damn it……」



A young man from the rescue squad was desperately performing first aid on a heavily wounded infant before his eyes while cursing with a face that could break into tears anytime. The bleeding was not stopping. An arm was torn apart, and a deep wound was on its stomach……he couldn’t stop the bleeding no matter how much he treated the injuries. The blood that was flowing out was the life of that young child, and the child’s face was already colored by the shadow of death.



The child couldn’t be saved. Such feelings beat down the young man from inside his body. Inside this maelstrom of a tragedy that was like the personification of hell, this young man was completely powerless. Just why the hell had he joined the rescue squad? Even these thoughts were passing through the back of his mind.



「I don’t care who, someone, please help. Please, just help this child.」



While talking to himself like that, only his hand was continuing to keep moving following his training. However, reality was ridiculing the result of the young man’s effort. Right now, in front of the eyes of the young man, the light of a small life was vanishing.



His hand stopped, the young man hung down his head crestfallen. His head understood that this wasn’t the time for this. Right now, there were still a lot of people waiting for help other than this scattered life. Even so, he couldn’t put strength into his four limbs.



The young man looked up to the sky, with an expression and tone that could be thought of as hatred, as a courtesy, as escapism, or as prayer.



「……God……I beg you. If this voice can reach you then, please save this child……」



He whispered.



At that moment,



Pure white light poured down from the sky. It was powerful like a flash. However, it was soft and gentle like a moonlight. Such light, all of a sudden, without any advance notice, was pouring down, enveloping the whole airport.



And then, right after everyone had looked up to the sky wondering what was happening,



「Wha-, th, the airport, is vanishing!」



「Ju, just what is, that!?」



「What!? Just what is happening!?」



People unanimously yelled. They pointed their fingers with a shocked state, and while getting half-panicked they turned their gaze, and there, indeed, just like those words were implying, an abnormal situation was occurring where the destroyed airport was vanishing into dust from the top as though it was going through an accelerated weathering.



The great mass of rubble that was touched by the pure white light was vanishing without effecting the surrounding people at all.



「O, oi, that-!」



「A person? No, but, he is floati……wait, wings?」



Someone noticed the silhouette that was descending slowly from the sky. But, they hesitated whether it was really okay to call that silhouette a person. Even though there was no parachute that could be seen, even though descending down slowly from the sky itself was already an extremely strange phenomenon, that silhouette was even witnessed having a pair of pure white wings.



The people were in a stupor from the disappearing mountain of rubble and the winged silhouette descending from the sky, and it was at that time,



「――The wind of blessing to the children far and wide, the light of salvation driving away the calamity――”Mighty Breeze of Turning World”」(TN: Kaiten no Ibuki)



Such a prayer was echoing with a voice that sounded like a ringing bell. Right after that, every single person was wrapped in pure white light. Without any reason, emotions of relieve and joy were welling up in the heart of the people. Without any reason, they understood. That currently, they were being aided by a large existence.



「Aa, good lord……」



The young man was trickling tears while his gaze turned toward the child that was already gone.



A miracle had occurred there.



The arm that should have been lost was returning to its former shape as though going through a rewind while the injury on the stomach was healing in the blink of an eye. The expression that showed the color of the shadow of death was changing into a gentle color with good complexion.



Right now, from the site where the rubble had been completely erased, the buried people who were lying down on the ground were showing their figures, and as expected they were being healed into perfectly good health from being enveloped in pure white light.



The airport site was flooded with the light of a miracle. The people were following the hard to describe great impulse that they couldn’t hold down and shed their tears.



Before long, all the wounded people were healed, by that time the space around the silhouette in the sky undulated and like that the figure was quietly vanishing along with space.



「Angel……」



「Oh god, my greatest gratitude to you.」



The people who were left behind were shedding tears that weren’t stopping while offering their feelings of gratitude with words or with the whispers inside their hearts toward the angel that caused the miracle and the god who sent her.



……Actually, that god, was the man that was called as the godslaying maou and so on, while the angel was the mistress of such maou……such a thing though, no one would even guess even in their dreams.



After that, the angel that was Kaori flew around to all the sites that became terrorist targets and healed absolutely all the victims.



Through the internet, a certain recording was being broadcasted to all over the world in real time. The place that was reflected in the recording was a large room that was painted pure white, with small children whose heads were covered with a cloth made to kneel. There were about forty children.



Surrounding the children, were masked terrorists holding rifles, they were staring at the scared children with cold eyes.



With those children and the armed group as the background, a terrorist was standing in front of the camera while unfolding a speech with a smooth tone. The contents of the speech were bullshit that wasn’t worth listening to. Something like the vested interests of the large country, or the god that they believed in, or the liberation of their compatriots that were being held in injustice, or the simultaneous terrorisms that were being carried out as the punishment of not recognizing their grievance, or the withdrawal of the stationed army, the contents were things like that.



And then, the people watching the recording began to harbor suspicion「This is, not a trick?」while the government officials were gritting their teeth watching the children of their country that were going to be publicly executed. In front of all of them, the terrorist speaker commanded his subordinate to drag one of the children in front of the camera.



「The judgment ceremony that will be carried out after this, everything, is the proof of the sin of you all. Carve it into your heart, you foolish people.」



The terrorist put a large knife on the neck of the kneeling child. If that knife was pulled back, then a tragedy that even the word tragic would be insufficient for would spread in front of the camera.



The common public reflexively covered their eyes while the government officials yelled「Stop-」even knowing that it was meaningless. Perhaps guessing those reactions, the terrorist’s cloudy eyes shined darkly with unbearable joy, and he put strength into the knife his hand was gripping.



「Now, judgment’s ti――」



「Time to stop, desuuu――!!」



The man was sent flying. The beautiful woman with faint blue hair that leaped into the room from the pulverized wall along with a thunderous sound made the man eat a jumping kneepad on the back of his head. The man was spinning in midair.



*dokusha* With such a graphic sound, the terrorist crashed into the wall at the opposite side. Blood was flowing like a river from his eyes, nose, ears, and mouth while his body was convulsing *twitch, twitch*.



The common public, and also the government officials, had the same feeling. That was, 「What the hell happened!?」.



「Hey hey, you criminals. This lovely rabbit ear onee-san will give you all a beating all over. Have you all resigned yourself desuu!?」



At that moment, rabbit ears appeared from the head of the beautiful woman with faint bluish-white hair, at the same time, a huge war hammer materialized from the empty air that caused a sudden gust when it was swung.



The gust toppled the camera down, and the recording went sideways with a blurred image but……



「GIIYAAAAAH」



「BUBERAH」



「GOBOSUH」



「KUPEH」



Such sounds that sounded like screams along with crash sounds resounded, and then, a masked man flopped down in front of the camera with the white of his eyes exposed. The people who were watching that recording guessed that the beauty with rabbit ears growing on her head just now was beating up the terrorists using that huge hammer.



Before long, when all sounds were dying down, the white eyed terrorist that was lying down in front of the camera got blown away with terrific force, and in place of that terrorist, a white slender, beautiful leg was projected.



「Ee~, I think that you all are likely to hear this, the people of the government? Anyway, all the criminals in this base have been all beaten up, for the time being, so please quickly safeguard the children. Very very please okaayy~」



With such words as the last, the recording cut off.



The people who were watching the recording were all dumbfounded while they sputtered out「What the hell?」



A few minutes after that, at another place, a different terrorist with a similar background of children hostages was about to recite out his principle and position「We are~」, but「CHEEESTOOO――!!」as expected a rabbit eared beauty leapt and curb stomped that place.



Such a scene repeated for three more times in succession after that but……the government officials who narrowed down the places where the recordings were taking place were all greatly cocking their heads in puzzlement. After all, each of the terrorist bases were all separated by a great distance of more than a hundred kilometers. Thinking from how the recordings were all taken in real time, it was unimaginable that the same person could run around to all those places in such a short time.



「Just who in the world, is that woman……」



That was the honest feelings of all the people watching the terrorists’ recordings.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Today I updated even at 6 P.M.



My writing brush is moving and moving by its own will writing the curb stomping drama. When I noticed it felt like it will easily surpass 20,000 characters……. If next time, I don’t make it in time by 6 P.M., I will split it further and post it even if it is between 8 and 9 P.M., and finish the compilation of the demon king’s daughter before the day is over.



It’s New Year’s after all, even updating in one sitting is okay isn’t it.





Chapter 191




There is a third. Pay attention.



Ten kilometers above the sky.



There was a jumbo airplane. With a sea of clouds below, while the powerful jet engines were rumbling loudly, the plane was heading straight for America.



But, the flight of that airplane was in a situation that wasn’t normal at all. It was because there were multiple fighter aircrafts following behind that airplane from a close distance. It wasn’t because there was a near miss between planes, or because this airplane was actually the exclusive airplane of the president. There was an entirely different reason why fully armed fighter aircrafts were flying behind a passenger airplane as if though they were keeping watch.



It was for the sake of shooting down the airplane in the worst case scenario before damage could be inflicted to the country because an airplane that was hijacked by terrorists wasn’t any different than a flying cannon shell possessing great mass.



Yes, that passenger plane was currently hijacked by terrorists. Due to the terrorists that somehow slipped handguns aboard the plane, the inside the plane was now being ruled by nervousness and fear.



「Oi, you……」



「?」



Everyone was staying quiet, and only waiting for this fearful time to leave. A passenger businessman stole a look at a patrolling terrorist before calling with a small voice to the young man across the aisle from him.



So that he wouldn’t be standing out, the young man only lifted up his hanging head slightly. When he directed a glance at the businessman that was calling him, immediately a small paper scrap was thrown on the lap of the young man.



The young man was startled, and he directed his gaze at the businessman, but at that time the businessman was already looking down and sitting quietly on his seat as though nothing had happened.



The young man was feeling a sensation of cold sweat going down his back while being careful of the patrolling terrorist; he spread open the folded paper scrap inside his palm.



――17:35



That was the only thing written on the paper. Normally such writing would be too cryptic, but the young man felt a shock as though electricity was running through his body. He guessed it. The written time, which was ten more minutes from the current time, was the time where the situation inside the plane might change greatly.



With a glance, the young man gazed at the businessman at his side. The businessman also moved his gaze without moving his face and gave a small nod. The will to rise in a counterattack in order to resolve this hijacking incident existed in that businessman.



Most likely this paper had gone not only to this young man but also to other people. It was unknown who was the one that started circulating this paper, but the person who dispatched this paper should be expecting for even more people to answer the call.



Surely it was because that person had vaguely guessed the objective of the terrorists that he decided to make a sink-or-swim gamble. In the recent news, there was an abundance of topics regarding suicide bombing. The features of the terrorists’ faces obviously looked like the characteristic features of the people of the country where the famous terrorist organization that was reported every day in the news belonged. In that case, it was possible to imagine the worst case regarding the objective of this plane hijacking.



The young man, thinking that they would die anyway if this situation kept on, scolded his heart that was withering in fear and nodded briskly at the businessman. And then, in order to increase the number of courageous comrades even just by one, he secretly handed over the paper, where the time for the counterattack was written, to another person.



Before long, inside the plane where eerie silence was ruling, the watches of the passengers were about to reach the time that was written. The tension was suddenly rising. Beside the young man, the businessman was wiping the sweat on his forehead. The young man also understood really well that feeling. Their fate might be decided in a few minutes. The tension the businessman was feeling wasn’t something average. The young man himself was feeling the sweat that was trickling down his back and neck and the feeling of his body growing cold.



But, at that time, the back of the plane suddenly became noisy. Angry yelling and screams, and then *pan* the sound of a gunshot resounded. The young man lost color. It finally began.



The young man and the businessman, and then several men――a father with a family, a middle aged male who seemed to be riding the plane with his wife, and so on, they were looking for a chance while their faces were straining with tension.



And then, the terrorists who noticed the strangeness at the back of the plane rushed from their posts while saying something. It was at that moment,



「UOOOOOOOOH」



「Hold them down-」



「Steal the gun-」



The passengers who had conspired beforehand simultaneously revolted. One of the terrorists who turned his back was tackled from behind; the tackler desperately held down the hand of the terrorist who hadn’t let go of his gun even when he fell. One other terrorist, when he turned his gaze at his tackled comrade, was also immediately wrestled by the father with a family who was right at the terrorist’s side and both of them fell on the floor.



It became noisy inside the plane. At the same time, the hope that perhaps at this rate they would be able to subdue the terrorists were beginning to spread between the passengers.



But,



*pan-*



A single gunshot resounded, at the same time, the businessman who was holding down a terrorist slumped down while groaning. And then one more shot. *pan* A gunshot resounded, and the father with a family, who was holding down another terrorist, screamed and fell.



Immediately, the terrorists punched away the other passengers, and then they further shot with their handguns while cursing and standing up. The young man who was similarly shot on his leg was making a pained voice while turning his gaze, and there he saw the figure of a flight attendant holding a small handgun.



「No way……why……」



The young man leaked out a bewildered voice. That was only natural. The flight attendant was a blonde haired Caucasian, no matter how he looked her nationality was different from the terrorists.



Due to the feature of the terrorists and the everyday news, the passengers were completely under the impression that the terrorist organization was made up of the race of that country only. But in fact, the terrorists had taken methods of abducting people of various countries, which they brainwashed, before they returned the people to their original country in order to cooperate with the terrorisms, so terrorists were not necessarily limited to the race of only that country.



「Father-, father-」



「Dear-, hang in there-」



Anxious voices mixed with screams reverberated. Looking there, a young girl and a mother were crying while clinging to the shot father.



The male terrorists who were swearing while venting their anger at the revolting passengers, the moment they saw those family crying, their expression changed into something ugly as though to say that they had found a good target to be made into a lesson. They then walked toward that family.



「The sin of treating with disdain our kindness of making you all accompanying us in an honorable death is heavy. Just die meaninglessly, along with your whole family.」



The terrorist aimed his handgun at the family. The shot father, even while his expression was growing pale from bleeding too much, desperately tried to cover his daughter and wife.



Everyone imagined the tragic end of the family. The fact that their revolt ended in complete failure would be planted inside the passengers with this public execution.



But, when the terrorist was about to pull the trigger, suddenly a gunshot thundered from the back of the plane. The terrorist’s hand stopped moving due to that sound. However, guessing that the same thing as here was happening at the back, he immediately put strength into his finger on the trigger.



Right after that, gunshot sounds in succession could be heard once more. The terrorist’s movement stopped once more while thinking that they were really flashy back there. At that time, the terrorists who were in this area were believing without a doubt, that their comrades were also making example back there.



After all, there was also a brainwashed conspirator from another country hiding back there too, so no matter what happened they could launch a surprise attack. There were also more terrorists that were stationed at the back compared to the front. Regarding the consecutive gunshots, there were a lot of hot-blooded guys amongst the terrorists, so the terrorists here thought that it was because of that.



「Oi oi, just what are those guys doing back there?」



「……Yeah. As expected they are shooting too much. Just what are they going to do if a stray bullet hits the window.」



The terrorists looked at each other’s face dubiously. The cause of that was because of the intense shooting sound that was reverberating even now.



The objective of the terrorists was a suicide attack on the capital of America using the hijacked plane. They couldn’t let the plane crash until then so they had to pay meticulous attention even when they were using guns. Yet regardless of that, right now, the gunshot sounds audible from the back of the plane made them think that the shooter wasn’t making any consideration to that, and instead, it sounded like a shooting that was done in desperation to avert death.



「Oi, Nadim, Karim, what are you all doing? Report the situation.」



Because the front and the back areas of the plane were partitioned from each other and they couldn’t see what was happening, they were unable to grasp the situation by eyesight. And so they used a communication device to contact the others, but what they could hear was only「Impossible-! What, is that-」an incomprehensible voice that was a mix of terror, unease, and confusion.



「Oi, Nadim! Just what is going on! Report-」



『A woman is-, it’s impossible-! The gun doesn’t work-. The blonde woma――』



The voice of the man called Nadim cut off. At the same time, the fierce gunshot sounds also stopped.



An eerie silence enveloped inside the plane.



The terrorist who was staring at the communication device gave a signal using his gaze to the other man and the flight attendant. Both of them nodded and aimed their gun at the partition toward the back area.



『This is Yosef. Saeed. What happened to Nadim and the others? Just what is happening over there?』



A communication from the terrorist comrade that was occupying the cockpit came through. The door to the cockpit was solidly closed, and it had been arranged previously so that the door couldn’t be opened no matter what happened in the passenger area. And so, the terrorist who introduced himself as Yosef didn’t come out from the cockpit, but he could still communicate and asked for a report that the other terrorists couldn’t ignore.



Furthermore, Yosef was able to accomplish trespassing into the sturdy cockpit that normally couldn’t be opened by any mean in the middle of flight because beforehand the terrorists had taken the pilot’s family hostage. The pilot was pressed with a mortifying choice even while vaguely understanding that he would be killed anyway in the end, comprehending that this option would only worsen the situation, but when he was shown the image of his young son’s soft skin being pressed with a knife, he finally chose to obey the terrorists. The one who carried the guns inside the plane and opened the cockpit door was also the pilot.



「I don’t know. We will confirm it now.」



Saeed said that, and then he approached the partition to the back area while readying his gun.



But, before he reached the partition, the cause of the abnormality finally arrived from the other side. A slender finger peeked out from the edge of the partition, and then like that, the partition was casually opened wide.



「Oo」



「……」



For a moment, Saeed forgot the current situation and leaked out an admiring voice. The other male terrorist was also wordless, but his eyes opened wide in obvious shock.



The one who showed her figure from the back area, with smooth and fluffy golden hair fluttering and crimson eyes narrowing with a sleepy look, was a peerlessly beautiful girl that was like a bisque doll. It went without saying, that it was Yue in girl mode.



In order to trample all the schemes of the terrorists and make all of their actions become meaningless, she boarded the hijacked plane using space teleportation.



Yue’s eyes ran through the terrorists in turn. Saeed, whose gaze met Yue’s, felt his body temperature rising against a girl who could only be seen as a girl in the first half of her teens. Even though the appearance of this girl could only be seen as a small girl no matter how he observed her, the atmosphere she was clad with was the personification of bewitchment itself. It felt like he was an insect that was lured by an insect trap; if he let his guard down, then it felt like he would assault the girl while staggering on his feet.



Yue turned his gaze to the family who was trembling at Saeed’s feet. The family was also directing dumbfounded gazes at the beautiful girl who suddenly appeared.



「……It’s fine.」



Yue smiled at the little girl who was clinging to her father and gave her those words. And then, casually, without any wariness, she walked toward the family.



That extremely defenseless figure reversely caused Saeed to return to his senses, and then his gaze moved toward the back area through the opened partition. Over there was……



「-, What, are. What are you doing……Carlo-」



There, he saw a scene of his comrade on his knees, strangling his own neck by himself. It seemed that the man was already unconscious, the white of his eyes was exposed while foam was coming out of his mouth. It was really an abnormal scene.



「……I’m no match for Kaori, but this much is no problem.」



Saeed returned to his senses once more due to that voice which came from below him. With a ‘hah’ he lowered his gaze, there the figure of Yue holding her hand over the shot father, and the figure of the father being enveloped in a faint golden light could be seen. It was as though time was being rewound as the blood was flowing back into the wound of the father before the wound visible closed. The bullet that had entered the body was also pushed out from the wound and fell down with a ‘plop’. The mother and daughter were dazed, staring at that miraculous scenery.



Yue, who ascertained that the wound had been closed, quietly stood up. She was right in front of Saeed and perhaps because he had witnessed unimaginable scenes one after another, the inside of Saeed’s head was already all messed up.



Even so, his long years of training and experience of terrorism that he had moved his body on its own accord, telling him only that the too beautiful girl in front of his eyes was a threat for him and his comrades. His gun muzzle aimed at Yue’s head and his hand thrust forward the gun.



「Yo, you, just who in the――」



「……All of you too, it’s fine already.」



Even with the gun muzzle thrust at her, the girl didn’t show even a bit of agitation. Rather, Yue, who looked like she didn’t even acknowledge his existence, caused Saeed’s expression to cramp.



Yue acted as though she was not concerned of Saeed, and waved her fingertip like a baton and scattered golden light. After that, the businessman who was on the verge of death from the heavy wound, the young man, and the other passengers who participated in the revolt had their wounds healed similarly like the father just now. It didn’t stop there, even the people who had already lost their lives had their heartbeat brought back, and they recovered their consciousness.



For the passengers, that was exactly a scene of miracles.



But, for the terrorists, it was a scene of nightmares.



Therefore,



「Kuh, this monster-」



*pan-*, Saeed pulled the trigger, and the bullet flew toward Yue. It was a shot that was impossible to miss from this close range. Everyone’s mind showed them the scene of death where the brain of the girl who manifested this miracle would be splattered from her head.



But,



「Such, thing……impossible.」



The bullet stopped still at the space in front of Yue. In the air where there was nothing, as though something soft was blocking the way, without any change to the shape of the bullet it was floating still.



Yue’s gaze was turned to Saeed once more. There was no emotion at all in those cold eyes. The moment Saeed saw that he was made to understand whether he wanted to or not. That for the girl before his eyes, he was something without value, just like a pebble on the side of the road. There was no meaning in him getting born; he brought nothing but harm by living, just a hindrance to be removed, he would vanish without anyone even lifting an eye of it……that was the kind of existence he had.



「Uh, aaAAAAAAAA-」



His very existence was rejected. That terror and that humiliation caused Saeed to burst. From very close range, he continued to pull the trigger as though he was possessed. Following after him, the other terrorist and the flight attendant also aimed at Yue and fired.



The passengers screamed. However, that too happened only for a bit. When they saw that all few dozen bullets were floating still in midair around Yue, their screaming was gradually dying down.



Saeed and the others desperately changed their handgun’s magazine and continued to shoot until all the bullets that they had run out.



Like that, *kachink* such a transient sound echoed. The handgun that had its top slid back still, informed them of the end. Yue, who was completely unmoving during all this, slowly ran her gaze through Saeed and the others. The bullets floating around Yue fell on the floor all at once and scattered. And then, a word.



「……so?」



「-」



「Ua……」



「Hih」



Saeed and the others staggered backward. Their handguns fell on the floor with a thump. Already there was only fear that could be seen in their eyes.



「You are, you are, what are――」



「…….You have no need to know. For now, 『Shut up』.」



「-」



Saeed’s mouth opened and closed trying to ask Yue’s true identity. But the moment Yue told him「Shut up」, his voice couldn’t come out. While Saeed was staring in a daze, Yue’s words came out further.



「……『Kneel』」



Saeed and the others simultaneously kneeled. There, Yue let out the finishing――”Divine Statement”.



「……『Slowly strangle, your own neck』」



Until the end, Yue’s crimson eyes possessed no color of emotion at all toward them. That became the last sight that Saeed and the others saw.



Yue’s gaze moved toward the last enemy, toward the terrorist who was occupying the cockpit. And then, when she walked toward the solid door between her and the cockpit, as though such a thing was only something trivial.



*DOGOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOON-*



「-」



A fierce shock and thunderous sound assaulted the inside of the plane. Right after that, the plane tilted down with a jerk, and oxygen masks fell down from overhead all over the place. The passengers screamed. The passengers who were seated at the back area witnessed black smoke spouting out intensely from the two wings of the plane, and their face turned pale all at once.



It appeared that all four engines that were installed on the plane were destroyed. Perhaps it should be said that it was a miracle that the wings themselves were still intact. Or else, perhaps it had been calculated to end like that.



Yue’s gaze quietly narrowed toward the cockpit. The cause of this was obvious. The last terrorist judged that at this rate there was a high possibility that the suicide attack on America’s capital would fail due to the abnormality happening inside the plane, so he activated the set up explosive.



As a matter of fact, this was the third hijacked plane that Yue had boarded and suppressed. The judgment of Yosef, which was made with great resolve, was surely because of the thought that even if the plane he hijacked himself couldn’t fulfill the objective, there were still the other hijacked planes. Rather than having this plane completely suppressed and taken back, he would prefer to crash this plane down sacrificing the many American passengers, bringing as much tragedy as possibly for America. The fact that he didn’t directly destroy the body of the plane and instead only the engines were surely because of his thinking of making even greater damage by choosing the place where they plane would fall.



「……Nn, this is my error. I’ll correct this mistake.」



Right after Yue was talking to herself like that, she used “Heaven Existence” to erase her figure from the inside of the plane.



「Am I, dreaming?」



The one who muttered that in a daze was the pilot who was following after the passenger airplane. There was a voice demanding a situation report resounding from the radio, but the pilot didn’t have the composure to answer that.



But, surely it would be cruel for anyone to criticize the pilot for that. The reason was that at the end of his gaze, the smoking plane that had just been falling due to the sudden explosion, which was then enveloped by golden light in the next moment, continued to fly straight even now. It was because of this extremely absurd sight that caused the pilot to be like that.



And what caused the pilot’s gaze to be nailed in place, what forced him to be dumbfounded, was the figure of a girl standing on top of that airplane. A person was standing on top of a plane that was flying at a high altitude――even though just that was enough to make him doubt his own sanity, there was also how that girl was enveloped in the same golden light like the plane, and furthermore, a pair of shining wings were spread from her back.



Perhaps noticing the gaze of the pilot, the golden girl, Yue, turned her face in his direction. And then, she suddenly showed a smile. ――The fighter aircraft jerked violently. The pilot was pressing on his chest as though he had been shot through by something. He should quickly grasp the control stick instead of that.



Yue returned her gaze to the front, and then normally began to walk on the plane, as though the wind resistance and the temperature had no effect at all. She got down in front of the cockpit.



「A, a girl? No, but, eh?」



「Wha-, wha-, wha-wha-wha-wha-」



The pilot who was bleeding from his head and Yosef were making really funny faces. The copilot was lying down from being shot. It seemed that he was still barely breathing, but perhaps he could only keep his life for a mere few minutes more. Yue, while being enveloped in golden light, quietly pointed her fingertip at the copilot.



Immediately, a faint light enveloped the copilot and healed his wound.



「Yo, you are-. This, monster-」



Yosef guessed the reason why he couldn’t contact his comrades in the passenger areas and raised a trembling angry voice. And then, he aimed his handgun at Yue who was outside the cockpit and was about to pull the trigger. He planned to crash this plane anyway. After this far he wouldn’t even hesitate about something like breaking the window of the cockpit.



However,



「……『Don’t move』」



「-」



Naturally, his movement was easily stopped. The pilot was bewildered at Yosef whose movement hardened with a snap like a stone. But, in the next moment, Yosef’s figure vanished into thin air.



Yue teleported him. Yosef then appeared right above the plane at the blind spot from the cockpit. Yes, he appeared outside of the jumbo airplane flying at the altitude of eight kilometers with the speed of a few hundred kilometers per hour. Furthermore, he was looking up with his hands spread apart as though he was being crucified; he was completely attached to the top of the plane.



「……Die while freezing.」



Yosef opened his eyes wide. Normally a normal human would immediately lose consciousness in this condition, but savagely he was given protection against cold and an oxygen supply, so he wouldn’t die that easily.



Yue softly flew backward. She flapped her golden wings and then she was flying while matching her speed with the airplane speed. Looking from the point of view of the pilot and the copilot who had recovered his consciousness, it looked like there was a girl floating casually in front of a flying airplane.



Yue floated a smile at the two people who were staring at her in astonishment and added,



「……Do your best.」



After saying that, her figure vanished with a puff.



Even after Yue vanished, the plane was still enveloped in golden light. There was only one engine that was still operating, but the plane could still maintain its altitude. The difficulty of the piloting was going up, but mysteriously the two pilots didn’t feel any anxiety of the plane crashing.



「……William. I am a criminal.」



「Captain……」



The pilot was holding the control stick while squeezing out those words from his throat. Hearing that, the copilot William made a complicated expression that couldn’t say anything. From the conversation of the terrorists, he had guessed that the pilot’s family was kidnapped and he was threatened that his family would be hurt right in front of his eyes. Perhaps because he could see the expression of the pilot that was filled with bitterness, that even now after he had almost just died William was unable to say any word of vilification.



The pilot told to such William.



「But, god has told a criminal like me, to live. Do your best, deliver the passengers safely home. If you cannot agree with this, then I’ll stay quiet and yield the control to you. But, if――」



「Captain. I too have a family. If my son meets the same experience as your son, a confidence that I can say that I’ll prioritize the passengers still……is something that I don’t have.」



The words of the pilot were cut off in the middle by William. And then, he nodded with a serious expression while returning to the copilot seat. That gesture indicated more eloquently than any words that he would leave this plane to the pilot one more time.



「……My thanks. This is my last flight. No matter what happens, I swear I’ll land this plane safely.」



「It’s going to be fine, captain. After all, the protection of the goddess is with us.」



「Yeah, you’re right.」



The captain’s face warped difficultly. That was a complicated expression that was a mix of relief and regret, gratitude and apology, and various other feelings.



(Goddess. Please, I beg you no matter how shameless this sound. My family…….please-)



The captain couldn’t help but pray like that in front of the miracle that he witnessed.



Half a day later, the tattered airplane that was enveloped in golden light safely landed. In the middle of the airport that was in an uproar due to the unprecedented situation, the captain who was receiving questioning heard how his family was saved by a beautiful rabbit-eared woman. And then, he became a zealous believer of the golden goddess and the rabbit eared beauty.





Chapter 192




I cannot write anymore……



Off the shore of the America East Coast.



There a large cargo ship was anchored. It was an unregistered cargo ship, so the coast guard immediately rushed to the ship and called at it, but there was no reaction. The coast guard kept calling for a while, but not a single response was given. With no other way left the coast guard decided to board the ship.



Suddenly, several people appeared on the deck of the cargo ship. The coast guard spontaneously stopped moving and called to those men. However, those men didn’t respond at all and instead took off the sheet that was covering the cargo that was placed on the deck.



「-, those guys, are they sane-!?」



One of the coast guards turned pale while cursing. That was only natural. What appeared from behind the sheet was a missile launching pad. At the same time, the men――the terrorists――leaned their bodies forward from the deck. What was held in their hands were familiar weapons for the coast guard.



「-, Get back-」



As the coast guard captain yelled out those orders, the terrorists pulled the triggers. Violent bursting sounds rang consecutively, *poshu-* along with a stupid sounding sound; the grenade launcher that was attached to the rifle mercilessly lobbed an explosive onto the coast guard ship.



Several people got caught up in the explosion, and they fell to the deck of the coast guard ship while screaming. Next, the steering room erupted in flames.



Naturally, another coast guard ship returned fire, but the attack of the terrorists was fiercer than they imagined and caused the coast guard to be unable to get near. They called for reinforcements from the navy, but in the end, whether the navy would make it in time or not before the missiles were launched to the city was……



「Shit-, don’t-. Stop itt-」



Several of the coast guards yelled. Right at this time, their beloved birthplace, the coastal city, was about to be destroyed. Thinking about the range of the missile, it could aim at anywhere in the coastal city. The place the missiles landed could perhaps be where their acquaintance, friend, lover, or family was.



But, emotionlessly, a mechanical operating sound was reverberating while the missiles were aimed toward the coastal city, and then……they were launched.



From the multiple launching pads, a total of six missiles were sent flying toward the city.



「Aa……how can this be.」



Someone whispered in a tragic voice.



The missiles crossed above the coast and kept flying toward the center of the city; it was at that moment,



*GOU-!!*



A black flash cut through the sky. A very thick laser that no one had ever seen before, except in a SciFi movie, suddenly flew out from further behind the cargo ship.



The black laser instantly swallowed the missile that was at the very right, and then the laser kept moving horizontally and annihilated all the missiles.



The coast guard, and also the terrorists, felt the same astonishment from the unimaginable happening. As though they had made an arrangement beforehand, all of them similarly turned their heads to the direction from where the laser came with botchy movements *gigigi* that was similar to a machine that hadn’t been oiled.



There, ahead of their gaze, the sea was beginning to swell up as though a mountain was forming. Like that, what appeared from there was……



「GO, GOZIRA-!!」



A dragonified Tio. By no means was it Godzi○ but with that appearance, it couldn’t be helped even if they thought like that. Dragon eyes with vertical slits on its pupil and jet black scales. Sharp fangs lining up in a row. Such a monster was appearing while stirring up the sea!



Tio spread her wings and flew up and descended toward the terrorists who were staring vacantly with mouths wide open. And then, ignoring those who were screaming, Tio’s sharp claws pierced the hull of the cargo ship and lifted the ship up all at once.



The terrorists were screaming while firing bullets and grenades at Tio. Having the experience of fighting a giant monster was an experience that was too valuable in a sense; however, the fact that they couldn’t make a single scratch caused the terrorists to expose their expressions of terror.



『Foolish people. Thou can cool down thy head a bit.』



Suddenly a majestic voice came down from the sky; it was at that moment that the ship was powerfully thrown. The cargo ship fell on the coast while the terrorists were scattered out from the deck like snack scraps. The ship split into two with a thunderous sound.



『I guess these gentlemen will have questions, that’s why I will go easy on all of ye.』



The voice poured down once more, and then within an instant, thunder fell on the cargo ship from empty air. Thunderous roars and lightning trampled the coast. The terrorists inside the cargo ship were grandly electrocuted and collapsed without even a single exception.



Right after that, a slight sound was reverberating. It was something like the sound of something flying overhead that was created by an aircraft. When Tio turned around, she could see a large missile coming at her.



Actually, further offshore there was a ship that was loaded with long range missiles standing by. The cargo ship at the coast was also acting as a decoy in this attack on the coastal city.



『How lukewarm. Thou foolish people can perish.』



Such an attempt couldn’t even be considered as an attack. Tio, who proclaimed that, opened her jaw wide open. Inside, a black light of ruin was converging.



Right after that, a second dragon breath was fired. The breath instantly reached the missile and annihilated the missile without causing any explosion. It continued its path and impacted the ship that was anchored several dozen kilometers away.



Just before the breath impacted, the terrorists who were on board the ship saw the black wall approaching them. There wasn’t even time for them to pray to their god. Just as they were aware that an incomprehensible black shining wall was approaching near everything blew up altogether, along with their consciousness.



Tio, who finished firing her breath, gave a glance at the coast guard members who were unable to stand up due to fear before she used regeneration magic and healed the wounded. Even people who had stopped breathing were also similarly healed by soul magic’s resurrection.



The scene of their comrades being enveloped in black light before their wounds were closing up was truly far removed from reality.



In the eyes of the coast guard members, the pure terror began to be replaced by awe.



『O protectors, be strong.』



Tio left those words and began to dive into the sea once more.



The coast guard members sent their salutes while staring wholeheartedly at the greatness of that figure. No matter how separated from reality this happening was, no matter how atypical the existence of this figure was, it had protected, saved, and gifted them with valuable words. There was not a single person who stopped saluting until Tio’s figure vanished from view.



And then, with awe and respect, they called that name.



「Thank you, Gozira.」



Currently, an American army was stationed in a ruined city in a certain country in the Middle East. The reason for their stationing there ranged from apprehending or killing the leadership of the terrorist organization to humanitarian aid to the vicinity.



If it was normal, the evening was supposed to be the time when the army would distribute food rations that were given out twice a day even while staying alert of terrorist attacks. The army garrison should be crowded with the local residents visiting in order to get water or food, or visiting the army medical facility to have their injury treated.



However, at present,



「Reinforcement request from east gate-. Many are injured. Delta and Zeta are almost isolated-」



「Take some men from the second division-」



「An enemy tank appeared at the west gate-. They are receiving concentrated fire-. Request for air support-」



「Someone-, three people got done in-. Send the medic-」



「South gate, they can’t hold on anymore-」



The bellows of the American soldiers, the fierce gunshot sounds, and the thunderous sounds of explosions were everywhere.



The America army base of this city right now was in the middle of receiving a large scale attack from the terrorist organization.



The base that was using several buildings of the city, surrounded with barbed wire, was now receiving simultaneous attacks from the east, west, south, and north of the city. Because the attack time was matched with the ration distribution time, there were already many citizens that had gotten involved and departed for the next world.



Although the American army immediately evacuated the people, who had barely gotten away from the disaster, into the base and the soldiers quickly fought back, the fierce attack which was to the degree that it made everyone wondering if this was actually the gathering of all the war potential of the terrorist organization, caused the American soldiers to fall behind and they were forced into a hard fight.



「Shit-, are the reinforcements still not here-. At this rate……」



The leader of this base, Armando Aston’s fist hit the desk in the command room loudly. Aerial bombing toward the enemy force was already impossible because the enemy’s distance to the base was too near. There was one other American base at the scale of one division in the neighboring city, but it would take them twenty minutes to reach this city. If they used a combat helicopter, then it would be even faster, but……without crushing the enemy’s anti-air weapon first, it would be too dangerous for the helicopter to give their support.



In the end, whether this base could hold out until the reinforcements came or not was……Armando scowled with impatience and roughly wiped the unpleasant sweat that trickled on his jaw.



But, at that time, a fierce impact sound assaulted the command room; clouds of dust were scattering down from the ceiling. Armando, who almost stumbled unintentionally, held onto the desk and braced himself while「What happened!?」yelling angrily at the communications officer.



A transmission that deepened the impatience of Armando further came from the radio.



『The enemy, they have a great number of unmanned attack aircraft-! Currently, the east gate is receiving aerial――』



「Impossible, just how far did those guys go to prepare their equipment-. There is no intelligence about that at all! Just what was the intelligence department doing!?」



After hearing the cut off the transmission, even while understanding that this wasn’t the time, Armando still spontaneously cursed. He immediately gave out instructions but……in the back of the mind of everyone in the command room, the word “annihilation” was floating.



Armando was considering whether he should abandon the citizens and instead escape from the city even if they had to bulldoze their way through. Despite understanding how low the success rate of doing such a thing, and the risk that they might lose their great cause for deploying their army in this foreign land, he was still about to make that decision. It was at that time, *hyuuuuu* an ominous sound of something cutting through the air entered his ear.



「-, all hands, get down-」



Armando’s immediate instruction made the surrounding soldiers’ faces grow pale while they dived to the floor. Right after that, a violent impact and thunderous roar assaulted all of them. Their consciousness was shaken as though they had been entered into a mixer and got whipped up.



「Guh, someone-, situation report-」



Armando was feeling a painful ringing in his ears as he was pressing his hand on his forehead. He somehow stood up and looked around him. And then, a part of the ceiling crumbled down, the sight of many of his subordinates being crushed under rubble, and the sight of the outside that was completely visible from the blown up external wall entered his eyes.



When he stepped outside with staggering steps, he could see many black smoke columns rising from the south gate. And then, he witnessed the enemy tank force advancing while crushing cars and humans on the street; they were flattening people underneath them as if they were bugs while forcing their way through.



The south gate had been breached. In the end, just what happened with the unit that was defending that spot……



「……To all hands, retreat by following the judgment of your own commanding officer while maintaining your force as much as possible. We are abandoning this base. Aim to link up with the third battalion that should be heading here.」



Armando, who was speaking into the communication device, was quietly watching the countless tanks that were approaching from the other side of the street while running over everything in their path. He made a bitter smile. He ridiculed himself, at how powerless and incompetent he was.



And then, he saw the tank that was running at the lead moving its turret toward him, or more accurately, at the command room behind him, and he discerned his end.



「……You demons. Even though I am incompetent, my country is different. Someday, the hammer of god will――」



*DOGOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOON!!*



A terrific impact rushed through, cutting off Armando’s last words. The tank’s shelling――wasn’t the cause. Instead, it was the sound of that tank getting pierced by a jet black stake three meters long.



「Fue?」



A stupid voice leaked out from the middle-aged man named Armando.



His shock was only natural. The movement of the tank force belonging to the terrorist organization was also stopping.



While time on the battlefield had stopped, on top of that jet black stake, without anyone knowing just from where he could possibly have come from, a single young man landed down with a thud. With a face that looked oriental, it was a normal young man that seemed like could be found anywhere, if you didn’t pay attention to the giant things on his two hands, which seemed to be weapons, that couldn’t possibly be carried by flesh and blood human.



Everyone had already stopped moving. That young man――Hajime―― shouldered the pile bunker while his right hand casually lowered down the gatling gun, and then he opened his mouth with an expression that was like a yakuza.



「Now then, it will be a curb stomp after this, but is there anyone who wants to surrender? Good, there is none huh. Then, die.」



In this battlefield where sounds of gunshots and explosions were still knocking incessantly on the eardrum, for some reason, those words could be heard clearly as though they came right from the communication device. Hearing those words, Armando and several of the terrorists made a retort in their heart「Fast-, you’ve got no intention of listening right from the start, right!?」but……in the next moment, such voices of the heart were sent flying.



Along with the situation, where the tank force was literally sent flying.



*DOU-DOU-DOU-DOU-* Consecutive heavy bass sounds and *DURURURURURURU* peculiar rotation sounds sounded off. Those sounds were the indication of the pile bunker stakes that were fired rapidly and the crimson swarm of bullets cutting through the air becoming countless flashes that were like meteors.



The two ton stakes that were fired six times per second pierced through the tanks with a force that made the tanks look like toys and pulverized the tank crews inside one after another. The gatling railgun was instantly changing the buildings into scraps just like paper scraps while mercilessly changing the terrorists that were at the other side into meat lumps.



「We surrender-. Stop it-」



Several of the terrorists riding in the tanks came out with both their hands raised. This was honestly unexpected because he thought that these people were all having martyrdom mentality. And then, Hajime who received the surrender proclamation was,



「Eh? What did you say?」



While saying something that sounded like a deaf protagonist that came out in a gal-game somewhere, he fired his pile bunker as though he hadn’t heard anything at all. The tanks somersaulted in midair from the impact. The man who declared his surrender was squashed underneath as a red stain was slowly spreading.



「Wh, why-. You heard already that those guys are surrendering, right!?」



One of the terrorists raised his voice at Hajime’s unreasonableness. In response to that, as expected, Hajime without even replying properly……



「No negotiation with terrorists. This is international common sense. Don’t you know that?」



「A surrender declaration, is not negotiation, right!?」



If it was asked whether that statement was too much or not, then it was too much. However, the terrorist couldn’t even object for the second time as he received the strafing of the railgun and ended up as mere pieces of meat.



「Chih, they are like bugs huh. I don’t like those guys who only swarm in numbers. Annoyingg.」



The tank force that broke through the south gate, which should be called as the greatest land battle force of the terrorist organization, was literally instant killed. Hajime stored away his gatling railgun and pile bunker, and then he kicked on the building wall and jumped to the rooftop. Following the rooftops, he reached the rooftop of the highest building in the city.



Armando who saw that sight with a faint smile,



「……It appears that salvation isn’t bestowed by god, but by a demon, huh.」



Whispered such thing.



Hajime fired a lot of missiles from the rooftop using “Agni-Orkan”; the fire trails of the missiles covered the sky of the city like a spider web. The unmanned aircrafts were easily shot down, and grand explosive sounds could be heard resounding from everywhere in the city.



After that, Hajime, who annihilated the large scale troops of the terrorist organization, next operated his smartphone to activate the satellite artifact “Bel Agarta” (By pouring down light exposure that had been enchanted with regeneration magic, it would regenerate the target at the above ground. Hajime developed it, so it was possible to immediately heal his friends and family even when they were far away) that he willfully launched in stealth mode using space magic until it settled above the satellite orbit before this, and healed the American soldiers.



Looking at his subordinates that should have died coming back to life (It was impossible for those who had died too long ago), at the enemy force that was easily turned to ash, and at Hajime who was interrogating several terrorists before leaving the battlefield like nothing had happened and vanished, Armando could do nothing except laugh.



Armando later returned home to his country. Even though he was a pious believer of god, his new tendencies, which were starting to have an excessive interest in demons, greatly worried his family and colleagues but……that was another story.



On the other hand, Hajime had asked about the current whereabouts of the leadership of the terrorist organization from several of the terrorists attacking the city and teleported there.



The location seemed to be in a suite at a high class hotel in the capital. Surely, the choice of this location came from the thinking that the possibility of aerial bombing was nonexistent in this location where there were a lot of common people, making it into a safe place.



It seemed that they were reserving the whole floor as their base; thinking about the extravagant terrorist force just now, it appeared that the terrorists were in possession of considerable financial clout. Actually, Hajime became curious about the connection of the terrorists with that area.



Hajime ignored the front desk, directly teleported to the floor, and advanced through the corridor with brisk steps. Then, men who seemed to be guards immediately pulled out their guns――faster than them, however, Hajime floored the guards with a double lariat.



While confirming that the presences inside the room suddenly became noisy, Hajime kicked open the splendorous door with a yakuza kick. Immediately, countless bullets rushed at Hajime. While carelessly warding off the bullets with his left hand, Hajime entered the room with a rude entrance and,



「Who the hell are-gobohaa-!?」



The first thing Hajime did was launch a yakuza kick at a middle aged old man that seemed to be the terrorist leader. The man seemed like he was about to say something, but he was made to swallow his words back, so it was unknown what he was going to say. Even terrorists weren’t a match to the approaching of old age.



The people around the middle aged man were about to fire at Hajime further, but as expected, Hajime’s slap was overwhelmingly quicker. The guards were all artistically rotating twelve times in midair before getting floored, or getting buried into the wall, or breaking through the ceiling and losing consciousness.



「Now then, old man. You are the mastermind of the simultaneous terrorisms this time, huh?」



「Guh, gohoh, you bastard――」



The yakuza kick burst down on the middle aged man’s solar plexus for the second time today. Trampling on the middle aged man that was vomiting while screaming with a voice that normal people wouldn’t be able to endure, Hajime grinded his foot further as though to add on the pain.



「Well, it’s actually inconsequential whether you are the ring leader or not though. I’ll have you spit out the information about the shitty bastard financing you all here.」



The middle aged man who seemed about to prattle “Who will tell you huh!” got the muzzle of Donner pressed hard on his forehead by Hajime who searched for the company and person who was financing the terrorist organization.



「Wait, you, do you understand what the meaning of this revolution is? The exploitation by America is――」



「Aa, enough about that.」



*DOPAN-*



The head of the middle aged man that was about to start talking about something got blown away. That act of Hajime who seemed as though he didn’t know of the existence of the word mercy itself caused the remaining leaders to back away while shuddering.



Hajime turned toward those leaders while tapping Donner on his shoulder. The leaders were desperately begging for their lives, saying things like they would give him money, or they would prepare women or anything he liked, but,



「Oy, look here you guys, it seems you tried to execute my daughter and her friend publicly. I won’t let you guys get off with the excuse of not knowing, you know? Indiscriminate terrorism is something like that, isn’t it? You guys tried to push for your own conveniences, indiscriminately. And then among those people there was a relative of a monster. That’s why you guys die. That’s all there is to it. Think of these in your mind, ‘I have done something stupid huuh’, ‘I failed huuh’, and then die.」



In the living room of the Nagumo family, Hajime and the others were enjoying tea time while watching a special news report. If it was asked what kind of special news it was, then naturally, it was regarding the simultaneous terrorisms that occurred in America the other day and the many miracles at those attack sites.



The male presenter was moving the news report forward with a voice and expression that looked excited.



「Now then, there were existences that changed the many tragedies that were caused by the cowardly terrorists on that day into miracles that will remain in history. Many people killed and wounded were healed by holy light, a passenger plane that was protected by golden light just before it crashed, the hostages that were on the verge of execution were saved from the terrorists by flying kicks and a giant hammer, the president was protected by someone using a single katana……just what in the world were those women? No, just what in the world were those existences? Were they secret agents of the country? Such opinions also seem to exist, but no matter how, it was unimaginable that what they had done was the work of a human. It-was-truly, the work of god! Many people who witnessed them had spoken unanimously.」



There, the male presenter put a long pause before,



「They spoke that those women were exactly “goddesses” that descended to this world.」



Kaori and Shizuku fell prostrated on the table. Their ears were dyed bright red. When Hajime sniggered, the news report moved to the recording of the interview of the witnesses.



A young man of the rescue squad that was carrying out the rescue operation at a destroyed airport was answering the interview in an excited state.



「Eh? You are asking me what I think of the woman’s true identity? Such a thing is obvious. She is a goddess, a goddess that is overflowing with kindness. If possible, I want to know her name but, no, that is too disrespectful perhaps. At any rate, that person is too beautiful, noble, and warm. The light that rained down on those injured people, it was truly divine. That was――」



The interview cut off. Surely if that young man was allowed to keep talking, then he would keep at it even for several hours. The screen changed back to the male presenter.



「He was really excited, wasn’t he! But that too is only natural. Clad in whitely violet light, with a beautiful pair of wings, raining down the light of healing that resurrected even the dead. Furthermore, she appeared almost at the same time at multiple locations that were damaged by the terrorisms, protecting the people with warm light. This existence that cannot possibly be human has been called with a certain name by the people, and this program will recognize that given name. Now, everyone in the studio, and then, you who are in front of the television, let’s extol that great existence! Her name is――Angel of Kindness!」



「「「「「Angel of Kindneesss!!!」」」」」



Kaori sunk down. She crouched while plugging her ears and entered the posture of seeing no evil, hearing no evil, and speaking no evil. It appeared the limit meter of her shyness had already surpassed its max number.



Wasting no time, Yue was making a sadistic expression while she was trying to make Kaori stand up and watch the television. After giving a glance at Kaori who was saying ‘no no’ with her head shaking in refusal and Yue that kept pulling on her, Hajime and the others then paid their attention to the next interview in the news program.



The one who made the next appearance was the unit members that belonged to the coast guard of the West Coast (TN: I realize that at the beginning of the chapter it said East Coast. But it was written West Coast now here.).With body and hand gestures, they excitedly spoke about how tremendous the existence that saved them before protecting the city from the missiles.



And then, they said it. With their mouths in unison, they called that existence as――



「「「「「It was Gozira-!!」」」」」



Like that.



「Why――!! No matter where and how thou see it, it was a dragon, wasn’t it!? It was a legendary existence that everyone loved art not it!? What’s with this fictitious character treatment!!」



Tio went ‘UGAA―’ while standing up in protest. However, the coast guard members in the television were all greatly excited saying「Thank you Gozira!」「We won’t forget Gozira forever.」「Gozira-tan, haa haa」「Gozira, FOREVER」extolling Tio=Gozira.



「Oh maaan, who ever thought that Gozira really exists! And, it appeared at the same time as the angel, and saved the people……the world is just too lovely! Does everyone also think so!? It will come you know; it will absolutely come you knoow~. The GO-ZI-RA Boom is coming-!!」



The tension of the male announcer was already reaching ecstasy. And then, the tension of Hajime and Shuu who had anticipated the coming boom and had already bought a lot of the stock of the company that was selling Godzi○ goods were also in ecstasy.



The next interview subject was the army colonel that was stationed in the Middle East. When the colonel was asked, just what he thought about the kind of existence that had annihilated the large scale army of the terrorist organization attacking his garrison, the colonel floated a nihilistic smile while answering.



「Fuh. That’s obvious. He was a demon――no, he was the demon king-sama.」



Hajime spurted out the black tea he was drinking. No, certainly he was called as demon king, but he had never imagined that of all thing he would also be called with that name here in earth too……his cheeks were cramping from that. The colonel inside the television was passionately speaking just how merciless, ruthless, unreasonable, and overwhelming Hajime was, how mere humans were like trash compared to that existence. It was as though the colonel was being possessed by a demon.



「Whoops, it feels like this program will be banned if we broadcasted more than this, so let’s finish the interview with the colonel there. It’s concerning what will become of the colonel from here on though, isn’t it! Now then, it seems that this man who repelled an army of the terrorist organization by his lonesome has many female fans with their number rapidly increasing. For some reason, all recording of this man is blurry which caused us not to be clear about his appearance, but the girls all over the world are going heart-eyed from that mercilessness you know. It seems there is even a fan club formed up already!」



The high tensioned yell 「How enviouuus!」of the male presenter, and then the calm yet excessively cold gazes that were in contrast with that yell, were all stabbing Hajime. Hajime was pretending not to notice anything while he drank his black tea once more.



「But, his popularity among men is also not losing! The gays from all over the world also seem to go heart-eyed. Really, my condolences!」



「Buhoh」



Hajime spurted out his black tea. And then, he was sunk by the kisses and fierce winks that seemed like they were making *bachikon* sounds thrown at him from across the screen by the many “big sis” who were excessively wriggling and acting flirtatiously despite their muscular build. Hajime fell prostrated on the table with a *gon-* sound that sounded painful.



While Kaori, Tio, and Hajime were plainly receiving damage, the news continued with the interview of the pilot that witnessed Yue; he was making a statement that sounded like he was somewhat awakened to lolicon, the male presenter wasted no time to cut that off before moving onto the last interview with the president who was treating Shizuku as a Valkyrie. Furthermore, the male presenter mischievously disclosed how the bodyguards of the president had formed a fan club for the black haired Valkyrie, causing Shizuku to turn red greatly.



「I have done the information manipulation and recognition manipulation through the net on a world scale, so no one will know that those people are us but……in the end, we still received damage huh.」



Hajime’s tired words were nodded by the people who had saved the world and now were drinking tea in the living room of the Nagumo house.



「Come to think of it, Myuu. After that, what happened to your friend? Just in case, at that time I took out Myuu from the recognition of the children that were in that place but……that child named Natalia is the only one whose recognition I didn’t tamper with. Will it become a problem?」



On that day, Hajime applied the measure on the children that Myuu saved so they would only remember that a blond haired girl annihilated the terrorists while making them forgot that the girl was Myuu. Hajime used a silver tube artifact to go flash on the children. That thing which was exclusively used by the black suited agents who protected the earth from alien.



But, regarding Natalia, with Myuu’s wish and the strong hope of the person herself, she was not given the recognition manipulation treatment. Natalia herself also promised that she wouldn’t reveal anything about Myuu to other people no matter what. Just in case there was a situation where for example someone knew about Myuu and tried to do something to Natalia, Natalia was given an artifact to make other people believe the girl’s deception as truth.



「Yep, no problem nano. But……」



「But? Is there something?」



「Uu~n, perhaps it’s just Myuu’s feeling but, it feels like the way Na-chan is looking at Myuu has changed……」



「……Like how?」



「It’s like, Altina-san when she is looking at Shia-oneechan……」



「Myuu, cut off your relationship with Na-chan, right now.」



「It’s fine nano. Because Na-chan’s face looked satisfied when Myuu gently patted her, and she immediately returned to the usual Na-chan.」



「……I see.」



Hajime’s expression turned into one where he couldn’t say anything. Shia was directing a gaze that was shuddering at Myuu while saying「Myuu-chan, has she surpassed me before I realized it……」. It appeared that Myuu was steadily climbing the stairs of “wrong person”.



「Ah, that’s right, papa. Have you flashed Emile-kun too properly nano?」



「Hm? I don’t know which one is this Emile that you refer, but all the children at that place other than Natalia, every one of them has been treated for sure. What’s the matter?」



「……Emile-kun, for some reason, he remembers about Myuu nano. It looks like he doesn’t know that the one who was fighting at that time was Myuu, but he remembered that Myuu was there as Na-chan’s friend, and it looked like all this time he was contacting Na-chan saying that he wanted her to let him meet Myuu. Although Na-chan is refusing it all.」



「……Hou.」



It appeared, the youth Emile was unable to forget the battling fairy of that day. Strangely he was remembering Myuu and seemed to wish for a reunion. Surely it would be boorish to ask what kind of feeling that drove him to do so. After all, if it had to be said, then it was the case of ‘Boy meets girl”.



The doting parent papa Hajime who guessed that emitted a voice that sounded a level lower than usual. He was thinking, so there was one more pest that was approaching his beloved daughter. Since Myuu was advancing to elementary school, the number of pests that were approaching Myuu was increasing day by day.



Young Emile, now what to do about you, was what papa Hajime was beginning to ponder. Myuu who was seeing Hajime being like that looked excessively happy, and she cheerfully sat down on Hajime’s lap. And then, she looked up at Hajime with a wide smile while speaking.



「Papa doesn’t need to be that worried. Myuu will forever be papa’s Myuu nano.」



「Mu, that’s, well, I don’t have any intention of doing anything about such a brat though……」



「Papa, Myuu said that Myuu understands.」



「……」



Hajime was making a troubled face and turned his gaze at Yue and the others asking for help, but before his face could move, Myuu’s small hands caught Hajime’s cheeks from two sides and fixed Hajime’s gaze on herself.



And then, while she was showing a bewitching smile that reminded him of a certain someone somewhere,



「It’s better for papa to think, that you won’t be able to escape forever nano.」



「……」



She said such a thing.



Hajime thought. In this five years, Yue’s magic, Shia’s taijutsu and war hammer art, Tio’s whip art, Kaori’s twin swords art, Shizuku’s Yaegashi-style, and then, Hajime’s gun-kata were all learned by Myuu at a high level. Originally, the sea dweller race didn’t have a body that was particularly excellent in battle, yet regardless of that Myuu had achieved all those.



That was surely because all the cheat characters around her taught Myuu their essence to her without sparing anything, and Myuu who trusted and adored those girls from the bottom of her heart was seriously working hard, but even with those factors, Myuu’s learning rate could still be praised without reserve.



Perhaps because of that, Hajime hallucinated, of his own figure that was being held down by Myuu even after he used all the methods in his possession and yet he still got outdone……



(No, no way that could be……)



「Nmyu?」



With a surprising switching speed, her bewitching expression of just now had gone somewhere, Myuu had returned to the usual innocent Myuu with her tilting her head, that appearance……



For some reason, it caused Hajime to shudder with a sudden shaking.



AN: The New Year holiday will end soon too.



Let’s work hard throughout this year too!





Chapter 193




The after story is written as the author pleases (the main story was also haphazard though), so the chronological order is also all over the place. Perhaps it’s hard to read, but please treat it well.



「I wonder……what to do about the marriage ceremony?」



In the living room that was illuminated by the bright sunlight, Sumire, who was drooping limply on the sofa, whispered to herself.



This day was a holiday for the society. However, Sumire was a famous manga artist from the beginning and didn’t have a holiday. In order to sail across the time of judgment with the name of the deadline that was approaching her today too, she class changed into a zombie and headed to her workplace, but……in the end, Sumire, who ran out of material, couldn’t advance, and instead of sulking in bed she was sulking in her house acting sluggishly.



At present, Hajime and Shuu weren’t at home, only the female camp of Yue and the others were home. What was unusual was that despite Hajime going out he left behind Yue and the others.



Hajime and Shuu were going to a meeting regarding the new game that was being created by Shuu’s company, but putting aside Hajime, who was recognized as an important battle strength even while he was still a student, for Yue and the others who only had meager knowledge about games, they couldn’t participate in the meeting just with the reason of wanting to be together with their lover, that was the surface reason.



In addition, today Myuu was also going out. It appeared she was taking along her friends(underlings) in the kindergarten to make clear of their position with the kindergarteners from the neighboring town. When Myuu got out of the house entrance, Myuu said「Today is the decisive battle nano. Myuu will teach those pretentious kids, just where their place in society is nano」with a fearless smile; just who she was taking after……such a question didn’t even need to be asked.



Because of that, Kaori and Shizuku were also invited into the house, and they spent a laid back holiday with only the females but……



That silent explosive which Sumire threw brought about a ripple that by no means was small among the females. Above their head, there was the “!?” mark floating like a certain soldier, who loved using cardboard boxes, when he was discovered by an enemy soldier, and they turned their gaze to Sumire with a momentum that seemed to give off the sound *bat-*. It was only Yue who was drinking black tea while directing a gaze at Sumire as though she was looking at a somewhat good-for-nothing person.



「E, err, Kaa-sama? What do you mean by just now?」



Shia represented everyone and asked the true meaning of Sumire’s whisper. In response to that, Sumire sluggishly raised her face that was buried on the sofa and opened her mouth with a really uneasy expression.



「There is no deeper meaning to it, Shia-chan. Sooner or later, we intend to hold a grand wedding ceremony of Hajime with Shia-chan and the others, but as expected, it’s impossible for all of you to do it, right? See, in this Japan, a country with a constitutional government, polygamy is prohibited by law.」



「Ce, certainly……」



Shia nodded up and down. Kaori and Shizuku went「Hm?」and tilted their head, they were about to open their mouths to say something, but Sumire’s words continued to forestall them.



「Everyone’s parents should absolutely want to see their daughter in a wedding dress too. But, how sad, based on the law of Japan, there can only be one bride in the wedding ceremony……that is to say, there is only one person among you that can wear a wedding dress!」



*zugaaan!* While lighting was roaring behind her back, Sumire loudly yelled the shocking truth(?). Shia and Tio, and also Kaori and the rest made a face that seemed to say「What did you say――!!」. Shizuku was about to make a retort at what Sumire pointed out but……



「Shizuku-chan……don’t you want to wear a wedding dress?」



「Wh? N, no, Sumire-san. That is, that, of course, I want to wear it, but……」



Sumire firmly grasped Shizuku’s shoulder and asked that question to her while peering at her face from really close. After hearing that question, Shizuku’s body leaned back from the pressure and expressed her honest feeling. As though taking advantage of that opening, Sumire’s verbal attack was not stopping!



「Shizuku-chan. Also, Remia-chan who is acting ‘my my ufufu’ over there, and also Yue-chan who for some reason is staring at me with a lukewarm gaze as though I am a good-for-nothing person. Everyone too also wants to wear a wedding dress, don’t you? You want to walk along with Hajime on the wedding aisle wrapped in the ceremonial dress, don’t you?」



「That……yes.」



「……Nn. Of course, Okaa-sama.」



「I also feel the same here, Okaa-san.」



Sumire nodded with ‘yep yep’, however, immediately after, she looked up above with a gesture that was excessively dramatic.



「Isn’t that right. But, only one person can do that. And then, about the marriage registration, that is the notification for the sake of being seen by the people outside as Hajime’s wife, it’s also only one person who can have that……in this Japan, only one person can be formally recognized as Hajime’s wife.」



After saying that Sumire ran her gaze over Yue and the others with a sad expression. And then, Shia and the others, when they heard the words「There is only one person among these people here who will be Hajime’s formal wife」they sent each other gazes containing slight nervousness at each other. Amidst such an atmosphere, Sumire released those words that would push the Nagumo family down into chaos on this day.



「Now, I wonder, who among these women is truly worthy to be Hajime’s wife? I wonder, as his mother, who should I choose? Hey, all of you, Hajime’s “self-proclaimed” wives?」



「「「「!?」」」」



Shock ran through the body of Shia and the others!



Self-proclaimed――that word deeply, truly deeply, pierced their chest. Indeed, they hadn’t submitted any marriage registration or even held the ceremony. No matter how much they insisted that they were husband and wife when seen from the eye of the society, there was no proof of that. The word “self-proclaimed”, for some unknown reason, caused a violent discomfort to well up to the point that they couldn’t negate it!



「Ka, Kaa-sama-! What, what should I do desu!?」



「Ah, Shia, that’s unfair! Okaa-san! I will do my best for Hajime-kun’s sake! That’s why!」



「E, ee, me too, I’ll do my best so……」



「Hmmm, I too, perhaps it wouldth be soon the time to show mine seriousness.」



Shia, Kaori, Shizuku, and Tio, who got all flustered and shook up, gathered around their mother-in-law and begged for her teachings. Even Yue and Remia, who had somehow guessed Sumire’s ulterior motive, only slightly exchanged glances and troubled smiles before closing in on Sumire’s side.



Sumire was smiling complacently inside her heart looking at her obedient(?) daughters-in-law. However, she didn’t show even a speck of the inside of her heart, and then with a force that seemed to make a sound *zubishi-* she thrust up her finger. And then, she proclaimed.



「Yue-chan, Shia-chan, Tio-chan, Kaori-chan, Remia-chan, Shizuku-chan! Do all of you want to wear a wedding costume at Hajime-sideee――!」



Naturally, the wives replied back「Oo~~~」in high spirits.



「Do you waaant, to be seen as Hajime’s wife by the neighbooors――!!」



Naturally, the wives replied back「Gung ho, gung ho, gung ho!!」in high spirits.



「Do you waaant~, to have your name written in the marriage registratiooon―――!!」



Naturally, the wives replied back「Uu~raaraaraaraa―――」in high spirits.



The trivial things already didn’t matter.



After that, with Sumire’s incitement, Yue and the others progressed the preparation for the sake of「The deciding match of who is the most worthy as the wife in the Nagumo Family!」.



In the evening, Hajime and Shuu finished their work and went home. They were passing through the house entrance while talking about this and that regarding the meeting today about the new game production, and they put their hand on the entryway’s door. And then,



「I’m home~」



「We’re back~」



They said the returning home greeting while opening the door……



「……Nn. Welcome home, dear, Otou-sama.」



「Welcome home desu!」



They were welcomed, by Yue and Shia who were only wearing frilly pure white small aprons. Shuu spoke「O, oo!?」from the side, but in the next instant, 「pugeh」a scream was raised, and he crumbled down. The swift inescapable attack from his son sent his consciousness flying.



「What are, you doing, Yue, Shia.」



Those figures of pure white, tight, beautiful legs and slender arms and shoulders, and then, the breasts that were bared by more than half, which was too lascivious, caused Hajime’s cheeks to cramp up while asking.



「……Of course, toward the husband who has just worked hard and returned home――」



「The wife welcomes him with her all desuu.」



「With a naked apron?」



「「With a naked apron.」」



Yue and Shia twirled on the spot. Their naked back and jiggling butts were shown to Hajime.



「You aren’t happy?」



「Is this a failure desu?」



Yue and Shia tilted their heads while confirming to Hajime. Naturally, Hajime bowed his head saying「Thank you very much」. It was the sad nature of man. Seeing such a Hajime, Yue and Shia asked him something strange「From 1 to 10, what is our score?」. Even while feeling suspicious, Hajime answered「Full score」without hesitation.



Yue and Shia took a guts pose「Yosh-」, then they took off Hajime’s coat and baggage before vanishing inside the room with their lovely butts exposed to him throughout.



「What is going on……」



While feeling as though he was watching a waking dream, Hajime shouldered his fainted father and opened the door to the living room.



There, this time it was,



「You guys too!?」



「uu, we, welcome, home, Hajime-kun.」



「We, we, welco――impossibleee, as expected I cannot endure this!!」



「My my, fufu. Welcome home, dear.」



「Yes, welcome home, Goshujin-sama.」



Kaori and Shizuku, also Remia and Tio were wearing naked aprons as expected while welcoming him home with a bow with their three fingers of each hand pressing on the floor. Hajime’s spontaneous retort caused Shizuku’s face to turn bright red from shame while she was rushing out of the room. However, it didn’t change the fact that she was wearing a naked apron, so it went without saying that her captivating jiggling butt was exposed to him.



「Uu, what, suddenly an impact hit my jaw……hah!? What is this place, is this Shangri-la abeshih-」



Shuu, who Hajime had discarded on the sofa, appeared to be opening his eyes, but as expected he received a swift, unavoidable attack that made him collapse with the white of his eyes exposed.



While glancing at Shuu, as expected a question of「The score?」from the wives came at him. Hajime livelily told「2 points」only to Tio before he said to Kaori and Remia「Full points」. Ignoring Tio who twitched before starting to pant, Kaori and Remia made a guts pose, and as expected they disappeared into the kitchen with their butts exposed to him.



「So, Kaa-san. What are you making them do this time?」



Hajime was sighing while asking Sumire, who was grinning broadly while making a cool pose for some reason in the corner of the room.



「My, what’s with that? You make me sound like I am a problem child. I am merely accompanying everyone in their homemaking training, you know?」



「This is the first time I heard that a naked apron is bride training.」



「Welcoming the husband home is also one of the creditable bride training. You see, Yue-chan and the others, right now they are competing with each other, you know? About who is the worthiest as the bride of the Nagumo family. As their husband, you have to watch them properly. The conclusion won’t be reached if everyone gets full points, so you have to grade properly! Okay!?」



「……」



Hajime was sending the most reproachful gaze he could make to Sumire. Before, the girls had done training for housework, laundry, and cooking as bride training. And now they were competing with each other after this late with abnormal ways like naked aprons; no matter how he thought about it this must be a prank. And the mastermind of this prank could only be one person in this place.



Hajime was about to question Sumire further, but at that time, Yue approached him with small steps. Her clothing was still the same.



「……Hajime, the preparation for dinner and a bath is finished.」



「O, ou, I see.」



「……Nn. So……」



Yue tightly clutched the fringe of her apron while fidgeting. If she did something like that, then the apron that had already been in a risky length from the beginning would be further rolled up and become something dangerous. Naturally, Hajime’s gaze was pulled to that territory like a monster who was being sucked into the mouth of a thunder dragon.



Toward such a Hajime, Yue mouthed that template speech.



「……Will you not take a bath, and do me? Or will you not take the dinner, and do me? Or else, will you do me, or do me?」



「……In the end, there is no option for me though……」



It was off by a bit from the template! As expected of Yue quality, but the matchless vampire princess wasn’t finished with just this level!



「Then, will you take a bath while doing me? Or else, will you have dinner while doing me?」



「What does that mean!?」



「……As expected, it will be embarrassing, doing it in front of Otou-sama and Okaa-sama. But, if Hajime wishes for it.」



「I don’t wish that! There is a limit even at being abnormal!」



「Myy, Hajime you! This pervert son!」



「Kaa-san, shut up a bit there!」



Hajime’s retort gushed out. On this occasion, he left alone Yue who was blushing while fidgeting with both her hands on her cheeks. For the time being, he should make her wear some clothes and recover the order in the Nagumo household. Hajime was about to act with that objective.



But, before he could do that,



「I, I cannot let, only Yue take the spotlight! Ha, Hajime-kun!」



「Ka, Kaori?」



Still in her naked apron, Kaori, who peeked out from the cover of the kitchen, leaped out as though she had been waiting for her turn. While she was fidgeting pigeon-toed looking embarrassed, she yelled with an expression that was filled with resolve.



「Won’t you eat me as dinner!?」



「What are you saying!?」



「What seasoning do you wanttt!?」



「Calm down-, what you are saying is just too lacking in common sense!」



「Myy, Hajime you! This Mr. gourmet master-」



「I’m going to throw you out of the house, Kaa-san!」



After that, Shia and the others similarly leapt out after that and were saying similar things which Hajime retorted back at severely. Sumire, who watched that, stirred up the place. Shuu, who recovered his consciousness with a ‘hah’, was made to sleep with a swift unavoidable attack, and in the end, it was one hour later before they could have dinner normally.



By the way, as expected everyone was wearing clothes when eating dinner. For some reason, everyone was wearing risqué cosplay appearances though……



In the middle of dinner, a young delivery service man was making a delivery, but he was startled by the blonde miniskirt police woman that came out from the house. He stepped back after seeing the miniskirt nurse that came out from behind the police woman saying「You forget the stamp heree」. Next, he sweated coldly due to the miniskirt shrine maiden that came in a panic saying「What are you two doing going out with that appearance!」. In the end, the young man expressed his gratitude「Tank ou hery much-―――」that was filled with various meanings with a red face and also panic.



At any rate, the cooking showdown had everyone make one dish; which then got judged by Hajime, and it went mostly peacefully.



「Haa」



「Nmyu? What’s the matter papa?」



In the bath, Hajime was washing the hair of Myuu who came home just before the dinner while unintentionally making a tired sigh. Myuu was tilting her head that was covered all over with bubbles.



「Myuu……grow up into a normal girl for me okay.」



「??」



「No, it doesn’t matter. Just forget it.」



Looking at his beloved daughter that was tilting her head in incomprehension, Hajime was smiling wryly thinking ‘just what am I saying’ before rinsing off the bubbles on Myuu’s hair.



But, at that time, Hajime’s senses detected the presence of several people approaching the bathroom!



「Wait, Kaori and also Shizuku, those two haven’t gone home yet?」



Before Hajime entered the bath, he had told the two of them that they should go back home soon. But regardless of that, Hajime could sense the presence of Kaori and Shizuku among the presences that were approaching; it made Hajime be at his wits’ end. Immediately after, the door of the bathroom was opened loudly. Just as he expected, there were the stark naked figures of Yue and the others boldly standing imperiously! Not even a single string was covering their bodies; it was to the degree that Hajime wanted to tell them to at least use a towel to cover their front. (For the moment, it was only Shizuku who was using a towel to hide her body.)



「……Nn. Now-」



「Charge desuu!」



「I won’t lose! The one who is the most skilled at washing Hajime-kun’s body is meee!」



「Ufufu, today is the day I’m washing the front.」



「Haa haa, Goshujin-sama, haa haa」



「……Pardon me.」



It appeared this was a competition about who could wash the body of the husband the best. Hajime’s eyes were twitching while he quickly headed to the bathtub and urged Myuu to follow. It was as though he was asking her if she could accompany him.



But,



「I won’t let you!」



Along with those words, *whoosh* Yue instantly appeared before Hajime’s eyes.



「Wai-, don’t use “Heaven Existence” in this kind of place!」



「Level X–」



「Maximum body reinforcement!? Ah, idiot, let go, this pervert rabbit!」



「Even me-, Limit Break-」



「What kind of limit are you planning to break, huh!?」



Hajime was completely surrounded by the vampire princess, the bug rabbit, and the angel mode maiden! Using that opening, Remia secured Myuu while Tio used wind magic to form a barrier and shut out the voices from leaking outside by laying out a veil of air.



Like that, in the next moment, the bathroom was turned into a battlefield. A battlefield of carnivorous maidens.



「Kuh, who can stay in this kind of place where there are only beasts! I’m going back to my room!」



While holding up a strange flag, Hajime slapped Tio severely to the point that it made her pant while he attempted to rush out of the bathroom. There Yue teleported, and Kaori activated her God Speed and leapt at his back while Shia clung on to his waist with her greatest body reinforcement. Because of his wet feet and the polished floor, Hajime slipped and fell down.



There Yue and the others jumped further at that chance; even the revived Tio also got on top of Hajime.



At the corridor of the Nagumo household, there was the figure of Hajime who was lying upside down while being covered with beautiful women and girls.



At the same time,



There was the figure of Sumire, cackling loudly while rolling on the corridor holding her stomach from seeing that situation.



Somewhere, *snap* the sound of something snapping resounded.



Right after that, Yue and the others raised「Aahn」coquettish voice. Their weak spot was fondled by Hajime. Strength reflexively left their bodies~, using that opening Hajime stood up. Kaori was saying something foolish「Hau, Hajime-kun’s Hajime-kun is in front of my eyes」, but he ignored that.



「Kaa-san, it seems that a family meeting is necessary between us. Also, it has to be an extraordinarily harsh meeting.」



「My, Hajime. I don’t think that such meeting is necessary though?」



「No, it’s necessary. ……The meeting for the sake of making Kaa-san reflect on yourself!」



Hajime’s store of patience had run out from his mother’s prank that was too much. He took a step forward. He intended to wrap his mother in a bamboo mat then hang her up for a night so she could reflect a little.



But, it seemed that Sumire had already predicted that action of Hajime’s. While saying「I’ve thought that this will happen!」with a triumphant look, she took out a vacuum cleaner that was leaning in the shadow of the corridor.



――Cleaning Artifact “Sniper Mark II”



By any chance, do you have the experience of sucking even the thing that must not be sucked carelessly when cleaning using a vacuum cleaner? It can become a cause that broke the vacuum, but opening the lid to fish it out every single time is troublesome, isn’t it? In that kind of time, use this. The next generation vacuum cleaner “Sniper Mark II”.



If you have this, you can select the target that you want to suck and the target that you don’t want to suck! Furthermore! If you put this to practical use, it’s even possible to suck the soy sauce or the remote control that is far away into your hand, just with a single push of a button! The next generation vacuum cleaner is already not limited for just cleaning in its utility!



The absorption force will never fall. The era from here on is the era of multiple absorption forces that suck only the prey you aimed for!



The vacuum cleaner (exclusive for the Nagumo household) that Hajime developed with such a catchphrase was held in Sumire’s hand.



In front of the suspicious eyes of Hajime, Sumire took out the degraded version Crystal Key from her breast pocket. It was handed over to her so in the case that something happened to his parents because of the matter of Hajime and the others, they could immediately teleport away.



Before Hajime could say「What are you」, Sumire stabbed the degraded crystal key to the front. Immediately the space distorted, and a gate materialized. At the same time, Sumire pushed the max mode button on the vacuum cleaner. Naturally, the powerful absorption force pulled on the target from inside the gate.



「Wha, wha, what!? What is going on!? Nooo――, I’m being pulleeeeeeed-」



Like that, a familiar scream could be heard, then from the other side of the gate, a petite female figure in a suit tumbled out. Sumire turned off the switch at the same time when that figure came out, but following the law of inertia, the female that leaped out from the gate rolled into the corridor of the Nagumo house, the figure finally stopped when her face crashed *munyu!* on the obstacle in front of her.



「……」



「……」



The female that rolled out from the gate and plunged into a certain thing with her face――Hatayama Aiko-sensei, wordlessly, slowly, pulled her face away from that place where her face was buried into. And then, looking at that thing dangling in front of her eyes that seemed to be familiar, she tilted her head while saying……



「Hajime-kun?」



「Aiko, can you spare me from you calling my name while looking at my crotch?」



「Hah!? Awawawawawa, I, I’m sorry~」



Yes, the rolling out Aiko, due to the momentum, her face landed on the son of Hajime that was currently standing imposingly stark naked.



Aiko instantly blushed hard while her mind was in chaos thinking ‘I don’t understand the situation!’. Looking from her suited figure, perhaps she had work regardless of the holiday and she only just came home. Despite so, she was suddenly made to teleport, and on top of that she dived face first into the crotch of her lover that was hidden from society except to some people……it was only natural for her to be astonished.



「Yo, you are wanting me and are using this kind of forceful method!?」, or「No, it’s not like I hate it but……waiting naked like this is a bit……」, or「Pe, perhaps I cannot go home tonight……」, it also couldn’t be helped if she was talking to herself like that, perhaps.



Anyway, after Hajime wrapped a towel on his waist, he ran his gaze around once more, but Sumire’s figure had already disappeared; he could only see the door of the entrance that was closing and a piece of paper fluttering midair. It seemed her plan was to make Aiko a distraction while she escaped. It was a splendid escape.



Hajime picked up the memo paper that fell at his feet, and his gaze fell on it. There,



『I received enough material. Thank you, very much. Mama is going back to her work now!』



Such a thing was written.



「Haa, I thought it was something like this……Yue, you noticed it already, right?」



Hajime was sighing to his mother’s deed while questioning Yue who was standing at his side unnoticed. In response, Yue nodded. Hearing that, Shia who had similarly recovered tilted her head and asked what Hajime meant.



「Look here, whether the wedding ceremony will be done one by one, or with everyone all at once, either is fine, but there is no rule that only one person can do it. Besides, if need be, we can also just do the ceremony at Tortus.」



「Aa~, now that Hajime-san mentions it that’s true isn’t it.」



「Besides, even the marriage registration, I have already faked the official papers about you all itself, so fussing about the marriage registration for everyone right now is meaningless, isn’t it? Something like the consistency of the data or whatever, it can be taken care of later as we please.」



「Now that you mention it, that’s true. Then, why did Okaa-san do something like a Bride deciding battle……」



「That’s obviously for her material collection. Just why do you think she was slacking off in the house this afternoon?」



In short, Sumire said whatever sounded appropriate to incite Shia and the others, and then the uproar that was caused due to that would be turned into the material for her manga that currently was reaching the limits. That was Sumire’s scheme.



Shia and the others thought that it was also their own fault that they got caught into the provocation thoroughly like that, but Sumire’s capability of letting out a flowing speech just by adlibbing like an agitator, it was just as expected from the mother of Hajime.



And then, Yue who noticed the intention of such Sumire still participated without really objecting was because,



「Today too was a fun day.」



「I see.」



That seemed to be the reason. For Yue, this kind of stupid uproar was also included in her lovely ordinary days. Something like boorish fair arguments could be tossed into the trash can. The satisfied expression of Yue made Hajime shrug「Well, then, it’s fine」.



「Say~, I really don’t understand what you are all taking about though……」



Aiko called timidly at Hajime and the others that were feeling warm and fluffy by themselves. Hajime glanced at Aiko and,



「My body got completely cold now……let’s enter the bath again. With everyone this time.」



Saying that Hajime picked up Aiko in a princess carry. 「Eh? Eh?」Giving a glance at Aiko who was in confusion, Yue and the others raised an「Oo~」in harmony and returned to the large bathroom of the reconstructed Nagumo house.



After that, including Aiko who was stripped by Hajime’s hand, Hajime and the wives relaxed and enjoyed the bath without particularly any competition.



……There was no one who paid any attention to Shuu who was still passed out in the living room.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.





Chapter 194




A famous foreign manufactured car (Mercedes Benz) that was reputed to be the firmest in the world was gallantly driving on the road along the coast. The car’s exterior, which was shining silver, showed how well polished it was, making anyone who saw it understand how much the owner cherished it.



Inside that car, the sea breeze flowed in from the opened window and the classic song, which was the favorite of the car owner, was playing making the time of the people riding that car to pass in relaxation.



「This sea route still feels pleasant every time we come here.」



Yes, the refreshing voice that expressed the feeling of this drive, was the driver of this car and also its owner――Shirasaki Tomoichi. He had hair that was lightly flowing down his back, long slitted and gentle eyes, and a balanced body type while his age was only that of being in the middle of his forties; just from his appearance, he was a handsome man that could pass as a man that was still in his late twenties.



Sitting beside Tomoichi was a woman that nodded at Tomoichi’s words while saying「You’re right, no matter how many times we come here, this is a really good place.」, was Shirasaki Kaoruko. Looking at her straight black hair without any white hair, her droopy eyes, and the neat and clean atmosphere she was clad with, she was a woman that felt like a lady. She was the same as Tomoichi as her age was in the middle of her forties, but she still looked like a young woman in her late twenties.



Just like their family name showed, they were a married couple. Just from their atmosphere, it could be clearly seen how they had been building a satisfactory marital relationship.



But even while Tomoichi’s consciousness was concentrating on the driving, it didn’t seem like he was paying attention at his wife. Since before, he kept glancing at the rearview mirror and repeatedly paid attention to the rear seat. Even his impression of the drive just now seemed to be a bit forced if someone listened carefully, rather than saying that it was his true feeling it was more a lure for starting a conversation. And then, it was clear that the cause of that was the passenger in the rear seat.



Hearing no other response to his words other than from his wife, Tomoichi coughed「A, ahem」, this cough also seemed to be forced, and then he once again formed his words to try to attract the attention of the person in the rear seat. This happened while his wife beside him was giggling at him.



「O, Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan, their ages are already quite old, so how about we move here soon? A home near the sea is nice don’t you think? Hey, what do you think? Kaori?」



「……Absolutely, no.」



The cold voice and words that came back caused Tomoichi to let out a small groan「Uguu」. He once more began repeatedly glancing at the rearview mirror to look at his beloved daughter――Kaori’s expression who was sitting in the back.



Kaori was emitting an assertion「I am displeased desu!」from her whole body while staring fixedly on the outside as though to say that she absolutely wouldn’t meet Tomoichi’s eyes. But even with such a super displeased mode being turned on, her posture, without putting her elbow on the window or crossing her arms, of having her two hands were put on her lap with her back straight, was really Kaori like.



Tomoichi attempted to talk further with an expression that looked a little desperate at Kaori.



「I, is that so? In the past, each time we came to play here, wouldn’t you always say ‘I don’t want to go home!’. Remember Riko-chan who lived next door, or your cousin Sakura-chan, you always played together with them, right? I think moving here is not really ba――」



「Then, isn’t it fine if Otou-san moves here alone?」



「!? No way!? That’s too much you know, Kaoriii!」



With a snap, Tomoichi turned around to the back seat. The Benz of the Shirasaki family was zigzagging! A string slap landed on Tomoichi’s face! Tomoichi’s face was forcefully faced to the front!



A call「Dear?」from Kaoruko that made Tomoichi fell a small but intense chill resounded inside the car. 「Forgive me」Tomoichi honestly apologized. Tomoichi knew really well that the true anger of his wife was like a production machine of trauma. In his dream, the Shiro Yasha-san was making an appearance! (TN: Shiro Yasha=white demon)



「Geez, dear you really……there is no way Kaori will accept that suggestion, right? There is Shizuku-chan, and also her friends at school back there.」



「Pe, perhaps that’s true but……」



Tomoichi’s eyes were swimming while he was still feeling the stinging pain on his cheek. Seeming very reluctant, he whispered「Even so, I think that idea is not bad though……」



Currently, the Shirasaki family was heading to the home of Tomoichi’s parents where both his parents and his older brother and his wife were living. Tomoichi’s elder brother and his wife had a daughter that was four years older than Kaori. That daughter was a really helpful daughter even though she could be a bit frank; she was an existence that was like a big sister to Kaori. The house was near the sea, so the two of them often played at sea together with Riko of the Ayasaki family who lived next door.



Kaori was an only child, and because of that she really idolized Sakura. When Kaori was little she often clung to Sakura while throwing tantrums and yelling「I don’t want to go home yet」. Due to that, Tomoichi was thinking, could Kaori possibly consider moving there even now……could she be distanced from that nasty shitty brat……and so on, but…….



Kaoruko, who seemed to grasp those thoughts dwelling inside of Tomoichi’s heart clearly, was giggling while speaking about the thing that Tomoichi didn’t want to hear the most. About the real reason why Kaori was displeased. About the young man that was the reason that Kaori absolutely wouldn’t accept moving from home.



「Besides, you see? There is no way that Kaori will leave the town where Hajime-kun is, don’t you think?」



「Stop it Kaoruko! This is our long-awaited family’s homecoming without any outsiders, you know!? Don’t say anything about that shitty brat who dares to make a pass at the cute angel of our family――」



「Otou-san?」



Tomoichi felt a chill at his back and twitched. He understood even without looking. This was a presence that really resembled his wife’s! It would be there if he looked back! The incarnation of fury that his daughter inherited from her mother before he noticed――the Hannya-san!



But, just with this much, Otou-san wouldn’t lose. For the sake of his beloved daughter, the apple of his eye!



「Ka, Kaori, calm down. My words just now were a bit poor. But, as expected Otou-san, about that bagwor――ahem-. That tras――ehem-. That shitty――」



「……I’m going home right now. I won’t listen anymore to what Otou-san has to say.」



「Nooo! Kaori, listen to what I’m saying! Otou-san is thinking about what is best for Kaori’s sake……」(TN: Here Tomoichi is saying nooo in English.)



「Otou-san is badmouthing Hajime-kun because Otou-san is thinking about what’s best for me? I never thought that Otou-san is that kind of person.」



「You are wrong, Kaori! Even Otou-san doesn’t want to say bad things about, Ha, Haji, Haji――about that guy. But, but still? While that bastard already has Kaori, he still made many other girls to serve him and open their legs for him; on top of that, instead of feeling guilty, he is acting defiant, you know? Do you think there is any father that can entrust his daughter to that kind of shitty bastard? No, such a father doesn’t exist! I’m telling this for your own good. Kaori, cut your relation with that cocky rubbish scum――」



「I hate someone like Otou-san so much!」



「Gahah!?」



Tomoichi, who was hit by the speech that would empty the HP of any father in the whole country if it was said to them by their daughter, caused the car to zigzag once more. With tears gathering at the corner of his eye, Tomoichi was leaking out the voice「No waaay, Kaorii, My Angeeeel~」looking really pathetic. (TN: The ‘my angel’ here is said in English.)



A few months after Kaori returned home from the other world, Tortus. Tomoichi and Kaoruko were already introduced to Hajime. From the beginning, before the summoning, Tomoichi and Kaoruko already knew that Kaori had a boy in her mind, but putting aside Kaoruko, from the start Tomoichi was already unable to stomach that boy――Hajime.



It wasn’t like Tomoichi had a clear reason. It was the feeling of a father whose treasured daughter might be taken from him, that feeling might even be called as a conditioned reflex. Tomoichi sometimes even bared his hostility toward Kouki and Ryutaro. If he acted like that even to the childhood friends of his daughter, then Hajime, who had started to live inside his daughter’s heart before he noticed, was already like his sworn enemy, that really couldn’t be helped.



Naturally, because this was Tomoichi, whose level as a doting parent had already reached the max value when Kaori disappeared, it was already a disaster for him. At that time, Kaoruko’s physical condition also worsened, but the Shirasaki family somehow held on by borrowing the help of the elder brother’s family and their parents, and also their whole relatives.



And then, his beloved daughter returned home like a miracle. They were told about the truth of the disappearance which scared them out of their wits from various things, and then they were shown many mystics in order to prove Kaori’s story, naturally all of those were a succession of astonishment for them but……there was a matter that was really hard to forgive, to the degree that all those absurdities seemed like trivial matter.



Yes, it was the matter about how his beloved daughter(My Angel) had made a lover.



Furthermore, that lover had several other lovers other than Kaori, he didn’t even have any intention to separate from any of those lovers, and in the end, he started talking about taking them all as wives. ‘Are you making a fool of me-, you bastard!’ Tomoichi roared angrily like that many times……



On top of that, the daughter in question was accepting of such a harem situation and making a really happy expression that even Tomoichi had never seen before. She was also saying things like ‘together with the other girls!’, and upon hearing that several times Tomoichi yelled angrily ‘You bastaaard, you are putting my daughter under some strange magic, aren’t you! No, it absolutely must be like that, you harmful pest-!’……



Furthermore, the speech that all the fathers in the whole country feared that someday might be said to them, no, the speech that the fathers had resolved they wouldn’t let any man say! ――「Father-in-law, please give your daughter to me!」, instead became「Father-in-law, I’ve received your daughter. Please take care of me from here on too」. When that curve ball was thrown to Tomoichi, he very naturally thought this, 「Yosh, let’s kill this guy」.



Everything was for the sake of his beloved daughter, to protect her from a bad man. Yet despite so, when he was about to punch the bastard, the one who pinioned him from the back was the daughter herself. While Hajime, who was about to be punched, kept sitting calmly and composedly. That self-assured attitude (Hajime himself was aware that he had something that was considered the worst, so he was only waiting to be punched) was also something he couldn’t stomach! Tomoichi was raging「This shitty bastarddd-, I’ll beat you to deathhhhh!」like that, but in the end was stopped by Kaori「Otou-san, calm dooooown!」with a suplex. Because Tomoichi lost consciousness, the meeting at that time was dissolved just but……



After that, Tomoichi knew that actually, Kaori had already climbed the stair of adulthood, which caused Tomoichi’s killing intent to climb without knowing a place to stop.



This time too, actually Kaori wanted to participate in the Nagumo family’s little gathering. But Tomoichi who thought ‘No way I’ll let my daughter go to the devil’s place’ hurriedly scheduled a visit to his parents and took Kaori along half forcefully.



When Kaori was in the middle of talking to Hajime about the arrangement, Tomoichi took away Kaori’s phone and said to the phone「Kaori has plans! She is going to spend her holiday with me! From here on too she won’t have any openings in her plans! Don’t call anymore, you scum bastard!」, and then he cut off the connection as he pleased.



Naturally, Kaori was getting angry at her father’s doing, but Tomoichi only looked aside with a huff and turned a deaf ear to Kaori. While that was happening, Hajime used telepathy to Kaori to tell her 「You should spend time with your family this time. Actually, I really understand how your father is feeling.」with a wry smile, and so Kaori reluctantly acquiesced to visit her grandparents.



Although, Kaori’s mood, who had her phone call taken over as it pleased on top of the fact that her lover had abusive language spouted at him, was at its lowest, so since they departed from their home, Tomoichi was desperate in currying favor to his daughter.



「Come on you two. Leave it at this; we are going to arrive soon, see?」



While smiling wryly at the cold war (one-sided) between father and daughter, Kaoruko intermediated between them. Just as she said before they realized it, they had entered a residential area, and in front of the car, a splendid house with two buildings that they were really familiar with began to become visible.



While being concerned about Kaori’s state, Tomoichi stopped the car at the shoulder of the road, in front of the house. In the middle, *garigari*, an ominous scraping sound that should not come from a high class car could be heard, but such a thing was only a trivial matter for Tomoichi who was hopelessly bothered over his daughter’s state. He left aside the expression of his wife that was looking like she had a headache.



Kaori immediately got out of the car without saying anything. Tomoichi also hurriedly got out of the car and took out the luggage from the car’s trunk.



「Kaori. Otou-san will carry the luggage for you!」



They planned to stay for three or four days, so Kaori’s luggage was in a Boston bag sized bag. Tomoichi carried the luggage while speaking smilingly, but Kaori walked briskly to him and tore off her luggage from him with a huff.



「It’s only until the entrance, Otou-san is too exaggerating. ……If it’s Hajime-kun, he will naturally bring the luggage without saying anything like that.」



「!? Is, is that so!? Ha, Haji……that bastard, earning a point in a petty way like that. (Hajime-kun, really is a considerate child isn’t he~)」



「……Haah. Dear, your true feelings and surface attitude are reversed there you know.」



Kaori averted her face ‘Puiihh!!’ from Tomoichi who was plainly leaking out his true feelings without hiding it at all, and then she ignored Tomoichi and walked away briskly. Tomoichi fell to his knees at the entrance of the house. His figure that was on all fours with his head hanging down was really inviting pity……



「……Just when I thought that you all finally arrived. Oji-san, what are you doing in that kind of place? The neighbors are looking, so I want you to stop doing that though.」(TN: Oji-san=uncle)



When Kaori was about to ring the chime of the door, a resident of the house, that seemed to come from the backyard while circling the house to the front, called with a voice that sounded exasperated and astonished.



「Sakura-oneechan!」



「Welcome Kaori. As always, it looks like it’s difficult for you involving various things, but I’m glad that you look energetic. Just relax slowly here.」



Kaori smiled widely at the owner of that voice――her cousin Shirasaki Sakura and embraced her.



Sakura, who was a female college student, had straight brown hair. She was a beautiful woman with a well proportion body like a model (TN: The words used here have the meaning beautiful, well-proportioned woman (body 8 times longer than the head)). The features of her face itself vaguely resembled Kaori, but the atmosphere she was clad in was basically cool. She felt like the so-called frank girl. Her hand was holding a hose that was trickling water, so surely she was just watering the garden before this.



Sakura’s cool gaze softened at her cousin that was like a little sister who leaped into her chest, and then she used her empty hand to caress Kaori’s head gently.



When she heard that Kaori was involved in a group disappearance, she was really worried to the point that she felt lost. Naturally, when she was notified that Kaori had come home, she immediately went to meet her directly. And so, different from the other distant relatives, she had already met with Kaori several times since Kaori’s return.



Even so, the society was still in commotion in regard to the topic of the returnees. The topic could be seen enough on the television, so as expected, it was something joyful to be able to see Kaori’s energetic face directly like this.



The sun had already gone down by this point. On the coastal street where the veil of night was beginning to fall, Kaori and Sakura were walking close to each other like true sisters.



「The live show was amazingly lively, wasn’t it? I don’t really go often to that kind of event, so I was really excited.」



「Is that so? Then that’s good. There were only local bands, so I wondered if it was strange for you.」



Kaori, who received a passionate welcoming at Sakura’s home, had passed a relaxing time there while talking to each other about their families’ recent state for a while. And then when it was evening, she was told that there was a live event of the local bands at the coastal venue starting at that time, so she was taken along by Sakura to attend at the live to kill time.



Sakura responded to her cheerfully smiling younger sister that she would be glad if Kaori was able to enjoy the show, however, Sakura’s expression was twitching a bit. The cause of that was one person. Sakura glanced over her shoulder behind them.



「Uu, Kaoriii. My angeeel. Can you make eye contact with Otou-san soon? Otou-san is going to die here from the loneliness.」



Yes, it was Tomoichi. For two women to go to a live show by themselves, they didn’t know what could happen to them. Giving that argument, Tomoichi went along with Kaori and Sakura, but the attitude of Kaori that treated him like he didn’t exist caused Tomoichi to make a contorted face that was about to cry. Furthermore, Kaori didn’t change her attitude at all even after looking at her father acting like that; instead, she was still smiling cheerfully, and looking at such a Kaori, honestly speaking, it was a bit scary.



The cold war between the father and daughter was definitely inflicting damage to Sakura’s stomach.



By the way, the reason Kaori was taking such an attitude wasn’t only because of the quarrel in the car, or Tomoichi’s accompaniment to the live show. Actually, when the families were talking at Sakura’s house, a topic about Hajime came up and urged by Sakura, Kaori made a call but……anyway what could be said was that Tomoichi bombed that phone call once more.



「……Hey, Kaori. How about you forgive Oji-san soon? Oji-san, he looks like he is seriously going to cry there. Honestly, having an uncle with a face that’s about to cry following behind you on the street at night, it’s scary.」



「Fufu, sheesh Sakura-oneechan. What are you saying? No matter where you look, there isn’t anyone like that here, you know?」



「Kaoriii! Otou-san is right here! Now, look here, please!」(TN: The ‘please’ is said in English.)



「See? There is no one, right?」



「Haa……」



Sakura’s stomach received further damage. For Sakura, if her cute little sister made a boyfriend, then she also wouldn’t be so accepting of that boyfriend. Therefore, it wasn’t like she couldn’t understand Tomoichi’s feeling. But, in reverse, to have a parent saying this and that about the person that she liked was……as a girl in the same position of being a daughter, she was also able to understand Kaori’s feelings. She was stuck between a rock and a hard place.



‘Geez, anything is fine, so won’t something happen that will end this father-daughter fight that has become quite troublesome’, when Sakura was running from reality by thinking that……



「Eehh? You girls there, you two were at the live show just now, right? What a coincidence! Want to talk a bit?」



It came. Inside her heart, Sakura held her head thinking「What kind of timing this is.」. Ahead of the gaze of Sakura, there was a group of youngsters with a really flashy atmosphere as though they were someone that really liked messing around. When judging from their similar appearances, there were about ten people. Sakura grandly made retorts, like why they were calling out to two girls when there were about ten people in their group, or whether they even saw the man who seemed to be the father behind the two of them. Of course, those were done inside her heart.



「My bad, but we have plans after this.」



「Plans? It’s plans to go play, right? Then, let’s go together yeah. The more, the merrier.」



Sakura politely refused, but the seducer group was grinning while surrounding Sakura and Kaori. No matter how they looked at this, it didn’t seem like they were planning to let the two of them go home merely. Because Sakura and Kaori were a beautiful woman and girl that really couldn’t be found that often in this area, these men wouldn’t give up that easily.



But, naturally, seeing his beloved daughter and cute nephew getting hit on, there was no way Tomoichi could just stay quiet.



「You all. My daughter just said that she doesn’t want to go with you. Now, open the way. We all just enjoyed a nice live show. Let both of our groups avoid any troublesome matter.」



「Aa, what is it, old man? Rather, your daughter? Eeh? By any chance, are you coming along with your daughter? Uwaa, that’s seriously disgusting.」



「Hey old man, being overprotective is no good. Is this what is called an over-demanding parent? Have some self-awareness. Seriously, how uncool.」



「Rather, the one harassing these two here is you old man. Seriously, realize that. Come on, you two too, let’s leave this stalker father and come play with us, yeah?」



The men who were trying to pick up the girls guffawed loudly from the words of Tomoichi who came to the front while verbally abusing Tomoichi. Hearing their words, Tomoichi didn’t even look particularly angry, far from that, he didn’t even show any fear being surrounded by more than ten people. He firmly said something more to stop the men from picking up girls more than anything but……



Perhaps feeling that Tomoichi, who was blocking their way, was irritating, one of the men passed beside Tomoichi and stretched his hand out toward Kaori.



「Can you not touch my daughter?」



「-, you really are noisy huh.」



Tomoichi suddenly gripped the man’s hand, his almond eyes quietly narrowed and he gave words of restraint. Tomoichi wasn’t particularly strong in a brawl. In his occupation, he was a first class architect, and there was no chance for his physical strength to be questioned in such an occupation. Even so, as an adult male who had piled up experience, furthermore, as a father who was witnessing someone trying to lay their hand on his daughter, the light of his eyes contained a considerable amount of pressure.



Therefore, the man was reflexively overpowered mentally. However, it seemed the man felt some shame from that fact, and his face immediately turned red indignantly. The man shook off the hand of Tomoichi that was grasping his hand, and at the same time, he hit Tomoichi.



Tomoichi let out a muffled voice, and something red oozed from the corner of his lips.



The man, driven by his indignation, swung his arm further, while the other men also stepped forward to further hurt Tomoichi who was a hindrance for them. Sakura was raising her voice to stop them while her fingers were gliding on her smartphone to contact the police, but it was at that moment,



「What are you all doing, I wonder? I wonder?」



Dread rushed through all the people in that place.



And then they noticed it. Before they even realized it, Kaori, who was already at Tomoichi’s side, had stopped the fist of the man that was swinging downward with one hand.



A chill that was impossible to understand lathered on their skin causing bumps and the strange situation of a girl smiling while stopping the serious punch of an older man with just one hand caused everyone to stiffen. In the middle of that, Kaori let out words with a flat tone that was the opposite of her smiling face.



「I’m asking you here, just what are you doing to my Otou-san, I wonder?」



「Wha, what the hell, are you!? Aa!? The father of you bitch was screwing around, so I was only giving him a lesson!」



The intimidating air that Kaori emitted caused the man whose fist was stopped to go into a frenzy while ranting. And then, the man’s other hand tried to strike in order to “give a lesson” to Kaori.



「Otou-san was screwing around? I guess so. Indeed, he is a troubling Otou-san who is always screwing around. He is overprotective, treating me like I’m still a small child. He immediately sulks if he is not paid attention to, and he keeps badmouthing Hajime-kun.」



「hrk, wha, what the hell-. This stupid strength-」



Kaori was talking with a small voice in a murmur, leaving the dumbfounded surrounding to lurch.



All the while gripping the two wrists of a man with a build far larger than herself.



From a glance, it was clear that the man was trying to pull his hands away with all his strength, but the hands holding him didn’t even twitch, as though he was being shackled with iron to a wall. Kaori’s words reached toward the man who was half falling into a panic.



「But you see, Otou-san is kind you know? He always thinks of me, no matter how busy he is with his work he always tries to make time to speak with me, he always protects me even though he is not strong in a brawl. When I worked hard, he praised me a lot, and when I made mistakes, he scolded me a lot.」



Kaori lifted her face. However, that gaze wasn’t directed at the man in front of her eyes. What she was looking at was Tomoichi at the side.



「……Otou-san, I’m sorry. I should have stopped it before you got hit. I recalled many things, so I was late to move. Thank you, for trying to protect me.」



「Kaori……」



Tomoichi only called Kaori’s name while looking at her wry smile. He could do nothing else but that. The reason was that his daughter’s figure was looking really grown-up for some reason. It was as though she was letting go of his hand; as if she had already left the nest since a long time ago. Even though they were in the middle of a situation like this, the loneliness that flooded his chest clogged up all his words.



Kaori moved his gaze from Tomoichi toward the men surrounding them, and then she let out her words along with an icy gaze.



「My father is the greatest father in the world. Don’t you dare, humans at the level of you all, make fun of him!」



「You bitch, let go of me alre――bugeh!?」



A kick that pointed to the sky was launched immediately after the angry yell. That kick impacted the jaw of the man whose both hands were gripped, and like that, that man was blown away like a joke in a parabolic arc.



The air returned to dead silence.



「If you all disappear right now, then I’ll overlook this.」



Kaori’s words resounded dignifiedly. A dainty girl was sending a young man with good physique flying with one kick――normally, the group of men would surely sense the abnormality of the situation; however, the difference in number between both sides and the common sense that said there was no way ten men could lose against a high school girl caused them to mistake their choice for the sake of their tiny pride.



The men were breathing roughly in agitation, their mouths hurled out unrestrained abusive language, and they adjusted their stance in preparation to attack.



「Yep, I guess it can only be like this. People like you all surprisingly all have the same pattern.」



Kaori lightly waved both her hands. Immediately, *kyakin!* a satisfying sound resounded, and two metallic poles appeared in both her hands. Those were extendable batons.



Kaori was wearing short sleeve clothes, which made anyone want to retort just where she hid those batons, but those who knew knew that it was great that what came out were only extendable batons, wasn’t it. Inside the ring that was attached with a crimson jewel dangling on Kaori’s neck, there were even brutal large swords that could easily split a great rock into two; those swords were exactly Kaori’s specialized weapon.



In the end, the two sword style using the extendable batons (Adamantium made-Lightning Clad enchantment) flashed on the coastal street at night; it became a fierce society study for the young men. Along with a trauma that wouldn’t disappear.



「Oji-san. It’s great, isn’t it? Kaori got angry like this for Oji-san’s sake. See, she is just like Oba-san. Please look at this goosebumps. It’s also like this when Oba-san is angry.」(TN: Oba-san=aunt)



「……Yo, you are right. Also, is, is it just my feeling? It feels like I can see “something” on Kaori’s back just like Kaoruko though.」



The last man ate a fierce blow at his butt that would make even a Thai kick look like mere child’s play; that man screamed「Aaa―――!!」while flying through the air. Sakura and Tomoichi were looking at that scene with a distant look and raised a dry laugh.



After that, Kaori tampered with the memory of the seducers with her own soul magic before she returned toward Tomoichi and Sakura with a really nice smile. It went without saying how Tomoichi and Sakura shivered altogether.



After that, seeing Kaori getting all fidgety looking like she wanted to talk with Tomoichi, Sakura read the mood and went back home first. Currently, Tomoichi and Kaori were walking silently with just the two of them on the path home.



「Otou-san, it doesn’t hurt anymore?」



「Yeah, it’s fine already Kaori. ……Magic is really amazing huh. You have shown it to me many times, so it feels too late saying this, but even now it still makes me feel admiration witnessing it.」



The wound on his lips had been healed by Kaori’s healing magic. Tomoichi said his thanks to Kaori with admiration just like he said. Feeling relieved hearing that, Kaori’s expression softened. And then, her gaze began wandering as though she was searching for words.



Seeing that state of his daughter, Tomoichi half-guessed just what she wanted to speak about and sighed inside his heart, then he urged Kaori to speak.



「Kaori, if there is something you want to say, then you can just say it as it is within your mind. After all, I’m the best father in the world. No matter what is it, I’ll listen to what you have to say.」



Kaori chuckled at the way her father spoke, and she opened her mouth.



「Say, I noticed this just now but……Hajime-kun, he resembles Otou-san doesn’t he-, that’s what I think.」



「……Can you pause there, Kaori? Even Otou-san has this thing called limit to what I can and cannot accept, you know? I’m similar to that harem man that is like a walking and talking haughty arrogance? I wonder, can Otou-san go out for a little bit of a journey? It’s okay; I think after finding myself for about a year, Otou-san will be able to stand up again.」



「Ahaha, that’s not what I meant. What I mean is not the current Hajime-kun, but the previous Hajime-kun.」



「The previous?」



Kaori nodded toward Tomoichi who showed a questioning face. And then, she narrowed her eyes in nostalgia and began to talk.



「Yes, previously. He couldn’t fight or anything at all, but when he thought that it was necessary, then he would step out without hesitation, that kind of weak but strong person. Yep, surely, that was why I became curious about Hajime-kun. Because, if I can be with a person that is similar with Otou-san, then I will be happy, I know that from looking at Kaa-san.」



「Kaori……. Right now, Otou-san’s feelings are really complicated. I’m happy but perhaps not happy……. However, that’s really hard to believe huh. That him, and the him of the past that Kaori talked about, I really cannot connect the two of them……」



「Isn’t that right. I too, when I reunited with Hajime-kun I was really shaken then. That was how much he changed. It was really terrible for him, to the degree that it was absolutely necessary for him to change. But, even so, deep inside he didn’t change. That’s why there are people that love Hajime-kun that much. A person who is merely insincere and like women, it would be strange if that kind of person is surrounded by that many people, isn’t it?」



「……Perhaps it’s just as you say. But, even so, as expected as a father it’s hard for me to consent. No matter who, if it is a father who has a daughter, then he will surely want to entrust his daughter to a person who will treasure her the most and only her.」



Tomoichi scratched his head looking troubled. Kaori took Tomoichi’s arm and then hugged him happily.



「Thank you, Otou-san. But, I have confidence. Indeed, it’s not just me alone that is with him, and I might not be the number one, even so, I’m confident that I can have happiness that won’t lose to anyone. Even though there are many people that are walking together with him, even so, I can puff up my chest and say I am cherished. Because, the person who had crawled up from the bottom of the abyss just with the thought that he wanted to go home to his important family, and defeated even god just because he wanted to take back his important person, such a person is the one who gave his promise to me, you know?」



Kaori showed Tomoichi the ring that was dangling from her neck. Different from the treasure warehouse, it was just a ring, but it was the eternal ring that was filled with the oath of her loved one.



After seeing that ring, Tomoichi’s expression turned extremely bitter.



「Otou-san. Hajime-kun, he is a person that will treasure every aspect of his important people, even the treasured people of that treasured people. That’s why he said that he wouldn’t give up no matter how much Otou-san hates him. He told me that he would treasure Otou-san and Okaa-san too.」



「……」



「That’s why, I understand that this is not normal, that this is something outlandish, but it’s fine even if it will take time. I want Otou-san to treasure Hajime-kun too. I want Otou-san to treasure my treasured person too.」



Kaori’s words rode the flowing night wind that carried the aroma of salt and vanished. Tomoichi’s expression was still bitter without any reply. If anyone looked at his eyes, they would be able to see a horrible discord whirling inside.



The long silence was continuing. Only the sounds of footsteps and sea waves were resounding in the ears of the two.



It was unknown how much time had passed, but before long Tomoichi deeply and grandly sighed. Toward Kaori who was staring at Tomoichi anxiously, his shoulders dropped while one of his hands held out to Kaori.



「Kaori. Can you contact that guy……Hajime-kun for me?」



「Otou-san……yes, wait a little bit.」



Kaori took her smartphone and called Hajime with a few rings. Hajime, who answered the phone, was told by Kaori that Tomoichi wanted to talk. Hajime consented readily without sounding particularly worked up. Hajime’s attitude that sounded composed caused Tomoichi’s face to turn bitter once more. Kaori handed over the smartphone while smiling wryly at that expression of his father.



「……It’s me.」



『It has been a long time.』(TN: Hajime used extremely polite language here.)



「Hmph! We just met around two months ago. Saying it has been a long time from that……it appears that within you, the matter of me is just like a mere stone at the roadside, huh.」



『No, that’s unthinkable. The family of Kaori is as important as a jewel for me.』



「Hmph! As always, it’s only your mouth that keeps spouting out pretty words, isn’t it? Is that how you trick my daughter?」



『Never. If pushed to say, then I think it is me who got caught.』



「Hmph!! Is this that? 『Not really, I am not really feeling anything here, but Kaori said that she wants this no matter what sooo, I’ll just give it a try』That’s what you think huh! Just what in the world are you――」



「Otou-san?」



「I’m sorry.」



When Tomoichi heard Hajime’s voice, his hostility flooded out like a conditioned reflex. At the same time, when he heard「Otou-san?」from his daughter, he also let out words of apology from a conditioned reflex. He wasn’t a mere father. He was a trained father.



While keenly feeling the gaze of Hannya-san from the side, Tomoichi cleared his throat while trickling cold sweat and opened his mouth once more.



「Ahem-. That, see, today, I called because……well, I too have various things in my mind. A father that has a daughter, no matter what, he cannot be gentle toward the man who is the partner of said daughter.」



『I understand. After all, I too have a daughter that makes me resolved to be a father. If I am in your position, and my daughter brings along a man like me, then there is no doubt that I will break all the bones in his body and bury him inside concrete, and in the end, I will throw him in the middle of Pacific Ocean.』



「Eh? Ah, yeah, tha, that’s it. I, I too, am thinking of doing at least that much, yup, to such a man, you know?」



『Yes. That’s why I understand how your blood must be seething. So much, that you must be thinking that you want to drop a nuclear bomb on me right now even if it drags the surroundings into it; that you want to dye everything in dark red, isn’t that right?』



「…………………Yo, you really got it huh!」



This time Tomoichi was trickling cold sweat from a different meaning. Hajime’s hostility was too extreme that far surpassed him. Furthermore, just by imagining the imaginary loved one of that daughter who might appear in the future, Japan might fall into a pinch in the future. Tomoichi was thinking, 「Ee? Isn’t the scale of hostility a bit too different from mine?」, which caused him to succumb to a complicated sense of defeat.



「Ahem-. It feels like I somehow came to understand really well how you are thinking, so let’s put this matter aside for a bit. More than that, I want to confirm something with you.」



『Yes.』



「You don’t have any intention to separate with Kaori. Conversely, you also don’t have any intention to separate from the other girls. You are planning to remain married with them all for life, and you don’t have the intention to bend that will. Isn’t that right?」



『It’s just as you say. I understand how such a thing is outlandish, how it goes against ethics, and how there are people like you who think unpleasantly of such a thing. But even knowing that, let me say it once more. Everyone, they all are my wives. That will of mine won’t bend. No matter what can possibly happen from here on, I won’t yield that will at all. My deepest apologies, but I will stick to this will for my whole life until you can possibly accept it.』



「tsk, you are brazenly acting defiant huh.」



『I will do everything in my power so that someday, you can possibly accept this as sincerity and determination of my own way.』(TN: The way Hajime used you to call Tomoichi here is also done in the politest way.)



Tomoichi’s hand that was holding the smartphone tightened. His fury was welling up hearing that nonsensical thing being spoken so brazenly. However, he saw the eyes of his daughter that was staring fixedly at him from the side, and then Tomoichi sighed once more to let out the heavy thing inside his chest.



「I really want to punch you flying right now, you know? The ideal future for me is that I won’t see your face anymore with my daughter, completely forgetting you once and for all.」



『I guess so. The troubling thing is, I understand your feelings painfully well. I also understand how it must be irritating for you that I am acting sympathetic like this. This is really a highly difficult problem, even more than adventuring in another world that was filled with death and absurdity.』



「I don’t know about the absurdity of another world, but there is not even a single doubt in me that this is the greatest trial that I have ever faced in my whole life. Aah, really, just why did my daughter encounter you in the past?」



『Surely, that’s because there is no one who can stand superior to this mean world.』



「No doubt about that. Good grief, this world really makes me go through something uncalled for. ……However, what is really, reall~y unfortunate is………………………………my daughter, is happy with this, with an expression so lovely that I have never seen before.」



『……』



Tomoichi stood still there. His parent’s house had come into view. But he couldn’t muster any will to enter the house like this. First, there was something that he had to ask, for the sake of the words and wish of his daughter that he had heard in this night, and above that, for the sake of producing a conclusion inside himself.



「Let me ask this to you, the shitty bastard who is trying to have your own way for a screwy future. Can you vow, that you will able to make, my daughter, my Kaori, to keep having that kind of expression forever? Can you vow, that she will be able to throw out her chest, and declare without hesitation that she is happy, can you make her continue to be that kind of girl forever?」



On the other side of the phone, Tomichi felt that the atmosphere suddenly changed. It was something that made Tomoichi feel Hajime’s serious feelings beyond any doubt before even hearing his next words……



『If it’s that vow, I have vowed it since a long time ago. This life is for that sake. It will never change, no matter what.』



「……」



Standing still in place, Tomoichi looked up to the sky. While feeling the gaze of his daughter that was looking up at him, he repressed the excessive urge to yell「BASTAAARDD――――!!」inside him. And then, breaking the silence, he formed the words while feeling a strange sense of defeat; he summoned up all his strength to the limit, in order to grant the earnest wish of his daughter.



「……Next time, come to my home. You can have dinner there.」



『……Thank you very much. I will surely visit to trouble your hospitality.』



An impact run through Tomoichi’s arm. When he looked there, Kaori was hugging Tomoichi’s arm with a full smile. With a small voice,「Otou-san, thank you. I love you!」she sent him the greatest words for a father. His feeling that almost made him scatter bloody vomit from working up the sentence just now, and also his murky feeling, all those feelings were somewhat cleared up if he could receive such words.



At the same time, when he thought that he received those words due to Haijme’s existence, as expected, he couldn’t help but feel a sense of defeat.



「Do, don’t you misunderstand! It’s not like I recognize you or anything! Until the end, I’m just thinking of keeping an eye on you for a bit, that’s all there is to it, don’t you dare make Kaori sad even for a bit! If you dare do that, then it will be that, that! It will be concrete and the Pacific Ocean and Nuclear I tell you!」



『Haha, that’s really terrifying. I will engrave those words deep in my heart.』



Tomoichi’s speech that was just like a tsundere caused Hajime and also Kaori to leak out chuckles reflexively.



It was at that timing when the talk almost end with a good feeling,



『Goshujin-samaaa~. Thy beloved servant has returned~. For the reward, please, chastise mine butt a lot toniiight!』



From the other side of the phone, some kind of voice that was filled with a mix of excitement and charm resounded. The moment that voice became audible, the atmosphere of Hajime changing into astonishment could be felt transmitted through the phone receiver.



『Tio, you, how did you come back!? Even though as the punishment of making merry in front of my Jii-chan and others before this I had wrapped you in a bamboo mat and tied you up to a missile before launching it……』(TN: Jii-chan=grandfather)



『Of course, it’s obviously by crawling back without untangling Goshujin-sama’s love(rope)! The kindness of not exploding the missile……if I didn’t answer that kindness, how could I be Goshujin-sama’s servant!』



『That’s a lie right……I sent you flying until the other side of the mountain; you shouldn’t be able to come back without crossing through the downtown……』



『Yes! When the people saw this crawling figure, that art like a caterpillar, cheers(screams) were raised everywhere. As expected even I felt shy. Furthermore, the authorities came out, so I traveled with a higher speed; everyone was already loudly cheering(pandemonium) then.』



『You are making a new urban legend in the city where my Jii-chan is living……』



『Now, grant the prize to me who hath worked hard in coming back. Specifically, a reward using that black, hard, and large thing, to chastise mine butt! Recently, Goshujin-sama didn’t do it much, so it feels lonely!』



『You stupid idiot! What kind of thing are you running your mouth about with that loud voice!』



Of course, the perverted exchanges that were done with loud voice were properly transmitted through the phone, to the father and daughter with cleared feelings.



「……Oi, perverted bastard.」



『! ……This is a misunderstanding desu. Give me a chance for explaining――』



「You think I’ll give you a chance? You think I’ll let you? Fufu, isn’t it strange? Aa, you are really, a strange man. Fufufufu.」



An eerie chuckle came out from Tomoichi. At his side, Kaori was holding her head while murmuring「Tio you idiooot」. And then, she tried to cover for Hajime and tried to talk to Tomoichi, but before she could do that, Tomoichi exploded.



「I take back my words-. You shitty bastaaaaarrrdd-! I absolute won’t hand over my daughter to a perverted bastard like you! I prohibit you from approaching her until the end of the world-! Someone like you, just explode with a nuclear bomb in the Pacific Oceaaaannnnnnnnnn――――!!!」



『Wai-, ple-――』



Hajime tried to make an excuse, but before he could do that, Tomoichi swung up his hand holding the smartphone, and then he threw the phone to the ground. A grievous scream「My smartphone――――!!」could be heard from the side, but such a voice didn’t reach Tomoichi who had transformed into a warrior that was a father protecting his daughter.



Far from that, as though the smartphone was a nemesis that couldn’t be allowed to live under the same sky, or possibly so that the hateful scum wouldn’t be able to call from the other side of the phone anymore, he stepped on the smartphone and grinded it many times.



Naturally, Kaori’s smartphone was invited into heaven.



「O, Otou-san! What are you doing!?」



「I am severing ties with that maggot-, with all my strength here! Kaori, don’t meet with that perverted bastard, until the end of the world! This is a promise with Otou-san!」



Indeed, if there was a father who would still entrust the daughter after hearing that kind of dialogue from the other side of the phone, then it would be better not to waste time to take such a father to a hospital. To a hospital for the brain.



However, from the point of view of Kaori, who had thoroughly witnessed Hajime’s unique relationship with Tio in the other world, she had already accepted it as an ordinary happening. Although she could understand her father’s feelings perfectly, witnessing her smartphone trampled and heard the person she loved being called a maggot caused her to want to object against her better judgment……



Tomoichi sensed his daughter’s atmosphere that obviously didn’t seem to obey him even after hearing that kind of exchange on the phone, and on top of that, even after he told her that she must not meet that man anymore. Tomoichi was trembling all over while declaring with all his strength in the residential area at night.



「Otou-san! Is abso~~~~~-lutely! Not appro―――――――ving-!!!」



「Ah, wait, Otou-san! Where are you going――――!!」



Tomoichi suddenly started to run. ……To the direction that was the opposite of the house. And then, in the blink of an eye, he disappeared toward the residential area.



If he went back to the house, then he would be talked to by his daughter about that hateful shitty bastard again. That was why he wouldn’t go home anymore. Until Kaori understood, Otou-san will run away from home! It was such a thing.



The shoulders of Kaori, who somehow guessed her father’s intention, slumped down.



「Normally, the one who runs away from home because they are not being understood should be the daughter, isn’t it?」



After whispering that, Kaori then chased after Tomoichi.



The father who absolutely didn’t want to approve the person that his daughter loved, and the daughter who wanted her father to approve no matter what; both of them began to race at night.



After that, whether Hajime could be accepted or not by Tomoichi……



Anyway, let’s just say that Hajime worked even harder than even god slaying for that.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Everyone, do you know about [Aozora no Kishi] series on Ni○ Dou? (TN: This refer to Nico Douga)



I found it recently, and it was totally enthralling.



Watching that, my hand reached out to Ace Combat again (it makes me have misgivings about the update next week……)



I want to try writing a light novel with an idiot and cool fellows like that as the characters someday.



Uploader-sama, thank you for making my holiday lovely.





Chapter 195




It was just before the sun approached the zenith of its climb. Hajime was walking expressionlessly through the residential area on a certain riverside.



It wasn’t like he was in a bad mood, but when he thought about the location he would be visiting after this, it made him feel somewhat melancholic. On top of all that, it also caused him to rack his brain about this and that when it came to how to deal with it, so his expression was naturally stiff.



Although, no matter how much Hajime worried about it since he had no intention of yielding the status quo or his will, resolving this was extremely difficult and finding a solution that could work in one go was next to impossible. Compared to this difficult problem, conquering a great labyrinth was something really simple.



「Well, that’s obvious, it can’t be helped, huh?」



He let out a small sigh while staring at his destination that came into view on the path ahead.



It was a spacious ground that was surrounded by splendid hedges with a large Japanese house inside of it, or rather than a house it was an estate. History could be felt from its appearance alone.



With a glance at that hedge and estate, Hajime finally arrived in front of the entrance. The front gate was also a heavy and splendid structure. The wood and iron were clearly conveying the months and years they had been piling up until now. If an ordinary person visited this place for the first time, they would unconsciously straighten themselves up.



The family name written beside the front gate was――”Yaegashi”.



Yes, this place was Shizuku’s house, and adjacent to the house was the long-established dojo of the Yaegashi-style.



For some reason Hajime looked at the nameplate where the name “Yaegashi” was carved while pushing on the button of the interphone installed beside the gate; the only piece that approached the modern age here.



『Yes, who could this be?』



A female voice immediately responded. It sounded young, with a pleasant tone that sounded calm, a voice that gave the feeling of maturity. The owner of that voice――if his memory from when he met her the last time was correct, then it was the voice of Shizuku’s mother, Kirino. She was the one who responded to Hajime.



「I received the invitation. This is Nagumo Hajime.」



『You are right on time, Hajime-san. Welcome. The gate is not locked, so please come inside as you are.』



「Excuse me for disturbing.」



Hajime put his hand on the gate. And then he pushed it open while sighing once more at “that” which he felt when he was walking the path that was facing the hedge.



Immediately after that, *hyu-* a sound of cutting wind!



「As expected huh……」



He carelessly lifted his hand in front of his forehead. Between the gaps of his fingers were several spheres held in place. Those things flew the instant Hajime opened the gate which he caught between his fingers. When he put a little strength into his fingers, those balls split with a cracking sound, and from inside them, colorful powder came out.



When he brought his nose near, the aroma of multiple spices like pepper or cayenne pierced his nasal cavity severely. If the spheres hit the forehead and their content scattered out, then a normal person would shed tears grandly while writhing in an unstoppable sneezing attack.



「I want to make a retort about just what kind of period this is but……really this house. Besides, if I am told this is reaping what I sow then that…..can’t be helped.」



Hajime strode across the threshold of the Yaegashi residence while smiling wryly.



First, the scenery of a considerably wide garden, which extended all the way to the entrance of the main building, entered his eyes. It wasn’t something like a Japanese-style garden where one could enjoy the sight, but a garden with normal weeds and gravel spread evenly throughout that looked well maintained. The path from the front gate to the main building’s entranceway was shown by stone paving; there was also a small pond distanced in between. Next, there were also garden lanterns hung irregularly and relatively big trees growing.



There was another independent one-story house a slight distance away, that place had become the dojo of the Yaegashi-style. But, on this holiday normally there should be the zealous voices of a lot of disciples practicing coming from there, instead, eerily there was no sound.



Hajime, who spontaneously wanted to sigh after guessing the reason of that silence, advanced on the stone paving, approaching a spot where a tree nearby with dense leaves had one of its branches extending out until it reached above the stone paving. It was at that time,



A killing intent was suddenly-!!



When Hajime looked up, there was a figure of an old man jumping down from the branch above his head, the hakama of the old man was fluttering while his hands were holding a wooden sword aloft! The sword ki the old man was clad with wasn’t something normal, a determination of sure defeat with one hit was residing in his eyes! That figure which swooped down from the sky, swinging down a mighty attack, was just like the technique of a certain wandering swordsman!



But, toward that sudden attack,



「It has been a long time, Shuuzou-san.」



Hajime, who stopped still with one hand the attack which looked like it could pulverize at least a boulder, lowered his head normally and gave a greeting. The opponent in front of his eyes that looked like he was around 80 with a deeply wrinkled face and white hair, was an instructor of the Yaegashi-style and the grandfather of Shizuku, so Hajime must show manners to him.



「Yes, long time no see, Hajime-kun. Nice of you to come. You can relax here.」



「Thank you very much.」



Shuuzou was speaking words of welcome normally as though nothing special happened while looking completely expressionless with his hands pushing down the wooden sword to the very limit. In response to that, Hajime too also returned the greeting familiarly.



Hajime and Shuuzou stared at each other wordlessly for a while, but as expected Shuuzou then quietly pulled back his wooden sword as though nothing happened and he turned on his heels.



「I think Shizuku is in her room. But, it’s a little unacceptable for you two who are still students to seclude yourself inside the same room. There are also delicious tea cakes, so come to the living room.」



「Aa~, yes, thank you-」



Shuuzou turned his back on Hajime and returned toward the dojo while talking. But, in the middle of that conversation, in an awkward timing, a new killing intent attacked Hajime!



Hajime quickly crouched, and over his head, a sharp, violent gale blew past. Furthermore, a cuff of a hakama was reflected at the edge of the sight of the crouching Hajime. A low kick aiming for Hajime’s head was rapidly approaching.



While evading that by leaping aside, Hajime used one of his hands in a handstand posture to roll before landing. Ahead of his gaze, there was the figure of the attacker still in continued alertness.



「Yaa, Hajime-kun. Nice of you to come. You can relax here.」



「……Thank you, Koichi-san. Excuse me for my intrusion.」



Yaegashi Koichi. He was the father of Shizuku and an instructor of the Yaegashi-style. He was a handsome middle-aged man with a rather harsh look, which was due to the gash in his cheek that he got from somewhere that was his trademark. While saying a speech that was the same with his father Shuuzou, and also with the same expressionless look as expected, he put his wooden sword on his waist as though nothing happened.



At that moment, a wooden sword was thrown at great speed from the side! Hajime, who quickly turned his head and evaded it clearly, heard a clicking tongue echoing from behind the nearby lantern basket.



Even furthermore, from behind the evading Hajime, a *zapaa-* sound resounded. The moment he heard that one of the pupils who seemed to be lurking inside the pond threw countless iron rods the size of a palm from a pose that looked like a wild falcon!



Hajime evaded that with a flowing feet movement like a fish swimming in the air, but right after that, he noticed something and back flipped highly from that place. When he did that, in the next moment, a young pupil smeared with soil leapt out from under the ground in the garden holding a wooden sword. The pupil was whispering「Chiih, so I failed in bringing him down-」with a small voice.



Hajime, who landed while smiling faintly to those words, quickly lifted his hand and grasped something that flew toward him. An arrow was caught by that hand. When he followed the trajectory, above the roof of the main building was a figure of someone that seemed to be a pupil holding a bow.



「I’m thinking this every time but……Yaegashi-style is absolutely not a kenjutsu dojo, right? Rather I think this place is a ninjutsu dojo instead.」(TN: Kenjutsu=sword art, ninjutsu=ninja art)



「What are you saying, Hajime-kun. Something like shinobi cannot possibly exist. Are you reading too much manga? It’s troubling that someone trying to become Shizuku’s partner is doing something like that.」



Hajime whispered his conjecture while staring fixedly at the pupils who were returning to the dojo quickly while likewise also acting as though nothing happened. Hearing that, Shuuzou said something like that with a tone that sounded really stumped.



The soaking wet pupil, who was lurking in the pond, quickly took off his dougi uniform and underneath it, there were black clothes, but……his face looked as though saying「So what?」. Surely, even though the iron bars thrown at him looked similar to shuriken that he previously saw at museum, or even though the pupil who climbed down from the main building’s rooftop was using a special descending tool where the tip of the rope had something shaped like a rake to be fixed onto the roof’s edge, or that one of them wasn’t making any footsteps while running, surely, everything was just Hajime’s misunderstanding.



Even if right now, in front of Hajime’s eyes a pupil was quickly running with a forward-bent posture――the so-called ninja run right past him, surely that was just his misunderstanding!



「Hajime, welcome!」



But, at that moment, a slightly lively voice called out to Hajime who was seeing off the back of the figures of the people of the Yaegashi dojo with a complicated expression. When he turned toward the voice, he could see the figure of Shizuku dressed in a gorgeous kimono waving her hand at him from the porch of the main building.



Hajime lifted his hand with a greeting of「Yo」while approaching her. Shizuku’s expression burst brighter the closer he got. Looking from up close, it seemed that she was wearing a cosmetic even if just for a bit. It appeared that she was dressing up a little with Hajime coming here from being invited.



Shizuku, who was lovable as usual in the small things, quickly cleared up his gloomy feeling that had been piling up due to this and that since he stepped past the gate of the Yaegashi house, which he couldn’t retort at even when he wanted to.



「As expected, Shizuku is more suited to Japanese clothes. Though it doesn’t look like a pure yukata……」



「Ye, yes. I received this as a sample of a prototype that Tio designed. It seems that this is a combination of the Dragonoid race’s clothing with Japanese clothes.」



「I see, she is a pervert, but she has good sense. It’s like it was order-made for Shizuku. Besides, the sakura color also suit you.」



「-……thank you」



Shizuku looked shy while she quietly touched her lips. She couldn’t hide her happiness from Hajime noticing and praising her. The person who was there wasn’t the usual gallant knightly Shizuku, but a normal girl in love that could be found anywhere.



Instantly, Hajime put his hand into his breast pocket and summoned a mini Donner that had a silencer attached. Without even showing a drawing motion, he rapid-fired to the right side with the gun barrel hidden under his arm! Right away, countless sparks and metallic sounds scattered in midair!



Shizuku came to her senses with a ‘hah’. When she turned her gaze there she found a bulge on the ground so small that no one would notice it was there without paying attention to it; from there several small things that looked like bamboo pipes peeked out……



It seemed, there were still several pupils hiding underground. Most likely there was a tunnel that could be entered by a person under the surface, by slightly lifting up the lid that was camouflaged as the ground, they sniped at Hajime using blowpipes.



「He, hey-, you all! You all are doing something like that again! Come out here!」



Shizuku raised an angry yell with a bright red face. But, they didn’t respond to Shizuku’s words, the ground was making slightly lumpy moves, and they vanished away somewhere.



Shizuku was trembling all over. Hajime was sending her a slightly sympathizing gaze while trying to ask her about the matter that bothered him as expected.



「Hey, Shizuku. Your family, just as I thought, they are the descendants of ninjas or something, right? It’s true, isn’t it?」



「……There is no way that’s true, I think. Before we were summoned, there was nothing like this. It’s only been like this since Hajime came to my house. Even I didn’t know that kind of technique existed in the Yaegashi-style. In reality, I was only taught the katana, martial art, and throwing art.」



「I don’t think that’s at the level of “only” though……. Or, how should I put it, you didn’t ask them? Like, 『Did I receive kunoichi training while I do not realize it myself?』」



「I questioned them already. I asked, what is the Yaegashi-style? Like that.」



「And the answer?」



「It’s commonplace kenjutsu and a little bit of acrobatics. That was what they told me.」



「So they concealed it from even their daughter ……」



Shizuku was whispering「This family of mine……」with a faraway look, to which Hajime was sending her an increasingly sympathetic gaze while to the Yaegashi family’s mystery――not only were they not hiding it at all even though they were obviously ninja-like, even their deception was so noncommittal it made him want to retort ‘do you all even have the motivation to hide it huh’――he was smiling dryly.



After that, Shizuku, who knew about her grandfather and father’s assaults, apologized to Hajime with teary eyes while heading to her room for the time being. However, even during their walk there, spears stabbed at them from the gap between walls, a pitfall suddenly appeared on the corridor floor, the wall in the middle abruptly turned, and an expressionless Koichi came at Hajime with a kodachi swinging, and when they thought they heard someone say「Muh, my hand slipped」, from the corner of the corridor a chain scythe flew making a pillar as its fulcrum which altered its trajectory using the centrifugal force toward Hajime……



「Shizuku……just accept it. Your house is a ninja’s residence. Your family are ninjas.」



「I, who didn’t know until this year that my own house had these kind of contraptions, am…….I mean, Ojii-chan! A chain scythe is no good! Look, it got stuck into the wall! That’s obviously the real thing, isn’t it!? Just where are you keeping that kind of weapon!」



Shizuku angrily went to the corner of the corridor while waving her yukata’s cuff, but there was already no one there. Shizuku crumbled down on all fours. This was the first time she saw the other side of her family since she returned from another world. It appeared Shizuku was burdened with the fate to go through hardships even inside her family.



「Hey, Shizuku. As expected should we go to the living room instead of your room? Shuuzou-san also told me that. Like this, I don’t know what kind of contraption will activate the moment I entered your room. It won’t be a problem for me, but your treasured collection(plush dolls) might be in danger you know.」



「……Uu. There is nothing like these odd contraptions in my room, supposedly. There is undoubtedly something in the living room……or rather, I’m already terribly angry by the fact that Hajime was attacked! I’ll have Hajime together with me in my room until the meal timeee! If anyone becomes a nuisance, I aa~bsolutely won’t forgive them you hear!」



Surely, Shizuku was raising her voice loudly toward her family who must be lurking behind the ceiling and on the other side of the wall.



They finally arrived at Shizuku’s room. Inside, there were many plush dolls placed around that it made the room cramped. There was a lovely animal and cat calendar, pink curtains, a cushion attached with fluffy rabbit ears, the whole room was enveloped in a soft atmosphere with a faintly sweet fragrance wafting off. It was a really sly girly room.



Shizuku put the sitting cushion of a droopy raccoon in front of a small round table made of glass. When Hajime sat on the cushion, it made a「pukyu」sound. The figure of the demon king of another world sitting down on a mascot cushion that made that type of voice, if it was seen by the classmates and the fellows of the other world (especially someone like the emperor) surely it would be a foregone conclusion for them to burst out in laughter.



「Wait there. I’ll prepare tea and snacks right now.」



「No, you don’t really need to do that. Rather, I don’t want to be left alone in this house……」



「Uu. I, it will be fine. Because my room is a safe zone.」



Even while faltering in her words, Shizuku guaranteed that ‘my room is safe!’, immediately following that, however,



「Hajime-san, welcome. This is a sweet bean jelly from a long-standing shop. Please have some.」



Shizuku’s mother――Kirino appeared carrying tea and snacks.



――From the ceiling *sucha-!* she jumped down.



「Okaa-san!? Where did you come down from just now!? Wait, the ceiling board is out of place!? No way……even though I should have properly investigated my room when I knew that the house was a residence with contraptions……」



Kirino was smiling friendly as though nothing happened with a sidelong glance at Shizuku who was dumbfounded while looking up at the ceiling. That figure which was gentle and calm exactly like a Yamato Nadeshiko, yet with an atmosphere where a straight core could be felt from her caused Hajime to comprehend something ‘I see’; that she was indeed the mother of Shizuku. She was a woman that made him think or even made him anticipate that when Shizuku aged beautifully, surely she would become a woman like this.



However, the fact that she jumped down from the ceiling while properly wearing kimono, with a tray in one hand that had tea and snacks on it, with not only her clothes unruffled but not even a drop of tea was spilled, she wasn’t someone normal at all.



「He, hey, Okaa-san. Let me ask this, putting aside the matter regarding my room’s ceiling for later; it’s just as I thought, that Okaa-san is a kunoichi? Hey, is that true?」



Since she returned home up till today, different from her father and grandfather, her mother didn’t show that kind of sign at all. Shizuku was asking her mother with a really complicated feeling that was half「Say that this is not true, mama」, and half「Okaa-san, so you too」.



Toward such Shizuku, Kirino was,



「My, Shizuku. You are too much in high spirits just because Hajime-san is here……. Forgive her okay, Hajime-san. Geez, this child, surely she is trying her best to make a joke that is in line with Hajime-san’s hobby but……by nature, she is a serious person, so like this, her joke is not really funny, isn’t it? A joke like『You are a kunoichi?』toward her mother of all things, see? She is a child like this, but please don’t desert her no matter what.」



「……Please rest assured. I don’t think that it’s not funny, or anything, even for a little bit. Rather, I’m greatly in sympathy with her. ――Are you okay, Shizuku?」



「I cannot do this anymore, Hajime. I want to become the child of Hajime’s family already……」



Hajime did his best to console Shizuku who was hanging her head down with an expression that was like a tired old man with a ‘there-there’ gesture. Seeing that harmonious(?) figure of her daughter and Hajime, Kirino said「My, geez Shizuku, acting like that in front of your parent. Yes yes, Okaa-san will leave right away」and left the room.



Of course, *hyupa-!* she jumped up to the ceiling.



Seeing the ceiling board that was returned back to normal soundlessly, Shizuku then looked at Hajime with an expression that could break into tears at any moment.



「We, well, what……like this Shizuku is also taught the secret of your family little by little yes? I don’t know if that’s because you returned from another world, or because you were able to make a lover like me but……good for you.」



「In this world, I wonder if there is a matter that is better off not to be known……. I feel like the thing they are doing is gradually escalating……」



Shizuku was comforted while being caressed by Hajime.



Hajime thought while looking at Shizuku who was like that. It was normally hard to imagine that she wouldn’t know about her family and the house’s contraptions until she entered high school. But, there was no way that Shizuku was lying, in that case, that meant that Shuuzou and the others were seriously hiding it from Shizuku.



Furthermore, before the summoning, in other words, even when she became a high school student this matter hadn’t been told to her. That could possibly mean that Shizuku wouldn’t be told any of this for her whole life; such a possibility couldn’t be discarded.



Then, why did a matter about one’s own family be hidden from their only daughter or granddaughter?



At the great labyrinth of another world, Shizuku’s true feelings were exposed. After that, Hajime became aware of the things that Shizuku was harboring from the story that he heard from Shizuku herself. About how happy her stern grandfather was when Shizuku displayed the talent for kenjutsu. About how much the people around her were putting their expectations on her.



And also about how as a result, just how much of Shizuku’s true feelings were suppressed because of those.



Hajime recalled the words that were said to him the first time Hajime first faced Shuuzou and Koichi.



――I see, so Shizuku, is fine already.



――My thanks, for letting Shizuku be a girl.



It seemed that rather than the return from another world, the two of them were feeling gratitude from the bottom of their heart at the fact that Shizuku fell in love with her own true feelings, at that growth of her. Relief also exuded out from them.



Hajime didn’t ask much at that time, but he was able to guess.



By some chance, Shuuzou and the others might be regretting that they made Shizuku studying the Yaegashi-style. It was impossible to tell a grandfather not to be happy when his granddaughter had a lot of talent for the family style, and that a parent having expectations for their children was also something natural.



That was why they got too passionate against their better judgment, and like that when they noticed, Shizuku already couldn’t even make a complaint to her family, creating a Shizuku who killed so many parts of herself.



Seeing such a Shizuku, surely Shuuzou and the others didn’t teach her anything more than kenjutsu so that she wouldn’t kill a part of herself any more than that. They thoroughly concealed the family secret.



This was just his guess, but Hajime was convinced that it was the truth.



Hajime spoke with a gentle tone while caressing Shizuku’s head.



「Perhaps they are a troubling family, but……you are treasured by them, right?」



「……I don’t deny that.」



It appeared that Shizuku also guessed that somehow. Though she couldn’t help but unintentionally look sour because it was hidden from her, and how extremely troubling the absurdity of that secret was.



「Now then, putting aside for the time being how one of my wives became a kunoichi」



「I didn’t become a kunoichi, don’t put that aside.」



Shizuku’s look grew increasingly sour with Hajime’s words, but when she noticed the presence of many people that were spreading out little by little in the surroundings, her cheeks cramped.



「Well, there is also Shizuku getting taught about your family I think, but……more than half of this is a test for me I guess. This must be something like revenge for a harem man who dared put his hand on their important daughter. Even Kirino-san was merciless, even though her face was smiling like that.」



「Okaa-san? As far as I know, Okaa-san didn’t do anything to Hajime though……」



「No, she is taking action even now you know. ……This tea and sweet bean jelly, something was put inside. Poison doesn’t work on me, but from the sensation, it’s something like a paralyzing drug I guess. Perhaps they intend to attack while I cannot move.」



「OKAAA-SAAA――――――N!!! WHAT ARE YOU GIVING TO YOUR DAUGHTER’S LOVER!!! STOP SCREWING AROUND; I’LL CUT DOWN ALL OF YOU TOGETHEEEERR-」



Inside the Yaegashi residence during midday, the angry yell of an infuriated Shizuku reverberated. She jumped out of the room with a black katana in one hand.



Hajime, who was left alone in the room, properly tasted the last piece of the sweet bean jelly before he whispered.



「Well, compared to the father of Kaori’s place, this brute force approach saved me the trouble.」



From the garden, sounds of「Ojii-chan and Otou-chan, and Okaa-saaan-, kneel seiza over there!」, the sound of something being blown away, or「Ojou, she is going mad! Send reinforcements!」, or「Muu, Shizuku, your skill’s improved!」, or「Don’t think that the current Shizuku can be stopped normally! Form formation! Prepare the Four Cardinal Thousand Execution formation-」, or「We are going to separate Ojou from that brat for sure! White Tiger squad, kill that guy now!」; sounds with that kind of impression could be heard coming from here and there.



Hajime was feeling the multiple presences who were approaching him while spitting out words「Whether, at earth or another world, there is really not much change huh……」really emptily.



After that, whether Shizuku finally knew all the secrets of her family, and then whether Hajime was recognized by Shizuku’s family or not……



For now, let’s just say that the pupils of the Yaegashi-style (hidden school) got along really well with the rabbit ears of another world.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I seriously don’t have time to write.



Even so, when I wrote following my whim, the Yaegashi-style became like this……





Chapter 196




Bu, but, well, I think that it’s fine if there is at least one of this kind of troublesome person isn’t iiit.



Sporadically growing weeds, old stone walls, and a blue sky that looked discolored were spread out. Things other than those which entered the field of vision were only the laundry stand, a rusty drum can with uncertain usefulness, and also the granny bike with a punctured tire leaned listlessly on the stone wall.



(Nothing has changed other than Okaa-san’s bicycle huuh~)



On the porch, with the cry of cicadas and the refreshing sound of the wind chime as BGM, the one who was kicking her legs back and forth while staring into nothing in a daze ‘bohee~’ was the eldest daughter of this household――Hatayama Aiko.



That day, Aiko, who had managed to return from another world, received interrogations not just from police and mass media, but also by school officials and government officials that spanned many days. After all, she was the only adult among the group disappearance. Even if the students were talking about fantastical stories they had experienced, the ratio of sympathy toward them was high, but for Aiko who was a working adult, she was seen with a sterner gaze by the society.



Having said that, all of them had talked about it beforehand and the conclusion that they reached was to talk about the events in the other world Tortus as it was without changing anything; also, Aiko herself didn’t have the confidence that she could fabricate “a really convincing story” that could convince the surrounding. So in the end, she could only give an explanation with content that was the same as what the students were talking about, which made her feel really ashamed as a working adult.



Naturally, in regard to her inability to bring back some of her students and how the students became obsessed with “wild delusions”, even though in reality those weren’t Aiko’s responsibility at all, but a flow which was pressing the responsibility to Aiko was starting to appear.



That flow was powerful. Furthermore, even idiotic opinions which said that perhaps the disappearance itself was actually the full responsibility of Aiko was also beginning to appear.



It was an incident with too many mysteries. The culprit was unknown. Some students didn’t return. The returnee’s wild delusions. Because all these affairs wouldn’t settle down without someone taking responsibility, a scapegoat so to speak, it was Aiko who was chosen to hold that role.



Aiko, who was completely exhausted with various things every day, was carried away by the flow of the surrounding, and she tried to respond to the demand of the surrounding and wore the stigma as the person responsible for the group disappearance incident. She accepted the severe bashing and the end of her job as a teacher――no, the end of her social life. Seeing this, the parents of Aiko, who couldn’t bear to witness the figure of their daughter that was reported every day in the news, also came to persuade her to return home. That was also one of the primary factors that affected Aiko.



But, just when Aiko resolved to distance herself from her students’ side, suddenly the topic was going toward its end surprisingly and unnaturally; however, bizarrely no one thought that nothing was strange with this development.



The culprit of that was of course Hajime.



Using the internet and media, he manufactured a super large scale awareness manipulation artifact, and he forcefully and powerfully, without letting anyone complain, interfered with the consciousness of the people all over the world.



Aiko, who knew that, made a grandly convulsing expression and leaked out「What have you done……」. After all, what Hajime did was brainwashing on a world scale. An evil deed that would make even an evil organization of a story go ghastly pale.



But Hajime shrugged toward Aiko who was haggard in various senses.



「The world who put false accusations on you and made their own interpretation as they pleased is the bad one. Returning tit for tat at them is only the matter of course, isn’t it?」



In other words, the flow of society, who had laid their hands on Aiko, was Hajime’s enemy. He didn’t kill them, so at least they could obediently get brainwashed, was his reasoning. They tormented his relatives with their curiosity, irresponsible remarks, and so on, so it was a punishment they deserved.



As for Aiko, she couldn’t say anything anymore having those things said to her. It’s unforgivable for you to leave my side because of the irresponsible flow of society. The person she fell in love with said that to her. Because of that, he made the consciousness of the world into his own.



A demon king-sama to the extreme was here.



No matter what she said, it wouldn’t stop Hajime anymore.



Aiko’s shoulders dropped limply, even so, inside her heart she felt flattered, she felt light as though she was floating, yet inside her chest, she also felt so tiiiiight that she writhed.



And so, in the end, Aiko managed to get reinstated in the school where Hajime and the others were attending. Furthermore, there was also the administration’s plan that wanted the returnees to be lumped together, which even caused her to be employed as the homeroom teacher of the special class of Hajime and the others, the returnees. Thinking of how before the summoning she was just a teacher without a class in charge with, in a sense, she could have said to have risen up in life.



Now then, through this Aiko safely managed to get reinstated as a teacher without getting separated from her students who were more important than anything since they had entrusted their lives to each other in another world, but here, a dilemma arose.



That dilemma was,



――I am a teacher. Hajime-kun is a student……It’s too late already but-



Yes, now she clearly remembered the relationship between her and Hajime. Of course, after the legendary decisive battle, she had already spent many passionate nights together with Hajime, so that thinking was reaa~lly something too late already.



Still, however, now that they were here on earth and in Japan, when she actually returned to her teaching job and stood on the teaching podium, from there she saw the figure of the student Hajime in his seat……



――Me, what have you doneeeeeeee-. You laid your hand on a studenttttttt-



Like that, she rolled around on the floor when she was alone. Her personality that was too serious by nature, and her extraordinary sincerity toward the teaching profession, when she had returned to the normal everyday life and calmed down, those two aspects mercilessly pierced Aiko’s mind all over *gussa gussa* with spikes and gouged it *chiku chiku* with marking pens.



Naturally, she was starting to avoid Hajime, however, looking at him flirting with Yue and the others exacerbated her heartrending, but as expected her guilty feeling, and whatever else, became an obstacle that made her avoid Hajime completely……like that, a really troublesome person had arrived here.



These past few months, far from spending time with Hajime, she didn’t even properly talk with him. Hajime being Hajime, he was running around fighting the government officials of the world, manufacturing artifacts to make it easier to open the gate to the other world Tortus, opening a business in order to provide for Yue and the others with his own hands, and so on. Spending busy days like that, he didn’t even go to meet Aiko.



――Lonely



That was the true feeling of Aiko without any falsehood in it.



――But, a teacher and a student, it’s just……as expected……



That too was the true feeling of a troublesome person.



――As expected, Hajime-kun and I are……uu, there is also the difference in age……there is also my social standing……



That was the true feeling of a very troublesome person.



While worrying endlessly like that, ‘There are thoroughly charming girls already around Hajime, perhaps a middle-aged woman like me should withdraw away……’ she was getting closer to such a conclusion while using the summer holiday to return home, and she became a no-good human like this on the porch.



「Hey, Aiko. You are making a very stupid face there. Isn’t your soul leaking out from your mouth?」



「Even if it leaks out, it can be returned back to its place you know, Okaa-san.」



Indeed, something like that wasn’t any problem if the age of god magic was used, though it was a different story whether her mother could comprehend that or not.



While making an exasperated expression at her daughter’s dazed reply, Aiko’s mother――Akiko asked「You want some watermelon?」. Aiko rolled over lazily and without stopping she kept rolling to the table. It was a wordless answer of「I want」.



Aiko waited for a bit while bathing in the wind of the electric fan. Akiko arrived carrying a watermelon that had been cut into beautiful triangle shapes. It was cold, juicy, and looking delicious just from a glance. Aiko was messing with the watermelon seeds with the provided toothpick before she bit into the edge.



The gentle sweetness spreading inside her mouth slackened the expression of Aiko loosely. Her appearance was completely an elementary student……an extreme of being child faced. She really couldn’t be seen as an adult woman at the age of 26. Her awakening to magic power also, for some reason, put her skin condition in an extremely excellent condition, surely that was also a factor that showed a childish look in Aiko.



「……When you are like this, I cannot see at all that child whose face was shown a lot on TV who was involving herself with various tragic resolutions. 」



「Mass media is scary. Government officials are scary. Board of Education is scary……fighting god’s apostle was still better.」



「Indeed, perhaps rather than magic, the flow of the society that cannot be seen by eyes is more frightening isn’t it. But, isn’t that fine. You have the strongest prince, don’t you?」



「……Not prince Okaa-san. He is the devil. Rather, he is the demon king-sama.」



「Anything is fine, but stop delaying already, let Okaa-san meet with my daughter’s benefactor soon. Otou-san, and Ojii-chan, and the others too, they are totally curious, you know?」



「U, uu~m……well, I’ll think about it.」



Aiko’s halfhearted attitude caused Akiko to sigh exaggeratedly.



The composition of Aiko’s family was her two parents and the grandparents from the mother side. Her family was fruit farmers, with her father marrying into the family. Even now, that father was telling his daughter who came home for the summer holiday ‘if you are free then help out here~’, going out to work hard in the farm energetically.



Currently, or rather recently, such Hatayama family had a matter that they were really concerned about.



That was regarding Aiko’s “lover”.



That day, the day their daughter who disappeared together with students unexpectedly came home, naturally the members of Hatayama family who received the explanation of the situation didn’t believe Aiko at first, but when Aiko’s magic extremely improved the farmland of the Hatayama family, and their crops also became the highest class product, they believed in Aiko while saying ‘well whatever!’ to the trivial matter.



In the middle of their talk, although Aiko didn’t make any declaration, they understood that somehow their daughter seemed to have made a lover. That she was able to return back to Japan was also thanks to that “he”, and the unthinkable pacification of the kangaroo court which tried to denounce Aiko previously was also “his” doing.



If this person was their daughter’s benefactor and the person who her heart had decided on, then they wished to be introduced to him by all means, but, for some reason, Aiko was evasively avoiding that and didn’t listen to them.



They were suspicious that this person could possibly be a horrible person, but seeing the figure of their disappointing daughter who grinned from seeing the ring that was always dangling on her neck, smiling cheerfully when she looked at her smartphone, talking to someone on the phone with her feet kicking back and forth and her face love-struck, holding her red face between her hands while shaking her head when she suddenly recalled something while doing nothing, they could understand that she was thinking of the other party from the bottom of her heart.



The family of Aiko was worried in their own way about the future of their daughter whose growth stopped completely when she was in middle school for some reason and had no romantic story at all. Because of that, they were, even more, looking forward to being introduced to the person who was chosen by their daughter.



But, as expected, no matter how long, Aiko kept acting elusive……



「Good grief, if you are like this, then “he” will get away from you eventually, you know?」



「Uguh!?」



Hearing the terrifying warning that was given by her mother regarding her relationship with him that she was currently worrying about, caused Aiko to spontaneously press her hand on her chest while a moan slipped out from her mouth.



「Even though you finally came home, you are just in a daze the whole day without even helping around the home. After all, you are worrying endlessly about “him” and ran away using going home as an excuse, right? Ah, or else, perhaps “he” actually already got away from you and you returned here because of heartbreak……」



「What are you saying, Okaa-san? That, I, don’t really have a, lo, lover or anything……」



Aiko averted her gaze, her volume turned smaller, and she toyed with the watermelon seed in high speed.



For Aiko, she understood her family’s wishes for her to introduce “him” ――Hajime. But, as expected, their relationship of teacher and student made it difficult to speak about even toward her family. No, it was extremely difficult exactly because they were family……



Inside her heart she was whispering「He is not my lover, I’m already treated as his wife, so I’m not lying……」which sounded like an excuse, making her have a vivid resemblance with someone somewhere.



「……Well, that’s fine. I guess you also have various things on your mind, and you are not a kid anymore. But, just remember that no matter what kind of person “he” is, we will welcome him warmly any time.」



「……yes.」



In the end, Akiko backed down, and the hand of Aiko that was playing with the seed slackened a bit. Akiko was smiling wryly at her daughter who was oozing out a relieved air while changing the topic.



「Speaking of, there is a festival this year too. It’s good timing, how about you try to change into yukata? You haven’t gone there anymore for these last few years, right? You loved Yamashiro-ojiisan’s cotton candy, didn’t you?」



「Yeah, now that Okaa-san mentions it, it’s this time……wait, Yamashiro-ojiichan, he is still alive……」



「You are really rude.」



「Because, when I was in high school if I remember correctly, he was already past 90 years old, right?」



「Yes, this year he will be 102 years old you know.」



「At, at that age, he is still opening a festival stand? Is he okay? He won’t ascend to heaven while making cotton candy?」



「You are really rude. Even now he is still lively. Even the person himself said that he would live for thirty more years.」



「He is planning to challenge even the Guinness record?」



Despite the silly talk, in the end, Aiko decided to participate in the nostalgic local festival, also for relaxing the gloominess inside her chest.



In the evening, when the beautiful sunset was about to disappear behind the mountains on the other side of the river, Aiko was at the front door with her body wrapped in a pink yukata. In her hand was a small and cute pouch, with her feet wearing refreshing Japanese sandals. When she was wearing a yukata, to some extent, a unique charm could be felt from her usual childish figure; perhaps that was because she was a Japanese.



「You are really going alone?」



Akiko asked while tilting her head.



「Yep. I’ll just aimlessly wander there. Otou-san and the others are also helping there, so I’ll show my face at their place for a bit.」



「I see……even if this place is in the sticks that doesn’t mean that there aren’t idiots, so be careful. Especially because on the day of the festival there are also people who cut loose too much.」



「I understand. Rather, after everything that happens, the likes of hoodlums really won’t matter much.」



「Don’t be conceited. If you like, should I call Taichi-kun to go with you?」



「Geez-, I’m really fine. Besides, Taichi-kun will be angry if he is called for something like this, you know?」



The one called Furukawa Taichi was a young man who, as it were, was Aiko’s childhood friend. In the past, the houses of the Furukawa family and the Hatayama family were close to each other. Since their farms were next to each other, the two families were closely associated. Taichi and Aiko also went to the same school all the time from kindergarten up to high school, so he was her trusted friend.



There was also a time when they temporarily distanced themselves from each other because of this and that at the puberty period. When they grew into adults they also never became a couple, but their relationship after that was friendly enough that met when they both came back here in an extended vacation where they would have a chat.



Taichi graduated from a university in another prefecture, and he immediately got a job at a company. But his father was hospitalized for a time, and he resigned from his job where he then succeeded his family’s farm about a year and a half ago. And so, in the festival this time around he was recruited as one of the young peoples’ group to help around……



「Is that so? I think that if it’s Taichi-kun, he will rush here happily though. Well, asking him to do that is too harsh perhaps.」



「That’s right. Taichi-kun is good-natured, but, as expected, he will get angry if he is taken advantage of too much.」



「That’s not what I mean though……well, that’s not where a parent should stick her nose into.」



「??」



Aiko tilted her head at her mother’s suggestive words, but Akiko didn’t look like she planned to talk more than that, so Aiko turned around and departed toward the festival.



She walked calmly on the familiar country road. Compared to the city, this place was accompanied with colors like the stars of the night sky, which were exceptionally visible, illuminating the path at night, the frogs staying on the fields, and the chorus of the cicadas burning their life on the trees.



(Although, as expected, the clearness of the air cannot compare with Tortus……)



What was revolving in the back of her mind while she was muttering to herself was her days in another world. Even amidst those memories, the one that she recalled vividly due to how dramatic it was, was……that reunion, that undesired result, and then the kiss that saved her life.



(Uu……)



There was also when she was imprisoned by god’s apostle Nointo. For her to be captured at the top of a tall tower, it was as though she was a princess in a tale. And then, he came for her who was in depression from anxiety and impatience, and that battle at the altitude of 8 kilometers.



She exposed her unsightly appearance after the result that she caused, and not only was that shameful figure of her seen, she was even looked after by him.



(Hau……)



After that, the words that he conferred to her beside the cenotaph was something that Aiko surely wouldn’t forget for her whole life. If the rescue drama before that was a salvation for her physical body, then the event in front of the cenotaph that evening was unmistakably the salvation for her heart. Thinking back, she was captured by an ardor that she couldn’t deceive herself from anymore since that time.



(Au……)



And then, with the battle at the devil king’s castle, and going through the legendary decisive battle……the gifted object. As the result of her attack after she let loose all her restraints, he let out a smile that looked as though he gave up, or possibly it was a troubled smile; and then to prove that Aiko was his――that she belonged to the demon king, he gifted her with a ring.



Aiko crawled her fingers on the thing behind her yukata, at the ring that was connected with a chain dangling behind the chest part of the yukata.



And then what she remembered was, the this and that of the night, that she thought might be staying unrelated with herself for her whole life, with how herself was a shorty. Just by remembering it she was still getting bright red. That was, that was……done too much.



「Awawawa-」



On the night path, Aiko fidgeted around while getting red-faced by herself. Seen from the side, she looked just like a suspicious person.



Even though she was getting like this so much, with her head suddenly getting full with Hajime even without anything particular happening, but the person herself was still harboring conflict (lol) inside her heart, worrying whether it was okay to continue this relationship. That was why if the wives’ group heard this they would undoubtedly get exasperated.



In the other world, she was titled a goddess and splendidly incited the people, this female teacher, who stood up against even the kingdom and the pope of the biggest religion for the sake of her students, was, in fact, a troublesome person that was super awkward when it came to love.



「Ai? What are you doing?」



「Ohee!?」



Suddenly a voice called out to her which caused Aiko to hop up *pyon* for real. Complete with a strange voice. Her face turned bright red in a different meaning this time while she turned her gaze toward the direction of the voice. There, she found a tall and sturdy young man, wearing a T-shirt with short sleeves in which the sleeves were further rolled up to his shoulder.



「Ta, Taichi-kun……don’t shock me like that.」



「No, Ai who was making a hundred comical faces alone in the road at night was the one who shocked me there……」



This young man, who was scratching on his cheek while calling Aiko with the pet name “Ai”, was just as Aiko called him, the person named Furukawa Taichi.



「Forget that……rather than that, Taichi-kun yourself, what are you doing in this kind of place? Aren’t you helping with the festival?」



「Aa~, no, I was but……because Ai said that you were coming. See, stupid bunches are also coming out in this kind of day yeah.」



「By any chance, you are intentionally coming here to pick me up?」



「We, well yeah.」



「Is that so, fufu, thank you.」



Aiko felt somewhat warm with Taichi’s nonchalant “good person act” that she knew from the past, and she smiled while expressing her thanks. Seeing that, for some reason, the young man Taichi quickly turned aside his face while his hand covered his mouth. When Aiko got curious「Oh? What’s the matter?」and circled around to look at his face, Taichi turned around hastily, and he walked toward the festival while urging Aiko ahead.



「Co, come to think of it, yukata. You are wearing it, huh?」



It was a somewhat sudden change of topic, but Aiko responded to the talk without being particularly bothered by it.



「Yep. The atmosphere is important in this kind of event. This is also the festival after so long that I rarely attended.」



「I see, you are right. …………That, what to say, it suits you.」



「Is that so? Thank you.」



Aiko responded to Taichi’s praise frankly, a little bit too frankly, by saying a normal thanks. She wasn’t at the age where she would be greatly concerned with words like that. ……Although that also depended on who was the one saying it.



Taichi felt a bit down, even so, he continued making trifling talk with his trusted friend, including reminiscent talk. Those two finally entered the busy festival and crowd of people.



There, the neighborhood uncle and aunt that knew the two of them since they were young bantered with them. Aiko clearly declared that the two of them were not in that kind of relationship even while responding calmly. Seeing such an Aiko caused Taichi’s cheeks to cramp. Seeing that situation, his comrades from the young persons’ association sent him a gaze that was mixed with sympathy……



Old man Yamashiro displayed his artistic skill that was pointlessly polished by making a Michaelangelo statue using cotton candy. Then the two of them encountered a female classmate of Aiko, who also brought along a child. Seeing that caused Aiko to hold a really complicated feeling, and when that classmate told Aiko that if she also married then~ half teasingly. The matter of Hajime floated inside her head which caused Aiko to turn a bit red though, and she didn’t speak any denial, which in turn caused Taichi to get pointlessly fired up……



And, with various things like that Aiko enjoyed a lot the festival that she hadn’t attended for a while.



With the festival, which was still lively, in the background, Aiko sat down on the porch of the shrine ground to rest while she was at it. Beside her there was Taichi who even though he was supposed to be a member of young persons’ association, he had been following Aiko all the time while she was walking around the festival; even now, he showed no sign of going to help at the festival.



In the silent atmosphere, Aiko was dangling her legs back and forth while listening to the bustling of the festival and looking up to the night sky. It was in the height of summer, but the shrine ground had a nice open space for wind, in which the night breeze felt pleasant on her skin which was damp from sweat.



Taichi was looking at Aiko, who had narrowed her eyes due to feeling good from the wind, with a dazed gaze……a beat later, he returned to his senses suddenly, and he slapped his own cheek. *pan-* That nice dry sound made Aiko startled, and she turned her gaze there.



Taichi opened his mouth, looking somewhat nervous toward such Aiko.



「Hey, Ai. Recently, are you okay? See, just a bit before there were various things that happened, right?」



「Yep, I’m fine. It’s over already. Right now, I’m a teacher normally.」



「I see. But, the class that Ai is in charge of, it’s that class, isn’t it? Then, won’t there still be a time when Ai would have to take the full brunt of the trouble?」



「……What do you want to say?」



Taichi’s gaze wandered from the dubious Aiko; however, right after that, he looked at Aiko with firm eyes and spoke.



「Isn’t it, enough already? You have, already, worked hard enough for your students’ sake, don’t you think so?」



「……」



「That’s why, just like Obaa-san and the others were saying before……come back home here already.」



「……」



Aiko didn’t answer, as though she didn’t want to respond to that topic, and then she stood up and started to walk toward the festival. Toward such Aiko, Taichi added on to his words looking impatient.



「It’s not like, you need to be at that place if you want to be a teacher, right? You can also try to find a job here.」



「That’s not why. I also have a responsibility, and above all, I myself, want to be at the side of those children.」



「Then, when those children graduate, what then?」



「That’s……but, even though that kind of incident happened, the school still trusted me enough to take charge of the class. I’m indebted to them.」



「That’s only because they want to gather the returnees in one place, right? Rather, if the current children graduate, you won’t know whether you can continue to stay there, don’t you? If it’s Ai, your face is widely known here, it’s convenient if you live here, and you also have connections to a certain degree that can help you.」



「Perhaps that is so but……that’s, still in the future.」



Aiko’s complicated attitude finally made Taichi irritated, and he stood up vigorously.



「……What Ai is concerned about, is actually not something like your duty to the school, or your responsibility to your students, am I right?」



「Eh?」



「What Ai is concerned about……is actually the matter of your lover, isn’t it?」



「Wai-, what are you saying……I, something like a lover is……」



「The one who thinks that it’s a secret is just Ai. Obaa-san and the others, me, we all know. That in the middle of your disappearance Ai made a lover. And also, how that lover is……your student.」



「!!!!?」



Aiko went「How do you!?」, an action that was really easy to understand. Seeing that act of Aiko’s, which was too honest in a sense, Taichi continued his words while his expression turned complicated.



「There is no way we wouldn’t know. Since the past, Ai is just too poor at hiding a secret. It immediately comes out in your behavior. Besides, even after you returned back you frequently contacted someone, you made a lover while you disappeared, yet it wasn’t a relationship that you could introduce to your parents, it must be a relationship that stimulates your guilt or morality by continuing it……When you searched for the answer that satisfies all those requirements, then it can be nothing but a student.」



「……Taichi-kun. Since when did you become a detective?」



Taichi said「I told you, it’s not just me, Obaa-san and the others also know that」toward Aiko who was stunned. When Aiko realized that the secret was actually exposed to her mother too, she was finally at her wits end with her hands holding her head.



Seeing such Aiko, Taichi resolved himself and spoke.



「A relationship between a student and teacher……you understand, don’t you Ai?」



「tsu」



「Ai yourself, you are feeling tortured like that. I don’t know what happened in the middle of your disappearance, but surely that was just how much of an abnormal situation it was, right? Then, that was just your momentary loss of judgment. I don’t care about that.」



「Taichi-kun?」



Taichi approached Aiko, and he stared at her fixedly with a serious gaze. Aiko took a step back from being overwhelmed, but when Aiko drew away, then Taichi would also close the distance accordingly.



「Ai, let’s stop that kind of impure relationship already, and come back here and start from zero. At first, it might feel lonely, but……I will be at your side from here on.」



「Taichi-kun, what are you saying……」



「I told you that I returned here because of my father’s sickness, but actually that wasn’t it. My father’s sickness was healed in one week……the truth is, when Ai disappeared, I felt uneasy, I couldn’t even focus on my work, and so, I resigned from my work to search for you full time.」



「Was, was that why?」



Aiko’s eyes turned round from this truth she didn’t know. And then, now that Taichi had spoken that far, then even the dull Aiko could guess just with what kind of feeling Taichi had been speaking about until now. That fact made Aiko astonished precisely because she had never thought of that possibility for even a bit until now.



「When I heard that Ai was gone, I thought that my heart got crushed. At that time, I noticed it. For me, Ai is, an existence that is that important to me.」



「Ta, Taichi-kun, fo, for now, let’s calm down a bit?」



「I am calm. Ai, come home. And then, marry me. I will treasure you, so be together with me forever!」



「No no, wait a bit! That’s too sudden! I, am not thinking of Taichi-kun like――」



「You relationship with your lover, it’s not going well, right?」



「Uguh」



「There is no way it’s going well. The other party is just a student. There is no way he can make Ai happy. If it’s me, I have seceded my house and also have resourcefulness, even my age matches yours. It will absolutely go well between us.」



Aiko’s back was already glued closely to a pillar of the shrine ground. The approaching Taichi suddenly tightly grasped the shoulders of Aiko. Taichi’s eyes had a seriousness that Aiko had never seen in them until now; they were overflowing with sincerity, including passion, so hot it was scalding.



If Aiko didn’t have a lover, yes, if this was before she was summoned to the other world, depending on the situation, her heart might be stolen even if she thought nothing of him until now except as someone like a brother. That was just how much of a “man” her childhood friend, who she thought she knew, was to her. As for his speech, she couldn’t help but feel that it was somewhat hurting but……or rather, now that she thought calmly, it was a bit, but it felt like a somewhat dangerous pick-up line……



But, even now when that much feeling was expressed to her, what floated in the back of Aiko’s mind was, the matter of him……



「Hajime-kun……」



「Ai-」



The name that unintentionally leaked out in a small murmur caused Taichi to frown, but in the next moment, he tried to close his distance with Aiko in one go. Perhaps he intended to return his beloved woman to her sanity from the impure relationship she was imprisoned in, even if he had to take a little forceful method……or perhaps, it might be simple jealousy……



The shocking situations that happened in succession, and her mind that was split between her feelings toward him, caused Aiko to react late. She immediately tried to twist her body, but…..behind her was a pillar, both her shoulders were pinned down, it wasn’t that she couldn’t shake herself free but, it was unclear whether she would be able to avoid from injuring Taichi!



Therefore, even while she was putting on strength to the level that was a bit dangerous for normal people, spontaneously, inside her heart, she yelled asking for help.



(Hajime-kun!)



「What is it Aiko?」



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



Taichi and Aiko leaked out similar voices, and then before Taichi’s approach could reach Aiko, or rather before he could get blown away by Aiko, he stopped. No, he was stopped. His neck was grabbed tightly from behind.



*meri-* An unpleasant sound could be heard.



「-, who, who are you-. What are you doing-」



「Oi oi, that’s my line you know? Just what are you doing to my woman?」



Right after that, Taichi’s figure vanished. No, he was sent flying backward with a force to the degree that it looked like he vanished. It seemed that his neck didn’t bend a strange direction or anything due to the superb moderation of power. But, he was fiercely sent flying to the ground where he rolled many times, the impact made him cough fiercely.



With a sidelong glance at such Taichi, Aiko was flustered while she stared at the person before her eyes feeling dumbfounded.



「Ha, Hajime-kun?」



「Yeah, it’s me.」



「Wh, why, are you here?」



「Because, Aiko is here?」



「No, even if you are saying something like a mountain climber somewhere with a question mark like that……」



Hajime smiled wryly seeing Aiko at a loss.



「Recently, you looked like you were thinking too much about various things. We also didn’t really have time to talk, on top of that you came home here. I thought it would be troublesome if you were persuaded by your parents to make an annoying decision, and because of that so I planned to visit here. And, when I used the compass to move here, you were in the middle of some kind of festival, right? I thought that by some chance, you were going around the festival feeling lonely by yourself, so I flew here but……the result turned out all right in the end.」



Hajime’s eyes narrowed dangerously toward Taichi who was standing up and glaring at Hajime even while coughing. Seeing that, even while feeling happiness welling up inside from understanding that Hajime was worried for her and he rushed here to spend some festival time with her, she also felt intense shame and fretfulness because her figure that was approached by someone else just now was seen by Hajime.



「U, um, that’s not what you think! There is, nothing like that going on between Taichi-kun and me! I don’t, have any intention like that at all!」



「Aa~, yeah, I see……」



Taichi, who was walking toward them, went「Gahah」with his hand pressing on his chest. Seeing that figure caused Hajime to make an expression where he was unsure of what to say. The woman he liked denied him with all her strength――indeed, hearing that would make anyone press on their chest spontaneously.



「But, recently you were worried a lot about your relationship with me, right? Perhaps you were worrying endlessly when we became student and teacher once more……it’s already really too late to think like that.」



「Hau!?」



This time, Aiko was the one who pressed her chest. Her gesture really resembled her childhood friend. That fact made Hajime’s wry smile deepen while he suddenly circled behind Aiko and embraced her. 「Ha, Hajime-kun!?」or「You-」could be heard, but Hajime ignored it.



Hajime kept embracing Aiko while he talked with a voice that was oozing a bit of exasperation into her ear.



「Even this relationship that Aiko is worried about will resolve itself not even two years later. Even so, if you are bothered with that two years, then both of us just need to hold back until that time arrives, right? If Aiko wishes for it, then I won’t mind something that small.」



「A, u, that’s……bu, but, I, am far older than you……」



「……Aiko, I’m telling you this for your own good. Just absolutely don’t say those words in front of Yue. You don’t want to have air travel ten kilometers high with your flesh body, do you?」



「Aa……」



Thinking really really carefully, something like a difference of age……above the sky there was still sky. It was something that she must not speak of no matter what.



「Good grief. Humans are a living thing that will think of various stupid things the moment they calm down, and Aiko is the very model of that kind of human huh. On top of it already being too late for that, it’s a problem that can be resolved easily. For you to become irresolute due to that……if you are that much fixated on “being a teacher”, then you at least have to be like how you were once before, where you remonstrate even me.」



「Uu, I have nothing I can say……」



「Or rather……just who do you think I am, huh? When I accepted Aiko, I should have declared it already.」



Aiko recalled. One month after the legendary decisive battle, when she wished that she also wanted to be loved by Hajime. There, she was accepted, on top of what was presented――the term of demon king-sama.



――When I decide to accept you, there won’t be any getting away.



There was no concept of “parting” for the woman of the demon king. Even if Aiko herself hated it, Hajime wouldn’t let her get away, no matter what kind of situation there was. It was impossible for him to accept any woman other than his beloved while there was any possibility of parting. That was the minimum distinction of Hajime who was someone preposterous and the worst from keeping relationships with multiple women.



The only one he could accept was only a partner who could offer her whole life to him and vice versa.



Therefore, it was meaningless for Aiko to worry about ethics, common sense, or whatever because Aiko had already offered that body and heart of hers to the demon king.



And the consequence was, that she couldn’t get away from demon king-sama.



「You understand?」



「……yes.」



Just with a sentence, when Hajime questioned her, Aiko easily surrendered. She nodded up and down repeatedly with her face bright red.



There, Taichi directed a severe gaze at Hajime who was still embracing Aiko from behind and opened his mouth.



「……You. Get away from Ai. You are, if I’m right, you are Ai’s student, aren’t you? I guess you don’t understand because you are still a student, but your existence is hurting Ai. This world is not so sweet that you can make it somehow with just feeling――」



「Thanks for the warning. But, You have mistaken the process too much to put on air as an adult with good sense. Your persuasiveness is nonexistent at the point of time you are reaching out your hand toward someone else’s woman. If you weren’t Aiko’s childhood friend, then I’d do the Inugami family to you but……well, this time I’ll magnanimously overlook it. Give up on Aiko and search for another suitable wife.」(TN: About Inugami family. I tried to google it, but the only thing I can find is a mystery novel about serial killing.)



Having a man that was younger, furthermore, someone that was still a student, talking back to him so frankly caused Taichi’s mouth to open and close wordlessly. And then, with a complexion that was busily turning blue and red intermittently, he was about to yell angrily at Hajime,



「Yaahn」



「tsu!?」



Yet he turned speechless due to the coquettish voice that Aiko raised and the spectacle happening in front of his eyes. Of all things, Hajime was thrusting his hand behind the chest part of Aiko’s yukata before his hand started to grope around! What an act! It was truly like a demon!



Then Hajime casually took out a ring that had been turned into a necklace from Aiko’s chest. Aiko, who had something embarrassing done to her in front of her childhood friend that was already like family to her, glared at Hajime with teary eyes + upward glance, but Hajime warded off something like that like a willow swaying in the wind.



「Understand that we are already at a stage where words won’t do anything. Just as you see, rather than my lover, Aiko is already my wife. Her body, her heart, I have received them all.」



「Yo, you-」



Hajime’s speech was completely like the villain. No matter how anyone looked at this, this was a composition of a gentle and sincere young man having his childhood friend snatched away by a bad man. The speech that Aiko could say in this kind of time should be「Stop-, don’t fight each other because of meee!」as expected. Although, the moment Aiko said such a thing, she would surely receive Hajime’s iron claw of love.



Taichi was about to condemn Hajime along with his emotion that felt like erupting, but before that could happen Hajime threw his words at him with a cold expression.



「You reap what you sow.」



「What-」



「You should have a powerful weapon that I don’t have. You have time and the same living environment that you spent together with Aiko since childhood, and even after you two became adults you must have met her many times too since then, isn’t that right? You should have had so many chances to exchange your feelings with Aiko, but you passed up all those chances. Don’t make any excuses now. You couldn’t even become a “reason to go home” for Aiko to give no place in her heart to go toward me. You didn’t try. The result of that is this. That’s all there is to it.」



That was a sound argument. Snatched away――such a thing was a serious case of barking up the wrong tree. While Taichi was in a position that was closer to Aiko than anyone, he didn’t fight so that he could walk together with her. That was why, before he realized it, Aiko had been at a place so far that his hand couldn’t reach. That was all there was to it.



Talking like this was strangely remonstrating considering it was Hajime. He crushed his enemy mercilessly, and if it was someone who he couldn’t stomach, then he would ignore that person without speaking too much. When that person couldn’t be ignored, then, as expected, he would crush them. That was Hajime. It was unusual for him to speak like this to someone who had tried to place their hand on Aiko.



Looking carefully, even though Taichi got thrown away that showily just now, there was no wound on him which looked that serious.



(Because he is my childhood friend……)



That must be the reason.



Aiko changed her embarrassed expression and raised a tightly stiffened face. And then, she softly untangled from Hajime’s hand that was hugging her tightly. Hajime didn’t oppose her.



Aiko took a step forward and calmly opened her mouth.



「Taichi-kun, thank you for worrying about me a lot. Thank you, that you think of me so strongly.」



「Ai……」



「But, I cannot answer Taichi-kun’s feeling. I, cannot look at Taichi-kun like that.」



「……Because of that, you are with that guy――」



「Yes. Because the one I have feelings for is Hajime-kun. I was worried about a lot of things but……yes, it’s really too late already for that. I even think to myself just what in the world I am doing worrying like that.」



「……Society won’t tolerate it. That’s something that must not be done.」



「Yes, I know. But, I cannot help it. Because the person I fell in love with is hopelessly like a demon, let alone the society, even the world or the god are no match for him. I too am a wicked woman huh.」



「……Wicked woman. Those words don’t suit Ai the most.」



「But, I think that’s not bad.」



「Haa, is that so. So it’s just like that guy said, from the beginning, it’s “too late” already for me.」



Aiko smiled wryly as though to state her agreement.



Taichi glared fiercely at Hajime. Hajime accepted it with an unruffled face. Understanding that something like his glare wouldn’t shake this guy even a little, and then, having the painful sound argument thrown at him just now, on top of how his body was thrown before this, showed him that he couldn’t even possibly match this guy in physical strength. Strength abruptly left his shoulders after glaring at Hajime for a while.



And then, he wordlessly turned around and left the shrine ground.



「My bad. Perhaps your relationship with your childhood friend will be bad after this……」



「No, it’s fine. Perhaps, it will take a bit of time, but we will be able to return back to our brother-sister relationship again.」



「Then that’s fine……but, as expected, if he reaches his hand to Aiko one more time, then I won’t have the confidence to not do the Inugami family to him.」



「……Why, are you that obsessed with the Inugami family?」



Aiko smiled wryly at Hajime’s manner of speaking, then a beat later, she faced straight at Hajime once again. And then, she bowed her head.



「I’m sorry that I made you worry because of me worrying irresolutely about strange things. Thank you for coming to meet me today.」



「Yeah, I definitely had received both your gratitude and apology. But, don’t mind it too much. I said it before too, but I really like that part of Aiko.」



「Hee? Tha, that part?」



The unexpected word of “like” made Aiko become red once more. Toward such Aiko, Hajime said that before in front of the cenotaph of the Hairihi Kingdom, he thought that Aiko who was worrying there looked dazzling to him, and then he asked her whether she remembered what they talked about there. That was what Aiko remembered just not long ago. It was clearly etched in her memory; surely it was an important memory when her feeling toward Hajime became definite.



「You who was running forward swiftly with all your might, and then you who was holding your head when you failed or when you noticed your contradiction; but even so you endured it and found a conclusion in your own way which you tried to carry through. I found those parts of Aiko dazzling; those parts look really lovely to me. That’s why Aiko, you can stay just as you are.」



「……I think it’s foul play for you to say something like that.」



Aiko turned around with her back toward him, her face looking down so Hajime couldn’t see it. But even without seeing that face, it was easily imaginable that her face was becoming complicated with shame and delight.



Perhaps because he understood that Hajime made an expression that was delicately holding back his laugh. Really what a bad guy.



「Now then, let’s go to Aiko’s house. I have to give my greeting to your parents.」



「Eh?」



Those sudden words that were said aloud so suddenly with a light tone as though asking her to go to some convenience store for a bit caused Aiko to go ‘hah’ and she turned around toward Hajime.



「It looks like your worry is resolved already, so there is no more reason that you cannot introduce me, right? If I have to greet them sooner or later, then I’ll at least show my face to them while also sending you home. It is late already, so I’ll do the formal greeting once more tomorrow.」



「A, as always, what proactiveness……n, no, you know, the greeting can be done next time……I too need to prepare my heart……」



「Hmm, Aiko’s house is over there……oh? So your father and the others are going out to the festival. They are right nearby. Yosh, let’s spend some money while greeting them at the same time.」



「Ah, wait, don’t use something like the compass for this! Wait, please don’t ignore me and go off like that! Just what in the world are you planning to say to Otou-san and the others!?」



「Of course, I’ll say “Otou-san, I accept your daughter. I won’t accept any objection or refusal”. That’s the standard speech, right?」



「The standard where-!?」



「Or rather, Aiko. I’m bothered, just why are you speaking using polite language to me while you spoke casually to that bastard? Isn’t that cruel?」(TN: Aiko has been using polite language all this time with Hajime while using peer language when she talked to Taichi.)



「Eh? That’s, it’s about the atmosphere or something……wait, don’t change the subject! There is a lot of my acquaintances here from the paaast! If you are saying something like that to Otou-san in this kind of place……tomorrow all the neighbors will know it!」



「If you properly talk casually with me too then I’ll think about it. ……Well, the time extension won’t even be one minute for you to decide though. Oh, that’s your father, isn’t it? The first impression is important. First of all, let’s binge shop the stall’s goods.」



「Please wait! Wait, wait……I get it! I get it already! I’ll properly talk to you without polite language so don’t keep walking rapidlyyy!」(TN: Here finally Aiko didn’t use polite language.)



Aiko who was making racket ‘gyaa gyaa’, and Hajime was handling her unseriously while charging toward the direction of her family with a fearless smile on his face. Naturally, Aiko was clinging to Hajime’s arm while Hajime was advancing while carrying such Aiko in his arm, and coupled with their noisiness the degree of attention to them was at MAX!



The madams of the neighborhood, and the old people who were affectionate to Aiko, they all went「Oh my!」seeing the two’s situation.



And then, finally, the father of Aiko, who noticed Hajime walking toward him with his daughter in his arms, opened his eyes widely, expressing his shock, then he smiled wryly as though he had comprehended something.



After that, Hajime, who loudly proclaimed that he was Aiko’s boyfriend right in the middle of the festival that was overflowing with Aiko’s acquaintances, was awarded clapping and the cheering of hooray. Hajime kept restraining Aiko, who was trying to run away from shame, with a princess carry and was causing cheers to be raised.



Furthermore, it was supposed to be only Hajime showing his face, but with Aiko’s father and grandfather inviting him to come to their house no matter what, Hajime visited the Hatayama house and also met with Akiko and the grandmother. Then he talked to them about his wives other than Aiko and his intention.



With everything that happened at the Shirasaki family and the Yaegashi family, Hajime had resolved himself to be slapped with rejection and rage for sure, but unexpectedly both Aiko’s parents, and even her grandparents, all the people of the Hatayama family accepted Hajime. Of course, it wasn’t like they weren’t frowning, but with the feeling of wanting to respect the will of their daughter who was already an adult, and above all, their debt of gratitude to Hajime because he had saved their daughter from danger many times, it seemed that it led to their trust for Hajime.



In the end, due to the kindness of the Hatayama family, it became a course of event where Hajime stayed for the night, and by using gate the next day, the people of the Nagumo family also visited the Hatayama family, where the words of Yue and the others which said “together with Aiko” promoted the trust to grow even deeper.



After that, it was as though the Hatayama family and the Nagumo family became like a family group but……



As a result, Aiko’s hometown became well-known as the “Land of Miracle” where every kind of crop could bear fruit regardless of the soil quality or the season. Surely that was due to the mixing of the family of “Goddess of Harvest” and the family of “Demon King of Another World”……



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Actually, I also planned to write the reason why Aiko is fixated on being a teacher, but there wasn’t any time, and I couldn’t think of any idea. Despite so, when I began to write thinking [Anyway if I just write then perhaps I’ll think of something…], this kind of Aiko was created……



Well, continuing from before, Shirakome’s condition is a bit bad, so I’m thinking of getting a change of pace.



Even though I say that I’m writing a bit of a longer extra story.



I’m thinking ‘Should I promote him to a main character I wondeeer~’.



Remember, it’s him you know, him. Come on, his name is……eh?





Chapter 197




AN: This is extra story where that guy is the leading actor.



It’s totally undecided just how far this will be!



Anyway, the prologue



Caution



(Hakumei’s excuse=>When making earth in reality as the stage, various names and setting cannot be tampered around as I pleased. What if it’s actually different from the actual condition because of my lack in knowledge……then, it’s similar but actually it’s different from the actual earth! That’s why, things like organization name or country name or weapon name, it will be okay even if they are subtly different!)



It shouldn't be like this.



Everyone without exception surely must have said that in their life. Or even if not then surely they must have thought those words in their mind.



Looking at an ideal, setting a target, making a resolve, with seriousness, one pushed forwards toward the future that they wished to be.



But, what was called as life, and what was called as world, were extremely malicious. As though it was the norm, matter went left when one wanted right, and then it went right when one thought it would be left, and in the critical time it would went "right outside the expectation". That's impossible, absurd, it's unreasonable, etc., even if one was thinking those they would still be toyed around by the raging stream of absurdity as though they were swallowed and washed away by flash flood, and then thrown out into a beach(reality) somewhere like a driftwood.



People with their dream destroyed, their heart broken, just like a scrap wood, they would stood up and start walking once more, or else they would keep being buried under the sand(reality) and vanished……it depended on each person. Although, in most cases there would be salvation from somewhere else for them. Someone might come to clear away the sand, there was also a possibility of someone pulling at their hand to drag their buried body. Perhaps there would also be someone who would stay close at their side for them until their wound was healed.



But……



(Surely, there will be no salvation for me. It's beyond hope for me to meet something like that. Aa, I, just what have I done……)



It was inside an equipment storeroom that was overflowing with iron shelves and crammed with cardboard box and fixtures. The place wasn't that spacious, it was a place to temporarily deposit fixtures that were taken out from large storehouse for the time being, there a girl was sitting down while hugging her knees.



That girl's body twitched from the sudden large impact sound and she froze from fear. *gan-gan-gan* The impact sound reverberated consecutively. Someone was hitting at the storeroom door from outside. The girl lifted her face fearfully.



She was a cute――or more accurately, a beautiful girl. Her age looked around 16, 17 years old. She had blonde hair that was tied into a side tail using scrunchie. Her almond shaped eyes that resembled a mischievous cat was colored with jade pupils and long eyelashes. On the whole she had slender body type, her legs that were stretching out from her skirt were long and slender, wrapped in black stocking. She was a girl that could even pass as a model.



But, this girl was not a model by any means, and that was shown by her clothes that a normal girl wouldn't wear in the first place. Yes, the girl was putting on "lab coat" on her blouse.



She wasn't wearing a lab coat because she was forced to wear it due to some kind of event or because of some particular hobby, which could be obviously seen from the lab coat's worn out state and her appearance that looked familiar wearing the coat which for some reason could be thought as "fitting".



That girl dressed in a bit particular look screamed「hii-」when a strong impact sound *gan-* reverberated once more and she held her head with both her hands. She shrunk her body really small, from her look she was in a state of fear, however, it seemed that fear wasn't because the ringing impact sound outside the storeroom was unknown for her, rather she was scared because she knew the true form of that impact sound.



Because, while the girls expression was scared, at the same time colors of pity, sadness, and guilt were coloring her face.



「I'm sorry, I'm sorry, I'm sorry……」



The girl in lab coat were repeating words of repentance with a voice so small as though it would melt into the air and became nothing. Just what was that apology referring to……



Butm at that time, the resounding impact sound stopped completely. The lab coat girl thought of a question「What is going on?」with tears gathering in the corner of her eyes. The behavioral principle of "them" that the lab coat girl created was extremely instinctual. Therefore they shouldn't be leaving away that easily from the storeroom where the "prey" that was the girl was inside. Then, perhaps something different that attracted the interest of "them" had appeared.



The girl wiped her eyes roughly with the sleeve of her lab coat and she advanced through the space between the shelves slowly and quietly on all fours. And then, the girl who finally arrived like a scared cat until beside a shelve at the inner part where it became a blind spot from the door of the storeroom, quietly peeked out her face from the cover of the shelve, her gaze moving toward the door that stopped making sound.



「Hiu」



She raised a strange scream that normally she wouldn't let out. The inside of her throat reflexively tightened from looking at the state of the door. Ahead of the girl's gaze, the door of the storeroom was――dented all over where it was in the verge of breaking down.



It was a storeroom to deposit items temporarily, so the door was made from iron and fitted with lock. Regardless large number of dent was created on the door as though it had received abnormal and concentrated impact which distorted it terribly. The outside corridor could be peeked out from the edge of the door. If the door received one more impact, then it would collapse inside the room.



「……」



Killing her breathing, the girl stared fixedly at the door for a while, before long strength suddenly left her shoulders. It seemed "they" had went away somewhere just before the door broke……



But, it seemed it was a bit too fast to think that.



*GOGAANNN* The door was blown away inside the room at the same time with that terrific impact sound.「Hih」The girl screamed and her body froze. The next moment, the door that flew inside with fierce momentum cut a swath through the shelves near the girl.



The girl fell on her butt and then perhaps because it was her habit when she was surprised, she hugged her head with both her hands once more, tears were gathering in the corner of her eyes while she fearfully opened her shut eyes.



「Fuuh――, fuuh――」



「a, ua」



Ahead of the girl's gaze was a man. It was a young man in the middle of his twenty wearing a lab coat similarly like the girl.



「Se, senpai……」



A whisper leaked out from the girl. The young man seemed to be a "senpai" that the girl knew. But, if a person that didn't know the situation was in this place, surely they would be unable to comprehend the girl's words at all.



Because, no matter how anyone saw it, for someone who was called as "senpai" by this girl whose intellectual eyes weren't clouded even with her scared expression, he didn't look like that type of person, no, in the first place he didn't even look like human.



The man's eyes didn't have fixed focus, those were abnormal eyes that sometimes fully bared the white of the eyes, his face and arms had blood vessels rising to the surface, despite how his body should have slim figure originally, his flesh was swelling bizarrely like bodybuilder, his breathing was rough and saliva was dripping down from his mouth, and he was raising low growl like a beast. There was no reasoning that could be seen from him. While he was wearing similar lab coat with the girl, but that appearance was truly out of place.



And then what was the most strange, was his fists that were tightly clenched. Those fists that likely were continuously hitting the iron door until it was broken just now, their skin was peeled, the flesh gouged, bones were jutting out, and they were soaked in blood, but those fists were rapidly returning back to normal in a speed that was obvious in a glance. No, perhaps to say more accurately, the flesh was swelling up, the bones that were cracked were connected back, and the fist was repaired to the shape of a fist that was still warped.



「uUUa-」



「A, a……」



The girl backed down while still on her butt slowly. The abnormal young man kept growling while heavily pursuing after her. The storeroom wasn't that big. Therefore, the back of the girl was immediately blocked by a wall.



The man was standing like a mindless beast in front of the cornered girl. Something warm was flowing out from between the legs of the girl who was holding her head. It was something that she did because of the extreme fear, but the girl herself had no composure to be care about that.



Toward such a girl, the fist of the young man that destroyed even a door made from iron was raised without even a shred of hesitation.



(I'm, sorry……. If only I didn't do that kind of research……. I'm sorry, senpai……everyone……)



While trembling toward her death that would surely arrive a few beats later, the girl repeated her repentance inside her heart.



Like that, the fist that could easily crush the face of the girl was swung do――



「Doctor Grant!」



An angry voice of a young woman and dry bursting sound reverberated. The fist of the "senpai" stopped. And then, slowly he turned around while growling. The lab coat girl also directed her gaze toward the door from the shadow of the "senpai".



There, was the figure of a tall woman wearing black suits with both her hands readying a handgun.



「Doctor Grant, please get down!」



「tsu」



Hearing the sharp instruction that shook the air like an electric shock, Doctor Grant――Emily Grant reflexively flopped her body low on the floor.



Right after that was the sound of gun discharging resounding consecutively. And then, a beast's roar. Footsteps that were like earthquake was going away from Emily. When Emily moved her gaze while lying low on the ground, she could see the figures of the black suits woman firing toward the "senpai" and "senpai" who charged ahead without caring of that.



At first it seemed the woman was aiming at the shoulders and legs of "senpai", but then she clicked her tongue looking that he didn't even seem to itch when the bullets hit. The next moment, with an astounding speed that it wouldn't be an exaggeration even if it was said that it was nearly instantly, the "senpai" closed the distance and he pushed out his fist toward the woman while screaming.



In no time, it seemed that the woman would become a mere lump of meat just like that, but at the next instant, it was proven that the woman wasn't an ordinary person.



「Haa-」



Along with a short breathing, the woman stepped forward. Like that, she weaved through the approaching fist and stepped inside the bosom of the "senpai" and grasped at his collar, and turned around. Without stopping she performed a splendid shoulder throw.



The "senpai" whose charging momentum was used for a throwing technique had his posture turned upside down and thrown onto the wall at the opposite side. Even so, as expected it was like he didn't feel any pain but……



「……Forgive me.」



That sentence was audible. At the same time, a dry bursting sound rang. The fired 9mm bullet penetrated from an eye of the "senpai" and mercilessly pulverized the brain. The body of the "senpai" twitched, and before long he stopped moving as though all strength had left him.



The woman held her handgun with both hands while observing the body with fixed stare for a while. Then with a sigh strength left her shoulders, it seemed she had judged that the "senpai" wouldn't move anymore. And then, she exchanged the gun's magazine with trained motion while taking a contact using her communication device to somewhere, with her quite expressionless face moving toward Emily that was sitting dumbfounded inside the storeroom.



「Doctor Grant, it's great that you are safe. I am Vanessa Paradis of state security. I come to pick you up. I will guard you until a safe place from here on.」



The woman who introduced herself as Vanessa quickly approached Emily's side and calmly held out her hand. The girl who saw from nearby comprehended it, indeed this woman had an appearance and air where it could be glimpsed that she was used to rough scene. Long slit and sharp eyes, with very short hair that was colored between grey and beige. Her height seemed to surpass 179 centimeter easily. Her whole body was emitting cold presence that was sharp like a knife.



Surely it was because of that, Emily wrinkled her eyebrows in vigilance.



「……I have grasped the gist of your circumstance. It's natural for you to be cautious. However, we don't have any leeway time wise. This facility is filled with the infected personnel. My colleagues are attracting their attention, but even so they cannot hold for long. That's why, please believe me for now and come with me.」



「…………senpai is……」



「……Forgive me. My priority protection target is you. I have no leeway to leave him as it was. Also, it was already too late when he became like that, that matter――」



「Yes. I am the one who know that the best.」



Emily stared for a while at the mere shadow of "senpai's" former self sinking in the sea of blood behind Vanessa, after that she moved her gaze to Vanessa. She was still having cold atmosphere and looked expressionless, but in her eyes that were so close Emily's figure was reflected on them, sympathy and apology toward could be seen somehow.



Emily stared fixedly at those eyes, then she took the hand of Vanessa that was still held out toward her.



「This doesn't mean I trust you but……I still, cannot die.」



「Yes, I don't mind that. Don't be separated from me no matter what, please follow me.」



Emily roughly wiped the tears gathering at the corner of her almond-shaped eyes that looked like cat with her lab coat, and then she sternly raised the corner of her eyes. Vanessa who saw that nodded briskly. And then she exited the room while leading Emily.



「……Senpai, I'm sorry. I swear, that I'll surely stop this.」



「……」



Emily left behind her words for the "senpai" at the end.



Emily who was still young and unfamiliar with the world even though she was called as genius was always alone in the university that she was enrolled into by skipping grade. Her personality that hated losing by nature caused her to use speech and conduct that seemed to say 'I'm totally okay!' even in such an environment, but as expected for Emily who was still very young it was something tough……



What let such Emily who was pretending to be tough to be a researcher in the true meaning, was the professor and the students of the laboratory where she was currently attached to. If the professor who she was indebted to for anything and everything was like her father, then the seniors were like her big brother and sister. They were affectionate to her like she was their little sister, and yet they treated her more than an equal as a researcher.



Even amidst those people, the completely changed "senpai" whose breathing stopped atrociously in front of her eyes was a benefactor who especially helped Emily warmly.



The silent prayer of Emily that went for less than a beat, was filled with really, really strong feeling that couldn't be expressed with words.



Even while staying vigil at the surrounding, Vanessa sent a glance without emotion at such Emily. No, there was a slight tremor in that gaze. It was something like a sympathy, or possibly worry……



However, the moment Emily finished her short silent prayer, Vanessa's gaze returned to its former expressionless look where her emotion couldn't be discerned.



「Let's go.」



「Yes.」



「Oo, so that's the famous clock tower. Yep, as expected something like this is best seen with your own eyes.」



There was a Japanese young man making click-clack sounds with his smartphone while making satisfied voice. Shouldering a largish rucksack, this young man wearing plain clothes with black tone didn't have any particular trait in his appearance.



That blackish young man took photo for a while, and then while confirming the result picture he lifted his face suddenly in realization.



「Crap, this is not the time to keep sightseeing. I've got to accomplish the instruction from my demon king-sama.」



The clock taken inside the photo was already showing the closing of the day. The surrounding scenery was already becoming quite dark with the cloudy weather although it wasn't as far as snowing.



The young man put away his smartphone and shouldered back his rucksack before he turned around while breathing out 'haa' white breath.



「Even though this doubled with my private business, but this is still a rough way of using someone. Well, I too am his relative more or less……there is no way I can refuse. Let's do my best.」



The young man vanished between the people hurrying to return home while talking to himself like that. Before long, his figure was completely buried into the surrounding scenery and he couldn't be seen anymore.



Although, before that young man slipped into the crowd, there was not even a person who sent their gaze toward him. He was too much normal, and too much without presence.



Someone who was able to notice that abnormality, was of course didn't exist there.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



This might make me sound obstinate, but one more time,



This is different from real earth! That’s why, if you want to retort ‘What the hell is state security bureau, somehow various things are seriously wrong here!’, I beg you to do it only inside your heart.



……Really, sorry.



Ah, also, I uploaded my activity report. I also placed cover image and special illustration there.



If you don’t mind please look over there too.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 198




London outskirts that was wrapped in thin mist. In a corner of a retro street where it felt like old fairy-tale or folklore might be hiding, there was a splendid residence where history could be felt from it conspicuously.



It appeared to be prudently maintained that it didn't look worn out. The garden that was spreading out at the front, the small path made from spread out white gravel and the flower bed where seasonal flowers were blooming, a small fountain where a beautiful goddess was sitting, all of those were first class work that gave elegant impression, from them it could be understood that really, really much labor, expense, and time were spent.



And that was how it should be, the master of this residence――Jefferson Allgrey was a famous wealthy person even at Britain. He was from a family lineage that was titled as the so-called "Real Estate King" that for generations possessed countless plot of land and building, buying and selling them.



Jefferson who was the current master of this generation Allgrey family also properly inherited the business talent from his ancestors, not only that he also seemed to possess political talent, he was a capable human that raised definite result while engaged in two trades of political world and real estate magnate at the same time.



The residence of such Jefferson was normally visited by many people. The type of people visiting was varied. If there were people from the same political world visiting, then there were also people from real estate companies who visited, there were also a lot of people visiting who were his personal friends.



Anyway, it was a house where the flow of people visiting it never ceased, and it was also a well-known fact for the people at the surrounding area.



Today too, a few hours already passed since the sun set, there was also the shrouding mist that it was a time where darkness had completely descended. The principal residence of Allgrey was lighted with brilliant illumination. Several high class cars were being parked nearby the main gate, showing how there were many guests visiting.



Although, each of the visitors today were definitely well-known characters, but it seemed they weren't friends that were invited for simple dinner, they also didn't appear to be guests who came for work-related matter to speak about politics or business.



「Now then, chief. Don't you think that we should get down to business soon? For you to assemble more than half of the society's upper echelons……it must be something really considerable isn't it? My guess that it must be a matter about them.」



A middle-aged man whose body was wrapped in a suit that was obviously high quality in a glance, with splendid moustache and belly meat, he addressed Jefferson as "chief".



Even though Jefferson was called with that designation that wasn't used that often in general, but he still behaved naturally. Looking from that attitude of him, it could be understood that it was only the matter of course for him to be called like that by the people who were called to this place today.



Jefferson slowly ran his gaze at the surrounding. It seemed that he had finished his meal, there was only wine put in front of him. Other than them, there were several servants of Allgrey family and the respective bodyguards that were brought by each guest.



Tonight there were nine guests gathered. Everyone of them were prominent figure that owned phenomenal result in their respective field, but the fields they participated in were completely scattered. Seen from the side this was a gathering that really couldn't be understood, the biggest possibility was that these people were the personal friend of Jefferson. Even if there was an outsider who knew of this meeting, then surely they would only be able to think of this as a meeting of fellow friends all the same.



But, from how Jefferson was sitting at the seat of honor while the others were sitting around a long table, it seemed that there was a clear pecking order here. And that became even clearer from the atmosphere they were clad in.



「……They are the real thing.」



A short sentence. For people who didn't know the circumstance, they would tilt their head wondering what he was speaking about. But, all the people at the dining table were instantly going astir from that sentence that was said by Jefferson with oppressive tone.



「Is that……is that, really true?」



「Wasn't that just a mere group kidnapping……」



「Certainly it was a inexplicable case, but……」



「A case of that degree is not that rare. Chief, do you have any basis saying that?」



While their mouths were speaking words where confusion and expectation were mixing together, their gazes were concentrating at Jefferson.



「There is still only circumstantial evidence. But, I have no doubt of it. ……I have confirmed that all the people who were sent to investigate were returning to their daily life without getting any information. Far from investigating, they forget even the society.」



「No way……」



「However, just with that……. It's not as though method to induce such situation doesn't exist you know?」



「Yeah, I know. Of course, I didn't make my conclusion just with that. ……This is the situation that can be currently confirmed. I judged that it is already at the level where there would be no problem calling it as supernatural.」



Saying that, Jefferson urged a servant with his gaze to distribute written report, the upper echelons sent their eyes to it. After they did that, they went astir once more.



The content that was written in that written report was,



It wrote, the house of the target group that had been confirmed once for some reason couldn't be approached for the second time. Even when they walked following map, when they noticed they were walking in circle at a completely different place.



It wrote, the observer was observing from a distance of 800 meter, regardless of that their gaze would meet without fail.



It wrote, the family register of the target that shouldn't exist until a few days ago was registered before they knew it.



It wrote, that abnormality wasn't noticed by anyone in the administration side. They didn't even feel that anything was out of place.



It wrote, everyday, their partners were disappearing one by one.



And then,



――It wrote, the people who were tasked to investigate, without exception all of them would have blank in their memory after a while. Even the matter that was being reporter right now, whether it was really true or not……was unknown.



Surely everyone was scanning the report until the very last sentence. Silence descended on the dining table. Everyone was fixated on the content of the report.



But, after a while……



「Fu, fuha, fuhahahahahaha-」



One person raised a laughing voice looking like he couldn't hold it down. It was a hideously distorted laughing voice that was composed from joy and madness. However, such laughing voice that would grant discomfort to anyone hearing it whether one wanted it or not, was gradually spreading to the other upper echelons too.



「Finally, we found the real thing! Magnificent! I wonder just what kind of supernatural they are knowing!」



「At the very least, it seemed they have the skill to interfere with human's brain. That's something beyond the position of mere students.」



「It cannot stay like this. Chief! We have to immediately send assault force and secure one or two sample!」



Excitement was ruling over the place. It was a mad excitement, just like how someone who lost in a desert finally found an oasis, that feeling of insane arousal before their craving could be fulfilled.



Perhaps this was only natural for them. Because these people had been secretly maneuvering, searching for "that" through so many years and months that they couldn't count anymore.



「Calm down……telling all of you that is impossible I guess. I understand well everyone's feeling. Then, everyone agree of the plan to move with the purpose of obtaining sample? There will be many troublesome things if we completely kidnapped all of them……」



「What, they are people who had gone through group disappearance once you know, chief. Even if it happened for the second time, surely there will be no one who thinks it strange. Not to mention there are also those among them who didn't return before this.」



「The ability possessed by the samples are concerning matter but……they are just children after all. It shows from how they are content with being student while possessing such power. We can do whatever we like if we involve their family into it. I will immediately begin to prepare the experiment site.」



「The returnee, they obtained supernatural while they disappeared……I'm bothered with the whereabouts of those that doesn't return. Perhaps, they are in the place that have to do with supernatural? If we grasped that, even us……」



The upper echelons let out their opinion after Jefferson's words. The meeting tonight was obviously filled with passion that was never seen before.



Like that, when they had decided the most of their plan from here on, Jefferson opened his mouth.



「Then, all of you, proceed with the matter paying meticulous attention for the sake of the accomplishment of our dearest wish. The priority target for securing sample will be the girl who is called as "Yue" as the first in the list――」



「About that, I think it's better if you stop with that though.」



And also the girls who aren't Japanese that are around the returnees――Jefferson was about to say that, but his words were suddenly cut off.



For a moment Jefferson thought that it was someone among the upper echelon who cut him off, but he immediately discard that idea as impossible. The returnees from the group disappearance in the middle of day that agitated the society――if it was asked what was the aspect that was clearly different in them compared to before, then the first thing that would attract the attention was the existence of the not Japanese girls who suddenly appeared.



Thinking from how their family register was created before anyone noticed too, then it would be valid to think of them as "visitor from the supernatural side". Then it was natural to prioritize securing them as sample.



That was the common understanding between Jefferson and other upper echelons that they obtained from continuously investigating the series of turmoil of the returnees that started from the group disappearance. For that reason, it was impossible for anyone to object here. And above all, the voice of young man which cut him off was a voice he wasn't familiar with!



Jefferson felt something cold running through his spine while raising an angry voice that questioned the identity of the person.



「Who! Where are you!?」



「No, I am right in front of you from some time ago. I was normally eating meal here.」



A voice that contained resignation resounded. At that moment, not only Jefferson, the upper echelons, the servants, and then the bodyguards too, they all finally aware.



「Yo」



With a really light mood, at the chair that was positioned at the opposite side of Jefferson, with his mouth stuffed with the same cooking that Jefferson and others were eating just now, was a Japanese young man greeting with his hand lightly raised!



「You bastard……where did you enter from? What is the guard at the entrance doing?」



The upper echelons and the servants were greatly shaken, the bodyguards were in the middle of taking out their handgun in order to recover from their disgrace, while Jefferson was restraining them from firing before he opened his mouth calmly. It seemed that he was also shaken, but the speed of him rallying back his mind ought to be said just as expected from an authority of politic-real estate world that managed this meeting.



Right after he took back his calm, dominating aura overflowed from Jefferson. That aura was something intense, if an ordinary person felt it then not only they would wither down without being able to say anything, they would undoubtedly trickle cold sweats while getting all flustered.



But, that young man warded off such dominating aura like a swaying willow……or rather, in the first place the young man didn't even pay attention to that aura, he kept eating the cooking of Allgrey residence with gusto while talking.



「Nguh. You asked me from where, I entered normally from the door you know. Mugu mugu, I even said excuse me. ……Though I was normally ignored.」



「……That, seems to be the cooking of my residence though?」



「It's awfully delicious. As expected from the place of a big shot politician and the real estate king. There was leftover in the kitchen, so I loaded it onto a plate by myself. ……I, I pretty much asked okay? I took silence to mean OK, but I properly asked okay? I'm not stealing you know?」



For some reason the young man kept reminding something like「It's true you know?」. Jefferson knitted his eyebrows at such young man. The more he looked, the more this young man looked like a normal youth. No, in a sense, he was too normal in presence and appearance that if he didn't concentrate it felt like he would naturally forget him, perhaps he should say that this young man wasn't normal in that sense……



「Who are you……or perhaps it's too unsophisticated for me to ask that? That remark of yours just now in this situation. And then that ability that managed to infiltrate here without anyone able to notice. You are……a returnee huh?」



Jefferson spoke his conjecture with conviction, but for some reason the young man who heard his words frowned and his face looked a little sad. While Jefferson was perplexed from that inexplicable reaction, the young man asked with a voice that also sounded sad.



「A returnee huh? you asked, if you investigated about us, then shouldn't you know about me too? I expected a reaction like『You bastard-, you are a returnee huh!?』, but……」



「What? A report of you is not……」



Jefferson was perplexed. He had looked over all the report of the returnee, he had driven into his head all the information of the returnees' profile from their family until their relative. If the young man before his eyes was a returnee that had been reported, then there was no way he couldn't recall him.



But, when one of his servants excitedly showed to him the returnees written report that had been converted into digital data in tablet……



「…………………Returnee list No. 28――Endo Kousuke? ………………ah」



「Yep, you forgot aren't you? Isn't that right? That's fine, I understand. Hehe, I'm used to it. Although my shadow is thin even in digital data, I'm not co, concerned at all you know? I am a riajuu you know? That's why, I'm really, really not concerned at all okay?」



Strange silence descended on that place. The young man――Kousuke who seemed to be thin in shadow even inside digital data was making *kacha kacha* sound with the spoon and fork, only that sound was resounding with clarity inside that room. Word of「Delish-」that he was whispering until just now was changing into「It's salty huh」.



「S, so this is the supernatural that you possess.」



「……I got this since birth. Even my mum, she often forget to do things like picking me up at kindergarten……」



「……I, I see. That, you know, must be hard for you huh.」



For some reason Kousuke received gentle words and sympathy from the man who was aiming at him and his friends. The salt content of the high class cooking was increasing! A female servant was wiping her eyes with a handkerchief. The eyes of the bodyguards who were readying their gun until just now were turning lukewarm!



While spouting complaint「If you sympathize than give me presence」inside his heart, Kousuke cleared his throat *cough*, he stopped eating and opened his mouth.



「So, about the reason I came here.」



「Mu, that's right. Certainly I've never thought that a returnee will directly march into here. It appeared that your side has also investigated us to a certain degree. ……You, don't tell me, you came alone here?」



「Well, yeah. Actually I was in the middle of personal travel though. But suddenly you guys are making conspiracy, so I was told to go here for a bit to crush all of you.」



Kousuke was looking at his smartphone while saying「In front of Rana, I cannot refuse that guy's request」with his shoulders dropping down. Seeing that Jefferson exchanged look with the upper echelons and the bodyguards while his expression turned ridiculing.



「Crushing us, is it. Looks like you are growing impudent after obtaining supernatural huh. It is overwhelmingly faster to shot your four limbs with lead bullet in this range. It seems that you have the technique to interfere with your opponent's awareness, but in this limited space, can you crush us faster than bullet?」



*gacha* Hard ominous sounds resounded countless time. The bodyguards were focusing their gun muzzle toward Kousuke. Their number was a little less than twenty people. The place was a large dining room where sixty people could enter with room to spare, but certainly in this limited space it was equivalent with not having any way to escape from twenty gun muzzles.



Jefferson who thought that this young man was showing composure because he was a child who was drunk in his own power reversely showed a composed attitude. He crossed his arms above the table, and then while hiding his mouth behind his joined hand, his sharp gaze was striking toward Kousuke.



「Young man. Won't you come to our side? According to the report, it seems that the livelihood of all of you doesn't change much before and after obtaining supernatural. It's worthy of praise that not one of you is running wild, but surely that's only because you all don't understand the way to use the power you obtained. Then, we will teach you what is the right way to use that power. This Jefferson Allgrey can promise you, a life that is filled with riches and fame that is beyond your imagination.」



「……You really can say that with straight face after calling human as sample huh. They said that the skin of a politician's face is thick but, that's really true. Scaryyy」



Kousuke didn't look like he was particularly moved by Jefferson's persuading words, rather he showed a creeped out look. While raising one of his eyebrows that money and fame didn't resound in Kousuke's heart, Jefferson continued his words.



「Then what about woman? You are ――」



「I have girlfriend, I'm fine in that. Rather, my girlfriend is a super beauty already. She is already the best-, yep.」



Having his words cut off and hearing Kousuke suddenly speaking fondly of his girlfriend in front of him caused Jefferson's gaze to become something severe.



「……It's natural for you to feel almighty if you have a special power. But, what is called reality is something that is more heartless then what all of you is thinking. Perhaps if it's just you, or possibly it's just all of you returnees then you all might make it work out somehow. But, what about the people around you? Your family, your friends who are not returnee, relatives. Can you protect all of them? Our society is not just about violence you know?」



Saying that, Jefferson looked at his surrounding. Ahead of his gaze were the upper echelons of their society ――every one of them were successful people who possessed social power. And then, the gaze of Jefferson spoke more eloquently than anything.



That this wasn't everything their society possessed.



In other words, even in the one in a million chance all the people here died, their society itself wouldn't be finished. There were still other people with power gathering in their society.



「I'll recognize your ability to gather information until this far and your guts to infiltrate into here alone. But, for you to be under the impression that the situation before your eyes is everything there is, you are still just a child. We have seek for supernatural from long ago, the society that have laid stretch our root to everywhere in the world, we are――」



「Hydra, right?」



Jefferson who implicitly pressed for obedience under the name of cooperation to Kousuke with condescending attitude was about to disclose the name of their society with plenty of emotion, but right before he could, Kousuke easily revealed that name.



Jefferson who twitched in reaction was about to open his mouth further, but ignoring him Kousuke ate the last of his food and operated his smartphone with one hand, then he spoke out the content that was displayed there.



「Abduction, murder, robbery, human experiment, on top of that even inducing war, a fanatic group of supernatural that will do anything――Hydra. Certainly it looks like you guys have long history. The origin of the name is because no matter how many upper echelons and parts of the organization are crushed, the survivor of the organization that is hiding somewhere will restore the organization back. The organization had existed since before the colonial period, historically the organization has been crushed several times, but before one knows it the organization is revived. The current chief is you……」



After that Kousuke read out loud the internal conditions of secret society Hydra. And then the information of upper echelon bunches who were here like their name, surface information, family, friends, work relatives, on top of that even the name of their illegitimate child or relationship with other organization that they kept secret even inside the organization. He didn't stop with just that, the concealed upper echelons who weren't here and the location of bases, and even further and further, things like the innermost thought of the upper echelons toward each other and so on, Kousuke disclosed everything.



It was clear that what was disclosed wasn't nonsense from the upper echelons who opened their mouth so wide it looked like their jaw might come off and their expression whose face turned completely pale.



Everything that they had done was impossible to be known by the information network of children or even by ordinary adult. Jefferson who had that fact thrust right back at his face not just by two fold but by ten thousand fold, the color of his face clearly shown how the capacity of his trained mind had completely went over capacity.



「When you peer into the abyss, the abyss will also peer back at you――su~ch famous expression, if it's you guys who loves supernatural then surely you have heard it before. We are standing in the superior position. Just how do you guys able to blindly believe such thing without any basis at all?」



「You, you bastard……」



「Well, you guys, you all are veteran through many adversity in the surface world huh. You guys must have never even dreamed that children who is going through school life without a care after getting their hand on magic will be able to overwhelm you even in information volume……」



「Why……just how, you know that much……」



「That's, if we know that there are some guys aiming for us, to say nothing of us, there is no way our demon king-sama will stay silent. Because that guy, he look like a cruel and heartless savage bastard, but actually he is totally spoiling the important people around him.」



「Demon king, you say?」



「Yeah. A godslaying demon king. That guy killed even god for the sake of a woman, and now you guys try to lay your hand on exactly that woman.」



Kousuke's gaze was growing to be filled with limitless sympathy. Jefferson's expression was grandly convulsing. There was already no dominating aura of a big-shot that could overpower ordinary person coming from him. Because he was a veteran manager and a politician who had piled up many experiences of going through adversity that he was able to understand Kousuke's experience and felt a sense of danger welling up inside him.



That was――they had touched something that should not be touched.



But, however, the people who were still relatively young among the upper echelons didn't have enough of that intuition.



「What is, what is, what demon king-. Just, what godslaying! Even nonsense has limit!」



「Tha, that's right! As expected you are just a kid. It seems that you don't even know how to bluff. Something like godslaying, as expected you have exaggerate too much.」



「Chief, no more word is necessary! Let's make this brat pay the compensation for looking down on the society! You guys, just keep him alive! Do it!」



Saying that, they started a reckless action without waiting for the order of the chief which was normally impossible. Jefferson immediately tried to raise his voice to stop them, but faster than he could, several of the black-suited bodyguards, because of the strange atmosphere and the mysterious uneasy feeling they had, as though aroused by their impulse they were aiming their gun toward Kousuke's limbs while jumping forward.



「……Haa. I had more or less tried it, even though I thought of doing this by getting spared from releasing the shackle.」



Inside the situation that was moving all at once, there was only that whisper resounding.



「Wha-. Where is-」



「Shit-, what is going on!? Where did that guy go!?」



「No way, he vanished!?」



The jumping forward black-suited bodyguards were surrounding a chair that had no one on it in feeling dumbfounded. The chair should have Kousuke sitting on it until just a moment ago. From the beginning until the end they didn't take off their gaze even for an instant from that chair.



He was certainly there. Right in front of their eyes. They would grip him up, pulled him down from the chair, and held him down. They reached out their hands without leaving any place to escape while even imaging how he would counterattack, they were certainly aware of him until the moment they could touch him. Yet despite so their hands moved through empty air and "when they noticed" the target had vanished. It was as though he wasn't there right from the start.



「-, our mind has been interfered already!? Be careful, our awareness is being manipulated!」



Jefferson, thinking that it couldn't be helped now it had come to this, he pushed at the emergency button at the other side of the table to summon the bodyguards standing by everywhere inside the residence while giving a warning. And then, he himself also took out a handgun from his breast pocket, at that time Kousuke's voice resounded once more. However, it was a voice with slightly different air than until just now.



「Interference to awareness? Fuh, what exaggeration……. My Ground Shrinker was beyond the pale of your perception ability, isn't that's all there is to it?」



「Wha-, impossible, standing on the ceiling!?」



Jefferson and others who were staying on guard against the most likely possibility of Kousuke sliding under the table was thinking in the corner of their mind 'doesn't it feel like his tone is a little strange?' while they looked up in surprise, and then they exposed a really stupid expression from shock.



Although, surely such reaction was something that couldn't be helped if they saw a human standing really naturally on the ceiling as though to say 'Gravity? What's that?'.



Furthermore,



(Why, why, is he making a strange pose!?)



Yes, Kousuke was standing upside down on the ceiling while covering his face with one hand with his eyes glaring down at Jefferson and others from between his fingers' gap! On top of that, before they knew it his body was already in an appearance of total black clothes, his eyes were wearing a sunglass on one-lens type, and his other hand was holding a black knife in a position that was crossed with the hand that was covering his face! Surely if the rabbit eared assassination group of another world saw this, they would undoubtedly clap and cheer while giving high praise of「What cool pose!!」!



「Fools who fell into the abyss of selfish desires and fanaticism. I'll teach into your body, that in this world, there are things that you ought not to know.」



For some reason, while rotating once before displaying a chuuni pose (version 24) again, Kousuke, no, the assassin of the strongest class who was awakened in various meaning at the other world, thrown a declaration of war toward the fanatic occult group. Together with that chuuni self-introduction!!



「The shadow of demon king, the vanguard of the dark rabbit ear family――Rapid Fang Shadow Claw, Kousuke E Abyssgate. Has arrived!!」



What does rabbit ear mean…….. Abyssgate, gate to where……. Those retort of Jefferson and others didn't form into loud words.



Because right after that, the peerless one even against the god's apostles in another world, the one with the thinnest shadow in the world, the best assassin in the world bared his fang.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Everyone’s review that is like it has been planned beforehand blew away Hakumei.



Like, Endo-kun, you are loved huuh. ……He is loved, right?



I properly got his name out this time, so please remember it properly.



He is Endo Abyssgate-kun, okay.



PS



I placed the information about the special SS for each bookstore-sama in my activity report.



Please confirm it if you please.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 199




「Haaaa~~~~~」



It was past noon where warm sunlight was showering down. In a corner of a certain city, at a lovely café with wooden entrance and terrace, a groan of a zombie was resounding. Although, people who got startled from that groan that sounded like it was reverberating from the realm of the dead was nonexistent.



Whether it was the couple that was feeding each other with cute cake at the terrace, or the male customer with businessman appearance operating his tablet alone, or the old man walking his dog who just passed through in front of the terrace, none of them showed any sign of being bothered by that groan. Or rather, they didn't even look like they noticed the groan.



「aaa~~~~~~」



The groan resounded once more. As expected no one noticed, but the owner of the groan who wasn't paid attention to, he also seemed to get used of not being paid attention to, so he groaned without any reservation regardless of him being in public space.



To say more while in this topic, that zombie imitation had his face pressed down on the café's table, with both his hands holding his head. He looked like, someone who had made a mistake that couldn't be taken back and lamented his very life.



Just to make sure, this wasn't a zombie that escaped a research place somewhere and slipped into the street, as made evident by the glass with the logo of the café filled with beverage put in front of him, and the sandwich that still wasn't touched but had already been properly ordered.



But, at that time, the smartphone that was placed on top of the table of the zombie imitation was starting to play the BGM of a certain epic RPG's demon king battle. That ringtone caused the zombie imitation to twitch in reaction, his hand crawled with his face still pressed on the table and picked up the smartphone.



And then, he put the phone on his ear and took the call still with his face pressed on the table.



「……bai」



『What's with that voice? That voice sounds like you are going to drop dead anytime.』



「Yeah, I feel dying. I caused my shame to overflow……」



『……I guessed it already. So you done it again huh, Endo.』



「I done it……I really done it, Nagumo. Perhaps, I'm no good already.」



『Endo……』



From the other side of the phone receiver, the conversation partner――the one who requested for the annihilation of the occult fanatic group Hydra, Nagumo Hajime guessed the mental damage of Kousuke and seemed to be exasperated, or perhaps it was sympathy in his voice that called Kousuke's name.



And then,



『Well, that doesn't matter――』



「It matter! Don't put it aside that simply! Give me more sympathy here! Have some more care! You are my kindred-spirit who know the same pain like me right!?」



Having his problem simply put aside like that, the excessive sadness caused Kousuke to succeed in coming back from zombie back to human. *Gabacho!* His face that was pressed on the table flew up and he raised the scream of his soul as though willing it to reach the other side of the sea.



『Even if you say that. In my case, I have a strong position as the victim of Hauria, but in your case, recently it came from yourself right? Not long ago you was still okay if it was just a little scuffle. Or else, was the case this time that difficult?』



「Uguu. Stabbing me right where it hurt……. That's, it wasn't really that bad yeah but……when I entered battle, unconsciously……. Maybe this is because before I asked you to open the gate and I spent a while with Hauria. Somehow, it feels like the more time I spend with them the more easily I "become" that……」



『Becoming Lord Abyssgate, huh.』



「Don't say that nameee!」



*gon-* Kousuke's face pressed down on the table once more along with that painful sounding sound.



――Endo Kousuke



The one with the scout role at the former hero party, at the legendary decisive battle which was carved at the history of the other world Tortus, he was the strongest assassin that boasted peerless performance against the apostles of god. ……Though such thing couldn't be imagined at all from the figure writhing in shame while groaning with his face pressed on a café's table.



The reason for such him who casually had a status of strongest to be turning into a hopeless person like this at a café in the middle of day, was needless to say because of the battle last night. Yes, that thing which was manifested at the battle, that chuuni conduct which was just too painful to look and listen to.



Just why he was performing that kind of chuuni in full drive even understanding that later on he would receive mental damage like this where it felt like he wanted to bash his head at the corner of a block of tofu and die? There were unavoidable reasons there.



One of the reasons was this.



===========================================================================================



Endo Kousuke 17 Years Old Male Level:92



Vocation: Assassin



Physical Strength: 800



Stamina: 940



Endurance: 450



Agility: 1700



Magic Power: 560



Magic Resistance: 560



Skill: Assassination Technique [+Dagger Art] [+Concealment] [+Tracking] [+Throwing Art] [+Hidden Weapon Art] [+Transmission Wave] [+Escape Art] [+Abyss Lord] - Presence Manipulation [+Presence Isolation] [+Phantom Step] [+Dream Illusion III] [+Clarity Phantom] [+Minimum Mind] - Shadow Dance [+Water Dance] [+Leave Dance] - Gravity Magic - Language Comprehension



===========================================================================================



As for the detail of those skills, [+Dagger Art] until [+Hidden Weapon Art] had the meaning exactly as the name implied, [+Transmission Wave] was an ability to strain one's ear to pick the vibration in the air or in the wall to listen at the conversation from some place in a distance, [+Escape Art] was a skill that gave aptitude correction to magic if it was used for escape.



[+Phantom Step] was a skill that left behind presence with afterimage piled up on oneself to blur one's own figure, [+Dream Illusion III] was a skill that produce illusion clone of oneself with the limit of three illusion, and then [+Clarity Phantom] was a skill that gave substance to the clone. [+Minimum Mind] was an invisibility assistance skill, when the user was being invisible, this skill would make the user's breathing, heartbeat, presence, and so on, and even the fluctuation of the mind to be in a flat state.



"Shadow Dance" was a skill to run on the wall that Kousuke often used. It couldn't let him stand still on wall, but as long as he had momentum he could continue to run of wall. Its derivation [+Water Dance] was the water version, [+Leaf Dance] was a skill that let him to use things like leaf dancing in the air as instant footstep for jumping.



Now then, have you all noticed? Nonchalantly there was a skill of a different disposition that could be seen just from its name mixing in among all those skills. Probably, that skill was exactly the one that awakened at that legendary decisive battle as the end derivation of assassination skill, the cause that made Kousuke's shame went into Mach speed.



――Abyss Lord (Abyssgate Lord)



The explanation from the status plate was like this.



Effect: In the middle of bloody battle, Abyssgate Lord arrived from dark bottom that is even darker than darkness. Now, o veil of darkness, o the dead of darkness, offer thy strength to the abyss! That is, the infinite power at dream……



The moment Kousuke saw this explanation, needless to say he threw his status plate on the ground with all his strength. It was also needless to say that he also grinded the plate with his foot while he was at it.



First the effect explanation was something cryptic that didn't become explanation, in the first place a nickname (?) that was given to him by chance at a battlefield becoming skill name just like that was also cryptic. Or rather the explanation text was just too painful. He didn't want to believe that this was really the final secret skill of his vocation.



However, just because of that didn't mean that he could neglect a power that he finally obtained without knowing its effect, and above all, there was a reason why Kousuke had to know it no matter what, and so he ascertained the effect while his SAN (TN: sanity) value was being shaved off grindingly. And the result that he understood, it appeared that this skill had the effect of a gradual Limit Break. It didn't raise his strength explosively like Limit Break, but a skill that strengthened all his specs little by little while that skill was in activation.



Furthermore, different from Limit Break, this skill didn't have the side effect of strong lethargy after use. It could really be said as an extraordinary ability.



Although, if it was asked whether it really had no demerit at all……the world wasn't that sweet.



The demerit of [+Abyss Lord]. That was……



While it was activated, the user's speech and conduct would be forcefully made to be a flawless chuuni(Abyssgate Lord)!



Furthermore what was troubling, the activation of the skill was basically possible to be done by the user's discretionary, but there was time when this skill activated before one knew it even when the user had no intention of activating it. Perhaps the cause of that was merely because of Kousuke's inexperience in handling this skill, or possibly there was other factor……



Just like Kousuke said himself, it seemed that the ratio of the forced activation was increasing in proportion with the time he spent with the members of Hauria clan, so most likely the cause was due to the latter……perhaps.



『I had recommended this to you before but, skill sealing artifact. Do you really not need it?』



「Uu. Tha, that's……I want it, but」



Hearing Hajime's words, Kousuke's expression turned bitter while his speech sounded hesitant.



Previously, when Hajime saw Kousuke who because of his speech and conduct that was too much looked like he was really going to sink into abyss, he said「I cannot watch this anymore……」and offered to Kousuke that he would manufacture a skill sealing artifact for him. Just seeing him made even Hajime felt like his chest was struck with pile bunker.



Kousuke's eyes turned bright right after he heard that offer, but his expression immediately changed as though he had recalled something, and then he refused the offer with an expression that was oozing out bitterness. The reason of that was,



「……Rana, she will be dejected then.」



『Really someone like you is……』



That.



Rana――Rapid Shadow, Ranainferna Hauria (Real name: Rana, just Rana. This is important so I'll say it for the third time, it's just Rana).



At the legendary decisive battle, Kousuke used his ability――including his skill and also his nonexistent presence that he had by nature――with all his power, and with all his seriousness to stay invisible, yet regardless of that this rabbit ear lady of Hauria clan found him normally. She was the woman who stole Kousuke's heart. And then, she was also the perpetrator who brought forth Abyssgate Lord to this world.



Above all else, Kousuke feared that if he sealed Abyssgate Lord, then she would fall out of love with him.



『Well, you went many hardships to go out with her . No, that's already crossed over the level of hardship. I think that you are the most amazing guy among our classmates you know, in various meanings. Or rather, I can even say that I'm holding respect for you.』



「I, is that so? It's not really something that much……」



『Don't be ridiculous. Just what is this guy who conquer【Raisen Great Labyrinth】by himself only for the sake of getting recognized by the woman he fell in love with is saying huh.』



「A, hahaha……yeah. I thought I was going to die that time. No, if I didn't use Abyssgate Lord state 24 hour that time, enduring that black history that made me dying in shame, I'd die normally there.」



Yes, just as shown by that skill which was casually written on the status plate, actually Kousuke had conquered【Raisen Great Labyrinth】. Furthermore he did it alone. At the battle against occult group Hydra, he was standing normally on ceiling wasn't because of his skill to wall run or because of Hajime's artifact, but by using his own gravity magic.



Even though the master of【Raisen Great Labyrinth】, Miledy Raisen was already gone, even though there was nothing but the half-automatic type interceptor golem that she left behind, but the labyrinth's trap and the situation where magic was unusable there were still going strong. Also, even though the golem was half-automatic type, they only lost the tactical capability like when Miledy controlled them, but their battle ability didn't decline even for a bit.



And Kousuke conquered such labyrinth by himself in a week and he returned alive. Because he was always in a state of Abyssgate Lord, his physical ability and will power, and then his chuuni speech and conduct, in various meanings they all broke the limit even more than Limit Break, and because he challenged his limit like that, his body and his heart, especially his heart! were all tattered, but even so he returned alive with all his limbs intact. It was only natural that Hajime and others were shocked by that.



『Really, you did well to survive. That was a savage condition that made even princess Kaguya look cute. You, just how much you loved that woman huh?』



「That's, so much that I'd challenge even Nagumo?」



『That's so huh……』



Yes, Kousuke was challenging the great labyrinth with even more preparedness for death than at the decisive battle when it was already completely the epilogue scene if it was a story where the final battle had ended, that was because the lovely rabbit ear onee-san Ranainfe……Rana gave a condition to Kousuke.



Since that day of the decisive battle, during the one month before they returned to earth, Kousuke was making his approach to Rana with great vigor.



However, Ranai……Rana was a Hauria clan, and all members of Hauria clan worshipped Hajime without a single exception. It was to the degree that if Hajime wished it, then any female of Hauria would instantly offer their body to him.



Of course, Hajime had the strongest hitting type bug character Shia Hauria who was the same Hauria clan like them, so there was no hero among them who would proactively try from themselves to obtain Hajime's affection. But, even so they made their "Boss" Hajime, the "demon king-sama that slaughter even god" as their standard for men so……to speak the unvarnished truth, their ideal was absurdly high.



And so, naturally, Kousuke's approach also didn't sway Rana.



「Fuh, I am a shadow that is serving "that person". A shadow doesn't need love……」



Like that,



「You too have strange taste aren't you. Know that you won't get away with just scald if you touch me, for you to pursue a dangerous woman like me……」



Or like that,



「Stop it already. A resolve to continue to walk together with me, in the bottom of darkness that is even deeper than abyss, there is none of that inside you am I right?」



Or like that, those sentences were told to Kousuke with fearless, or possibly bewitching smile on her face.



No matter how many times he confessed, Kousuke was shot down with speech that was undeniably excessive. Such Kousuke was seen by Hajime with a gaze as though he was witnessing a hero, while Shia was staring with intensely reproachful eyes (at Rana).



Even so Kousuke didn't get discouraged, he kept approaching her repeatedly, seeing that as expected even Rana seemed to be moved just a little by his persistence, that in the end it became like this.



「……Uu, do, do you want me that much? Not that, cough-. If you wish for this cursed body to that degree……. But, I belong to boss……not that, cough-. It's unfortunate, however my body already belong to "that person". That's why, okay? Give up……not that, cough-. Shadow live in shadow, and light in light, that is the law. Bu, but, well, if you conquer a great labyrinth or something like boss……or maybe, if you can make even a scratch on boss……it's not like I won't think about it, maybe? Not that-, cough-. Fuh, if you still wish for this body even then, then try to challenge the king of abyss and splendidly exert yourself and win.」



The beautiful rabbit ear onee-san said such thing while fidgeting and looking restless. It went without saying that seeing that caused the inside of Kousuke's chest to contain explosive heat that was equivalent with the eruption of【Guryuen Grand Volcano】before.



Yes, the condition that Rana gave him was to conquer a great labyrinth as well as landing an attack at the demon king Hajime…….



Just as Hajime said, it was a savage condition that might made even princess Kaguya to go「Wai-, you-」.



However, Kousuke who was blazing with the pathos of feverish love that could burn him to ash didn't even listen to the voices of the surrounding that tried to stop him, his figure vanished while no one noticed, he picked【Raisen Great Labyrinth】because it had the highest possibility for him to conquer and also because the age of god magic that he could obtain from there suited him the most, and then he jumped right into it.



After that, a week later. As expected Nagayama Juugo and Nomura Kentarou were anxious because Kousuke didn't go back. They discussed it with Hajime and others, the person concerned Rana was also acting 'perhaps I have said a little bit too much……' with her gaze swimming around, so Shia who was already familiar with conquering that dungeon was about to go out for searching (by no means that they finally noticed that Kousuke wasn't there only after a week passed), it was at that time,



Kousuke returned.



He was tattered all over, but he properly obtained age of god magic――the gravity magic. And then, while making the surrounding dumbfounded with his incomprehensible behavior of obtaining new power after the final battle for some reason, Kousuke made a declaration. He pointed his finger with a snap, and then boldly, with a fearless smile on his face,



「Demon king Nagumo Hajime-. Fight me!」



He said.



Naturally, Juugo yelled「Kousukeee, come back to your sanityyy! Stop doing something like suicideee!」, Kentarou begged「Shirasaki-san-, Ayakoo, anyone is fine! Quickly a recovery magic-. I beg you treat his head carefully!」, Aiko-sensei clung at Hajime while pleading「Hajime-kun, don't be hasty-. Endo-kun is, that, he is just a little tired! His head is-」, and then Kouki, Ryutaro, and Suzu stood in the way between Endo and Hajime, they were trying to buy time for Kousuke to escape while getting drenched in cold sweat with the preparedness of death.



All those caused Hajime to say「You guys, just what do you think I am……」with his cheeks cramping, but he was reaping what he sow, so no one consoled him.



In that place that was filled with chaos, Kousuke completely ignored his friends who were stopping him, his gaze turned toward Rana and then he proclaimed with a loud voice, willing it to reach into her heart.



「Rana-san-. I love you! The condition that you gave me――if you can put even a wound at boss, then it's not like I won't think about it, those words, I believe in them! In front of Rana-san's eyes, I'll put a wound at Nagumo, clearly and distinctly-!!!」



Hearing that proclamation, the classmates who didn't know that Rana's condition was just her hiding her embarrassment finally guessed the reason of Kousuke conquering a great labyrinth and his war declaration to Hajime which could only be thought as suicide wish, and they thought.



――So it's Hauria again-!!!!!



Everyone simultaneously directed criticizing gaze of「What the hell you have said to him!」to Rana. Rana who received those gazes were drenched in cold sweat while her gaze was swimming around as expected. Her cheeks reddened a bit from Kousuke's declaration while the Hauria females at the surrounding were giving her broad grin and teasing.



Now then, Hajime who received the challenge because of all those felt somewhat of a sympathy at the scenario of a boy challenging a powerful enemy for the sake of the woman he loved and he accepted that challenge.



Of course, he had no plan to get done in that easily. Even he had women that he loved, doing something like an unsightly fight in front of those women, was something that wouldn't do no matter what kind of circumstances it was, and above all, Kousuke himself would ask to be excused from "being gifted a mercy win".



And so, Hajime and Kousuke carried out a duel, and the result was――



The fact that currently Rana was accepting Kousuke's feeling was the clearest proof there was. The strongest assassin character, + full power Abyssgate Lord state, the combination of those weren't just for show.



It was a grand battle in various meanings but……that would be told in another chance.



Kousuke who accomplished the great feat of conquering【Raisen Great Labyrinth】solo, as well as dealing a blow at the godslaying demon king, he splendidly shot down Rana's heart with that challenge that put his life at stake.



But, naturally, although Rana had entrusted her to Kousuke, the fact that Rana was a Hauria didn't change, the time that he spent together with her, and also the time when he was welcomed by Kam and others as family, all of those times were basically spent as chuni. Naturally, because of that his Abyssgate Lord time was also increasing……



「Nagumoo, perhaps, I cannot go back anymore……. Perhaps, I should just go until the very end just like this instead.」



『You are really driven to the wall huuh. But, even if you stop being Abys――chuuni, I don't think that girl Rana will fall out of love from you though? The fact is that you broke through that girl's savage condition right from the front. That is something that nobody else will be able to do. No matter even if you are chuuni or not, but there is no way she will abandon you who have gone that far for her sake after this late.』



「Perhaps, that's so. But try to think from the opposite. From here on too I'll spend time together with Hauria clan as relative. If I act normally among them by myself……won't the away game feeling get bad like that? See, it will be like a guy that cannot read the mood who will make a realistic retort like『This kind of thing is impossible in real world』when you are playing fantasy game.」



『Wha, what a difficult guy……. Well, that's an example that is easy to understand though. Indeed, doing that will dampen the mood.』



「Right? This guy, he can't read the mood huh, or what a boring guy, or he is not fun huh……if Rana think of me like that, I don't have the confidence that I can keep living even then.」



『Don't assert so surely like that geez. Rather, you cannot be helped anymore, in the end Endo, you have already found the answer inside yourself right? That's why, I too just tried to casually put it aside……』



「Listen to me here! I too know that I'm just complaining! But I want someone to listen to me still! Recently when I talked this to Juugo or Kentarou, both of them would just act 'saying this again huh~' and won't listen to me at all! You are my kindred-spirit that know the same pain aren't you!?」



『Aa, got it, got it. That's why don't scream like that to the phone.』



In the end, it seemed that Kousuke had the resolve to shoulder by himself (?) his shame or his metal damage, the point was that he just wanted Hajime to listen to him grumbling. Because Hajime understood that, that at first he tried to put it aside, but it seemed that Kousuke wanted him to keep him company in him letting out his stress.



Hajime who was faithfully keeping company with such Kousuke was also completely different from the time when he was at Tortus, perhaps it should be said that he had mellowed. Though perhaps there was also the feeling of sympathy in him as a comrade who knew the same pain of heart just like Kousuke said.



After that, for a while Kousuke spoke his grumbling at length, between times he also asked for love consultation (?) like a way to progress his relationship with Rana, before finally Kousuke's mind was recovered, it was at that time that Hajime finally spoke the main topic of why he called――the detailed story of the occult group Hydra.



『So? I don't think that you will make any miss but, was the treatment to those guys went well?』



「Yeah, no problem with that. Hydra has become a charity group inside those guys. I think they will direct the funds of their society to unfortunate children from here on. I don't do anything to the bunches that weren't at that place though.」



『I don't mind that. After all they are a big organization. It seems that they have members everywhere, I'll deal with those. Well, perhaps I'll ask you to do something like this again if you happen to be nearby the target location while you are in your private business like this time.』



「No, I wasn't really close with this place. I was at North America you know? You, aren't your sense of distance getting weird because you can use gate?」



Kousuke glared with reproachful eyes while understanding that Hajime couldn't see him. Which wasn't surprising. In the first place Kousuke left Japan wasn't to purposefully respond to Hajime's request. If that was the case then no matter how extremely busy Hajime was, it would be faster if he opened a gate and directly marched into the enemy base.



This time Hajime requested Kousuke to deal with antagonistic organization was because the timing was just right when Kousuke was overseas in a private business using his winter vacation. And then, the private business of Kousuke was to boldly observe battlefield medical treatment in practice. Therefore, the destination of Kousuke was a country with inadequate medical system, there he learned directly in the spot, and by the time he thought 'well, perhaps I should go back soon?', an imperial command came down from the demon king-sama to him.



By the way, for the moment Kousuke was a student preparing for examinations to enter the medical university he wished for, but perhaps it was a present for doing his best at another world, his skill "Language Comprehension" also could be used for all languages on earth, he was already like a native speaker right from the start at the foreign language subject, the other students preparing for examination were in the state of teary eyes in that subject, so Kousuke had relatively more leeway there.



Also, Kousuke wanted to enter medical university not because he wanted doctor license or that he wanted to become an elite doctor, but only because he wanted knowledge and technique that could be put to use at Tortus someday, so there was no need for him to enter into a university with that high of a standard, like that sometimes he was going around like this relaxing while also observing real practice of medical treatment.



The base of occult group Hydra that was Allgrey residence was located at Britain, so thinking with common sense, it couldn't be said that it was a place that was close with the place that Kousuke visited this time. It wasn't like Kousuke had a gate so he normally made use of commercial airplane (he had quite a lot of request fee transferred to his account from Hajime though) to travel until here which made it even farther.



『I told you before that if it's you I'll at least make a degraded crystal key for you didn't I?』



「……I'll refrain from that. Nagumo's artifact is too convenient. If I grow to rely it like it's only natural, then it feels like I'll think of normal life as inconvenient, that's scary. If I'm traveling then I'll limit myself to my own feet and public transportation.」



『You, even though you have thin shadow but something you say something with depth huh.』



「You don't need to add about the thin shadow-. Just the request fee you transferred is enough. About this much is just right for a timid person like me.」



Kousuke could feel Hajime smiling wryly at the other side of the phone from his words. Kousuke who didn't receive really high assessment from the surrounding because of the thinness of his shadow fundamentally had low self-esteem. Even though he always produced an outrageous result "when he noticed", he wasn't evaluated by other, that was why it didn't become an awareness of him that what he had done was amazing.



『Well, anyway, you saved me the trouble there. I planned to crush them sooner or later, but recently I'm seriously busy. If those guys start to move all out it will be really troublesome, but now their heads are crushed before that happen, so I guess they won't move for a while. Now I can devote myself to what I want to do with this spare time.』



「That's great. If I remember right, you are doing various things like making it easier to open the gate to Tortus right? If that works then I'll be able to meet with Rana more casually.」



Leaving aside Kousuke's low self-esteem, their talk came to a finish after Hajime heard about what he wanted to ask. Kousuke earnestly reminded Hajime that he would cooperate with this kind of odd jobs, so he should hurry with establishing a way to make it easier to come and go to Tortus, after that he was about to hang up the phone.



「Then, later. Nagu――」



It was at that time.



Suddenly, *gyagyagyagya-!!* such sound of something slipping fiercely resounded.



「Wha, what is!?」



『Oi, Endo, what――』



The shocked Endo turned his gaze toward the street where the sound of slipping and scream of people were reverberating from, right after that a thunderous sound that drowned the words of Hajime came, a car was drifting through the street corner rushing out toward here.



The thunderous roar was the sound of that car running wild coming into contact with the car parked on the street. The parked car that was hit had its mirror blown away and its tail lamp popping off. However, while it clearly caused such incident, the car that made its entrance with a drift didn't show any sign of stopping at all, far from that it accelerated further.



Toward the café where Kousuke was.



「Wha-, wa-――!?」



The couple, businessman, and then the beautiful waitress who were also at the terrace screamed while tumbling over trying to escape inside the café. The next moment, the black car that looked tough pulled its emergency brake just before it charged into the terrace and its rear part mowed the terrace heartily.



Wreckage of terrace danced midair, and then tableware and cooking……



「Uoh. That's a waste!」



Kousuke was evading the wreckages of the terrace before jumping to the air and with *hyupapapa-* caught the sandwich that he still hadn't touched! In his hand was a plate that he secured unnoticed while the sandwich was put on it before it was blown away still beautifully untouched due to Kousuke's exquisite skill. While he was at it, he had put away his smartphone into his pocket unnoticed and in exchange used his hand to use the glass that he had secured to skillfully secure the blown away beverage to a certain degree.



And then, he caught midair the last piece of sandwich with his mouth and lightly landed on top of the café's signboard that was placed on the walkway.



「Mugumuguh, puhah. Good grief, a car suddenly came charging, just what in the world――」



Kousuke swallowed the sandwich that he caught in his mouth and he spoke his complain with his two hands holding plate and glass, there his gaze suddenly met someone.



The black car that was temporarily stopping after crashing into the terrace. From the window of that car's passenger seat, there was a blond haired girl with his mouth opened wide looking as though 'I had seen something unbelievable!', her gaze staring fixedly at Kyousuke.



Beside the girl who had pretty blonde hair that was tied into side tail and almond-shaped eyes with unyielding spirit that reminded one of cat, there was also a beauty with crisp appearance and very short hair style who was the perpetrator of this reckless driving. That very short hair lady was also staring fixedly at Kousuke.



「A, aa~, he, hello? Are you two, injured?」



Kousuke was making a bit awkward expression from the stares of the two that was too straightforward while he tried to say such thing for the moment. Perhaps reacting to that, the cat eye side-tail girl was opening her mouth to say something but,



「Eh, wai-, again!?」



A fierce slipping sound that suddenly could be heard made Kousuke's cheeks convulsed and he turned his gaze there. Ahead of his gaze, there were the scene of similar black cars, two, three of them drifting while rushing out from the street corner.



The woman with very short hair also seemed to notice that, she recovered her time that stopped from witnessing Kousuke's absurd movement. She immediately moved the steering wheel, stepped on the accelerator and rapidly took off right away. The cat eye side-tail girl passionately kissed「Mugyuu-!?」the side glass due to the centrifugal force.



The black car boarded by two females seemed to, no, they were really running away from the black cars that came from behind, their car was driving dangerously once more while vanishing at the other side of the road. After that, the three black cars passed through in pursuit.



It was a scene that happened out of nowhere. In a hair's breadth, the couple and businessman that had escaped from the terrace into the café fearfully peaked outside, while Kousuke was drinking up his beverage with *zugo-――* sound.



『Oo~i, Endo. What happened?』



Actually the call was still connected all this time, the voice of Hajime resounded from the smartphone.



Kousuke jumped down from the signboard and gently put down the glass that he had just drained on that signboard. His gaze was moving to the other side of the road where the cars were disappearing while he took out his smartphone, and then he responded to Hajime seriously.



「Nagumo, as expected, foreign country is scaryyy.」



『……You, what are you saying?』



Hajime's retort drifted lightly into the blowing wind and vanished completely.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Now then, about the custom (?) heroine attribute,



Blonde side-tail + Lab coat girl + unyielding cat-eyes + ○○ + ○○



Something will surely be entered into those ○○. Please use your imagination if you like.



By the way, the model for her is Akita Neru. Tda-style is goddess. (TN: Tda-style is character model that is used at Miku Miku Dance, Vocaloid)



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





